<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59255 </DOCNO>
<HT>  "jpcar002___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<H1>   JPRS REPORTS </H1>
<H2>  January Reports </H2>
<AU>  JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL </F>
<F P=101> GENERAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Reviews Western Economic Policies </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0054A Beijing XIANDAI GUOJI GUANXI [CONTEMPORARY 
INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS] in Chinese No 47, 20 Sep 93 pp 30-33 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0054A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XIANDAI GUOJI GUANXI [CONTEMPORARY 
INTERNATIONAL RELATIONS] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Deng Zhiqing (6772 1807 3237): "Several Major </F>
Revisions in Western Economic Policy Thoughts"] 
  [Text] In recent years, because of the protracted economic 
recession and because of increasingly intense international 
competition, many large Western nations have made major 
revisions in their economic theories and policies. With 
President Clinton's election in the United States, the policy 
stand that advocates active government intervention in the 
economy is on the ascendent, replacing the 1980's laissez-faire 
as advocated by former British Prime Minister Thatcher and 
former US President Reagan. 
<H3>  I. Emphasize Stimulating Economic Growth; Besides Monetary 
Policies, Attention Is Focused on Fiscal Policies, Especially 
Direct Government Investments </H3>
  It began in the United States, Canada, and Britain and was 
followed by Japan and Germany -- nations have gone into economic 
recession since entering the 1990's. To stimulate economic 
recovery, many have lowered the interest rates again and again. 
For example, in the United States, the Federal Reserve has 
lowered the federal fund and discount rates 17 times between 
1990 and 1992. The federal fund rate has dropped from 10 percent 
to 3.25 percent and the discount rate has fallen to 3 percent, 
the lowest in 27 years. Even Germany, which has always made 
controlling inflation its primary economic goal, has been under 
pressure from other nations and has lowered its interest rates 
six times since last September, and at the end of July, its 
discount rate had dropped to 6.75 percent and its collateralized 
loan rates had fallen to 7.75 percent. However, because of the 
1980's monetary overexpansion, enterprises and individuals in 
the West are busy paying off old debts now that interest rates 
are down and are not increasing investment or spending, and 
therefore this monetary policy has not done much to stimulate 
the economy. For this reason, the United States, Europe, and 
Japan are seeking help from fiscal measures and increasing 
government spending to promote economic growth. Japan took the 
lead last August in announcing a 10.7 trillion yen ($86 billion) 
government spending plan. This April, it further proposed an 
unprecedented 13.2 trillion yen ($117 billion) package to combat 
recession: One-half of the money will be invested in the 
construction of public facilities. The European Community 
ratified an economic revitalization plan worth 42 billion in 
Eurocurrency at a summit meeting in Edinburgh last year and at 
the financial and economic ministers meeting this April, and in 
the summit meeting held in Copenhagen this June, they decided to 
add another 3 billion Eurocurrency's worth of investments. 
Primarily, they intend to increase government spending on 
infrastructure, encourage private investments, and help medium 
and small enterprises. To help the U.S. economy get out of the 
economic doldrums of the last several years, upon taking office, 
President Clinton unveiled a plan to use government investments 
to stimulate economic growth. The short-term measures include 
government investments of $28.3 billion this and next year. The 
money will be spent on the construction of public facilities, 
extending unemployment insurance, creating jobs, and providing 
tax credits to businesses. Although the Congress has only 
approved a very small portion of that plan, the plan itself is 
an indication that when it comes to "Clintonomics," the 
government will have a bigger role. 
  Using government investments to stimulate economic growth is 
not a new theory or political stand. If we look at the history 
of development of this century's Western economic theories and 
economic policies, we will find that the period before the 
crisis of the 1930's was dominated by Marshall's neoclassical 
theory of free market economy. The great depression of the 
1930's, a crisis of unprecedented depth, protraction, and scale, 
pronounced the bankruptcy of laissez-faire's claim that market 
mechanisms could achieve full employment and stability. 
Keynesianism which emphasized state interventions gradually 
swept the West and became the main theoretical basis for 
economic policies in many countries. Keynesian theory on 
controlling effective demand led to widespread state 
interventions, resulting in "big government, big spending, high 
taxes, and expensive welfare." Although it helped the Western 
developed nations achieve a high rate of economic growth after 
the War and through the 1960's, by the mid-1970's, its defects 
became increasingly obvious, manifesting themselves in the 
phenomenon of "stagflation," a condition of prolonged economic 
stagnation accompanied by runaway inflation. The late 1970's and 
early 1980's marked the rise of a new kind of laissez-faire in 
the form of monetarism as advocated by British Prime Minister 
Thatcher and in the supply-side economics which former U.S. 
President Reagan firmly believed in. "Thatcherism" and 
"Reaganomics" temporarily halted the stagflation in the West and 
helped sustain a fairly long period of slow growth, but they 
also left behind the ill consequences of big deficits, large 
debts, and high unemployment rate. Eventually in the early 
1990's, another serious post-war economic recession erupted, 
again putting the theories of laissez-faire in jeopardy. The 
Bush administration, which inherited "Reaganomics," had no 
remedies and eventually lost the election. With the Democrats in 
the White House, the "anticlassical" school of Western economics 
is now on center stage. Of course, "Clintonomics" is not a 
complete revival of Keynesianism, and Clinton himself said that 
he has chosen a "third road" between Keynesianism and 
laissez-faire: While increasing government intervention, he 
wants to streamline government and reform the welfare system to 
cut budget deficits. "Clintonomics" in fact represents a new 
direction in today's Western economic policies, that is, 
Keynesianism is dead, and laissez-faire has gone through 
its rise and fall. Efforts must be made to combine the two to 
develop a new kind of economic theory and create new 
mechanisms. 
<H3>  II. Putting Industrial Policy on the Government's Policy 
Agenda </H3>
  Industrial policy is the policy a government formulates to 
directly interfere in the development of some industries as a 
way to supplement the market's inadequate role. In Europe and 
the United States, because they believe in a relatively free 
economy, unless national security is threatened, they generally 
do not advocate government interference in industrial 
development. They believe that the government's choice of 
industries is often influenced by political interests while the 
rise and fall of industries should be determined by the market. 
Although some European countries and the United States have at 
times adopted policies to help certain industries, they have 
mostly been in the form of assistance and not direct promotion, 
and they have never been systematic. Since the late 1980's, the 
end of the Cold War has made economic competition, especially 
competition in science and technology, the focal point of 
international relationships. Amid the intense competition, 
Japan, which has a clear industrial policy, has seized the upper 
hand, and increasingly European and American industries are 
unable to compete. This is demonstrated by the large trade 
deficits against Japan and the fact that they are gradually 
losing ground to Japanese advanced technologies. In 1992, the 
United State ran up nearly $50 billion in trade deficits against 
Japan, which accounted for more than half of its foreign trade 
deficits. The European Community also has more than $30 billion 
in trade deficits against Japan. Faced with Japan's overwhelming 
offensive, and upon studying the Japanese government's success 
with the development of its automobile, electronics, and 
computer industries, advocates of European and U.S. industrial 
policies believe that the "market economy by itself cannot 
nurture industries deemed vital to the national economy, and 
therefore the government must intervene." To win in future 
economic competition and come out ahead in international 
competition, European and American governments have formulated 
important industrial development policies and plans, the most 
important of which are: 
  1. Setting up specialized government agencies to lead 
and coordinate national scientific research work. U.S. 
President Clinton has already proposed the setting up of a 
federal science, engineering, and technology coordination 
committee to plan government-funded R&amp;D projects. The 
committee 
will be headed by the President's science and technology adviser 
and chairman of the White House Science and Technology Policy 
Office. The European Community Committee proposed a new set of 
scientific research guiding principles in March of this year 
which suggested setting up a technical assessment agency 
responsible for coordinating regional, national, and European 
Community tasks to strengthen the integration of their 
scientific and technical work. 
  2. Putting the emphasis on high-tech industries. 
With the constant development of science and technology, what 
determines the comparative advantage of a nation in terms of its 
ability to compete is no longer natural resources but scientific 
and technological resources. Therefore, a policy on science and 
technology has become the core of every nation's industrial 
policy. U.S.President Clinton pointed out again and again that 
"the key to a nation's economic success lies in taking the lead 
in technological invention and commercialization." Soon after he 
took office, he went to the Silicon Valley and announced that 
the government will try to form a partnership with industries to 
build more companies like those in the Silicon Valley which will 
introduce even more new technologies to help the United States 
maintain its lead. He also proposed specific plans to support 
the computer and telecommunications and others in the 
information industry and develop high-speed trains and a new 
generation of automobiles. In the Fourth General Research and 
Development Plan (1994-1998) proposed by the European Community 
in April of this year, scientific research outlay was increased 
to 13.3 billion in Eurocurrency, which more than doubled that 
under the Third Plan. Specifically, three-quarters of the funds 
will be spent on information and telecommunications 
technologies, industrial technologies, environmental science, 
life science, and energy industry. 
  3. Increasing the propagation and application of the 
results of R&amp;D. Superiority in basic science and technology 
research is only potential ability to compete. To achieve real 
capability, the results of advanced science and technologies 
must find commercial applications. Therefore, while science and 
technology policy is the focal point of any industrial policy, 
the commercialization of the results of R&amp;D is the focal 
point 
of any science and technology policy. The major policies most 
nations have adopted today are: A) Making R&amp;D projects more 
practical. The United States has identified that the focus of 
federal R&amp;D projects is on new technologies of significance 
to 
economic growth and has removed the word "Defense" from DARPA 
[Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency], changing it to 
ARPA, to put the emphasis on civilian technology research. The 
European Community meanwhile is prepared to allocate 600 million 
in Eurocurrency over the next few years to fund the assessment, 
development, and application of R&amp;D results. B) Increasing 
the 
exchange of information between government and civilians. The 
United States will open up its national laboratories to 
civilians and is going to raise $80 billion before 1997 to set 
up an information network covering the nation's 50 states, so as 
to make sure that the government can play a more effective role 
in coordinating the propagation of information nationwide and in 
transferring the results of R&amp;D. C) Providing financial and 
material support to the development of civilian R&amp;D 
institutions. The United States has estimated that this step 
will cost the government an additional $6 billion over the next 
4 years. To guide civilian enterprises in the development and 
utilization of advanced technologies, the U.S.government has 
also decided to set up a "Critical Technologies Research 
Institute" to turn the results of some R&amp;D projects, such as 
numerically controlled machine tools and robotics, into products 
that can compete internationally within the next two to three 
years. 
  4. Emphasizing education and training. To improve 
the workers' technical skills so as to increase enterprise 
productivity and competitiveness, Europe and the United States 
have implemented educational reform and have raised the level of 
basic knowledge while adopting various measures to enhance the 
workers' professional training. In the EC's Fourth Science and 
Research Development Plan, for the first time, the importance of 
education and training was stressed, and 785 million in 
Eurocurrency was allocated to education. "Clintonomics" even 
emphasizes "putting people first." The federal government plans 
to spend $60 billion in the next four years on raising 
educational standards and training workers. In his new science 
and technology policy, President Clinton proposed implementing 
an education and training program to make sure that all American 
workers have a chance to continue their education. To make 
education and training more technology-oriented, the government 
will support the development of computers and telecommunications 
equipment used in schools and for professional training in 
enterprises. 
  In addition, they have adopted active foreign trade policies 
to create an environment of "fair" competition, and internally 
they have amended their antitrust laws to encourage enterprises 
to join forces to meet foreign competition. 
<H3>  III. Trade Management Has Become the Theme of the West's 
Trade Policies </H3>
  As the Western nations gradually put their industrial 
policies into effect, they also make drastic changes in their 
trade policies. Since the end of the War, the world trade system 
has been dominated by the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade 
[GATT] whose purpose is to advance free trade. Despite the 
constant trade conflicts among nations, up through the Bush 
administration, free trade has been the main theme. Since 
President Clinton took office, however, he has pursued a more 
aggressive trade policy than his predecessors. He fights trade 
protectionism on the one hand and emphasizes fair trade on the 
other hand. Analysts believe that the developed nations, 
led by the United States, are changing their trade policies from 
free trade to managed trade. Its characteristics are: 
  1. More trade conflicts resulting from efforts to 
capture "fair" trade opportunities. Unlike protectionism's 
building of barriers to keep out foreign competition or the 
policy of non-intervention under laissez-faire, managed trade 
advocates highly competitive international trade, that is, it 
supports opening up the markets but meanwhile it seeks "fair" 
trade opportunities and emphasizes active government 
participation. Accordingly, while the Western governments 
continue to attach importance to mechanisms of multilateral 
cooperation, they often adopt unilateral measures of sanctions 
and retaliation. As soon as Clinton took office, he immediately 
adopted an aggressive trade policy. On 27 January, the Commerce 
Department announced the imposition of punitive tariffs on steel 
materials imported from 19 countries including those in Europe 
and Japan. Subsequently, it put pressure on Europe and Japan 
regarding government contracts and the aerospace, 
semi-conductor, and automobile industries and so on. At a 
US-Japan summit meeting, President Clinton directly asked Japan 
to formulate specific goals to open up its markets. Meanwhile, 
Europe and Japan have been waging a tit-for-tat battle. On 28 
May, the United States announced a ban on several EC companies 
from bidding on U.S.federal government projects. In retaliation, 
at the 12 nation EC foreign minister meeting held on 8 June, 
U.S. companies were banned from bidding on EC member nation 
projects. Japan has also openly criticized the United States, 
saying that "using managed trade measures and unilateral threats 
will not resolve its trade balance problems." All these are 
attributable to the fact that since the end of the Cold War, 
economic security has become the focal point of foreign 
relations for all nations. President Clinton, who has made 
revitalizing the U.S.economy his primary administrative goal, 
has put opening up foreign markets as his foreign policy goal. 
His foreign policy clearly puts economics above all else. In a 
series of meetings with heads of states since he took office, 
Clinton has without exception put economic and trade issues 
first. Because of uneven economic and trade development, and 
adding the effects of the recession, it is expected that 
economic and trade conflicts among the United States, Europe, 
and Japan will further intensify. 
  2. More non-tariff trade barriers. Under GATT, 
nations have gradually lowered their tariffs. Today, the 
developed nations are imposing an average of 5 percent tariff on 
manufactured goods, and the developing nations' average tariff 
is only around 15 percent. For this reason, non-tariff trade 
barriers are becoming increasingly important, and governments 
too are playing an increasingly bigger role. Non-tariff barriers 
fall into five main categories. Besides the usual voluntary 
export limits, import quotas, and price controls, there are 
quasi tariff measures and administrative measures. The former 
measures refers to taxes imposed for the purpose of raising the 
price of imports. They include tariff quotas and seasonal 
tariffs. The latter refers to administrative measures to control 
the import of sensitive commodities. They primarily include the 
checking and monitoring of import prices and quantity and 
antidumping and antisubsidy measures, and specifically 
antidumping measures are most common. Based on GATT statistics, 
from July 1989 to June 1990, there were 96 antidumping cases in 
the international markets, but between January 1991 to June 
1992, there were 237 cases. Some experts believe that 
antidumping has become a hidden EC industrial policy. Frequent 
antidumping activities have jeopardized GATT's success in 
reducing tariffs. It is estimate that if we add the antidumping 
tax, the average U.S.tariff on manufactured goods is 23 percent 
and not the nominal 6 percent. 
  3. The formation of regional economic blocs increases 
bilateral and regional cooperation. With the inauguration 
of the unified European market, the signing of NAFTA, and the 
emergence of economic cooperation mechanisms at different levels 
throughout Asia, the world economy is gradually separated into 
three major economic blocs comprised of America, Europe, and 
Asia. Because these three economic blocs control the absolute 
majority of world trade, regional economic blocs will dominate 
the development of trade policies of all nations. Currently, 
there is no consensus on what effects regional economic blocs 
will have on the world economy and on world trade, but one point 
is certain: The development of regional economic blocs will 
cause nations' trade policies to change from the kind of 
multilateralism advocated by GATT to those extending mutual 
benefits on a bilateral or regional basis. Most developing 
nations which have been excluded from the three major blocs will 
be at a disadvantage. 
  4. The scope of commodity management widens. With 
the constant improvement in the mix of products being traded, 
more and more products are put under trade management. European 
antidumping measures which included products such as ethanol, 
cement, and aspirin have expanded to cover forklifts and 
computers. The United State's agricultural product, automobile, 
steel, and semi-conductor industries are constantly putting 
pressure on the government for protection. In the 1990's, 
managed products not only will include labor intensive products 
and agricultural products but will also include labor and 
services and high tech products. The developed nations will 
especially stress protection of intellectual property rights. 
The developing nations will face increasingly greater pressure. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59256 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs on British Strategy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM00073A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 23, 24 Jun 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM00073A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No 50 and 51 of the serialized memoirs of Xu </F>
Jiatun (6079 1367 1470): "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [23 Jun p 2] </H5>
  [Text] Return Means "Returning Government to China," 
Not "Returning Government to the People"; Britain Wants Radical 
Change in 13 Years, No Change in 50 Years 
  Hong Kong currently has a colonial type of government. The 
governor, appointed by the British monarch, has supreme ruling 
power, so in reality the Hong Kong Government is an autocracy 
with the governor acting as dictator. The Executive Council and 
Legislative Council are nothing more than consulting bodies; the 
latter is not a true lawmaking body. The Hong Kong Government 
bears no resemblance to that in Britain, where power is divided 
among the three branches of government for checks and balances. 
  Both the Green Paper and White Paper made it clear what the 
British are up to: An attempt to foist on Hong Kong what it did 
in its other colonies, namely decolonization. But Hong Kong is 
different from other British colonies. It is part of China 
territorially, so there is no question of its becoming 
independent. Britain should return to China the Chinese 
territory it had invaded. It should return the government to 
China, not to the people of Hong Kong. As for returning the 
government to the people, that would be up to the Chinese 
authorities. 
  In the Green Paper, the British were still taking a go-slow 
approach. In the White Paper, however, they were trying to speed 
things up. About elections to the Legislative Council, for 
instance, the proposal was to advance to 1985 what was 
originally scheduled for 1988, that is, three years earlier. 
Under the Green Paper, there would be six elected seats on the 
council in 1984 and 1985 and 12 by 1988. The White Paper, on the 
other hand, called for 12 elected seats. 
  In its debate on the government report with a number of 
Legislative Council members such as Dame Lydia Dunn, the Hong 
Kong British government also proposed setting up a ministerial 
system. It suggested that the government reassess the central 
organization, take steps to put together a ministerial system, 
something similar to what they had in the United States, and 
give the legislative body decision making power. The idea was to 
remove the decision making power currently held by the Executive 
Council, actually the governor, and hand it over to the 
legislature. That would change the present government framework 
fundamentally. 
  Many people in Hong Kong were pleased with the British 
Government's relentless push for a representative system in Hong 
Kong and its move to change the local political framework 
drastically. Mostly these people had no confidence in China. 
Many other people, a majority of them from the upper and middle 
to upper crusts of society, were also concerned. 
  The current issue of the magazine JIUSHI NIANDAI published 
two interviews, one with the senior unofficial member of the 
Executive Council, Zhong Shiyuan [6945 1102 337], and the other 
with a high-ranking official about to retire, Secretary for Home 
Affairs Li Dunyi [7812 2415 5030]. Their conversations spoke 
volumes. 
  According to Zhong Shiyuan, when China said things would not 
change for 50 years, it did not mean there would be no change 
from the way things would be in 1997, but from the existing 
state of affairs. So he had three worries. First, would Hong 
Kong really be run by the people of Hong Kong, or would it be 
run by Beijing? Second, how can we ensure true non-intervention? 
Is it like the headquarters telling the manager of a branch 
office there would be no intervention? Third, can China 
guarantee that its open policy would remain in place and that it 
would not go back to its ultra-leftist line? Hong Kong had lost 
the first round, he said, so there was no reason why Hong Kong 
should keep the form of organization of the colonial government. 
Instead, it should adopt a political system of democratic 
elections. It should spend the three years switching to a 
representative system. 
  Zhong Shiyuan disclosed two other things. First, he realized 
full well that when China said there would be no change for 50 
years, it meant there would be no change from the existing 
situation, not the conditions in 1997. Be that as it may, they 
wanted to change the existing situation in 13 years. Second, 
how? A political system of popular elections. 
  What Zhong Shiyuan said made it clear that the British 
strategy toward China's takeover of Hong Kong had changed. 
Executive Council members were kept abreast of what was going on 
in every round of the Sino-British talks. Many times either 
their opinions reflected those of the Hong Kong Government or 
they saw eye to eye with the latter. 
  Li Dunyi was even more blunt. He said unequivocally, "Times 
have changed. We need to move from one era to the next. The way 
things are, the governor is appointed by people outside Hong 
Kong. We hope they will treat the people well, but they may turn 
out to be bad guys. I don't think anybody wants to see this 
situation continue in the next 13 years, all the way to the 
transfer of power. That is why we must switch to another system 
of government, specifically a legislature created through 
elections and an executive body that is held accountable to the 
legislature." He told the people of Hong Kong, "It is up to you 
from now on." The interviewer, JIUSHI NIANDAI chief editor Li Yi 
[2621 1837], asked him, "In the past the government has always 
shied away from changing the political system, even contending 
that few local citizens wanted to see a change in the system. 
Now it is pushing for change, radical change, in the political 
system." Referring to this inconsistency, Lidunyi said, "How can 
we justify it?" Li Yi then asked, "You had no choice under the 
circumstances?" He answered, "Absolutely not." Li Yi asked, "In 
the past some government officials kept telling us, `Democracy 
is not the only good system.' Indeed we don't have a democratic 
system..." Li Dunyi said, "That's right. Things were more quiet 
before there were any politics." 
  As a high-ranking official in the Hong Kong Government, Li 
Dunyi was privy to insider information even though he was about 
to retire. What he said proved that Britain had changed its 
strategy in its maneuverings with China and awkwardly exposed 
the hypocrisy of the British government when it declared its 
intent to "return government to the people." An article at the 
time said, "Britain wants to make radical change in the next 13 
years but demands no change for 50 years." [Installment No. 50] 
<H5>  [24 Jun p 2] </H5>

    Britain Jumps the Gun on Political Reform; First 
Press Conference Touches Off Controversy 
  At the beginning we did not fully understand the matter. We 
only knew that Britain wanted to introduce a representative 
system but had no inkling of its desire for radical change. I 
was not sure about the situation in Beijing, but at least that 
was the case in Hong Kong. When Beijing said, "No comment," we 
echoed it. In response to a reporter's question, I added, "This 
has to do with the British Government." Later Beijing picked up 
this line, saying, "This is a matter for the British Government. 
We have assumed no such obligation." Perhaps taking this as a 
sign of Chinese acquiescence, more and more Britain acted as 
though what it was doing was "inevitable." 
  Based on information from all sources, particularly the 
statement "radical change in 13 years, no change in 50 years," 
we concluded that the British Government had indeed changed its 
strategy toward Hong Kong's return to China. Its jumping the gun 
on political reform for Hong Kong was all in all a premeditated 
move, a tangible expression of its assertions that it would 
continue its ties with Hong Kong beyond 1997 to protect its 
interests. It might continue to play the "public opinion card," 
even turning it into the "democracy card," and advanced the plan 
in the Sino-British Joint Declaration to reform the governmental 
system of the special administrative region after 1997. It might 
sell its political reform plan to the Hong Kong people as an 
example of British benevolent rule for Hong Kong in order to win 
the locals' goodwill and support. At the same time, its actions 
would further divide society, helping the Hong Kong British 
authorities nurture and develop pro-British forces which could 
be relied on to continue to rule Hong Kong after 1997 as a 
regent of London even in the absence of British rule. At my 
request Ji Pengfei [1213 7720 7378] called a meeting to discuss 
this matter. The meeting was attended by leaders from the Hong 
kong and Macao Affairs Office, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, 
and the Foreign Affairs Office. 
  By then the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Affairs had already 
made representations to Britain, demanding that the switch to a 
representative system be consistent with the future basic law 
for Hong Kong and not affect the smooth transition in 1997. The 
British had not made any formal response by the time the meeting 
was held. At the meeting we speculated that Britain might try to 
bring about another kind of transition, that by speeding up 
reform it might create a fait accompli which the basic law must 
live with. By effecting radical change in 13 years while 
demanding no change for 50 years, it would in effect go back on 
its commitments under the Sino-British Joint Declaration. This 
was something China could not accept and must do its best to 
prevent. We were also aware that the Green Paper and White Paper 
had whetted the appetite for democracy among some people in 
society. If there was absolutely no change in 13 years, these 
people would be disappointed. There was also the need to help 
the British find a way to exit gracefully. In accordance with 
Deng Xiaoping's "step by step" approach, any move affecting the 
political system must be incremental and cautious. 
  At the meeting I told Ji Pengfei that I had promised 
reporters in Hong Kong that I would hold a press conference upon 
my return from Beijing. Should they ask me what was discussed at 
the meeting, I said to Ji Pengfei, I would respond in accordance 
with the spirit of the conference. Ji Pengfei nodded and did not 
offer any objection. 
  On 21 November I held a press conference at the XINHUA NEWS 
AGENCY Hong Kong branch, the very first in my life. Both TV 
networks covered the event live. 
  The moderator, Yang Qi [2799 1142], asked the reporters to 
present the questions in writing so that I could address them 
collectively after they were collected and assembled. 
  The press conference was about to end when a female reporter 
from a radio station suddenly posed this question, "What is most 
essential to maintaining prosperity and stability in Hong Kong? 
What may happen now that would undermine such prosperity and 
stability?" 
  Essentially this was how I responded, "The main thing is to 
proceed firmly, comprehensively, and substantively in accordance 
with the Sino-British Joint Declaration. If we depart from the 
provisions in the declaration, we may be undermining the 
declaration." "These days we can see some people are not 
operating in accordance with the document. We cannot but keep a 
close eye on them." "If there is any unexpected change, this 
must be it." The reporter shot back with this follow-up 
question, "Who really is not operating in accordance with the 
document?" I laughed, "I can't tell you now. The time is not 
quite right yet." 
  Deputy director Chen Baijian [7115 0130 1017] of the XINHUA 
NEWS AGENCY Hong Kong branch, who accompanied me to the press 
conference, said, "We all have an idea as to who is not 
operating in accordance with the document." 
  At this point I had already been fielding questions for over 
an hour; my glasses had fogged up, so I took them off to wipe 
them. I held them in my right hand and picked up a copy of the 
Sino-British Joint Declaration with my left hand, gesturing and 
talking at the same time. In photographs and on the TV screen I 
came across as quite emotional. 
  My public acknowledgement of the existing rift between China 
and Britain touched off a chain of reactions, dubbed by the Hong 
Kong media as the "document controversy." 
  The Hong Kong British Government responded swiftly, and so 
did the British Foreign Office. The British media too got busy 
and commented on my remarks. The British Foreign Office issued a 
statement reiterating that Britain "has the responsibility to 
govern Hong Kong until 1997. The Chinese government, on the 
other hand, is responsible for formulating the basic law. The 
governments of both nations are taking the Sino-British Joint 
Declaration as the point of departure." The Foreign Office also 
stressed that Britain had not violated the joint declaration. 
Some newspapers said, "With Beijing taking a high-handed 
approach, one is skeptical that China would give Hong Kong a 
substantial measure of self-rule." Locally, the community 
reacted strongly, with the Hang Seng index plunging 50 points. 
Some groups went so far as to protest to XINHUA NEWS AGENCY, 
complaining that I had been irresponsible in my statements. 
[Installment No. 51] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59257 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics Bureau Official Views Current Inflation </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0108A Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] in 
Chinese No 38, 27 Sep 93 pp 7-10 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0108A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Qiu Xiaohua (6926 2556 5478), deputy director of </F>
the [PRC] State Statistical Bureau: "Why the Economy Is Cooling 
Off But Price Rises Are Still High"] 
  [Text] Since the beginning of the second half of 1993, 
accompanying the gradual putting into place relevant measures by 
the government to strengthen macroeconomic regulation and 
control, China's economy has begun to cool down and increases in 
production, investment, and consumption have slowed each month. 
The financial order, which for a time was chaotic, has gradually 
taken a turn for the better; the problems of breaking rules and 
regulations on discounts and loans, disorder in raising funds, 
and disorder in setting up financial organizations are being 
corrected, and initial success has been achieved in their 
correction; and there has been a large increase in savings 
deposits. At the same time, consumer market prices have 
continued to rise. The averages for August were: in China as a 
whole, retail prices rose more than 11 percent, and the cost of 
living broke a 13 percent increase. This situation has caused 
concern and anxiety in all quarters. In this regard I will only 
give some of my own views, and I welcome the readers' criticisms 
and comments. 
  1. Market price increases continue to be high mainly 
because of the delayed reaction to the previous period of the 
trend for high economic growth, the relaxation in the currency 
supply policy, and the vigorous measures for price reform. 
  Prices are the "barometer" of the state of macroeconomic 
operations, and an economic boom and price rise go together, but 
there is often a delayed effect. A practical analysis of China's 
economy shows that this delay is generally about a half year's 
time in the entire economic cycle. When observing the current 
price situation, one must look back at the economic growth 
situation over the past several years. Beginning in the fourth 
quarter of 1988, China's economy was brought under control and 
consolidated, and the pace of development was clearly slowed. 
Later the retrenchment dynamic became flexible, and in 1991 a 
recovery-type growth began (in that year the gross domestic 
product [GDP] was 3.9 percent higher than that of the year 
before, a rise of 8 percent). In 1992 the growth accelerated (in 
that year the GDP was 13.2 percent higher than that of the year 
before). And the trend of market prices is basically for a state 
of acceleration to prevail, and this state began in the last 
half of 1992: from July to December the retail prices were on 
average 5.8 percent higher than in the same period of the year 
before, and were 9 percentage points higher than in the first 
half of the year; the December rise was 6.8 percent, 2.6 
percentage points higher than in June. With the spring breeze 
accompanying Deng Xiaoping's tour of the south, in the second 
half of 1992 China's economy got on the track of sustained 
high-speed growth (since July in that year the growth of 
industrial production has exceeded 20 percent). Correspondingly, 
beginning in 1993, China's market prices rose markedely: in 
January they went up 8.4 percent, in March 10.2 percent, in May 
12.5 percent, and in the intervening months there was a rise of 
about 2 percentage points. Because in the first half of this 
year the growth of China's economy was still in an accelerated 
state, starting in the second half of the year there was a 
further rise in market prices, 14.9 percent in July and 15.1 
percent in August. This shows that price rises often accompany a 
high-speed growth of the economy and become a state of 
acceleration. 
  Prices are a manifestation of inflation, and they often rise 
following a relaxation in the money supply. In the initial 
period of development and consolidation, because a policy of 
strictly controlling the money supply was adopted, money in the 
narrow sense -- currency and demand deposits (M1) --gradually 
dropped from more than 30 percent in July 1988 to under 10 
percent before June 1990. In the same period, the rise in market 
prices dropped month by month, from 26.7 percent in December 
1988 and 27 percent at the beginning of 1989 to 6.4 percent in 
December 1989. In 1990-91, because a reasonable growth in the 
money supply was maintained, the market price rise was basically 
maintained at under 3 percent; in the period of high-speed 
growth during the economic recovery, the M1 was affected by the 
fairly relaxed monetary policy and a situation of accelerated 
growth clearly appeared. In June 1992 the rise exceeded 30 
percent, and in March 1993 it broke through the 40 percent 
level. Against this background, an accelerated rise in market 
prices in the second half of 1992 was inevitable, and it is no 
wonder that current market price increases remains high. 
  An increase in China's market prices often occurs following 
the appearance of price reform measures. Because prior to reform 
the old economic system excluded the market's role, and strict 
administrative controls were imposed on prices, serious 
irrationalities were created in China's price administrative 
mechanisms and price relations. Particularly since the nineties 
began, almost every year reform has taken big strides and 
charged through several barriers in succession. By the end of 
1992 the prices of 90 percent of the consumer goods, of 80 
percent of the means of production, and of more than 90 percent 
of import-export commodities were being basically regulated by 
the market. Under the dynamic of such a major reform, the 
general level of market prices was bound to increase; this is a 
"necessary cost" of price reform that is difficult to avoid. 
According to estimates, in 1992, of increases of retail prices 
as a whole, about 70 percent of it was the effect of policy-type 
price regulation, and in the first eight months of 1993 about 
half of the price rise was related to price reform. 
  From this we can see that at present the market price 
increase is not falling back in synchronization with the cooling 
off of the economy. It is not the case that the current 
macroeconomic regulation and control policy is not playing its 
role, but rather it is the total effect of the previous period 
of high economic growth, generous money supply, and major price 
reform. This is basically a normal phenomenon, and there is no 
need for excessive anxiety about it. Of course, as a 
macroeconomic regulator and controller, there is a necessity for 
China to obtain and maintain a rational rate of growth in the 
economy and in the money supply. Mastering the dynamic of 
appropriate price reform is an important condition for ensuring 
that the rise in market prices can be lowered to a point that it 
can be regulated and controlled in order to further perfect the 
scientific nature of macroeconomic regulation and control. 
  2. Supply and demand on the consumer goods market are 
basically in balance, but the rise in market prices is still 
fairly high, mainly because of the elasticity in consumption and 
the differences in the consumption mix, causing differences in 
commodity price rises. 
  Based on a relevant investigation, at present on the Chinese 
mainland's consumer goods market, commodities for which supply 
is greater than demand or for which supply and demand are in 
basic balance account for 91.6 percent, and commodities for 
which supply does not meet demand account for only 8.4 percent. 
What people think is strange is: why is there no reduction in 
the trend for market prices to rise, and why does the rise 
remain high? As an individual I think that the main reason for 
the appearance of this contrasting phenomenon is: On the one 
hand, from an overall view, although for most commodities supply 
and demand are not in balance, people's elasticity in the 
consumption of different commodities is different. If there is a 
lot of elasticity in this consumption, frequently after a price 
rise the amount of consumption will fall, thereby restraining 
price rises; if there is little elasticity in this consumption, 
often after a price rise it will be difficult to have a major 
change in the amount of consumption, and thus it will be 
difficult to restrain price rises. Now, on China's consumer 
goods market, most of the price rises are often in commodities 
and labor services for which there is fairly little elasticity, 
e.g., grain, nonstaple foodstuffs, fuel, rent, tuition, 
transportation fees, etc. Since the beginning of this year, the 
rise has been very high: in China as a whole, from January to 
August, compared to the same period of last year, the price of 
grain rose 26.3 percent, the price of fuel rose 39.4 percent, 
the price of nonstaple foodstuffs rose ll.3 percent, and the 
price of service items rose 28.6 percent. For these commodities 
and services, which have little elasticity, people in daily life 
often have difficulty in finding suitable substitutes; once the 
state releases controls on the prices on these commodities or 
raises the standards for collecting fees, the law of consumption 
cannot play a role. Moreover, of these commodities and 
services, a considerable part of them are not in a state of 
basic balance between supply and demand, and some of them are 
adversely affected by the natural environment. As for 
commodities for which there is a lot of elasticity in 
consumption, their price rises are not high. For example, the 
price rises on clothing and on daily-use, cultural and 
entertainment electromechanical commodities are basically less 
than 10 percent, and the prices on some of them are moving 
downward. On the other hand, influenced by the rasing of the 
people's income level, consumption is tending toward fine 
quality, high grade, and the new and original, and a fairly big 
change has occurred in its structure. Even looking at the total 
output, we see that at present in China there does not yet 
existthe contradiction of a shortage of consumer goods, but 
there are still many unsuitabilities between the production 
structure and the consumption structure. Frequently for 
commodities that satisfy marketing needs, the situation in 
supply and demand tends to be tight and price changes are fairly 
big. In particular, under conditions in which market rules and 
regulations are not sound and the market order is not 
standardized, abnormal phenomena, such as price rises in 
disguised form and arbitrary price prices, will often appear, 
thus raising the general level of price rises on consumer goods. 
Many people feel that the price rises which remain high in the 
current market is a case of some people in a high income bracket 
with a tendency for high consumption spurring increases of 
prices of new products, high-grade and fine-quality commodities, 
and commodities of new and original design; and that the rises 
in the prices of general traditional goods of dependable quality 
are not high, and that there even has to be a dependency on 
price cuts to promote sales. 
  Moreover, the high rises in the price of consumer goods 
since 
the beginning of this year are related to costs. The 
concentrated manifestation of this is in the rise in the price 
of advanced products, the rise in the cost of funds and foreign 
exchange, and the rise in the cost of labor. Since the beginning 
of this year, the prices of raw materials and energy purchased 
by enterprises have risen more than 30 percent compared to those 
of the same period of last year; labor wages have risen more 
than 20 percent, the prices of funds have risen more than 10 
percent, and the prices of foreign exchange have gone up more 
than 20 percent. These factors for price increases are bound to 
push up costs, and thereby spur a rise in the ex-factory prices 
of industrial goods of more than 20 percent, which is bound to 
be passed on to the retail prices. It is estimated that the 
cost-push factor has become one of the most important factors in 
market price rises, particularly for the prices of the means of 
agricultural production (which have risen 13.5 percent in the 
past eight months). 
  Of course the current high price rises on the market are to 
a 
certain extent also related to the fairly brisk demand by the 
people (in the past eight months the volume of commodity retail 
sales grew 22.5 percent). In the first half of the year, for a 
while there appeared on the domestic market a situation in whcih 
there was a race to buy commodities in order to protect their 
value, and the situation on the agricultural market was also 
better than it was in the year before, with a rise in prices 
exceeding 10 percent. What needs to be pointed out is that, 
since the beginning of this year, the renminbi has been 
devalued, and the cost of imports has risen markedly, also, from 
another side, pushing up domestic prices. 
  3. The pressure of latent inflation has abated, and the 
consumption psychology of the people is basically stable, but 
the current pattern of market price rises will be maintained for 
a certain time. If a problem does not appear in currency 
control, it is estimated that, beginning in the second quarter 
of next year, the increase in market prices will certainly fall 
back. 
  The central government has taken measures to strengthen 
macroeconomic regulation and control with a rectification of the 
financial order as the breakthrough point. These measures are 
manifested in the beginning of the cooling off of the overheated 
economy (from July to Augsut respectively the industrial rate 
fell back 5.1 and 1.7 percentage points, and the investment 
growth fell back 5.4 and 13.2 percentage points). The chaotic 
financial order has been rectified, and the trend in the 
financial situation is toward stability (from June to August the 
urban and rural people newly added 109.9 billion yuan to their 
savings deposits, thereby greatly allieviating the pressure of 
currency put into circulation). The prices of the means of 
production are tending to fall amid a stable situation, and the 
adjusted market foreign exchange prices are basically stable. 
All of these things will certainly have a positive effect on the 
market price situation in the next year. From a look at the M1 
growth trend, we see that the more than 40 percent growth for a 
time at the beginning of the year fell back to 19.7 percent by 
the end of August. This growth was lower than normal, showing 
that the latent pressure of inflation has begun to abate. If 
this level of growth can be sustained for more than a quarter, 
it is bound after half a year to produce a restraining force on 
market prices, the rise in prices will fall back, gradually 
returning to a range within 10 percent that can be regulated and 
controlled. 
  However, in view of the problems in the first and second 
seasons that have been discussed, it will be difficult within a 
short time to effect fundamental changes, and the economy will 
suffer the inertia effect of high-speed growth and of the rises 
in investment still tending to be on the high side. In addition, 
the fourth quarter is usually the one in which the effect of 
currency circultion and financial expenditure is at its peak, 
and it is estimated that the present more than 10 percent rise 
in prices will continue for several months. For the year as a 
whole, the rise in the cost of living could range between 14 and 
15 percent, of which the rise in cities could be near 20 
percent. Therefore, macroeconomic regulation and control must 
make a point of preventing two tendencies: the first is 
excessive pessimism and the other is excessive optimism. A 
cautious, positive attitude should be taken, and regulation and 
control should be scientifically mastered, striving both to 
control inflation and to successfully attain the goal of 
maintaining a fairly rapid growth in the economy. 
  4. The key to controlling excessively high price rises 
lies in maintaining a basic balance in total supply and demand 
and in promoting the optimizing of the structure. 
  From a look at the macroeconomic regulation and control 
measures to be taken in the next stage, we see that it will be 
impossible to completely eradicate inflation and that this will 
also not be necessary; the point of effort should be one that 
all sides can bear. Therefore, the dynamic should be to keep the 
rise in market prices below 10 percent, and the key to this is 
to enhance the management of the money supply policy and to make 
strict checks on the currency. At the same time as this, we 
must, on the basis of maintaining a basic balance in total 
supply and demand, augment the structural regulatory dynamic, 
and truly achieve a big development of the bottleneck industries 
and a rational regulation of the deposit structure. For this 
reason, we must reform the capital investment system, get a 
tight grip on setting up investment markets for basic industries 
and the infrastructure, and establish mechanisms that can 
circulate the assets of state-owned enterprises, further 
loosening and rectifying, and encouraging the forces of all 
sides to advance in unison. Now, first, we must continue to get 
a good grip on managing investments in fixed assets, and stop or 
postpone projects for which there is neither capital nor 
markets. Second, while putting a stop to evil practices, we must 
"open the front gate," step up the pace of implementing the 
"funds tray" in the plans, increase the effective supply, in 
particular support the procurement of agricultural and sideline 
products, and keep the promise not to just make a show. Third, 
we must get a good grip on building a unified market in China, 
devise sound market rules and regulations, break through 
regional blockheads, and promote the unblocked circulation of 
resources. Fourth, we must strengthen the legal system, stricly 
punish all acts that violate law and discipline, particularly 
cracking down on passing off the fake and inferior as genuine 
and superior and on driving up prices, and reducing the various 
kinds of noneconomic factors that cause inflation. Fundamentally 
speaking, we must prevent the appearance of tangible inflation, 
and, with dependence on the constant furthering of reform, form 
management systems and operation mechanisms that meet the needs 
of the market economy, switching the extensive business style of 
high input, high consumption, and high speed to the track of 
depending on technology, fine quality, and low consumption for 
success, and striving to improve China's economic competiveness 
and truly developing the economy rapidly and well. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59258 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   CASS Economist Comments on Price Trends, Reform </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0106A Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] in 
Chinese No 37, 20 Sep 93 pp 16-19 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0106A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Shen Zhiyu (3088 1807 3342): "Noted Economist </F>
Comments on Price Trends, Price Reform"] 
  [Text] Since the beginning of this year, inflation has been 
picking up momentum in a broad area. The central government took 
macroeconomic control and regulatory measures but instead of 
being reined in, the overall social retail price index actually 
continues to climb. How should we interpret this situation and 
what actions should we take as a response? Recently we 
interviewed Professor Zhang Zhuoyuan [1728 0587 0337], an expert 
on prices, and asked him to comment on price trends and the next 
stage of price reform in China. 
  Professor Zhang Zhuoyuan is currently director and a 
researcher with the Finance, Trade, and Economics Institute of 
the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences. He is also a professor 
and supervisor of doctoral studies at the graduate school of the 
academy, and vice president of the China Prices Society. He has 
been studying the issue of prices for years and has written 
several books, including Socialist Price Theory and Price 
Reform and Selected Works of Zhang Zhuoyuan, and 
hundreds of scholarly articles. He is well known in academic 
circles at home and abroad. 
<H3>  Is It Normal for Prices To Rise Just as Macroeconomic 
Regulation and Control Gets Under Way? </H3>
  Professor Zhang Zhuoyuan began by briefly describing the 
current situation on the price front. Before June this year when 
the central government took macroeconomic regulatory and control 
measures, fixed assets investment continued to expand with no 
letup. Coming on top of the raid expansion in 1992, this 
resulted in an overheated economy, releasing the inflationary 
pressures that had been building up for the past several years. 
The overall social retail price index climbed every month, up 
10.2 percent between January and June alone. Prices of capital 
goods also soared, up 21.7 percent by May from the beginning of 
the year. The price of steel used in construction at one point 
hit 4,300 yuan per ton, significantly higher than the price on 
the international market. Meanwhile, the exchange rate of the 
renminbi on the foreign exchange regulatory market plummeted. On 
1 June the government decontrolled prices on the foreign 
exchange regulatory market. By late June the exchange rate had 
dropped to $1:11 yuan. The plunge would have continued had not 
the government intervened in time. Interest rates on the market 
and the black market surged, with the annual interest rate 
reaching 20 percent or so in most cases, vastly higher than 
those charged by banks. The explosion of real estate prices was 
stunning; the prices of undeveloped land rose in an endless 
spiral, doubling and redoubling again and again. 
  Faced with this grim economic situation and galloping 
inflation, the Chinese Government tightened its macroeconomic 
regulatory and control measures beginning in June to cool the 
economy, check inflation, and prevent prices from rising too 
rapidly. Among other things, it clamped a tight lid on the scale 
of credit and the money supply, strictly limiting the amount of 
currency issued in 1993 to within 150 billion yuan. It cracked 
down on illegal capital-raising; demanded that banks collect the 
funds they had lent in violation of the law within a specified 
period; raised the interest rates charged by banks; and revived 
value-guaranteed savings. It demanded that the Bank of China 
become a true central bank and get out of business dealings in 
the future. It raised the interest rates on treasury bonds this 
year and speeded up their sales. It tightened its management of 
the real estate market, imposed controls on foreign exchange and 
reformed the foreign exchange retention and utilization system, 
selling foreign exchange on the foreign exchange regulatory 
control to hold down exchange rates. Party and government organs 
at all levels were prohibited from going into business with no 
exception in a draconian step to stop state organs and their 
affiliates from collecting all sorts of fees arbitrarily under 
all sorts of pretexts by using their office, etc. In the 
professor's opinion, it is essential that the government took 
these measures. Had the government not acted, the development of 
the entire economy would have ben affected, as would reform. 
  More than two months later, the above-mentioned measures 
have 
begun to pay off, as demonstrated mainly by the following: The 
upsurge in industrial expansion, hitherto excessive, has 
retreated. In July the output value of industrial enterprises 
at the township level and above nationwide rose 25.1 percent 
compared to the same period last year, but was 5.1 percentage 
points down from the preceding month. The average daily output 
value was off 15.4 percent from the level a year ago. For the 
entire January-July period, the gross value of industrial output 
was still 25.1 percent higher than the corresponding period last 
year. In fixed assets investment, fewer new projects were 
launched. In July, the number of capital construction projects 
and modernization and transformation projects was off by 6,372 
compared to the previous month. The boom in real estate and 
development zones has begun to cool off. The consumer goods 
market continued to stabilize and flourish. The trading of 
capital goods began to slacken, with the volume of transactions 
heading downward. The supply-demand gap for major materials has 
narrowed. Prices fell and inventories continued to rise. The 
regulatory exchange rate of renminbi rose, stabilizing at about 
$1:8.8 yuan currently, which represents a 20 percent 
appreciation for the Chinese currency since it hit a record low 
in late June. Exports rebounded. According to customs 
statistics, there was a 6.5 percent gain in exports in July 
compared to the same period last year, while a drop of 9.1 
percent was recorded for the preceding month. Household savings 
surged. In July new urban and rural household savings deposits 
amounted to 40.5 billion yuan, 26.9 billion yuan more than the 
same month a year ago, reversing a downward trend. 
  At the same time, however, prices continued to climb because 
of the delayed effects of inflation. Retail prices jumped 13.9 
percent in July, pushing the retail price index up 10.8 percent 
for the January-July period. Workers' cost of living index rose 
12.8 percent in just the January-June period, and 14 percent 
from January through July. In the 35 large- and medium-sized 
cities, the workers' cost of living was a high 23.3 percent by 
July; for the entire January through July period, it was 18.2 
percent. Can the central government's macroeconomic regulatory 
and control measures check inflation effectively? Just how long 
would prices keep on going up? Professor Zhang Zhuoyuan has 
offered an analysis of price movements for the remaining few 
months of 1993 and 1994. 
<H5>  What Is the Optimal Meeting Point? </H5>
  As Professor Zhang Zhuoyuan sees it, the introduction of 
intensified macroeconomic regulatory and control measures would 
not tame inflation any time soon. The reason is that it usually 
takes six months or so for macroeconomic changes to be reflected 
in prices. In the first few months, therefore, prices may 
continue to go up. He expects inflation to ease notably only 
after October. When the central government acted to toughen 
macroeconomic regulation and control, its goal was to cool the 
economy gradually after a period of adjustment, restore balance 
to the overall volume of the macroeconomy, and then bring 
inflation under control effectively after a time lag, slowing 
the rate of price increases. Specifically, if we manage to keep 
fixed assets investment, new bank lending, and the increase in 
the money supply below 1,000 billion yuan, 400 billion yuan, and 
150 billion yuan, respectively, this year, and if we can hold 
the rate of increase of the gross value of industrial output at 
20 percent or below and the annual growth rate of gross output 
value at 10 percent or so, then the nation's overall retail 
price index for 1993 may stay below 12 percent. In other words, 
we can hold the nation's overall retail price index for the 
second half of 1993 below 14 percent. At the same time, the 
exchange rate of the renminbi will hold steady at $1:9 yuan or 
so. That way a little more fine-tuning is all we need to do in 
1994 to further stabilize the economy and hold the rate of price 
increases to within two digits. 
  One other scenario is conceivable, however. If the 
government's macroeconomic regulatory and control measures are 
resisted by local governments and some enterprises and therefore 
are not really carried through or if these units go along with 
them half-heartedly at the beginning only to relapse into their 
old ways later by going around the red light, thus preventing 
the economy from staging a soft-landing and reigniting the 
investment explosion, then the government's original economic 
adjustment objectives will not be met. In that case, we will 
have difficulty controlling inflation and prices will continue 
to rise. Specifically, suppose total investment exceeds 1,000 
billion yuan by a wide margin; new bank loans surpass 400 
billion yuan, perhaps even reaching 500 billion yuan; the amount 
of currency issued goes beyond 150 billion yuan; the gross value 
of industrial output remains at a high level, hitting 25 percent 
or even higher, and the gross value of output expands 13 
percent, 14 percent this year. Suppose too that retail prices 
surge 20 percent nationwide in the second half of 1993 and the 
exchange rate falls back to $1:10 yuan. If all that comes to 
pass, the government would have no choice but to adjust the 
national economy more radically in 1994 so as to re-stabilize 
it. And that will come with a steeper price. Professor Zhang 
Zhuoyuan pointed out that the first scenario is a more likely 
outcome. The war on corruption being waged nationwide in 
particular will help us reach the various targets as required in 
the first scenario. 
  Professor Zhang Zhuoyuan noted that since there is a 
relationship of mutual substitution between inflation and 
economic growth, which means that when the economy expands too 
rapidly, it will inevitably trigger off notable inflation, we 
must find the best meeting point between a high rate of economic 
growth a sustainable rate of price increases as a major point of 
reference for the central government as it regulates and 
controls the macroeconomy. Bearing in mind the conditions in 
China, he suggested the following meeting point for the nation 
as a whole in the next one to two decades: average annual 
economic growth rate around 9 percent and prices increasing 6 
percent on the average annually, not more than 10 percent at 
most. Assuming that he has located the best meeting point and 
that the Chinese economy more or less behaves as it should, 
China would still lead Asia and the world in economic growth 
rate, ensuring the achievement of the strategic objectives it 
has set for itself by the end of the century, thereby realizing 
a fairly comfortable standard of living. What is more, China 
will match the economic development level of moderately 
developed nations by the second or third decade of the next 
century. It seems that this is a promising path that would lead 
to accelerated economic growth amid stability. 
<H5>  What Next Step Should We Take in Price Reform? </H5>
  When you discuss the current price movements, you naturally 
have to talk about price reform. After 14 years of price reform, 
Professor Zhang Zhuoyuan said, China has taken big strides in 
the transition toward a market price system and made substantive 
progress. The market mechanism has begun to play a leading role 
in the formation of commodity prices. A distorted price 
structure has improved significantly. Measured against the 
requirements of developing a socialist market economy, however, 
price reform has not been completed. Under the central 
government's plan to tighten macroeconomic control and 
regulation, price reform is scheduled to slow down for a certain 
period of time. In the long haul, however, price reform must be 
pursued with vigor as well as a steady hand. How then are we to 
further price reform in the future? Professor Zhang Zhuoyuan put 
forward the following four proposals. 
  First, decontrol the prices of those products ready to enter 
the competitive market. As of now there are still prices which 
should be deregulated but have not, including the prices of a 
number of leading commodities such as energy products, including 
centrally allocated coal and finished oil; raw materials such as 
steel and non-ferrous metallic products; chemical industrial 
products such as basic chemical industrial products, chemical 
industrial raw materials, chemical fertilizers, chemical fibers, 
and plastics; construction materials such as cement; heavy-duty 
mechanical products; light and textile industrial products, and 
a handful of agricultural products under contract procurement. 
The reasons are extremely complex. For starters, there is the 
fear that once these prices are decontrolled, the overall price 
level would shoot up so much so that it would be burdensome for 
enterprises and households alike. Secondly, the market is still 
immature. Industry-based monopolies and regional separatism have 
impeded the formation of a unified market and hence more 
standardized market-regulated prices. Thirdly, to protect their 
own vested interests, some departments have balked at delegating 
power, so on and so forth. It seems that even with a more 
enthusiastic attitude, it will take us two to three years to 
gradually decontrol those prices which should be deregulated but 
have not so far. 
  Second, we must further rationalize prices under government 
control. A number of key commodities are still underpriced, so 
the task of price adjustment remains an arduous one. For 
instance, the government should set the prices of crude oil and 
natural gas in a centralized manner. Moreover, it should raise 
their planned prices substantially, from the present 200 yuan or 
so per ton to more than 700 yuan to bring them in line with 
international market prices. Rail freight charges should be more 
or less doubled, which would increase the freight per 
ton/kilometer from 3.85 fen to about 6 fen. The prices of 
government-procured grains and those sold to consumers also must 
be raised. Public housing rents are clearly on the low side at 
present; they too must go up. Price adjustments will involve 
huge sums of money. The adjustment of the prices of crude oil 
and natural gas and rail freights alone, for instance, would 
mean an additional 50 billion yuan changing hands. This cannot 
be accomplished overnight. If we try to do it in one fell swoop, 
the overall price level would jump a dozen percentage points, 
which would be socially unacceptable. Therefore we must phase 
them in step by step, doing everything we could to straighten 
out the prices mentioned above within five years or so without, 
however, touching off a round of double-digit inflation. 
  Furthermore, we must gradually let the market regulate the 
prices of capital goods. Among such prices, the most important 
are interest, the price of funds, otherwise known as capital, 
labor wages, land prices and rents, and exchange rates between 
the renminbi and foreign currencies. In accordance with the 
requirements of developing a socialist market economy, they all 
should be formed and regulated by the market so that the most 
essential market signals would not be distorted and the 
improvement of the efficiency of resource allocation would not 
be hindered. 
  Zhang Zhuoyuan singled out interest rates, the prices of 
funds, the foremost capital goods, for special discussion. 
Calling funds the scarcest economic resource in every market 
economy, he pointed out that having the market determine 
interest rates is the first step in having the market determine 
the prices of capital goods. In a socialist market economy, 
interest rates are the most essential lever available to the 
government for regulating the macroeconomy. To ensure able, 
coordinated, and effective economic growth, the government must 
regulate interest rates. In an overheated economy, for example, 
the rediscount rate and re-lending rate charged by the central 
bank must be raised to drive up interest rates on the market and 
hold down inflation. When the economy is too sluggish, on the 
contrary, the rediscount rate and re-lending interest rate 
charged by the central bank should be cut to push down interest 
rates on the market, spur investment and consumption, and bring 
about economic recovery and growth. Be that as it may, interest 
rates regulation by the government or the central bank 
essentially consists of regulating the base interest rates as a 
way of influencing market interest rates, not directly fixing or 
altering market interest rates. As for interest rates charged by 
commercial banks and other financial institutions on loans or 
paid by financial institutions on deposits, the government 
should not intervene but instead give the market a free hand in 
regulating them. Regarding interest rates payable by enterprise 
and companies as they seek to raise funds directly, the 
government too should take a hands-off policy and let the 
bonds-issuing bodies determine the interest rates to be carried 
by the bonds. Accordingly a distinction must be made between 
commercial banking and policy-oriented banking, between 
commercial banks and policy-oriented banks. When a loan must be 
made to a key infrastructural project or a project in a leading 
industry on preferential terms, the treasury may pay interest in 
the form of a deduction and take other steps to differentiate 
such a loan from ordinary commercial banking. 
  Finally, we must create an effective price regulatory and 
control system. Both during the creation of such a system and 
after, we must keep the overall price level relatively stable 
and basically stable to ensure the stable and normal functioning 
of the economy. To stabilize the price level, the key is the 
implementation of a stable macroeconomic policy by the 
government. The central bank must keep a tight leash on the 
amount of money it puts into circulation, limiting not only the 
cash issued (M0), but also the supply of currency defined 
broadly to include cash and deposits (M1 and M2). By and large 
the money supply must not expand faster than the GNP. Nor should 
the growth rate of the money supply be excessively higher than 
what the monetarization of the economy requires, preferably 
around 5 percent. 
  He went on to say that to ensure the stable development of 
the socialist market economy, we need do more than regulate 
interest rates, wages, and exchange rates. We must also prevent 
wild swings in the prices of major commodities. Toward that end, 
we must set up the necessary grain, energy, and raw materials 
reserves and establish price regulating funds, including 
separate regulating funds for grain and agricultural byproducts. 
Concomitantly, producers, traders, and consumers must be 
provided with signals -- market and prices -- as a guide to 
prevent the supply and demand as well as prices of key 
commodities from moving too sharply upward or down, which would 
hurt the sustained and coordinated development of the national 
economy. Furthermore, we must perfect prices-related law-making, 
enforce the law strictly, and establish a variety of supervisory 
bodies and methods. All of that is indispensable. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59259 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liu Guoguang Interviewed on Role of Foreign Banks </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0136A Hong Kong CHING-CHI TAO-PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] in 
Chinese No 35, 6 Sep 93 pp 22-24 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0136A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHING-CHI TAO-PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by special correspondent Ho Hsu (0149 3563): </F>
"Important Actions in the Opening to the Outside World To Bring 
in Foreign Owned Banks: China's Finance and Banking -- An 
Interview With Renowned Economics Professor Liu Guoguang (0419 
0948 3432)]" 
  [Text] Following restitution of China's legal position as a 
GATT signatory nation, foreign banks will be bound to come to 
China in profusion. In a situation in which both development 
opportunities and serious challenges co-exist, whether China's 
finance and banking has the strength to withstand the onslaught 
has become a matter of general concern. It was in this 
connection that the writer visited Professor Liu Guoguang, a 
member of the Eighth NPC Standing Committee and deputy chairman 
of the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences. 
<H5>  Trend of the Times </H5>
  Reporter: Foreign banks began to enter China more 
than a decade ago, but it has been only during the past two 
years during China's efforts to re-enter GATT that the issue of 
the introduction of foreign banks has aroused extreme concern. 
Please tell us about this situation. 
  Liu Guoguang: It is my understanding that opening 
the country to foreign banks was an important decision in 
China's reform and opening to the outside world that was made 
more than a decade ago. In 1979, the Beijing Office of Japan's 
Long-Term Credit Bank hung out a shingle, becoming the first 
foreign banking institution to set up shop in China since 
founding of the New China. Later on, some well known Japanese, 
U.S., British, French, German, Canadian, and Swiss banks also 
came pouring in to set up offices in China. At first, these 
offices were permitted to perform only tasks that produced 
indirect profits. Not long afterward, however, they obtained 
permission to take part directly in business activities in the 
special economic zones [SEZ]. Thus, these foreign owned banks 
began to do more than 10 different kinds of business including 
foreign currency savings accounts and foreign trade settlements. 
A large number of foreign owned bank branch offices opened for 
business in the SEZs. During the 1990's, the opening up of 
Pudong in Shanghai provided new opportunities for the entry into 
China of foreign owned banks. In June 1992, the Chinese 
Government further opened seven coastal cities including 
Guangzhou, Fuzhou, Ningbo, Nanjing, Qingdao, Tianjin, and Dalian 
to the entry of foreign banks. According to the most recent 
statistics, 250 offices of foreign banking institutions, foreign 
bank branches, Sino-foreign joint venture banks, and wholly 
owned foreign banks from 30 different countries and territories 
have been set up in China's 14 cities that are open to the 
outside world. 
  The speed of arrival and the large number of foreign banks 
coming to China have astounded the world. The degree to which 
even the four small Asian dragons made inroads when China first 
opened to the outside world is incomparable. 
  Not long ago, the Chinese Government tendered to the GATT 
secretariat a revised tenatively agreed to bill of particulars 
on the General Agreement on Trade in Services (GATS), which made 
the following tenative promises about finance and banking 
services: Foreign banks may use the following four kinds of 
financial institutions to conduct investment and provide 
services: foreign owned banks, foreign bank branches, 
Sino-foreign joint venture banks, and Sino-foreign cooperative 
joint-venture banks. 
  This shows that the opening of China to foreign banks is an 
irreversible major trend. Not only is this an important measure 
for the opening of China's finance and banking sector to the 
outside world and a requirement for China's GATT restoration, 
but it is also a major way for China to establish and develop a 
socialist market economy and to dovetail China's economy with 
the world economy. 
<H5>  Is the Wolf Coming? </H5>
  Reporter: Many people still find it difficult to 
accept the large scale introduction of foreign owned banks, or 
they are even filled with anxiety about the prospect. They feel 
that this will hurt domestic finance and banking and harm 
development of the indigenous economy and the finance and 
banking sector. This is termed "crying wolf." What are your 
views about this? 
  Liu Guoguang: Whether the wolf is coming is 
impossible to say categorically, and if the wolf is indeed 
coming, that is not necessarily a bad thing. At least it brings 
some external pressures to bear. I would like to explain several 
levels of thinking about this question as follows: 
  On the one hand, bringing in foreign banks will face all of 
China's big domestic banks with strong competitors. They will 
face more severe challenges. In many ways, they will be 
adversely affected and buffeted about. This goes without saying. 
We know that foreign banks have not only abundant experience and 
skill in dealing with international banking and financial 
competition, but they also have self-sustaining, flexible, 
sophisticated, and highly effective business methods, management 
mechanisms, and technical equipment. Therefore, foreign banks 
hold a marked advantage in both their operation and the 
attraction of capable people. Practice in China during recent 
years shows that in areas and business fields that foreign banks 
have entered, such as the international clearing business and 
the foreign exchange credit business, China's domestic banks 
have been stricken in varying degrees. This has showed up in a 
fall off in business volume, a loss of customers, and the flight 
of skilled personnel. If foreign banks are permitted to do 
business in the renminbi, the predicament of the domestic banks 
will be even worse. These are inescapable facts. From this point 
of view, I feel that some people's worries about the wolf coming 
make sense. They should not be regarded as groundless fears. 
  On the other hand, we must realize that what follows from 
the 
influx of foreign banks is not all negative. There are many 
positives. For example, the presence of foreign banks will make 
it easier for domestic banks to learn sophisticated foreign bank 
management methods and the newest business techniques. This will 
enhance the domestic banks' ability to provide services, and to 
upgrade domestic finance and banking in terms of management, 
service, and skills. it will help increase the competitiveness 
of domestic finance and banking institutions, enliven financial 
markets, and accelerate the modernization of domestic finance 
and banking. It will also help develop new financing methods and 
bring in foreign capital. It will increase Sino-foreign economic 
and technical cooperation, and it will promote the integration 
of Chinese finance and banking with world finance and banking, 
etc. The benefits are numerous. 
  At the same time, we must also realize that as the lifeblood 
in operation of the national economy, finance and banking truly 
power the national economy. It is also for this reason that even 
nations that have opened their financial markets to the outside 
world have instituted strict and effective control over foreign 
banks. Cases in point are Japan and South Korea, which have 
strict regulations regarding the sphere of business of foreign 
banks. Australia and Malaysia likewise have strict restrictions 
on foreign banks establishing branches in their countries. The 
current situation in China suggests implementation of a limited 
and gradual deregulation of the sphere of business and the 
operating area of foreign owned banks. The "Shanghai Foreign 
Owned Finance and Banking Institution and Sino-Foreign Joint 
Venture Finance and Banking Control Methods," which was 
promulgated in 1990, provides detailed regulations on this 
matter. The tenatively agreed to GATS bill of particulars that 
China recently made public further provides as follows: When 
providing services, foreign finance and banking institutions 
must abide by "People's Republic of China Special Economic Zone 
Control Regulations Regarding Foreign Banks and Sino-Foreign 
Joint Venture and Contractual Joint Venture Banks," as well as 
by "Shanghai Foreign owned Finance and Banking Institutions and 
Sino-Foreign Joint Venture Institutions Control Methods." 
Foreign investors shall be finance or banking institutions that 
have had offices permanently located in China for three years. 
Foreign banks shall have no less that $10 billion total assets 
and enjoy a good reputation in their home country before 
applying to invest in China. Foreign banks may deal only in 
foreign currencies. Therefore, looked at from this angle, I 
believe that there is nothing to worry about to be afraid of 
from bringing in foreign banks. 
  To summarize the foregoing several levels of thinking, my 
conclusion is that in an overall sense and in long-range terms, 
the advantages of bringing in foreign banks outweigh the 
disadvantages. They will ultimately play a positive role in the 
reform and development of China's finance and banking. 
<H5>  Shortcomings of Chinese Finance and Banking </H5>
  Reporter: As far as GATT requirements are 
concerned, particularly the provisions pertaining to trade in 
financial services in the GATS, it should be said that there is 
little disparity between China's finance and banking and 
customary international practices. Please comment on problems in 
this regard. 
  Liu Guoguang: It is true that many problems remain 
in China's finance and banking, which is in the midst of reform 
and development. These problems are found in both the system of 
organization and the management mechanism as well as in service 
methods and techniques, and the caliber of personnel. A look at 
the finance and banking system as a whole shows the 
macroeconomic regulation and control ability of the central bank 
to be weak, and a commercial banking system that stands on its 
own two feet as a business and is responsible for its own 
profits and losses has yet to be built. The entire finance and 
banking business remains highly monopolized by the national 
banks, effective and normalized competition in financial markets 
a long way from taking shape. In the system for the management 
of capital, we continue to control the total amount of funds 
available, setting the total amount of credit on the basis of 
national plan expenditures. All the specialized banks must 
strictly control the amount of funds they make available, 
largely ignoring the safety, the fluidity, and the appreciation 
of credit funds. In the interest rate control system, interest 
rates are still set mostly by plan or administrative fiat, no 
market interest rate mechanism having been truly formed or 
playing a role. The specialized banks' assets are undiversified; 
techniques for controlling assets and liabilities are 
antiquated; an effective mechanism for stimulating profits and 
an understanding of modern competition are lacking; and both the 
efficiency and quality of financial services are very low. In 
addition, finance and banking legislation lags, and first rate 
finance and banking talent is hard to find. This situation is at 
variance with, and even falls far short of, the major trend 
toward deregulation of China's finance and banking, as well as 
requirements for restitution of China's GATT status. Given such 
a finance and banking background, China's domestic banks come 
under strong competitive pressure from foreign banks. They are 
in a disadvantageous position that is difficult to avoid. 
<H5>  Increasing Strength To Meet Challenges </H5>
  Reporter: What do you feel the priority task is 
for China's finance and banking sector given the need to develop 
a socialist market economy and the moderate introduction of 
foreign owned banks? 
  Liu Guoguang: The introduction of foreign owned 
banks is already a major trend that cannot be reversed. This 
being the case, our focus should not be on increasing 
limitations on foreign banks' entry into China's finance and 
banking markets. In fact, this is unwise and even impossible. 
Our emphasis should be on the needs of the market economy and 
opening to the outside world. We should accelerate reform of 
China's finance and banking system, and we should do all 
possible to move ahead with international normalization with the 
goal of improving in every way the adaptability and 
competitiveness of China's banking system. This requires close 
study of the experiences and lessons of developed nations, 
developing nations, and of China itself in opening its banking 
system to the outside world, and relating them to our own 
formulation of measures related to the applicable provisions of 
GATT. 
  Much work must be done in these regards. I feel that work on 
the following matters is crucial: enhancement of the central 
bank's functions to hasten the formation of a unified and 
effective macroeconomic regulation and control mechanism in 
order to ensure currency stability; and reform of the central 
bank's methods of controlling the funds of the specialized 
banks. Adoption of the 8 percent international practice (i.e., 
capital plus savings must amount to 8 percent of risk assets), 
going all out to promote strict control of the ratio between 
assets and liabilities and to control risks in the specialized 
banks, increasing the specialized banks' self-restraint 
capabilities, and establishing a mechanism to supervise and 
control risks; quickening the transformation of the nation 
specialized banks' operating mechanisms so that they can 
gradually become economic entities responsible for their own 
operating decisions and responsible for their own profits and 
losses; reforming the interest rate control system, interest 
rates eventually being set by the market; appropriate 
development of finance and banking institutions of many various 
kinds to promote competition; use of both international and 
domestic means to hasten the training of highly qualified 
financial service personnel to bring about the quickest possible 
upgrading of the caliber of personnel through the banking 
business; widespread use of computer technology and modern 
communications equipment to hasten the modernization and 
computerization of finance and banking tools to improve service 
efficiency; and earliest possible finance and banking 
legislation. 
  Finally, I want to emphasize the need for discretion on the 
issue of the scale and speed with which foreign banks are 
brought into China. Their entry must be in keeping with the 
level of domestic finance and banking, and the legal climate. 
There can be no rushing headlong into precipitate action. 
Prudence is also needed in permitting foreign banks to deal in 
renminbi. In addition, control and foreign owned bank business 
transactions and auditing, supervision, and inspections must be 
enhanced. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59260 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   ECONOMIC DAILY on Merits of Tax Sharing System </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0215A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 16 Nov 93 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0215A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gao Shusheng (7559 2579 3932): "The Tax Sharing </F>
System Is Spreading Like Wildfire"] 
  [Text] As fiscal system reform is playing a very key role 
in China's reform process, the significant new fiscal reform 
measures that are going into effect are arousing widespread 
attention in all circles. As fiscal macroeconomic regulation 
and control capability is being tightened, particularly over 
central finances, the tax sharing system reforms that "seem 
ready to happen" have naturally become the focus of attention of 
people in all walks of life. 
<H5>  "Down With the Package" Has Become a Militant Slogan </H5>
  Is China now capable of carrying out tax sharing system 
reform? Theoretical circles have not yet reached a consensus on 
this. One of the focuses of the debate is how to assess the 
fiscal package system. Academics who strongly oppose the tax 
sharing system fully affirm the merits of the fiscal package 
system, holding that it helps to stimulate local fiscal 
initiative, while those who favor implementing tax sharing as 
quickly as possible strongly attack the current fiscal package 
system, on which grounds they promote tax sharing system reform. 
These latter hold that while the fiscal package system has pros, 
such as package figures being simple, clear, and easy for all to 
grasp, its many existing practical defects fully prove that it 
has completed its hstorical mission. 
  Scholars who favor tax sharing system reform list the 
following major defects of the fiscal package system: 
  1. Fiscal package bases are set irrationally, protecting 
vested interests, creating "injustice and taking more from the 
best," and further widening the interregional economic and 
social development gap. 
  2. The local revenue package weakens tax regulation 
capability, reinforces "regionalism" and "feudal separatism," 
and blocks commodity circulation and the formation of a uniform 
market. 
  3. The fiscal package slants revenues toward localities, 
leaving state revenues, particularly central ones, without 
strict guarantee and oversight mechanisms, and creating a severe 
loss of central revenue. 
  4. The fiscal package contributes neither to the thorough 
conversion of government functions or to genuinely pushing 
enterprises toward the market, while causing local governments 
to guide the disposition of resources unilaterally in the 
interests of increasing local revenues, which leads to duplicate 
production, construction, and importing, as well as to wars over 
all types of raw materials and to the assimilation of local 
industrial structures. 
  5. The fiscal "separate kitchens" results in localities 
haggling with the center over the setting of sharing percentages 
and contract bases, as well as causing lateral competition. 
This makes central fiscal actions nonstandard, with arbitrary 
borrowing from localities and income equalitarianism, while 
localities take many fiscal accomodation steps to intercept and 
keep revenue that should be paid to the center. This ultimately 
limits the rational growth of state revenue and fiscal 
macroeconomic regulation and control capability. 
<H5>  There Is Still a Lingering Fear of "Tax Sharing" </H5>
  Just as more and more people are shouting the praises of the 
tax sharing system, theorists are singing "another tune," even 
though it may be a very "faint" one. The current theoretical 
stands against the tax sharing system can be summed up in the 
following three key areas: 
  1. As the tax sharing system's point of departure and 
grounds conflict with our overall reform objectives, the tax 
sharing system should be firmly opposed. The scholars who favor 
this view hold that the tax sharing system is focused on 
increasing the [central] revenue percentage, by concentrating 
central financial might, the grounds for which are that the 
above base sharing part paid to the center in the fiscal package 
is too small. But they say that promoting tax sharing on this 
grounds ignores a fundamental issue, i.e., that increasing local 
fiscal might was aimed at stimulating the fiscal initiative of 
local authorities, with fiscal authority being devolved along 
with administrative authority, meaning that a lower central 
revenue percentage was inevitable. So tax sharing would be 
bound to weaken the impact of local profit forces, causing a 
tightening that would be adverse to stimulating central and 
local initiative simultaneously, as well as to sharp economic 
growth, and ultimately to increasing central revenues. 
  2. China is not yet fully equipped with the conditions for 
tax sharing. The academics who favor this view point out that 
standardized tax sharing requires: 1) a clear division of 
central and local administrative authority; 2) a break with the 
order of revenue division based on enterprise subordinate 
relations; 3) a scientific revenue and expenditure base factor 
appraisal law; 4) a relatively perfect local tax system; 5) 
separate central and local tax management and collection. But 
China is not yet fully equipped with these conditions. For 
instance, current local taxation still involves many places 
unsuited to tax sharing. This can be seen mainly in that local 
taxes are more nominal than real, with the local tax revenue 
percentage too small to meet local spending needs and unable to 
increase along with local economic growth, and collection and 
management in chaos. So as the terms for tax sharing do not yet 
fully exist, rather than expanding the tax sharing experiment in 
scope, it would be better to begin by studying and drawing up a 
scientific methodology based on a factor appraisal of revenue 
and expenditure bases, in order to make good preparations for 
standardized tax sharing system reform. 
  3. The aim of fiscal reform should be not "tax separation," 
but rather "system separation," i.e., the establishment of a 
graded budget system. This is because tax sharing actually 
solves only the revenue division matter, not the system problem. 
The graded budget system put forth by the scholars who hold 
this view includes the following key substance: Drawing up 
separate central and local tax revenue systems; giving 
governments at all levels corresponding spending independence; 
setting up a standardized system for the shift of payments from 
the center to localities; establishing separate central and 
local budgets for independent balance; and providing local 
governments with the authority to issue local government bonds 
to increase their capital account revenue. 
<H5>  Tax Sharing: The Trend of the Times </H5>
  With State Council approval, the Ministry of Finance began 
in 
June 1992 to conduct tax sharing experiments in nine provinces, 
autonomous regions, and municipalities authorized to formulate 
their own plans independently, striving to divide central and 
local revenue sources through tax categories, in order to 
standardize and rationalize central and local financial 
distribution relations. These tax sharing experiments have 
shown the following features: 
  1. They have expanded local fixed revenue limits and better 
stimulated local revenue organization initiative, helping to 
reinforce tax collection management, stop up system loopholes, 
prevent revenue erosion, ensure basic central government 
spending needs, and tighten central macroeconomic regulation and 
control. 
  2. The tax sharing system turns flow taxes from most being 
retained by local governments to a central local "50-50" 
sharing, adjusting central-local distribution relations, 
eliminating to a degree tendencies, such as unchecked local 
development of high tax rate products and unchecked striving for 
output value and speed, and helping to promote the state's 
industrial structure and the formation of a uniform market, 
eliminate financial distribution arbitrariness, adjust 
interregional financial distribution, and appropriately shrink 
the interregional economic and social development gap. 
  3. Tax sharing can play a promotional and driving role in 
the 
reform and opening of our whole economy. On one hand, all 
areas will pay attention to managing the flow taxes shared by 
the the center and localities. On the other hand, once all 
state-owned, collective, and "the three kinds of foreign trade" 
enterprise income taxes become local fixed revenue, this will 
spur local governments to pay attention to enterprise economic 
efficiency, providing more effective guidance and oversight of 
enterprise operations. 
  Based on these tax sharing experiments, the state has 
decided 
to practice the tax sharing system on a wider scale beginning in 
1994. So theorists have made the following suggestions on ways 
to implement tax sharing in practice: 
  1. At present, due to a number of limiting factors, it will 
be impossible to accomplish the tax sharing system all in one 
move. Overall reform steps could proceed in the order of "the 
current package -- a tax sharing package -- a tax sharing system 
in which shared taxes dominate -- a thorough tax sharing 
system." Meanwhile, based on conditions in various areas, we 
could break down and apply varying methods for a tax sharing 
system. 
  2. Tax sharing reform must be accompanied by reforms in 
other 
areas, most crucially: a) We need to clearly divide 
governmental administrative and fiscal authority, particularly 
construction investment authority, with central revenue 
undertaking mostly key national and transregional project 
construction, and local revenues being responsible for building 
regional projects. b) We need to reform our tax system, by 
establishing one conforming to market economy needs, as well as 
a sound local tax system. c) We need to reform systems, such as 
planning, pricing, investment, circulation, and social security. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59261 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commentator on Personal Income Tax Reform </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0185A Beijing ZHONGGUO SHUIWU BAO [CHINA TAXATION NEWS] 
in Chinese 4 Nov 93 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0185A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO SHUIWU BAO [CHINA TAXATION NEWS] 
in Chinese 4 Nov 93 p 1 </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105>Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by CHINA TAXATION NEWS Commentator: "Important </F>
Measures in Tax Reform"] 
  [Text] The fourth session of the Eighth NPC Standing 
Committee examined and adopted the "Decision of the NPC Standing 
Committee on Revision of the `Individual Income Tax Law of the 
People's Republic of China'" (hereafter referred to as the 
"Decision") on 31 October 1993. President Jiang proclaimed this 
"Decision" in Order of the President of the People's Republic of 
China No. 12. The "Decision" will to into effect from 1 January 
1994. This is a major revision of China's individual income tax 
system. It shows that a major step has been made to make the 
individual income tax system become more legalized, scientific, 
standardized and rationalized. The proclamation and enforcement 
of the revised individual income tax law is of great 
significance in promoting the healthy development of China's 
socialist market economy, opening the country even wider to the 
outside world, ameliorating the uneven distribution of incomes 
in society and protecting the nation's rights and interests in 
taxation. 
  To reform China's individual income tax system is an 
objective requirement in continuously developing the socialist 
market economy, deepening the reform and opening to the outside 
world. Prior to the reform, China's individual income tax 
system was composed of three tax laws and regulations. The 
enforcement of these laws and regulations has played a positive 
role in promoting economic and technical cooperation and 
exchanges with foreign countries, regulating the incomes of 
individuals and increasing the revenues of the state. However, 
with the development of the situation, some contradictions and 
problems have gradually cropped up. They are often manifested as 
follows: 
  1. The tax laws and regulations are not standardized in 
taxing individuals with similar incomes and dividing the 
categories of taxpayers. 
  2. Expense deductions seem to be low, while normal tax rates 
too high. 
  3. The tax laws and regulations can no longer keep pace with 
the many social and economic changes in terms of the scope of 
taxation, taxable items and tax exemption policy. There is a 
need to readjust and improve them. 
  In light of the aforementioned problems, the "Decision" made 
the following important revisions of the 1980 Individual Income 
Tax Law on the basis of the principle of "treating all taxpayers 
on an equal basis, simplifying the tax system and making 
reasonable adjustments" after summing up the past experience and 
using the experience in foreign countries as a reference. 
  1. Efforts have been made to expand the sphere of the 
Individual Income Tax Law to include Chinese citizens, 
foreigners and self-employed industrial and commercial 
establishments into a single uniform individual income tax law. 
  2. In accordance with international practice, the concept 
of "resident" is introduced to differentiate the taxpayers' 
limited liabilities from their unlimited ones in paying taxes. 
  3. Five more taxable items have been added according to the 
actual situation in social and economic life. They are "incomes 
of self-employed industrial and commercial establishments in 
production and business," "income of institutions and 
enterprises from their contracted and rental businesses", 
"income from the transfer of properties," "income from authors' 
remuneration" and "unexpected incomes." 
  4. Tax burdens have been properly adjusted. The tax rate 
table for income tax from wages and salaries is divided into 
nine steps instead of six steps. The "Decision" stipulates that 
self-employed industrial and commercial establishments in 
production and businesses must pay income tax at progressive 
rates ranging 5 to 35 percent levied on their income in excess 
of specific amounts. Those who are paid extremely high 
remunerations for a certain type of work may be asked to pay 
higher income tax on a percentage basis. In addition, people are 
allowed to deduct from their income taxes the amount of their 
donations to education or public welfare funds. 
  5. More items have been added for tax exemption in 
accordance with the state of affairs in China. 
  It is important to enact a good tax law, but even more 
important is that we must do a good job in enforcing such a law 
and ensure that laws are observed, that their enforcement is 
strict and that law breakers are dealt with. To levy the 
individual income tax constitutes an important means of the 
state in strengthening its macroeconomic control. We must 
earnestly carry out this work in levying and collecting the 
individual income tax. This law directly affects the 
distribution of individual benefits. It is an important issue 
of policy, and it involves many aspects of life. It is 
difficult to levy and enforce this law. In enforcing this law, 
the tax authorities must not only work hard, but also acquire 
the full understanding and support of the large number of 
taxpayers and people in all sectors of life in society. It is 
for this reason that the local party and government leadership 
must firmly strengthen their leadership in enforcing this law. 
The various departments concerned must energetically coordinate 
with one another in this regard. Directly shouldering the 
responsibility in levying the lax, the tax authorities have an 
arduous task to perform. On the one hand, they must adopt all 
measures to give publicity to the significance and the spirit in 
reforming the individual income tax law so that all taxpayers 
will understand this law and consciously pay their income tax 
according to the law; while on the other hand, they must 
earnestly sum up their past experience in collecting income tax, 
and firmly and in a down-to-earth manner achieve their goal of 
acting according to law and levying the tax on the basis of the 
prescribed tax rates. 
  Currently, there is less than two months left before the new 
individual income tax law goes into effect. The tax authorities 
at all levels must seize every opportunity to actively carry out 
their preparations in propaganda and training work and in 
studies in order to enforce the new tax law with a good 
beginning. 
  It is our belief that with the vigorous support of the party 
and government leadership at all levels, the close coordination 
of the various tax authorities, the full understanding of the 
large number of taxpayers and the joint efforts of all the 
cadres in the taxation departments, China will definitely be 
able to achieve new progress in levying and collecting 
individual income tax and let this individual income tax play 
its due active role. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59262 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Legal Specialist Views Taxation of Authors </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0185B Beijing GUANGMING RIBAO in Chinese 24 Nov 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0185B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUANGMING RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by reporter Huang Xiao: "Dialogue on Personal </F>
Income Tax From Authors' Remuneration -- Interview of Professor 
Zheng Chengsi, a Jurist of the Academy of Social Sciences"] 
  [Text] Reporter: The fourth session of the 
Eighth NPC Standing Committee adopted a decision on revising 
China's "Individual Income Tax Law" on 31 October 1993. Friends 
in the intellectual circles, particularly many experts and 
scholars, are extremely concerned about their personal income 
tax from the authors' remuneration. Please talk about China's 
laws on this connection. 
  Professor Zheng: China's personal income tax 
system was formed in 1980. The Third Session of the Fifth 
National People's Congress adopted the "Individual Income Tax 
Law." In the "categories of taxable income" this law did not say 
anything about authors' remuneration. However, it mentioned 
"income from royalties." In the "Rules for the Implementation of 
the Individual Income Tax Law," this income was interpreted as 
"income from providing and assigning patent rights, copyrights, 
rights to use proprietary technology and other rights." Thus, 
from this we can understand that authors' remuneration is 
included in the income from copyrights. At that time, it was 
stipulated that a monthly deduction of 800 yuan is allowed, and 
the tax rate was 20 percent. 
  Reporter: What do intellectuals think about this 
law after its enactment? 
  Professor Zheng: People in the academic field 
complain a great deal, because they have to make monthly tax 
payments from their income which is in excess of 800 yuan. Some 
experts and scholars write a book once in every ten or more 
years or even once in a lifetime. However, they must make a 
lump-sum tax payment. This is quite unreasonable. 
  In the "Interim Regulations on Personal Income Regulatory 
Tax" proclaimed in 1986, the State Council lowered the monthly 
deduction to 400 yuan for the personal income regulatory tax. 
However, the monthly deduction remains at 800 yuan for incomes 
not exceeding 4,000 yuan from free-lance writing, translation 
and transfer of technology. For any single payment of 4,000 yuan 
or more, a deduction of 20 percent shall be allowed for 
expenses. The remaining amount shall be taxed. 
  Reporter: From this, we can see that these 
regulations take into consideration the interests of those who 
invent and create and of the literary and art workers. 
  Professor Zheng: The No. 69 Document issued by 
the State Tax Bureau in 1990 stipulated that if the author's 
remuneration for a book does not exceed 20,000 yuan, he or she 
will pay income tax with a tax abatement of 30 percent than the 
taxable amount listed in the "Interim Regulations on Personal 
Income Regulatory Tax." However, for those whose authors' 
remuneration for a book exceeds 20,000 yuan, they still need to 
pay the personal income regulatory tax as stipulated. 
  Reporter: This shows another great progress. 
According to these regulations, the tax rate for authors' 
remuneration under 20,000 yuan per book is only 14 percent. 
  Professor Zheng: It is so. However, this is only 
an administrative document. It is not so binding as a law. In 
fact, more than half of the publishing houses do not enforce 
these regulations. Most of them say that they have not seen such 
a document. 
  Reporter: The "Individual Income Tax Law" revised 
on 31 October 1993 explicitly stipulates that "the tax rate 
applicable to income from authors' remuneration is 20 percent 
with a tax abatement of 30 percent, and that for income from 
personal services or authors' remuneration, a deduction of 800 
yuan shall be allowed for expenses, if the amount received in a 
single payment is less than 4,000 yuan. For single payments of 
4,000 yuan or more, a deduction of 20 percent shall be allowed 
for expenses. The remaining amount shall be taxed. 
  Professor Zheng: In this way, the tax rate for 
authors' remuneration is still 14 percent. As compared with the 
tax rates of other incomes, this is fairly preferential. 
Besides, it is written into the state law this time. 
  We must emphatically point out that according to a 
provision of the revised "Individual Income Tax Law" on tax 
exemption, if a book or thesis wins the prize of a 
provincial-level government, a ministry or commission under the 
State Council, a PLA unit at or above the Corps level and any 
foreign or international organization in the fields of science, 
education, technology, culture, public health, sports, 
environmental protection and others, the prize is tax-free in 
despite of its amount. 
  Reporter: After a book is published, in what way 
can its author pay his or her income tax from his remuneration? 
  Professor Zheng: In practice, the publishing 
house generally withholds the amount of income tax that the 
author needs to pay before it pays the author's remuneration, 
and should mail a copy of the necessary tax form to the author. 
Some of the publishing houses do not withhold income tax for the 
authors. They should mail the authors the tax paper anyway. As 
far as authors are concerned, they better ask the publishing 
houses if they are not so sure whether or not the publishing 
houses have withheld the income tax or not, because tax evasion 
is subject to administrative punishment or even criminal 
prosecution. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59263 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Suggests Countering Antidumping Actions </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0067A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] in Chinese No 
141, 15 Sep 93 pp 20, 53 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0067A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Yuqing (1728 3768 0615) of the Treaties </F>
and Law Department, Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations and 
Trade: "New Trends in Foreign Antidumping Actions Against 
China's Export Products"] 
  [Text] On 7 July 1993, the U.S. Department of Commerce gave 
its final judgement on the antidumping case of nodular cast iron 
tubes exported by China, deciding to levy a high antidumpting 
tax of 127.38 percent on all such products of Chinese export 
enterprises. Thus, this product of China's will be completely 
squeezed out of the U.S. market. 
  Before 1988, on the antidumping issue the U.S. Department of 
Commerce, because China was a country with a centrally planned 
economy, decided to levy an antidumping tax in line with a 
standard tax rate, on a Chinese enterprise that was ruled as 
exporting a commodity in a manner that constituted dumping. 
After 1988, changes were made in this U.S. policy: Provided that 
a Chinese import or export company could prove that in a given 
enterprise, in both law and fact, there did not exist government 
control, the U.S. Government could, in line with the difference 
in the export prices of the commodities of different companies, 
separately lay down different antidumping tax rates. For 
example, in the May 1991 electro-optical fireworks case and 
other cases, the U.S. Department of Commerce gave rulings 
according to separate tax rates. However, after Joseph Spetrini, 
new acting chief of the International Trade Management Office of 
the U.S. Department of Commerce, took his post, changes were 
made in this policy. The signed ruling on this states: "In the 
investigations and administrative reviews of the past, separate 
tax rates were always applicable, but the Department of Commerce 
has not yet differentiated on the basis of ownership and export 
businesses; state ownerhsip is not a barrier to the obtaining of 
a separate tax rate by an export company. We have now 
reconsidered this policy and have decided that it is improper to 
give separate tax rates to state-owned enterprises. We have 
determined that an entity owned by the central government cannot 
be completely divorced from the central government's control, 
and that state-owned enterprises provide an opportunity for the 
central government to control prices. Therefore, with regard to 
future investigative cases and administrative reviews, the 
Commerce Department will not consider the request of a 
state-owned enterprise for a separate tax rate." This ruling was 
filled with extreme discrimination against and unfairness toward 
China's state-owned trade enterprises, and it also threatened 
the destiny of China's export commodities on the U.S. market. In 
this antidumping case, the Metal Products Company under the 
China National Metals and Minerals Import and Export Corporation 
engaged lawyers, provided a large amount of evidence, and made a 
powerful counterplea, as a result of which the original 
judgement on the antidumping tax rate was much lowered. However, 
because the U.S. Department of Commerce, without exception, 
would not give China's state-owned enterprises separate tax 
rates, this company suffered serious adverse effects. 
  There were two main reasons for the antidumping tax rate on 
nodular cast iron tubes being as high as 127.38 percent: 1) The 
U.S. Department of Commerce had demanded that the Chinese 
Government make a reply on a "standard questionnaire" issued by 
the department, and the U.S. Government stated that it had not 
yet received this reply from the Chinese side. 2) In China there 
are a total of eight companies that export this product to the 
United States, but with the exception of the China National 
Metals and Minerals Import and Export Corporation, there was no 
second company that agreed to act on behalf of the Metal 
Products Company and make an appeal against America's 
antidumping action. Therefore, the U.S. Department of Commerce, 
when a ruling is made, makes use of the so-called "Best 
Information Available (BIA)," which favors U.S. businessmen 
(i.e., data provided by U.S. industrial appellants). The 
antidumping tax rate in the U.S. final ruling was the tax level 
put forward by the appellant on his first appeal. 
  The trend in this policy of the United States raises new 
questions for the appeals made by import and export commerce 
departments of China and its trading companies. At present, 
China's products that have been the target of U.S. antidumping 
actions are unsupported and unpermitted products, and their 
export is lacking in orderly management. Their volume is sharply 
increasing year by year, and enterprises are competing in 
exporting them at low prices; but, when there is an antidumping 
action, no one is willing to personally put up money to appeal 
the action. U.S. law demands that the length of time for an 
appeal be set quite strictly, and, therefore, this usually 
causes the U.S. Department of Commerce to use the BIA for 
China's export enterprises. 
  The Western countries, including the United States, have 
always made antidumping a protectionist weapon to limit imports, 
protect domestic industry, and promote trade. China's export 
products have become the key targets of the West's antidumping 
laws. Recently America and the EC carried out an antidumping 
investigation of more than 20 products exported by China, 
including color television sets, bicycles, computer diskettes, 
cast iron tubes, carborundum, shoes, athletic shoes, fluorite, 
microwave ovens, nitro-formaldehyde, (silicasolucate) [gui er 
suan 8944 0059 6808], and aldose. Mexico has also made 
antidumping investigations on more than 4,000 Chinese products 
in 10 major categories (its export volume is 75 percent of 
China's export to Mexico). 
  To solve the problem of foreign antidumping actions against 
our export products, we suggest: 
  First, strengthen the coordination and management of export 
products and enhance the capability and means for import and 
export chambers of commerce and other societies for organiaing 
appeals against antidumping actions. 
  Second, devise ways to penalyze exports at lower than cost, 
and put a stop to the phenomena of high-price panic buying and 
low-price competitive selling. 
  Third, set up a fund for appeals against antidumping 
actions; 
enterprises that are members of chambers of commerce or other 
societies every year will pay a certain proportion of their 
export volume value into the fund. The fund will be used for 
appeals against antidumping actions as well as for investigation 
and research. 
  Fourth, the economic relations and trade committees at all 
levels must attach importance to the problem of foreign 
antidumping actions against China's export products; and 
supervise enterprises so that they get a good grip on the prices 
and volume of export, and, after an antidumping case arises, 
urge the enterprise to take the initiative in making a timely 
appeal. 
  Fifth, the relevant government departments must make use of 
all opportunities and channels, like delegation exchange visits 
and mixed committee meetings, to negotiate with the governments 
of Western countries to change their discriminatory practices 
against China's export products. 
  Levying an antidumping tax on an export product is 
equivalent 
to squeezing it out of a foreign market. There are now more than 
140 kinds of China's export products on which rulings have been 
made to levy an antidumping tax. If things go on like this, 
China's export potential is bound to be adversely affected, and 
this should draw a high degree of our attention. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59264 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> POPULATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Comprehensive Family Planning in Impoverished Areas </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0159A Beijing RENKOU YANJIU [POPULATION RESEARCH] in 
Chinese No 83, 29 Sep 93 pp 55-59, 64 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0159A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENKOU YANJIU [POPULATION RESEARCH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wei Liuqing (7614 3966 1987), Xu Shanyou (1776 </F>
0810 0645), and Chen Youdao (7115 2589 6670) of the Rugao 
Municipal Family Planning Commission in Jiangsu: "Strategic 
Thinking On Comprehensive Family Planning in Impoverished Areas"] 
  [Excerpts] Shanxi Province is one of the 18 most 
impoverished places in China. In all, it has 50 impoverished 
counties with a population of 8.5453 million, which occupies 
45.5 percent of the province's 110 agricultural counties. 
Scattered throughout such areas as Taihang, Taiyue, Hengshan, 
and Zhongtiao, it constitutes 29.3 percent of Shanxi's total 
population of 29,418,600. For many years, the Shanxi Provincial 
Committee and the provincial government have adopted a series of 
major and important measures intended to develop the economies 
of the impoverished counties, but the average income in 1991 was 
still less than 300 yuan, which was 47.2 percent lower than the 
provincial average. In addition, 20 percent of the peasants 
still have been unable to resolve the problem of getting enough 
to eat or warm clothing to wear. Looking into the reasons, we 
see that in addition to the restrictions of climate, water 
resources, traffic, and production type, backwardness of family 
planning work is an important factor. While this backwardness is 
due to a very large degree to insufficient comprehensive 
handling by relevant departments and various other sectors of 
society. [passage omitted] 
<H3>  Major Characteristics of Family Planning Work in the 
Impoverished Areas </H3>
  1. A higher birth rate, with a more rapid population 
increase. The fourth census showed that the birth rate in 
Shanxi's 50 impoverished counties was up to 25.18 per 1000, 
which was 12.9 percent higher than the provincial average for 
the same period. The highest birth rate was in Baode county, 
which reached as high as 31.23 per 1000. In 1992, based on a 
population survey by the provincial Bureau of Statistics, the 
birth rate in the 50 impoverished counties was 21.23 per 1000, 
which was still 8.4 percent higher than the average level for 
Shanxi. In addition, the natural population rate of increase in 
the impoverished areas was very high: it was 18.23 per 1000 in 
the fourth census and 14.29 per 1000 in 1992, which was, 
respectively, 2.17 and 1.64 per 1000 higher than the provincial 
average for the same period. 
  2. The high gross female fertility rate. In 1989, the gross 
female fertility rate in the 50 impoverished counties was 3.27, 
which was 0.81 higher than the provincial average. Among these, 
there were 31 counties in which the gross female fertility rate 
was more than three with Ji County having the highest rate, 
4.398. In Daning and Fengxi Counties, it was up to 4.259 and 
4.123, respectively. Based on our recent investigation, 1992's 
gross female fertility rate in the 50 impoverished counties was 
still steady at three, with no decrease. 
  3. The rate of family planning and a high rate of multiple 
births. According to figures from the fourth census, the 
multiple birth rate in the 50 impoverished counties was up to 
34.8 percent, with the highest being 50.3 percent in Pu County; 
it was close to 50 percent in Fengxi, Zhongyang, and Baode 
Counties. Although these counties were listed as key control 
counties by the provincial committee and government, the recent 
investigation showed that its multiple birth rate was still 
holding at 20 percent, and in some towns and villages was still 
higher than 30 percent. Countering this is the fact that the 
family planning rate in the impoverished areas tends to be low; 
in 1990, the family planning rate in the 50 counties was 40.4 
percent, and in 1992, it was 43.9 percent. Both of these figures 
were obviously lower than that for all rural areas in Shanxi. 
  4. A low rate of late marriages and late births, and a high 
rate of early marriages and births. [passage omitted] Based on 
close monitoring by relevant departments, only about 20 percent 
of young men and women persist in late marriage and births 
voluntarily, and only about 15 percent of newly married couples 
practice later births. Under the domination of traditional 
custom, the phenomenon of early marriage, early childbearing, 
and illegal marriages were quite popular. It was shown that, in 
ten concentrated impoverished counties in Xinzhou, nine counties 
on Lulian Mountain and six counties on Xi Mountain in Lingfeng, 
the early marriage rate for women has risen to 21.8 percent from 
17.6 percent at the time of the fourth census. The early 
childbearing rate for women has also risen to 19.7 percent from 
15.3 percent at the time of the fourth census, and in a few 
individual places, the early marriage and early childbearing 
rate even went over 30 percent. [passage omitted] 
<H3>  The Current Situation Regarding Comprehensive Handling of 
Family Planning Work in the Impoverished Areas </H3>
  What we refer to as comprehensive handling of family 
planning 
work is, under the united leadership of Party committees at 
various levels and governments, to inspire, organize, and 
coordinate various powers throughout the whole of society, 
confirming the division of labor into each relevant department's 
position and responsibility. Its objective is to control the 
increase in population, improve the quality of the population, 
exploit every advantage, take responsibility for each position, 
control each link, jointly manage, to create a population 
situation with is favorable for building the economy and 
developing society. We can examine the current situation of 
comprehensive handling of family planning in Shanxi's 
impoverished areas from two aspects: 
1. Basic methods 
  A. The leadership, organization, and coordination functions 
are carried out well by the various organs of committee and 
government. Ten years ago, some prefectures, counties, towns, 
villages (residents' committees) all established leading groups 
for population and family planning work, which consisted of 
departments of organization, personnel, popularization, 
education, culture, labor, civil affairs, health, disciplinary 
examination, supervision, as well as departments and groups for 
workers, youth and women, etc. These were actually the local 
leadership organs for comprehensive handling of family planning 
work, implementing their authority in leadership, organization, 
and coordination. In many localities, the leadership group also 
established rules and systems for comprehensive handling of 
family planning, confirming and regulating the division of labor 
among each relevant department's position and responsibility, 
and these were published in formal documents for operations. We 
must applaud the issuance of these documents and rules, and the 
positive role they played in promoting local family planning 
work at that time. Meanwhile, family planning leadership 
organizations at various levels resolved many difficult problems 
in family planning work by means of major leaders being 
personally on the scene, holding coordination meetings, brief 
meetings, and associated meetings, etc. 
  B. The new framework for devoting the whole society to a 
unified control has been formed initially. Popularization and 
media departments, which include propagation, education, 
culture, radio, television, film, and the Party school have all 
played definite roles in propagating family planning, basic 
national policy, educating masses of peasants, and changing 
people's opinions regarding marriage and fertility. 
Disciplinary and law enforcement departments, including 
organization, personnel, labor, discipline examination, 
supervision, public security, law enforcement, procuratorial 
work and courts, have assumed certain responsibilities in 
strictly controlling cadres. This includes their promotion, 
initiating Party members, employment, discovering and handling 
excessive births and excessive pregnancies among Party cadres 
and employees. They also attack people and matters which damage 
family planning work and forcibly enforcing the policy with 
"nail families" and "nut families" who have had excessive 
births; major administrative departments, including industrial 
and commercial, civil affairs, urban construction, insurance, 
revenue and expenditures, auditing, etc. have all performed 
certain functions in supporting family planning work; functional 
departments including planning, statistics, health, family 
planning, etc., have all made massive contributions to enforcing 
the population plan, supervising implementation policies, supply 
services, adopting birth control measures, etc. So we can say, 
the framework for handling family plan work in impoverished 
areas has been initially formed. 
  C. The single-vote denial system for family planning has 
been 
implemented to a certain degree. In order to implement the basic 
national policy for family planning, some Party and 
administrative departments in the impoverished areas have 
implemented the single-vote denial system to a certain degree 
and scope. For example, in Liuling County, of only 40-some 
cadres promoted in the past year, 15 had their eligibility 
cancelled because of excessive births; when the education 
department was involved in converting compensated volunteer 
teachers to regular State employees, 18 of these people were 
turned down for family planning reasons; the land department 
denied approval to 57 excessive birth counters' land 
applications for housing construction; the operations management 
department took back grain rationed land and contracted land 
from 265 families with excessive births. In addition, some 
localities combined the single-vote denial system with such 
matters as small valley management, orchard contracting, 
extension of credit, competition in submitting tenders, etc. 
There is no doubt that these steps played a positive role in 
family planning work in the impoverished areas. 
  D. Some counties and towns have issued a series of social 
and 
economic policies favorable to family planning work. In recent 
years, in accordance with the Central Party and government's 
spirit of family planning "decisions", many impoverished areas 
have put developing the economy and controlling the population 
in the same position of importance, linked them with the actual 
situation of the localities, and issued some social and economic 
policies which were favorable to family planning work. Some 
examples: in Shelou County, when the small valley management 
policy was published, the ability to practice family planning 
was factored in, which resulted in favorable treatment for over 
2,000 families; Lang County took as its overall concept 
"possessing land, this life resource, blocking the big mouth of 
excessive births", to favor family planning families in 
contracting for reserve land, uncultivated land, etc., through 
the means of providing subsidies, while implementing advance 
penalties for families with excessive births, before they were 
allowed to cultivate the land. This program has been obviously 
successful. Liuling County has linked poverty assistance closely 
with family planning: when they fixed policy and rules for 
arranging poverty assistance capital, verified with poverty 
assistance counters, and taking family planning into 
consideration, implemented the "six favorites" rule for family 
planning families; Long County started from "two favorites" 
angle, to implement a project to provide health care for women 
and children and compensation for lost service, which was 
welcomed by the masses; of six towns in Xin County, Yangjipo, 
Xiaojiawa, and Donghui, favored family planning families in 
contracting for orchards, making them models for how to get rich 
quickly by having fewer children. All of these were beneficial 
to family planning work in the improvished areas. 
  2.Major problems 
  While approving accomplishments and accumulating 
experiences, 
we must realize that in the process of comprehensive handling of 
family planning in impoverished areas, there are still many 
problems, which can be summarized chiefly as: 
  A. Some grass-roots Party and government major leaders have 
a 
tendency to "pay attention to the economy and ignore family 
planning work". Some counties and towns' major Party and 
government leaders are usually busy with projects, applying for 
capital, conducting negotiations, and operating enterprises, 
while putting little energy into family planning work. The time 
they can personally devote to coordinating conflicts between 
family planning and other departments is even less. In some 
localities there are individual leaders who don't concern 
themselves with family planning work at all, which causes family 
planning work to always be in a backward status. This tendency 
to "pay attention to the economy and ignore family planning 
work" is extremely detrimental to population control in the 
impoverished areas, and deserves immediate attention. 
  C. The work which related departments do in support of 
family 
planning work is stuck in the negative situation of "moving only 
when pushed". Our investigation disclosed that although there 
were no obvious "collisions" occurring in family planning work 
when related departments fixed policies and rules in 
impoverished areas, there was always a problem of one kind or 
another in implementing policies. For example, on the issue of 
promoting cadres, admitting them to Party membership, the family 
planning situation is not taken into consideration before 
observation and examination of excessive birth counts; it is 
only after everything is set that they let the family planning 
department express any opinions on the matter, which forces the 
family planning to prepare for it in a rush. When implementing 
measures designed to encourage the single child family, some 
departments and work units have often failed to cash in by 
making the excuse that fund were short. When punishing excessive 
birth counters, some units deferred dealing with the situation 
until receiving a communication from the family planning 
department,and some units don't even apply the penalties then. 
When doing work in support of family planning work, some units 
have partial achievements along with partial failures. For 
example, it is common for health departments to undertake a 
considerable number of the "four kinds of operations", but there 
have also been a great many complications and fake operations. 
They judged the sex of the embryo by means of B supersonic 
(wave) which causes a massive amount of psychological confusion, 
more of a hindrance than a help. The illogical distribution 
system regionally also is a problem. Since the implementation of 
the production responsibility system, with the cultivated land 
divided into two parts--the grain ration land and the 
responsible contracted land--the former is allocated according 
to number of family members, and the latter according to number 
of people in the labor force, but some places allocated lands 
totally according to number of family members. When allocating 
disaster relief materials or money, the civil affairs department 
bases their allocations on number of family members. In this 
distribution system, more family members means more cultivated 
land, which strengthens the peasants' desire for early births, 
multiple births, and having boys. In addition, most departments 
only worked on the framework of family planning work. When 
dealing with circulating population, the public security and the 
industrial and commercial departments completed their work after 
checking certification regardless of whether it was true or 
false that the applicants would have multiple births later on. 
Law enforcement officers often fall back on excuses such as: 
there are too many procedures, the measures are too 
complicated, or they lack proof to not strictly enforce the law 
on "nail families" and "nut families" of excessive births. They 
cannot deal effectively with cases of abuse or beatings of 
family planning cadres; they have let the perpetrators go 
scot-free, with extremely bad effects. When issuing marriage 
certifications, the civil affair departments have not strictly 
enforced age limitations, plus there has always been the 
possibility of "relationship certification" and "friendship 
certification". They have shown a lack of enthusiasm and energy 
in encouraging marriages and births at a later age, abandoning 
"two later" education among young men and women. There have been 
some departments doing more verbal and written work in family 
planning, but little of an operational nature. When dealing with 
Party members and cadres who violate discipline, some 
disciplinary examination and supervision departments have only 
discussed the matter but not done anything. Personnel and labor 
departments did not practice what they announced they would do 
in employing, accepting new cadres, and in raising wages and 
promoting employees. Cultural, broadcasting, motion picture, and 
television departments have very few programs which propagate 
family planning ideas. 
  C. The system of encouragements, rewards, and penalties in 
family planning is an "unhealthy situation". In the impoverished 
areas, family planning's measures of rewards and penalties 
hardly work. On the one hand, in most places, there are no 
rewards at all, the so-called preferential treatment of having 
only one child with even a five yuan health care fee for an only 
child is something that cannot be cashed. However, they would 
rather spend money on encouraging sterilization for excessive 
birth parents. On the other hand, it was only symbolic in their 
collection of social care fees from excessive birth parents. In 
impoverished areas, it is common to find the phenomena of no 
penalties, penalty replacement, penalty reduction, penalties 
which are difficult to collect or not collected at all. Some 
village cadres adopt the method of using fines instead of 
ligature in order to operate their sterilization work which 
actually creates a penalty free situation. Some excessive birth 
families cannot afford the penalty fee due to family poverty, so 
village cadres have to let them repair roads, plant trees, and 
cultivate uncultivated land, and call it penalty replacement. 
Many villages charge only five or six yuan for a second birth; 
even for multiple excessive births, they only charge something 
over 100 yuan, and call it a minor penalty; some excessive birth 
parents roam about or cause trouble, beyond the reach of village 
cadres' power; also the latter dare not take forceful measures, 
and this is called a difficult penalty. Some family planning 
cadres did not concern themselves with family planning work for 
long periods of time, which led to a great many excessive 
births, and formed a protective circle for excessive birth 
parents: If they punished one of them, it would anger a group of 
them, so in the end they didn't charge penalties at all. All of 
these basically had no economically restricting function. 
  D. There are some "blank points" in family planning work 
about which no one seems concerned. Early marriages, early 
births, unmarried couples, the rate of these are quite high in 
impoverished areas, and is tending to expand. This has a very 
great effect on family planning work, but there is no department 
dealing with this--that is one point. The geographical region 
from which the marriage partners come is extremely small, they 
do not have a premarital health examination, and there is no 
guarantee of a woman's "three items" of health care. There are 
still some individual places where intermarriage of close 
relatives exists, and there are very serious instances of 
marriage among retarded people or people with hereditary 
diseases. These are detrimental to improving population 
quality--this is the second point. We call these: "blank points". 
  E. There is a tendency for less and less in the social 
restriction system which is favorable to family planning. In the 
new situation of the socialist market economy, some new 
situations and problems are appearing in the family planning 
social system. One is that since opening up the grain price, the 
original urban residence card has lost its original meaning, and 
the restriction system of a grain residence card which was 
exploited by family planning departments doesn't exist. Another 
is that when contracting enterprises, stores, orchards, lands, 
uncultivated lands, etc., competition depends on how much you 
can put on the bid without any consideration of the family 
planning factor. A third is that strengthening the role of the 
family has increased the peasants' freedom, so that they think 
more about their family and individual profits, and less about 
national and collective profits. This is especially prominent in 
birth matters. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59265 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Grain Administration Problems After Deregulation </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0179A Nanchang JIAGE YUEKAN [PRICING MONTHLY] in Chinese 
No 9, 15 Sep 93 pp 42-43 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0179A </F>
<F P=104>  Nanchang JIAGE YUEKAN [PRICING MONTHLY] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhou Jiyun (0719 4480 0061), Survey and </F>
Statistics Department, Jiangxi Branch, People's Bank: "Problems 
and Suggestions Stemming From Changes in the Wake of 
Deregulation of Grain Prices and Dealings"] 
  [Text] This is the first year of decontrol of grain prices 
and dealings in Jiangxi Province, and it is also a year of 
intensification of reform of the grain circulation system. 
Recently, the People's Bank in Jiangxi Province made a special 
survey of the effect on agricultural production and the 
peasants' income following decontrol of grain prices and 
dealings, what new circumstances and new problems might occur in 
the procurement, marketing, transportation, and storage grain 
enterprises may face under the new system, and what effect these 
new problems may occasion for the bank. Results of the survey 
show that cancellation of command style plans in agriculture and 
decontrol of grain markets have played a positive role in 
stabilizing grain production, increasing the peasants' income, 
and systematizing grain procurement and marketing. Nevertheless, 
some problems remain in production, procurement, and marketing. 
<H3>  I. Current Status of Grain Production, Procurement, and 
Marketing Throughout the Province </H3>
  With the establishment of a socialist market economy, the 
former highly centralized system in which the state controlled 
the allocation of all grain is no longer in keeping with the new 
situation in rural villages where contract procurement that 
expresses the deregulation of grain procurement and marketing 
has come about in response to the times. Surveys everywhere show 
that the new grain production, procurement, and marketing system 
exhibits new vitality. 
  A. Restructuring of agriculture continues, the grain growing 
area decreasing. With the cancellation of command style planting 
plans, the peasants enjoy greater authority to make their own 
production decisions. They are free to plan production 
rationally on the basis of market supply and demand, as their 
own circumstances require, growing whatever they like. This has 
greatly stimulated a restructuring of rural industry. Survey of 
the farm crop growing area shows a decline in the area planted 
to grain. Statistics show a 20,469,300 mu area throughout the 
province sown to grain in the spring of 1993, 7.8 percent less 
than in 1992. The percentage of the total crop area planted to 
grain decreased from 72.8 percent in 1992 to 68.7 percent in 
1993. This included a 18,477,000 mu area planted to early rice, 
1,956,000 mu less than in 1992. The area planted to superior 
hybrid grain varieties increased, more high yield, premium 
quality, and high economic benefit varieties being sown. Survey 
statistics for nine counties in Ji'an Prefecture show a 12,417 
mu increase in the area sown to premium quality early rice, up 
3.8 percent from 1992. Premium quality rice was planted in 54.5 
percent of the total early rice growing area. In Shangrao 
Prefecture, 1.5 million mu was planted to premium quality rice. 
This was 60 percent of the total rice growing area, and a 25 
percent over the same period in 1992. The early rice growing 
area increased from 15 percent in 1991 to 60 percent in 1993. In 
Jingdezhen city, 165 peasant households planted 1.96 percent 
less grain in 1993 than in 1992 while increasing the area sown 
to hybrid varieties 19.44 percent over 1992. 
  B. Grain marketing has become livelier, the amount of grain 
in storage "deflating" markedly. Jiangxi is an agricultural 
province that has suffered from "difficulty selling grain" in 
recent years. Granaries throughout the province are filled to 
overflowing, grain storage tying up a large amount of bank 
credit. Following decontrol of grain sales markets, grain 
companies seized the opportunity to transform their operating 
mechanisms in an effort to stimulate sales and develop marketing 
farther afield, grain marketing becoming livelier in 
consequence. During the first quarter of 1993, Fuzhou Prefecture 
marketed 524 million jin of trade grain, 341 million jin of it 
parity price grain, and 201 million jin of it negotiated price 
grain. This represented a respective 78.4, 40.4, and 229.3 
percent increase over the same period in 1992. As of the end of 
the first quarter of 1993, the prefecture's granaries contained 
1.87 billion jin of grain, 406 million jin less than at the end 
of 1992. Grain loans decreased by 24.81 million yuan, 40.7 
million yuan more than for the same period in 1992. As of the 
end of May, grain in storage throughout the province decreased 
by 4.273 billion jin. 
  C. The price of grain rallied, peasants anticipated income 
rising, and their interest in growing grain increasing. 
Following grain market decontrol, prices rallied everywhere. In 
Nanchang markets, the price of premium grade early crop long 
grain and premium grade late crop long grain rice increased more 
than 17 percent. The trend continues strong and the outlook is 
good. Currently, the early crop market price is 27 yuan per 50 
kilograms, and the late crop market price is 33 yuan per 50 
kilograms, both exceeding the sum of the floor price and the 
excess price. In addition, individual grain dealers are 
numerous, grain marketing channels widening. Competition with 
the state-owned grain sector is intense, and expectations are 
that grain prices will continue to rise. Thanks to the upturn in 
the grain market, grain prices have picked up tremendously and 
the peasants have received tangible benefits. Comparison of 
February 1993 with July and August of 1993 shows a 72 yuan per 
mu increase in peasant income from the upturn in prices alone. 
The People's Bank in Fuzhou Prefecture reports that the peasants 
are happy to grow grain following the upturn in grain prices. 
Formerly a 420,000 mu reduction in the grain growing area was 
planned, but only a 380,000 mu reduction occurred. 
<H5>  II. Several Existing Problems </H5>
  The decontrol of grain prices and grain dealings occurred 
against a background of a still not very highly developed grain 
market. Consequently several problems remain in the contract 
procurement of grain that are manifested in "four difficulties 
and one low." 
  A. "Difficulties in implementation" of grain procurement 
contracts. Ganzhou, Yichun, Fuzhou, and Yingtan prefectures, and 
Jingdezhen City report that since the deregulation of grain 
procurement, some peasants are resentful for various reasons. 
They suppose that now that fixed procurement quotas have been 
abolished, it is no longer necessary to sign contracts. As of 
the end of May, contracts signed in the three prefectures and 
Jingdezhen City numbered 83.5, 76.4, 90, 82.7, and 66.0 percent 
of the planned number. The reason for this poor showing is that 
the basis for the "market price" in contract procurement is not 
clear. The peasants have misgivings. They fear that contracts 
may not be honored. The contracts that grain departments sign 
with peasants explicitly provide that when the market price of 
grain is lower than the floor price, all grain covered by the 
contract will be purchased from the peasants at the floor price; 
and when the market price of grain is higher than the ceiling 
price, all grain covered by the contract will be purchased at 
the market price. This is a fine means for protecting the 
peasants' personal welfare, but it is difficult to live up to in 
practice. Since no document stipulates the time of the market 
price that is to be used, the market price of what department or 
jurisdiction, or who is to subsidize the "inversion" that this 
method pricing causes, disputes are inevitable. Second is 
favoritism in the issuance of downpayments on porocurement, 
which damages the peasant's interests. The Fuzhou Prefecture 
People's Bank reports that Nanyue County issued 4.44 million 
yuan in advance payments during 1993, 2 million of which was in 
cash, the remaining 2.44 million being issued in the form of 
"fertilizer" coupons. In Dingxi County, 4.25 million yuan of 
payments in advance was entirely in the form of supply and 
marketing cooperative credit on sales. Since they are unable to 
sell it or the available kinds or quality of the fertilizer is 
poor, the peasants were very resentful and even created 
problems. Third government departments interference and 
deductions are numerous, the peasants' burdens remaining fairly 
heavy. The Ganzhou Prefecture People's Bank reported that the 
peasants still must pay more than 90 assessments of various 
kinds. In order to meet their payment quotas, when governments 
at all levels sign grain contracts with peasants, they attach a 
schedule showing taxes and fees to be deducted. After the grain 
is sold and accounts settled, the peasants obtain almost no cash 
at all. A survey conducted in a certain village in Ningdu County 
showed the contract ordering of 9,400 kilograms of grain, but 
10,050 kilograms was needed to offset the payment of various 
taxes and fees. Obviously, the peasants do not want to sign such 
contracts. 
  B. Grain enterprises will face "difficulty buying grain." 
Grain market decontrol demolished the "monopoly" position of the 
state-owned grain units. It produced a situation of multiple 
economic components, multiple ways of doing business, and 
multiple circulation channels all competing with each other. 
Because of their own limitations, grain departments may face 
future procurement difficulties. The first problem is that only 
85.7 percent of the planned contract procurement contracts for 
the province have been concluded. Second, is the dispersal of 
sources of grain. Not only do collectives and individuals 
compete for grain, but people from neighboring Fujian, 
Guangdong, and Zhejiang provinces stream to Jiangxi to buy 
grain. They go from door to door to buy it; they pay high prices 
for it; they pay on the spot, and they make no deductions. 
  C. Difficulties obtaining grain procurement money. Pressures 
on grassroots level banks have increased. No issuance of 
I.O.U.'s for grain in 1993 is an important guarantee the state 
has made to gain the peasants' confidence. However, owing to the 
the high speed growth of investment in fixed assets this year, 
and the craze for buying stocks and bonds, and for pooling 
funds, savings have grown only slowly, funds have dispersed in 
many directions, and banks have trouble finding money to pay 
out. At the same time, because of local governments' fiscal 
straits, grain enterprises' serious losses and accounts owing, 
and the sluggish turnover of bank funds, money is in short 
supply throughout society and banks find the going difficult. A 
survey of the Fuzhou Prefecture People's Bank shows that up 
until 1991, the prefecture government was able to allocate 287 
million yuan to subsidize losses in the grain sectors, but now 
it is unable to provide a cent. Instead it must increase 
interest payments by 14 million each year. As of the end of 
1992, grain enterprises had posted losses of 347 million yuan, 
an amount equal to the prefecture's fiscal receipts for 1 1/2 
years. Since more than 60 percent of the Bank of Agriculture's 
total credit was tied up in loans for the purchase of 
agricultural and sideline products, and thus did not turn over 
rapidly, the banks were operating under an overload. Thus, a 
situation occurred very easily in which the People's Bank alone 
had to ensure the funds needed for grain procurement. The 
Shangrao Prefecture People's Bank reports an abnormal shortage 
of Bank of Agriculture credit funds in the prefecture at the 
present time. As of the end of May, it still owned banks at a 
higher level a net 15.31 million yuan. Meanwhile, more than 780 
grassroots level banks throughout the prefecture had only 
somewhat more than 20 million yuan in People's Bank contingency 
savings accounts. Some grassroots level branches that even had 
trouble paying the salaries of enterprise staff members and 
workers and paying out funds held in savings accounts, had to 
supply the money for the procurement of 530 million jin of 
contract grain as well. Finding the money needed to buy 265,000 
dan of cotton and 120,000 dan of tobacco is very difficult. 
Unless banks at a higher level are able to allocate quickly the 
funds needed for procurement, the issuance of I.O.U.'s for grain 
procurement will be virtually unavoidable. 
  D. Authority over grain is highly centralized; grain 
marketing is decontrolled but not open making "invigoration 
difficult." The method of handling the buying and selling of 
grain under the planning system long prevented grain enterprises 
from making their own decisions about grain dealings. Today, 
although the state has deregulated grain prices and dealings, 
the deregulation applies only to grain sold at negotiated 
prices, but authority for plan procurement grain and grain that 
the government uses to regulate the market, which still accounts 
for the bulk of grain procurement, is still centralized in the 
hands of the central government and the provincial governments. 
Grassroots grain agencies still lack the authority to make 
decisions about this grain. A Xinyu City People's Bank survey 
shows that as of the end of April the city had 233.01 million 
kilograms of grain in storage, 118.47 million kilograms of which 
was being stored for the state, 22.6 million kilograms of which 
belonged to the State Council for use in regulating grain 
markets, and 65.53 million kilograms of which was parity price 
grain. The negotiated price grain over which grain enterprises 
could really exercise authority amounted to only 26.41 million 
kilograms, or 11.3 percent of the total. This high 
centralization of grain authority has resulted not only in 
swollen granaries, the accumulation of old grain, and serious 
waste, but it has also dampened the interest in grain dealings 
of grassroots grain units. 
  E. Returns from grain farming remain fairly low; the number 
of peasants going elsewhere to work is on the rise. Abandonment 
of the land should be a cause for serious concern. A Jingdezhen 
City People's Bank survey shows a peasant income of 344.20 yuan 
and expenses of 263.90 yuan per mu of grain for a net income of 
80.3 yuan per mu. This net income does not include tractor, 
water, electricity, and fuel expenses, and various withholdings. 
After a further deduction for grain retained for their own 
consumption, the peasants have virtually no cash income. Their 
income is far lower than what can be made from growing cash 
crops or leaving the land to work. Because of the relative low 
returns from the growing of grain, the number of young members 
of the work force who are leaving the land to work elsewhere has 
risen sharply. As a result, some farmland has been abandoned and 
allowed to lie fallow. During 1993, more than 70,000 people in 
Shangrao, Guangfeng, Boyang, Yugan, and Yongxin counties have 
left the land to work elsewhere. Ruichang City reports the 
departure of 38,000 people for jobs elsewhere during 1993, 
double the 1992 number and approximately 33 percent of the 
city's rural manpower. Thirty-one of the 51 able-bodied workers 
in Team 4 at Xiaban Village in the same city have left for jobs 
elsewhere, leasing to peasants in nearby townships 320 of the 
village's 600 mu of farmland, which is unintensively farmed. 
Dexing City reports that 10 mu of wetlands lie fallow because of 
the departure of peasants from the city. In several townships 
and villages, between 20 and 30 percent of paddy fields were not 
being farmed in May. It is estimated that the city's early paddy 
crop will be 3 million kilograms less than in 1992. The 
Jingdezhen Municipal People's Bank reported that 12 percent of 
the reduction in the early paddy growing area is attributable to 
growing only a single rather than a double crop. 
<H5>  III. Several Suggestions </H5>
  Bread is the staff of life. Grain is a strategic commodity 
that has a bearing on social tranquility and the development of 
economic stability. It affects the personal well-being of 1 
billion Chinese. Further good implementation of grain 
production and marketing policies, and doing a good job of grain 
procurement are of major importance in ensuring stable grain 
production and long and peaceful governance. Some problems 
remain in the wake of the deregulation of grain prices and grain 
dealings. All departments concerned should take action and work 
steadily to solve them. 
  A. The implementation of all policy measures regarding grain 
production must be ensured to gain the confidence of the people. 
First, all possible must be done to make down payments on grain 
procurement to households so that the peasants will have the 
funds they need for production. Second is the need to adhere to 
contracts and to ceiling and floor prices in the procurement of 
grain , halting the deduction of various fees in grain 
procurement, allowing money from the sale of grain to reach the 
peasants' hands. Third is the need to control the steady rise in 
prices of agricultural means of production, and to lower the 
cost of seed grain for further increase in peasant interest in 
growing grain. 
  B. Completion of grain procurement and marketing system 
reform to invigorate enterprises. In the sale of grain to 
regulate markets, provinces should delegate directly to 
grassroots grain units all plan allocation grain quotas, grain 
sales outside plan being centrally regulated by the province. 
This would not only ensure the province's plan procurement, but 
would also help deregulate and enliven grassroots grain units. 
  C. Grain units should improve their service attitude, change 
their work methods, overcome current difficulties, and continue 
to maintain and develop their roles as principal channels. 
  D. A good job should continue to be done specialized 
household administration of grain procurement funds to ensure 
that adequate funds are available on time, and to prevent their 
draining away or diversion to other purposes. As an 
accompaniment to grain circulation system reform, a gradual 
change should be made from grain procurement funds to a grain 
regulation fund, setting up special grain regulation fund 
administration agencies to replace the specialized household 
administration of grain procurement funds. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59266 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Soybean Market Price Direction Analyzed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  93CE0889B Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 5 Aug 93 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> 93CE0889B </F>
<F P=104>  Harbin HEILONGJIANG RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Text] This year the soybean prices will rise compared with 
those at the end of last year. The reasons for the increase are 
as follows: First, the push is from the oil processing 
industry's demand for soybean material. In recent years, due to 
feed and feed material industries development, the soybean has 
become popular in the market, stimulating the irregular 
development of the oil processing industry. The processing 
demands at the oil factories far exceed the actual supply of 
soybean materials. Many oil factories have a serious shortage of 
supply. In the future the improvement in the people's living 
standards and the adjustment in their diet structure will 
inevitablly cause the feed and feed materials industry to 
develop. This trend will require an increased development of the 
soybean supply and the oil processing industry, causing the 
already "hungry" oil processing factories to demand more soybean 
materials. This is unquestionably the main stimulation for the 
price rise in the soybean market. Second, price differences 
between the production area and the marketing area. In the 
selling area the soybean market has always been tight with a 
large selling amount and high prices. Using Shanghai as an 
example it can be seen that its annual demand is several hundred 
thousand tons, and the local selling price is 1.9 yuan per jin 
which is 0.20-0.30 yuan diferent from the market selling price 
in the main producing area of Heilongjiang. This area price 
difference means that the managing unit would gain profits if 
they could send the soybeans directly from Heilongjiang. Third, 
the total opening of the grain market has caused the 
distribution system to operate smoothly with the soybean 
transported by train. Thus, it will cause a conflict between 
supply and demand. Customers arriving from outside are finding 
it increasingly difficult to locate soybean resources. The 
phenomenon of rising prices comes back. As time goes by, the 
conflict between supply and demand becomes more serious, causing 
contracted soybean prices to continuously rise. Therefore, since 
last fall, the procurement purchasing prices of soybeans has 
always remained high and even risen to 0.8 yuan per jin. 
However, some economically sound large sellers still don't want 
to sell the soybeans. The purchasing prices are continuously 
increasing, and will have a chain effect on the contract prices 
in the market. Last year was a period of increase for the 
soybean market price. At the beginning of the year the soybean 
contract prices to other provinces were 1.30 yuan per jin. Up to 
the fall grain harvest the highest price was 1.74 yuan per jin. 
It is projected that this year's soybean market will no longer 
have this striking increase, but rather a slow increase. The 
reason is as follows: 1. The resources of the procurement 
priced soybeans have increased compared with last year. Last 
year the production of soybeans increased which enlarged the 
sources for collecting soybeans by tens of thousands of tons. 
This will moderate the conflits between supply and demand this 
year and is the material foundation for reducing the rising 
price tide. 2. The limitation of the tolerance of consumers in 
the selling areas. If the soybean market price in 1993 still 
rises with the speed of 1992, the price in August will increase 
to over 2 yuan per jin which will exceed the actual consumer 
toleance in the selling areas, and restrict the market sales. 
3. The adjustment from the imported soybeans. Every year the 
selling areas need the imported soybeans to adjust the market 
demands. According to the projection for China's import and 
export of soybeans from "The Situation and Projection of World 
Oil Materials" made by the U.S. Department of Agriculture, in 
1992 and 1993 China will import 100,000 tons of soybeans which 
will play a decisive role in moderating the conflicts between 
supply and demand in our country's soybean selling areas, and 
stablize the prices. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59267 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   PLA Use of Force Against Taiwan Assessed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  93CM0502A Hong Kong CHUNG-KUNG HAI-CHUN SHIH-LI [CHINESE 
COMMUNIST NAVAL FORCES] in Chinese Jun 93 pp 165-74 </F>

<F P=103> 93CM0502A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHUNG-KUNG HAI-CHUN SHIH-LI [CHINESE 
COMMUNIST NAVAL FORCES] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Text] Taiwan's Democratic Progressive Party [DPP] is 
incorporating `Taiwan independence' into its party program, and 
moreover continues to conduct coordinated marches and 
demonstrations. These new trends among `Taiwan independence' 
elements are attracting the attention of the CPC, and high-level 
CPC officals are taking strong positions. If the situation 
gradually spins out of control, many people say that there is 
the possibility that Beijing might ultimately use force to 
resolve the `Taiwan independence' issue. 
  Unification of China has been the CPC's intent all along. 
After 1949, for more than 20 years, the slogan `We must 
definitely liberate Taiwan' was shouted; however, out of concern 
for various factors such as the international situation, 
military strength, weaponry, public cooperation, and economic 
strength for support of a war, Beijing was continuously unable 
to achieve this goal. After 1979, the CPC, using a posture of 
peace to conduct the war of unification, did not again resurrect 
the `Liberate Taiwan' slogan, but rather advocated `One Country, 
Two Systems,' allowing the Kuomintang [KMT] to retain its army; 
however, the CPC did not move toward renouncing the use of 
military force against Taiwan. CPC senior statesmen all hope to 
be able to see China unified during their lifetime, and it is 
reported that Deng Xiaoping has ordered Jiang Zemin to pay 
attention to `Taiwan independence' activities and not take them 
lightly, so if `Taiwan independence' succeeds, it could become 
an excuse for the CPC to use military force against Taiwan. 
<H5>  CPC Military Capabilities Reorganized and Improved </H5>
  In recent years, the PLA has undergone `reduction and 
reorganization,' in which troop strength has been reduced 
somewhat; however, due to the introduction and use of new types 
of weapons, combat effectiveness has increased. 
  Development of the PLA Navy is what the leadership is 
focusing on: Functionalizing nuclear submarines, mass production 
and constant improvement of guided missile destroyers and 
escorts, equipping of units with new anti-ship and ship-to-air 
guided missiles, organizing and establishing a marine corps, and 
construction of a research platform and military outpost far off 
the mainland in the Spratly Islands. All of this reflects the 
CPC's intention to completely develop its navy. 
<H5>  New Trends in the PLA Navy, Army and Air Force </H5>
  Units are already being equipped with 35-Series 
conventionally powered torpedo submarines, the successor to the 
33-Series submarine (a copy of the Soviet Romeo-class sub). This 
submarine is slightly larger (2407 tons submerged displacement) 
than the 33-Series, submerged speed is slightly faster (18 
knots), and can possibly carry onboard Chinese-built Sturgeon-1 
or -2 acoustic homing torpedoes. 
  The successor to the 051-Series (Luda-class) guided missle 
destroyer has also been built and distributed to units. The new 
destroyer's displacement is approximately 4,000 tons and it is 
equipped with eight YJ-8 surface-to-surface guided missiles, a 
point defense surface-to-air missile, shipboard artillery, 
75-Series 12-tube 204 mm anti-submarine depth-charge launching 
rocket gun, is equipped with a helicopter launch/recovery deck 
and hangar, and may carry Z-9 helicopters. 
  The Navy air force possesses H-6D bombers that can carry 
YJ-6 
air-to-surface missiles and Q-5 attack planes that can launch 
YJ-8 air-to-surface missiles. 
  Air Force equipment has also been updated, but it is said 
that, overall, compared to Western nations, it lags 20 years 
behind. After the sweeping changes in the Soviet Union, Russia 
is already fulfilling the CPC's early 1991 order for the 
purchase of Su-27 Flanker heavy-duty fighter aircraft. It is 
reported that the CPC purchased, and as of early 1992, was 
accepting delivery of, a total between 28 and 70 Su-27's. 
  The Army suffered a personnel cutback during the `reduce and 
reorganize' campaign, but only a portion of those affected were 
from important newly-fielded units, so the result was an 
increase in efficiency; in addition, many units were equipped 
with technologically advanced weapons. For example, the 
79-Series main battle tank, the 85-II main battle tank which is 
in the midst of production, the 501-Series (copy of the Soviet 
BMP) infantry fighting vehicle, the 523-Series wheeled armored 
personnel carrier, many new types of artillery, multiple rocket 
launchers, and engineering equipment. In particular, the 
establishment of an Army air corps, along with the rest has 
greatly enhanced the mobility and combat effectiveness of the 
ground forces. 
<H3>  New Developments in the Combat Strength of Taiwan's Armed 
Forces </H3>
  This past year, Taiwan has concentrated on improving the 
capability of the weapons and equipment of its armed forces. In 
particular, on the Navy side, with the technological assistance 
of the United States, Taiwan has already built its first 
Perry-class improved model guided missile escort (known in 
Taiwan as a `frigate'), purchased 16 Lafayette-class frigates 
from France (only purchasing the hulls, with the Taiwanese 
themselves outfitting the vessels with weaponry), purchased mine 
sweepers from Germany, and in addition, with the recent 
acquisition of Netherlands-built `Gailiang Qiyu' (Improved 
Flagfish)-class submarines and `Yang' destroyers, the Taiwanese 
Navy's ability to wage war on the seas has not decreased at all. 
<H3>  Speculation Over the Chinese Communists' Use of Force 
Against Taiwan </H3>
  If the Chinese Communists really use force against Taiwan, 
it 
is estimated that they will first blockade Taiwan by sea and 
air. Because the Russian military threat against the Chinese 
Communists has been greatly lessened, most of the main body of 
the Chinese navy can be withdrawn to execute the task of 
blockading Taiwan. How will the United States react to this 
possibility? This will attract much attention. Perhaps 
diplomatically the U.S. Congress will impose political and 
economic sanctions against the Chinese Communists. However, even 
during the armed confrontations between the two sides of the 
Taiwan Straits in the 1950s and 1960s, the United States did not 
interfere by sending troops. It is estimated that today's United 
States would not interfere either, by sending troops. Once the 
Chinese Communists send troops, Taiwan can only fight against 
the blockade single-handedly. 
<H3>  Submarine Mines Are the Weapons That Cause Headaches to 
Taiwan Military </H3>
  If compared in the quality of weapons and the qualifications 
of personnel, the navy and air force of Taiwan are in a slightly 
advantageous position. In the area of anti-submarine warfare, 
though the Chinese Communist navy has more than 100 submarines, 
it is estimated that only about one half of them can be put into 
use during the initial stage of fighting while the rest will 
remain in a state of maintenance or refitting. Moreover, among 
the usable submarines of the Chinese Communist navy, the Type 33 
are the mainstay. This kind of submarine emits loud noise which 
can be easily detected by the other side's anti-submarine sonar. 
For some of the submarines, the original advantage of "surprise 
attack" has been lost. Weapons used by Type 33 submarines are 
torpedoes and mines. The torpedoes' range is 10,000 meters and 
most of them are direct charge and do not have directional 
guidance. The mines, however, are the weapons that cause 
headaches to the other side, and can play a big role in 
destroying the other side's shipping, and in blockading ports. 
Taiwan's navy has only four submarines, namely the Sea Dragon, 
Sea Tiger, Sea Lion, and Seal. But two of them are much improved 
and they voyage quietly with little noise. In addition, they are 
equipped with excellent sonar systems and guided torpedoes. 
Their overall performance is far above the Type 33 submarines, 
and also superior to the Type 35 submarines. However, it is 
impossible for only two advanced submarines to cope with the 
general situation. Before Perry and Lafayette destroyers can be 
put into service, the Yang destroyer will have to 
single-handedly shoulder the main naval tasks. Though the 
destroyer has advanced weapons and equipment, it is too old, and 
in anti-blockade confrontations it will have to deal with both 
submarines and numerous warships on the sea. It will not have 
the capability. 
<H5>  The Chinese Communists' Fighting Force on the Sea </H5>
  In the area of sea warfare, the Chinese Communists can 
probably use 12 of their 20 destroyers (while at least two of 
the rest will patrol the Spratly Islands, two will stay in the 
Yellow Sea, and the other three Type 7 Anshan class will 
undertake blockading tasks). Forces that will collaborate with 
the destroyers will include all the forces of the East Sea 
Fleet, some of the South Sea Fleet, and a convoy ship of the 
North Sea Fleet. The total number may reach 20. The Chinese 
Communists' destroyers and convoy ships have powerful sea 
warfare capabilities. They are equipped with cruise missiles 
including the Seagull I-A (HY-IJ on Type 51 ships, and Shangyou 
I-A SY-IJ on Type 53 Jianghu class ships), and Seagull Attack 8 
(YJ-8/C-801 on the Type 53H2 Huangshi frigate). Both the Seagull 
I-A and the Shangyou I-A belong to the Soviet Minghe [phonetic] 
missile type. They can easily be subject to intervention and 
prone to being off-target, or even to being shot down. But 
"Seagull Attack 8" is similar to the French "Flying Fish," and 
is the kind of missile that flies over the water and is hard to 
detect and stop. The warships of the Chinese Communists are very 
likely to be deployed with Type 21 type Yellow Bee [Huang Feng] 
missiles. The Chinese Communists possess more than 100 fast 
attack craft, each equipped with 4 Shangyou missiles. But, due 
to the short range of this type of ship, the Chinese Communists 
may use warships to haul fast attack crafts out to the sea to 
fight when the opportunity arises. This will reinforce the sea 
combat capability of the Chinese Communists. On the other hand, 
Taiwan's Yang destroyer group and Mountain convoy ship group 
will have to face sufficient attacks from many types of 
missiles, and damages suffered will certainly be enormous. 
<H5>  Contending for Air Domination </H5>
  The air force of the Chinese Communists lacks long range 
capabilities and also lacks air refueling capabilities. 
Therefore, it may not be able to effectively dominate Taiwan's 
skies, the east coast in particular. So, the Chinese Communists 
may use submarine mines to blockade Taiwan's east coast, and use 
the air force to blockade the south, north, and west coasts. The 
Chinese Communist fighter planes that can endure relatively long 
flights are the J-8 I (only a few J-8 IIs are in service). But 
their performance is not very good. In general, the quality of 
Taiwan pilots is superior to that of the Chinese Communist air 
force. Furthermore, Taiwan's F-5E fighters presently in service 
have been developed with the Soviet Mig-21 as the enemy (while 
the main force of the Chinese Communist fighters is still the 
J-7, an imitation of the Mig-21, and the J-6, an imitation of 
the Mig-19. However, the number of fighter planes of the Chinese 
Communists is far greater than that of Taiwan. Moreover, the 
production capability of the Chinese Communist aviation industry 
is far greater than that of Taiwan. If an air war breaks out 
between the two sides, even if the air force of the Chinese 
Communists has to sacrifice three to four fighters to destroy 
one of Taiwan's, by the time Taiwan has lost all of its air 
force, the Chinese Communists will still have plenty that can be 
used. At that time the planes of the Chinese Communists can even 
join forces against warships and land troops. At that time 
Taiwan will have no air force at all. 
<H3>  Taiwan Relies on Imports for Raw Materials and Oil, It Is 
Hard for Its Economic Lifeline To Survive Long-Term Blockading </H3>
  The native land of Taiwan is short of resources. Most of its 
raw materials for production and oil are imported. Its economic 
lifeline also depends upon export trading. If Taiwan is to be 
blockaded for some time, Taiwan's survival will be threatened, 
and the military personnel and the ordinary people in Taiwan 
will waver. Of course, it is extremely unfortunate if a civil 
war breaks out in a country. In recent years, relations between 
the two sides of the Taiwan Straits have been relaxed. There 
have been frequent exchanges of commerce, investment, and 
visits. If Mainland China, Taiwan, and Hong Kong can be united, 
their actual strength and achievements will attract attention 
world-wide. If a civil war breaks out again between the 
Kuomintang and the Communists, it will be a big tragedy. The 
idea of "Taiwan Independence" is absolutely unacceptable and 
unfeasible. We hope that the Taiwan government will not be keen 
on Taiwan independence and will resolutely deal with the 
activities to split national territory by the Democratic 
Progressive Party. We also hope that Beijing will cherish peace 
as most important and let a situation continue in which peace 
develops between the two sides. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59268 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL </F>
<F P=101> NORTHWEST REGION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mao Zedong's Role In Peacefully Liberating Xinjiang </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0049A Urumqi XIYU YANJIU [THE WESTERN REGIONS STUDIES] 
in Chinese No 3, 15 Sep 93 pp 1-8 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0049A </F>
<F P=104>  Urumqi XIYU YANJIU [THE WESTERN REGIONS STUDIES] 
in Chinese No 3, 15 Sep 93 pp 1-8 </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105>Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhu Peimin (2612 6844 3046) of the Xinjiang </F>
Uygur Autonomous Region party school, and responsible editor Qi 
Qingshun (7871 3237 7311): "Mao Zedong's Role in Peacefully 
Liberating Xinjiang"] 
  [Text] Deng Xiaoping says, "Without the outstanding 
leadership of Comrade Mao Zedong, it is highly unlikely that the 
Chinese Revolution would have come to fruition even today. 
Should that be the case, people of all nationalities in China 
would still be under the reactionary rule of imperialism, 
feudalism, and bureaucratic capitalism and our party would still 
be struggling arduously underground." (Footnote 1 -- 
Selected Works of Deng Xiaoping, 1975-1982, p 138) 
Deng Xiaoping's words are no exaggeration at all. A piece of 
vivid and clear evidence is the liberation of the people of all 
nationalities in Xinjiang. 
<H5>  A Wise Policy Leading to Peaceful Liberation of Xinjiang </H5>
  Xinjiang has been an inseparable part of the territory of 
the 
fatherland since ancient times. In modern times, the various 
nationalities in Xinjiang had launched repeated indomitable 
struggles aimed at casting off the yoke of imperialist and 
feudal rule. Mao Zedong had the utmost concern for the 
historical destiny of the people of all nationalities in 
Xinjiang. During the War of Resistance against Japan, the CPC 
entered into a united front with a local strongman Sheng Shicai 
[4141 0013 2088]. Over 100 CPC members, including Chen Tanqu 
[7115 3389 4428] and Mao Zemin [3029 3419 3046] were sent to 
Xinjiang to work by Mao Zedong and the CPC Central Committee. 
They did numerous good deeds. Mao Zedong sacrificed a relative 
for the liberation of the various nationalities in Xinjiang; Mao 
Zemin, his younger brother, was murdered by Sheng Shicai. 
Tianshan was washed in blood, but his righteousness was 
awe-inspiring. 
  The year 1945 saw the Chinese Revolution triumph on a 
national scale. People of all nationalities in Xinjiang had been 
looking forward to liberation with as much eagerness as people 
hit by a drought longing for clouds. Mao Zedong, profoundly 
conscious of the wishes of all nationalities in Xinjiang, 
devised a sensible strategy to bring about its peaceful 
liberation. During the Second Plenum of the Seventh CPC Central 
Committee in March 1949, Mao Zedong earnestly urged Wang Zhen 
[3769 7201] to continue to carry forward the revolutionary 
spirit of fighting heroically, undeterred by difficulty or hard 
work, as the latter made preparations to lead troops into 
Xinjiang and do more good deeds for the people of Xinjiang. 
After the CPC-KMT peace talks broke down in late April, the KMT 
regime's chief representative as well as its northwest military 
and political commander, Zhang Zhizhong [1728 3112 0022], stayed 
behind in Beijing. The CPC Central Committee considered using 
Zhang Zhizhong's connections to bring about the peaceful 
liberation of Xinjiang. In a telegram to Peng Dehuai [1756 1795 
2037] on 28 April, Mao Zedong said, "Solve the northwest problem 
in a peaceful way. It seems that the possibility is there. Zhang 
Zhizhong and others have now decided to remain in Peiping and 
are edging closer to our side. Perhaps we need to consider 
solving the northwest problem peacefully with his help." 
(Footnote 2 -- "Selected Telegrams Relating to the War to 
Liberate the Great Northwest," from Party Documents, 
1990, Vol 5) 
  In early July 1949, Liu Shaoqi [0491 1421 1142] led a CPC 
delegation in a secret mission to the Soviet Union to discuss 
with Stalin a number of matters relating to the establishment of 
a people's republic in China. The Soviets raised the Xinjiang 
issue in the discussions and gave the Chinese some pointers. As 
the CPC poised itself to liberate the entire nation, the Soviet 
leader said, the Americans were cooking up a plot, specifically 
they were encouraging the five northwest warlords headed by Ma 
Bufang [7456 2975 5364] to withdraw their units to Xinjiang and 
set up a "Nation of Islam" in opposition to the Chinese 
Communists. Should the Americans succeed in their plot, China's 
civil war would become an international issue, which would 
complicate things. The Soviet Union therefore proposed that the 
CPC liberate Xinjiang ahead of time. 
  The military commission under the CPC Central Committee had 
earlier decided to "begin working on Xinjiang" next spring. 
Armed with the information provided by the Soviet Union, and 
after analyzing the nation's situation comprehensively, the CPC 
Central Committee decided to tackle the Xinjiang situation 
earlier. On 6 July, Mao Zedong sent a telegram to Peng Dehuai in 
which he sketched a blueprint for solving the northwest issue, 
including the problem in Xinjiang. He wrote, "Besides the 
military solution, we also must try the political solution. What 
are your opinions? This is what we think. The northwest is vast 
in territory and is home to many nationalities. Furthermore, the 
number of party cadres of the Hui nationality who enjoy public 
trust are few and far between. The political solution, 
supplemented by combat, is the only way to solve the problem 
rapidly, properly, and thoroughly. Now that our troops have 
gained the upper hand, it will do more good than harm to combine 
the political solution with the military solution. Specifically, 
we should organize a military political committee bringing 
together KMT members who are leaning our way and our own people 
as an interim transitional body. The KMT people we have in mind 
are none other than Zhang Zhizhong, Fu Zuoyi [0265 0155 5030], 
and Deng Baoshan [6772 1405 3790]." "Tao Zhiyue [7118 1492 1471] 
is now wavering and showing signs of leaning toward a peaceful 
solution for Xinjiang. We think we should ask Zhang Zhizhong to 
put together a Xinjiang military and political committee as an 
interim body, with himself as chairman and our man (is Wang Zhen 
going to Xinjiang?) as vice chairman. There should be one other 
vice chairman, someone from Yili." (Footnote 3 -- "Selected 
Telegrams Relating to the War To Liberate the Great Northwest," 
in Party Documents, 1990, Vol 5) On 23 July, Mao 
Zedong sent a telegram to Peng Dehuai about the offensive 
against the two Ma's and the issue of sending troops into 
Xinjiang, saying, "Wrap up the campaign against the Ma's by the 
first half of August and spend anywhere from half a month to one 
month for rest and reorganization. March westward in September 
and occupy Lanzhou, Xining, and the three prefectures of Gan, 
Liang, and Su in October. It may then be possible to capture 
Dihua in winter instead of waiting until next spring. Older 
Brother Chen (referring to the Soviet Union--ed.) is extremely 
anxious that we take over Xinjiang as soon as possible and may 
give us every assistance, including dozens of airplanes. Shaoqi, 
Gao Gang, and Jiaxiang are over there now. As soon as you 
finalize your military plan, they will consider the question of 
aid. In my opinion, provided the Pingliang battle wipes out the 
forces of the two Mas, then the military situation in the 
northwest would basically cease to be a problem. The occupation 
of the four provinces of Gansu, Ningxia, Qinghai, and Xinjiang 
would largely be a question of getting there and taking over, 
with no major combat involved. With Older Brother Chen's air 
force giving us assistance, it should not be hard to take over 
Xinjiang." (Footnote 4 --"Selected Telegrams Relating to the War 
To Liberate the Great Northwest," in Party Documents, 
1990, Vol 5) 
  Between 24 July and 11 August, the 1st Field Army of the PLA 
launched a battle of pursuit and attack in eastern Gansu (the 
Pingliang battle), tracking down the forces of Ma Bufang and Ma 
Hongkui [7456 7703 6652] and liberating a vast stretch of land 
including Pingliang and Tianshui. On 4 August, Mao Zedong sent a 
telegram to Liu Shaoqi with the following message, "Since the 
main forces of Hu Zongnan [5170 1350 0589] were annihilated, the 
two Ma's retreated in defeat again and again. By taking 
Pingliang, one part of our troops has now consolidated their 
grip on the plains. The other part would occupy Tianshui within 
a few days and then move onto Lanzhou, which is expected to fall 
in late August or early September. We can then make preparations 
to advance to Xinjiang." (Footnote 5 -- "CPC Xinjiang Historical 
Materials Series," The Peaceful Liberation of 
Xinjiang, Xinjiang Renmin Chubanshe, 1990, p 46) On the 
same day, Peng Dehuai issued a combat order to attack and take 
over Lanzhou and Xining. A decision was made to concentrate the 
best troops on the campaign against the forces of Ma Bufang. 
  To coordinate with the PLA's march into the northwest, the 
Soviet Union on its own proposed a three-prefecture revolution 
in Xinjiang to take on the KMT. It suggested that the CPC send 
somebody to get in touch with the revolutionaries so as to pin 
down the KMT, which would help liberate Xinjiang. The CPC 
Central Committee figured there was not enough time to send 
somebody from outside the region to the northwest. Nor would it 
be easy for such a person to get there. So a tentative decision 
was made to order Deng Liqun [6772 0500 5028], political 
secretary to the delegation, to leave Moscow for Yining in his 
capacity as a liaison for the CPC Central Committee. Mao Zedong 
noted, "The key to solving the Xinjiang issue lies in close 
cooperation between our party and the Uygur nationality. Working 
on that basis, we can compel the KMT to give in and put Zhang 
Zhizhong, Tao Zhiyue, Liu Mengchen [0491 1322 4783] and others 
at our service. That way we can take over Xinjiang peacefully 
with a minimum of destruction and reorganize the KMT's forces in 
an orderly manner. (Footnote 6 -- CPC Xinjiang Historical 
Materials Series: The Peaceful Liberation of Xinjiang, 
Xinjiang Renmin Chubanshe, 1990 ed., p 75) This can be described 
as the CPC Central Committee's basic policy for solving the 
Xinjiang issue. On 18 August, Mao Zedong, as chairman of the 
preparatory committee for the CPPCC, wrote Ahmetjon a letter 
inviting the three prefectures to send a Xinjiang representative 
to attend the CPPCC scheduled to be convened shortly. Mao Zedong 
and the CPC Central Committee thought highly of the revolution 
in the three prefectures, calling it "part of the democratic 
revolutionary movement of the Chinese people." "The struggle of 
the people of the three prefectures of Yili, Tacheng, and Ashan 
is an essential contribution to the liberation of all Xinjiang 
and all China." (Footnote 7 -- Mao Zedong Manuscripts 
Since the Founding of the PRC, Vol 1, p 82) He also said, 
"We consider the nationality army a well-trained people's army 
of the Uygur nationality. By pinning down 100,000 reactionary 
KMT troops with its own revolutionary activities in the past few 
years, it has played a major supporting role for the Chinese 
Revolution." (Footnote 8 -- Mao Zedong Manuscripts Since 
the Founding of the PRC, Vol 1, p 87) 
  As the PLA advanced in the northwest and across the nation 
triumphantly, Tao Zhiyue, commander in chief of the KMT garrison 
headquarters in Xinjiang; Bao Erhan [7637 1422 3352], chairman 
of the Xinjiang provisional government; and other patriotic 
generals and personalities realized that the "KMT is doomed and 
incapable of further military resistance. So they are inclined 
toward a peaceful solution and are working hard on its behalf" 
in an attempt to stage an uprising for peace. (Footnote 9 -- 
CPC Xinjiang Historical Materials Series: The Peaceful 
Liberation of Xinjiang, Xinjiang Renmin Chubanshe, 1990 
ed., p 219) In planning such an uprising, however, Tao Zhiyue 
however had to wage an uphill battle because he had no military 
forces at his command. At the time some of the KMT troops in 
Xinjiang were under Ma Bufang (reorganized as the First Mounted 
Division), but most belonged to Hu Zongnan (reorganized as the 
78th Division and 42d Division). Commander Ma Chengxiang [7456 
0701 4382] of the 1st Mounted Division, Commander Ye Cheng [0673 
2052] of the 78th Division, and Commander Luo Shuren [5012 1859 
0086] of the 179th Brigade under the 78th Division were 
staunchly in favor of resisting the communists. Ma Chengxiang 
was unshakable in his loyalty to Ma Bufang before the latter was 
routed. Nor did Ye Cheng and Luo Shuren vacillate before Hu 
Zongnan was cornered, so they were hardly open to persuasion by 
Tao Zhiyue. In plotting his uprising, therefore, Tao Zhiyue had 
to overcome many complications and move one step at a time. 
  On 26 August, the PLA stormed and captured Lanzhou. On 5 
September, Xining was liberated and the old den in which the Ma 
family had been entrenched for decades was utterly destroyed. 
The situation was getting more and more favorable for a peaceful 
uprising in Xinjiang. Under the pressure of events, Ma 
Chengxiang, Ye Cheng, and Luo Shuren "all agree to a peaceful 
transformation. But they balk at reorganization by the people 
from Yili and would rather go to Jiuquan and wait for 
reorganization by the PLA." (Footnote 10 -- CPC Xinjiang 
Historical Materials Series: The Peaceful Liberation of 
Xinjiang, Xinjiang Renmin Chubanshe, 1990 ed., p 202) Tao 
Zhiyue and others approached Saveleyev, the Soviet consul 
general in Dihua (present-day Urumqi), pledging not to put up 
any resistance to the PLA and asking to get in touch and open 
negotiations with the CPC through the Soviet Union. On 6 
September the troops under Ma Chengxiang and Ye Cheng in Suilai 
(now Manasi) and Qitai began withdrawing. Because of the 
historical understanding between nationalities, however, some 
members of the Hui and Han nationalities fled east following the 
retreating KMT units, while some members of other minority 
nationalities escaped to the sub-provincial administrative 
region. (Footnote 11 -- CPC Xinjiang Historical Materials 
Series: The Peaceful Liberation of Xinjiang, Xinjiang 
Renmin Chubanshe, 1990 ed., p 219) Whatever their nationality, 
the masses were panic-stricken; everybody feared for his own 
life. Sensing the opportunity, Ma Chengxiang, Ye Cheng, and Luo 
Shuren vainly tried to launch a counterattack. Xinjiang was in 
the grip of a crisis. 
  To hasten and bolster Tao Zhiyue's and Bao Erhan's peaceful 
uprising, Mao Zedong took a number of important decisions on the 
Xinjiang issue. First, in view of the strained relationship 
between Dihua, on the one hand, and the three prefectures, on 
the other, and considering the panicky mood among the masses, 
the CPC Central Committee did not adopt the suggestion by the 
three prefectures of sending minority troops to relieve the 
retreating KMT units. Moreover, it ordered forces under Tao 
Zhiyue to "remain on garrison duty in the various regions and 
counties as usual instead of coming together at a particular 
spot. Troop reorganization must wait until the PLA enters 
Xinjiang and relieves each garrison in order to avoid chaos." 
(Footnote 12 -- CPC Xinjiang Historical Materials Series: 
The Peaceful Liberation of Xinjiang, Xinjiang Renmin 
Chubanshe, 1990 ed., p 61) Second, in a meeting with Zhang 
Zhizhong on 8 September, Mao Zedong told him that the liberation 
army had decided to enter Xinjiang along two routes, through 
Lanzhou and Qinghai, respectively, and expressed the hope that 
Zhang Zhizhong would telegram military and political leaders in 
Xinjiang to ask them to launch an uprising. Mao Zedong also said 
that provided Zhang Zhizhong sent them a telegram, the local 
leaders would surely go along. Zhang Zhizhong agreed readily and 
sent a telegram to Tao Zhiyue and Bao Erhan on 10 September, 
followed by another to Tao Zhiyue on the 11th. After receiving 
his telegram, Tao Zhiyue saw "a ray of hope on the horizon. 
Everything we do becomes infinitely more powerful. So we can 
press forward with an indomitable spirit." (Footnote 13 -- 
Brightness Bound: A Historical Record of the 25 September 
Uprising, Liaison Department of the Xinjiang Military 
Region, 1982 mimeograph ed.) Third, Mao Zedong sent a telegram 
to Peng Dehuai demanding that they concentrate on the march onto 
Xinjiang. On 10 September, the 1st Field Army of the PLA 
launched the Hexi battle. Xu Guangda [6079 0342 6671], commander 
of the 2d Corps, pursued and attacked in a northwesterly 
direction along the Lanzhou-Xinjiang Highway. Wang Zhen, 
political commissar cum commander of the 1st Corps, led the 2d 
Army into Hexi by taking a shortcut through Qinghai and occupied 
Zhangye on 19 September. On the 20th, the 1st and 2nd Corps 
joined forces in Zhangye and continued to press onward to 
Jiuquan, practically knocking on Xinjiang's door. Fourthly, Mao 
Zedong sent a telegram to Deng Liqun demanding that the latter 
enter and garrison Dihua as soon as possible. Accompanied by 
Yeshyev, Soviet vice consul general in Dihua, Deng Liqun arrived 
in Dihua on 15 September and held talks with Tao Zhiyue and Bao 
Erhan on 16th. At the meeting he transmitted the instructions of 
the CPC Central Committee that Tao Zhiyue and Bao Erhan 
immediately send someone to Lanzhou to discuss with Peng Dehuai 
finding a peaceful solution for Xinjiang. 
  Then a minor setback occurred. Alisituofu, the Soviet consul 
general in Yining, objected to Tao Zhiyue letting Ma Chengxiang 
and Yi Min [0122 2404] get away and demanded that the CPC 
Central Committee order Tao Zhiyue to take Ma Chengxiang and 
other reactionaries into custody. Let them go or detain them? In 
a telegram to Deng Liqun, Mao Zedong said, "Let bad elements 
like Ma Chengxiang, Luo Shuren, and Ye Cheng flee by plane. The 
more the escapees, the better." 
  On 25 and 26 September, Tao Zhiyue and Bao Erhan issued 
separate telegrams announcing an uprising. On 28 September, Mao 
Zedong and Zhu De sent a telegram to Tao Zhiyue, Bao Erhan, and 
other political and military personnel in Xinjiang involved in 
the uprising, praising and encouraging them. At the same time, 
Mao Zedong ordered the PLA's 1st Corps to advance onto Xinjiang. 
With that peaceful liberation came to Xinjiang, opening a new 
chapter in its history. 
<H5>  National Unity: Key To Solving Xinjiang Problem </H5>
  After the CPC and PLA entered and garrisoned Xinjiang, how 
did they lead the people of all nationalities in Xinjiang to 
build a new Xinjiang? At the time all trades and industries were 
in a state of depression and a hundred tasks awaited to be done. 
Problems abounded. What was the key to solving the Xinjiang 
problem? In the opinion of Mao Zedong and the CPC Central 
Committee: "The key to solving the Xinjiang problem is close 
cooperation between our party and the Uygur nationality." On 23 
October, Mao Zedong again stressed this point in the "Telegram 
of the CPC Central Committee to Peng Dehuai" drafted by himself, 
"Only by establishing a brotherly relationship with the Uygur 
nationality (and other nationalities) can the PLA build a new 
Xinjiang with people's democracy." (Footnote 14 -- Mao 
Zedong Manuscripts since the Founding of the PRC, Vol 1, p 
88. Zhongyang Wenxian Chubanshe, 1987, p 88) Xinjiang is 
inhabited by minority nationalities, of which the most important 
is the Uygur nationality. Thus national unity is critical and is 
a prerequisite for and a basic guarantee of every other 
undertaking. 
  Mao Zedong said, "It would be impossible to totally resolve 
the nationalities issue and completely isolate the reactionaries 
among the minority nationalities without a large number of 
communist cadres from the minority nationalities." (Footnote 15 
-- Mao Zedong Manuscripts Since the Founding of the PRC," 
Vol 1, p 128. Zhongyang Wenxian Chubanshe, 1987) Owing to the 
longstanding influence of the Soviet Union and because of the 
fact that some minority members had studied in the Soviet Union 
and that the struggle had been going on for some time, there 
were already some advanced communists or sympathizers among the 
minority nationalities. Earlier they had put together an 
alliance of communists and then an alliance in defense of peace 
and democracy. So there already existed a solid base for setting 
up a communist organization among the minorities in Xinjiang. On 
15 October 1949, Seipuddin Aziz submitted his application to 
join the CPC while attending the CPPCC in Beijing, at the same 
time conveying the strong desire of other comrades to do 
likewise. On 23 October, Chairman Mao Zedong wrote this comment 
on Seipuddin's party membership application, "I endorse Comrade 
Seipuddin's application to join the party. Have Seipuddin 
himself take this letter to Peng Dehuai for the latter's safe 
keeping. After the Xinjiang bureau comes into existence, Comrade 
Seipuddin can then complete the formalities by filling out a 
party membership application form and submitting it to the 
bureau." (Footnote 16 -- Mao Zedong Manuscripts Since the 
Founding of the PRC, Vol 1, p 86. Zhongyang Wenxian 
Chubanshe, 1987) In late December 1949, the Xinjiang bureau 
admitted its first 15 party members with the approval of the CPC 
Central Committee. For starters, there were Seipudding Aziz of 
the Uygur nationality, who became a member on the recommendation 
of Wang Zhen and Deng Liqun; Bao Erhan (Uygur), on the 
recommendation of Wang Zhen and Xu Liqing [1776 4539 3237]; and 
Chen Xihua [7115 6932 5478] (Han) and Zhao Delin [6392 1795 
2651] (Xibe), on the recommendation of Xu Liqing and Deng Liqun. 
They were followed by 11 other people, who joined the party on 
the recommendation of members of the bureau. They were Shu 
Mutong [5289 1970 0681] (Xibe), Maerguofu Yisihakefu [7456 1422 
2654 1133 0181 2448 0761 4430 1133] (Tatar), Abdullah Muit [7093 
0008 6757 3583 0678 3341 4476 5030 2251] (Uygur), Abdullah 
Zakrof [7093 0008 6757 2139 2089 0344 3157 1133] (Uygur), 
Anniyaer Jiakulin [1344 1441 1422 6328 1655 2651] (Kazak), 
Anniyaer Hanbaba [1344 1441 1422 3352 1572 1572] (Uzbek), 
Yibulayin Tuerdi [0122 0008 2139 7299 0685 1422 0966] (Uygur), 
Wuyiguer Shayiran [3527 0181 0657 1422 3097 0181 3544] (Uygur), 
and Abuliemiti Makesutuofu [7093 0008 0441 4717 2251 7456 0344 
5685 2094 1133] (Uygur). Each of them submitted an application 
for examination and review, along with the recommendations of 
two full party members. Upon direct approval by the Xinjiang 
bureau, he became a member without going through a period of 
alternate membership first. These 15 party members represented 
seven nationalities and 14 of them were members of minority 
nationalities, including eight Uygurs. In early 1950, the Dihua 
municipal CPC committee and its counterparts in the various 
districts and prefectures began admitting party members 
directly. By late November 1950, 995 people had been accepted as 
party members, the vast majority of them being key elements of 
the revolution in the three prefectures and leaders of 
progressive organizations. 
  To nurture minority cadres, Mao Zedong at the time demanded 
that provincial CPC committees in Gansu, Qinghai, Xinjiang, 
Ningxia, and Shaanxi as well as the local CPC committees of all 
prefectures inhabited by minorities organize cadre training 
classes for minorities. He also demanded that Xinjiang turn out 
within three years about 10,000 minority cadres with a knowledge 
of policies who were also in close touch with the masses and 
were loyal to the people's interests. Acting on these demands, 
the Xinjiang CPC bureau immediately moved to put together local 
minority cadre training classes, the first one of which began in 
early April 1950. Addressing the opening ceremony of the first 
class, Wang Zhen compared such training classes to "factories 
producing people's cadres." (Footnote 17 -- Deng Liqun's 
"Xinjiang Memoirs," 17 February 1989, appearing in 
Xinjiang Party History Work Correspondence, 1989, Vol 
2) Not only did the Xinjiang CPC bureau organize local cadre 
training classes for minority nationalities, but party 
committees in the various regions, prefectures, and counties 
also got into the act. After their graduation, the trainees 
participated in social reform on all fronts, tempering 
themselves and acquiring new skills in the process. Those who 
performed well were recruited into the party or Communist Youth 
League. In no time, the first generation of CPC-trained minority 
cadres emerged and became the backbone of leading groups at all 
levels. According to statistics as of October 1950, of the 165 
commissioners, deputy commissioners, and county chiefs in all of 
Xinjiang, 107 were minority cadres. 
  To solve the nationalities problem and achieve national 
unity, there is no alternative to doing more good deeds for the 
people of all nationalities. In accordance with Mao Zedong's 
instruction to the PLA stationed in Xinjiang--the main purpose 
of its being in Xinjiang was to do more good deeds for the 
people of various nationalities--and in keeping with its own 
fine tradition of being a working force and production force as 
well as a fighting force, the PLA units successfully suppressed 
the bandits and put down the rebels, protecting the people's 
lives and properties and stabilizing social order. (Footnote 18 
-- Remembering Mao Zedong, Xinjiang Renmin Chubanshe, 
1977, Vol 1, p 498) They took part in local party building and 
government building, putting an end to the historical oppression 
and enslavement of the various nationalities and turning them 
into the true masters of the nation and society. Under the 
leadership of General Wang Zhen, the PLA stationed in Xinjiang 
in particular responded to Mao Zedong's call to the military to 
participate in production by furthering the Yanan spirit and 
launching a mass production campaign. It was a huge success. 
Wang Zhen put it in no uncertain terms, "We do not compete with 
the people for grain. On the contrary, we help the people grow 
grain. We must demonstrate to the Xinjiang people the 
superiority of collective labor and the collective economy." 
(Footnote 19 -- Wang Zhen, "Production and Construction by the 
Military in Xinjiang: Principles and Tasks," in Selected 
Historical Materials on the Xinjiang Production and Construction 
Corps, Vol 1, 16 January 1950) Taking a long-term view, 
Wang Zhen regarded the use of troops to open up the wasteland as 
a strategic measure that would develop the border, lessen the 
burden on the people of all nationalities in Xinjiang, 
strengthen national unity, and consolidate the new frontier. 
  The troops participated in production to ease the burden on 
the people, According to calculations as of January 1950, it 
took 20,000 tons of grain imported from the Soviet Union in 
addition to the 20,000 tons shipped from the rest of the 
province to feed the 193,000 troops stationed in Xinjiang. At 
3,000 rubles per ton, the imports cost at least 162 billion yuan 
(old currency), including freight costs. Because of the troops' 
involvement in production, they were able to grow their own 
grain by June and July, eliminating the need for imports and 
saving the nation a large sum of money. Meanwhile, grain 
shipments from the rest of the province also were reduced, 
easing the burden on the various nationalities. Under KMT rule, 
peasants parted with over 700,000 dan of grain in feudal land 
taxes an other additional levies. Even more onerous was "going 
on a public errand." The masses in southern Xinjiang had to 
transport military provisions to Dihua (now Urumqi) and northern 
Xinjiang using small donkeys. One round trip could take anywhere 
from a couple of months to half a year. To the man on the 
street, "going on a public errand" was something to be dreaded. 
After liberation, the units became self-sufficient in grain and 
the peasants turned over just 440,000 dan of grain in 1950. 
Public errands too were abolished. In other words, while the 
size of the units was doubled, the burden on the masses was cut 
by almost one-half. People of all nationalities in Xinjiang 
realized from this the spirit of the CPC-led people's army of 
wholeheartedly serving the people, which was totally different 
from KMT troops oppressing and plundering the people. Mao Zedong 
had high praise for the military, saying, "Wang Zhen's troops 
entered Xinjiang and wasted no time in devoting themselves to 
careful budgeting. By practicing self-reliance, they produce 
what they need. They are now solidly on the right track and have 
won the enthusiastic support of the minority nationalities." 
(Footnote 20 -- Mao Zedong Manuscripts Since the Founding 
of the Republic, Vol 3, p 384. Zhongyang Wenxian Chubanshe, 
1989) 
<H3>  Advance Steadily and Cautiously, Carry Out Social Reform 
Step By Step </H3>
  According to the Marxist view, social reform is 
indispensable 
to really solving the nationalities problem. Marx and Engels 
said, "Once the exploitation of man by man is eliminated, the 
exploitation of nationality by nationality will also be 
eliminated." "Once class antagonism within a nation disappears, 
the hostile relations among nations will also disappear." 
(Footnote 21 -- Selected Works of Marx and Engels, 
Renmin Chubanshe, 1972 ed., Vol 1, p 270) What direction then 
should social reform in minority-inhabited areas follow? 
  In June 1950, Mao Zedong told the 3d Plenum of the 7th CPC 
Central Committee, "Social reform in minority-inhabited areas is 
a matter of utmost importance and must be handled carefully. 
Under no circumstances can we be impatient. If we get impatient, 
things may go wrong. If the conditions are not in place, don't 
reform. When only one condition is in place, don't reform 
either." "Don't engage in any reform of a mass nature without 
mass support, without the armed forces of the people, or when 
there are no cadres of the minority concerned." (Footnote 22 -- 
Selected Works of Mao Zedong, Vol 5, p 23) 
  Following the instructions of Mao Zedong and the CPC Central 
Committee, Xinjiang experimented with rent reduction in 147 
villages in agricultural areas across the province between 
September 1950 and October 1951. Beginning in September 1951, a 
campaign was launched in all agrarian areas in Xinjiang to 
reduce rents and denounce local despots. By May 1952, the task 
of rent reduction and local despot denunciation was accomplished 
in over 1,500 villages with a combined population of almost 4 
million in 58 counties in nine sub-provincial administrative 
regions, so it was a great success. But reducing rents and 
denouncing local despots weakened feudal forces without 
fundamentally changing the feudal land system. Many peasants 
said, "The landlord class and feudal land system are like a 
mountain. Local despots and other counter-revolutionaries are 
the wolves in the mountain. The campaign of reducing rents and 
denouncing local despots has gotten rid of the pack of wolves, 
but the mountain is still blocking our advance." (Footnote 23 -- 
"Report on Land Reform To Be Carried Out in Agrarian Areas This 
Winter and Next Spring," by Zhang Bangying [1728 6721 5391], 25 
August 1952) This fully shows that the urgency of the peasants' 
demand for land in the wake of the campaign to reduce rents and 
denounce local despots. 
  With Mao Zedong's approval, land reform was carried out in 
four stages in agrarian areas in Xinjiang between September 1952 
and December 1953. The landlord class, which had lain like a 
dead weight upon the people of all nationalities for thousands 
of years, was overthrown, feudal land ownership was eradicated, 
and 3.45 million peasants divided 7.37 million mu of land among 
themselves. Not only did peasants of all nationalities succeed 
in casting off the oppression and exploitation of the 
reactionary Han ruling class, but the oppression and 
exploitation by feudal forces represented by the landlord class 
within a nationality also came to an end. Politically and 
economically the peasants had truly stood up. Peasants of all 
nationalities were encouraged and elated. At a meeting 
celebrating the victory of land reform on 23 March 1952, Uygur 
peasants in Paha Taikeli village in Shufu County wrote a 
letter--"Dedicated to Mao Zedong"--in the form of a poem to 
express their respect. In the letter they told of their 
suffering in the past, described the joy of land reform and 
standing up, and expressed their profound and unparalleled love 
for the CPC and Mao Zedong. They wrote, "In celebrating the 
victory, our village is a more lively and festive scene than it 
is when we celebrate a festival. Land reform has really done us 
a world of good. The person who has improved our well-being so 
much is none other than Savior Mao Zedong. Your ideological 
splendor shines all over Paha Taikeli." On 30 August, Mao Zedong 
wrote a letter in reply, "Thank you for the letter you wrote me 
in March as you celebrated the victory of land reform. You have 
been liberated from the bondage of feudal land ownership. I hope 
you will be even more united in response to the `Be patriotic, 
harvest bumper crops' slogan, apply yourselves to production, 
improve your own material lives, and, on that basis, elevate 
your cultural standard step by step." (Footnote 24 -- 
Selected Correspondence of Mao Zedong, p 440) 
  By 1957, socialist transformation involving agriculture, 
animal husbandry, handicrafts, and private industry and commerce 
had basically been accomplished in Xinjiang, signaling that 
Xinjiang had largely abolished the exploitation system and set 
up a socialist economy. The establishment of a socialist system 
opened up a brave new world for the political, economic, and 
cultural development of Xinjiang and for the achievement of 
equality, mutual aid, unity, cooperation, common prosperity, and 
happiness among the various nationalities. 
  During the period of socialist transformation, by and large 
"our policy was quite cautious and reliable and had strong 
support among the various minority nationalities." (Footnote 25 
-- Selected Works of Mao Zedong, Vol 5, p 277) People 
of all nationalities in Xinjiang were sincerely thankful to Mao 
Zedong for the new good life he brought them. Kuerban Tulumu, an 
elderly man from the Uygur nationality in Hetian prefecture, was 
determined to go to Beijing riding on a donkey to thank Mao 
Zedong and present to him the raisins he made and the coarse 
cloth he wove. For a time this incident was much talked about 
with fondness and had a profound effect on the public 
psychology. It fully revealed the unparalleled love and feelings 
for Mao Zedong on the part of the people of all nationalities in 
Xinjiang. 
<H3>  Development and Stability: Two Major Themes In Modern 
Xinjiang Today </H3>
  With the completion of the socialist transformation of the 
private ownership of the means of production and creation of a 
socialist system, what should be the focus of work in 
minority-inhabited areas? Or, should we say, what should be the 
top priority in such work? For a long time this question 
remained unanswered. Still, Mao Zedong demonstrated his usual 
theoretical wisdom on this matter as well. 
  Nineteen sixty-two saw the Yili-Tacheng incident. In April 
1962, 60,000 residents in the border area near Yili and Tacheng 
fled to the Soviet Union. On 29 May, a handful of hooligans went 
rioting in Yining. The main explanation for the Yili-Tacheng 
incident was the instigation planned and organized by the Soviet 
authorities over a number of years. Nevertheless, our failure to 
make proper or adequate provisions for the livelihood of the 
people of various nationalities also played an important part. 
Under the leadership of the CPC Central Committee, the 
autonomous regional CPC committee and regional people's 
committee handled this matter correctly and resolutely. To 
stabilize Xinjiang, the CPC Central Committee ordered the 
production and construction corps in the Xinjiang Military 
Region to take over agricultural and pastoral production and 
other grassroots work left behind by the border people who had 
fled to the Soviet Union and set up state farms, pastoral areas, 
tree farms, and mines along the Sino-Soviet border. 
  The events in Xinjiang set Mao Zedong thinking long and 
hard. 
On 27 September 1963, Chairman Mao Zedong issued important 
instructions on Xinjiang work at an enlarged meeting of the 
standing committee of the politbureau of the CPC Central 
Committee. In Xinjiang, he said, "We must first do a good job in 
economic work to keep agriculture, animal husbandry, and 
industry growing year after year. The economy must be more 
prosperous every year than the year before, and the people must 
live better every year than the year before." "It takes 
accumulation to pay for socialist construction, but accumulation 
must not be excessive. The state must procure grain from the 
peasants, but state purchase quotas must not be too burdensome. 
We must not go too far with state procurement. Lessen the burden 
on the people. Improve their lives." "Second, put politics in 
command. Step up ideological and political education." "Take 
pains to improve relations among the nationalities. Enhance 
national unity." 
  Such were Mao Zedong's ardent expectations and immense 
concern for the rank-and-file cadres and the people of all 
nationalities in Xinjiang before he died, pointing up a 
direction for solving the Xinjiang issue. In fact, Mao Zedong's 
instructions identified the two major themes in modern Xinjiang, 
namely development and stability, which held the key to solving 
the Xinjiang problem. National unity and social stability are 
the prerequisites for economic development, without which we 
would be in no position to do anything. Ideological and 
political work, therefore, must be intensified and unity among 
the nationalities must be enhanced. On the other hand, only when 
production increases year after year, the economy becomes more 
and more prosperous, and the people's livelihood improves all 
the time can we really have solid national unity and social 
stability. Development is the most reliable guarantee of 
stability. The top priority in Xinjiang is economic development. 
  This is why. First, Marxism attaches the utmost importance 
to 
the development of productive forces. In Marxism, productive 
forces are seen as the ultimate determining factor of all social 
development. Socialism, in particular, must devote itself to the 
development of productive forces. "The consolidation and 
development of the socialist system must also rely on the 
liberation and development of productive forces. Thus, putting 
economic development on the top of the agenda is consistent with 
the fundamental principle of Marxist historical materialism. 
Second, it is in line with the basic interests of the people of 
all nationalities in Xinjiang to develop the economy and improve 
their lives. Xinjiang is a land of many nationalities. While 
inequality among the nationalities has been disappearing since 
the PRC was founded, there is no denying that economic and 
cultural gaps between minority-inhabited areas and places where 
the Han people live, between the west and the coastal region, 
remain very wide. Only a mighty push to develop the economy in 
minority-inhabited areas can gradually narrow the gaps and truly 
bring about prosperity for all nationalities and solidify 
national unity. Third, located on the fatherland's northwest 
frontier and bordering on five nations, namely the Soviet Union, 
Mongolia, Afghanistan, Pakistan, and India, Xinjiang occupies a 
vital strategic position. Only when its production has taken 
off, its economy is booming, the people's livelihood has 
improved, and society has achieved stability can we have a 
strong border defense and demonstrate the superiority of Chinese 
socialism. In Xinjiang, whether the economy is growing and 
whether the people's livelihood is improving not only will 
impact national unity domestically but will also have direct 
international repercussions. Mao Zedong had said at the time 
that people of all nationalities in Xinjiang must live better 
than they did in the KMT era and even better than their 
counterparts did in the Soviet Union. 
  Mao Zedong's instructions represented the first time he put 
forward the criterion of productive forces since 1945 when he 
made a similar point in "On Coalition Government." He wrote, 
"When all is said and done, whether the sum total of party and 
government policies in China and their implementation have been 
a good thing or bad for the Chinese people, whether they have 
had major or minor effects will depend on whether they have 
helped stimulate the development of productive forces of the 
Chinese people and by how much, whether they have hampered or 
liberated productive forces." (Footnote 26 -- Selected 
Works of Mao Zedong, 2d ed., Vol 3, p 1079) In his 
instructions, Mao Zedong did more than reiterate the productive 
forces criterion, he also refined it in a major way by demanding 
that we not only ask whether productive forces have been 
developing year after year, but also whether the people have 
been living a better life each year. The reason is that while 
the development of productive forces provides a material 
guarantee for an improved livelihood for the people, it does not 
automatically improve their living standards. If the people are 
saddled with a heavier burden because of high accumulation, high 
procurements, and indiscriminate fee collection, they would not 
lead a better life even if production is rising and the economy 
is booming. That Mao Zedong made the improvement of people's 
lives an important part of the criterion of productive forces, 
therefore, was both theoretically and practically significant. 
To improve the people's lives requires easing the burden on them 
as well as increasing output. Easing the burden on the people 
essentially means easing the burden on peasants. Without easing 
the burden on peasants, there can be no sustained developments 
in agriculture, in animal husbandry, and, ultimately, in 
industry, and no economic prosperity. 
  The autonomous regional CPC committee and regional people's 
committee firmly implemented Mao Zedong's instructions. The 
autonomous regional CPC committee submitted two documents to the 
CPC Central Committee: "Report on Strengthening Economic Work in 
Compliance with Chairman Mao Zedong's Instructions on Xinjiang 
Work" and "Report on Putting Politics in Command in Compliance 
with Chairman Mao Zedong's Instructions on Xinjiang Work." These 
two documents focused on the dual themes of development and 
stability, respectively, and aside from a number of leftist 
ideas, were basically correct. As a result, the Xinjiang economy 
made rapid progress in the 1963-66 period. In the era of taking 
class struggle as the key link, however, one was not in a 
position to truly focus on economic work; given the prevailing 
historical circumstances, Mao Zedong's instructions were not 
carried through. 
  Under the theoretical guidance of Deng Xiaoping's thesis of 
building socialism with Chinese characteristics since the 3d 
Plenum of the 11th CPC Central Committee, the Uygur Autonomous 
Regional CPC Committee and people's government have unwaveringly 
adhered to the basic line of concentrating on economic 
construction, upholding the four cardinal principles, and 
sticking with reform and the open policy. The result is a 
revitalized Xinjiang, a Xinjiang profoundly changed in many 
aspects. The economy is developing steadily and national unity 
has been strengthened. Be that as it may, the task of developing 
the economy and improving the people's livelihood in Xinjiang 
remains an arduous one. We need to keep up the hard work for a 
long time to come and Mao Zedong's instructions about 
development and stability will still be of immense instructive 
significance. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59269 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   MOFTEC Regulations on Small-Scale Trade </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0154A Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] in 
Chinese No 2341, 18 Oct 93 p 29 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0154A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Regulations Promulgated by the PRC MOFTEC (Ministry of </F>
Foreign Trade and Economic Cooperation) Customs Office: 
"Regulations To Control Small-Scale Trade With the Taiwan 
Region"] 
  [Text] Article 1 These regulations have been 
specially drawn up to facilitate commodity exchange between 
mainland coastal provinces and cities and the Taiwan region, by 
guiding small-scale private trade across the Taiwan Strait to 
normal growth. 
  Article 2 Small-scale trade with the Taiwan Region 
(abbreviated hereafter as small-scale trade with Taiwan) refers 
to commodity trade carried out according to the pertinent 
provisions between residents of the Taiwan Region and designated 
mainland coastal ports (in Fujian, Guangdong, Zhejiang, Jiangsu, 
Shandong, and Shanghai). 
  Article 3 Small-scale trade with Taiwan may be 
conducted only between residents of the Taiwan Region and 
mainland companies engaged in small-scale trade with Taiwan. 
  Taiwanese residents refer to those who hold the pertinent 
status identification, such as valid and complete Taiwanese 
fishing licenses and ID cards. 
  Article 4 Companies engaged in small-scale trade 
with Taiwan should be approved by responsible foreign trade 
organs in coastal provinces and cities authorized by the 
Ministry of Foreign Trade and Economic Relations (abbreviated 
hereafter as MOFTEC), as well as being registered with the State 
Administration for Industry and Commerce. 
  Companies engaged in small-scale trade with Taiwan are 
permitted to conduct only small-scale trade with the Taiwan 
Region, not ordinary import-export business. 
  Article 5 The import-export quota for small-scale 
trade with Taiwan is $100,000 per ship per trip. 
  Article 6 The commodities involved in small-scale 
trade with Taiwan are limited to those not subject to state 
franchise, prohibition or import-export restrictions, and 
those not under import-export quota licensing control. 
  As to the few commodities under quota licensing control that 
must be exported, companies engaged in small-scale trade with 
Taiwan should submit them to the higher-level MOFTEC organ for 
examination and approval formalities according to the pertinent 
regulations on ordinary trade and trade with Taiwan and, after 
approval and consent, apply for and receive export licenses and 
customs-document releases. 
  Article 7 Imports involved in small-scale trade 
with Taiwan are restricted to commodities whose place of origin 
is Taiwan. Customs should when necessary check and approve 
product-origin certificates for imported commodities. 
  Article 8 Small-scale trade with Taiwan may be 
carried out only on Taiwanese ships under 100 tons (including 
100-ton ships). Taiwanese ships refer to carriers officially 
registered in the Taiwan region that can carry out normal 
operations and navigation at sea. 
  Commodities carried on ships engaged in small-scale trade 
with Taiwan that are not sold should be returned on the original 
ship. 
  Article 9 Small-scale trade with Taiwan may be 
carried out only in the designated ports. 
  The ports for small-scale trade with Taiwan will be 
designated by responsible foreign trade agencies in coastal 
provinces and cities authorized by MOFTEC, such as local public 
security, border inspection, customs, communications, and Taiwan 
affairs. 
  The authorized responsible foreign trade organs in coastal 
provinces and cities should promptly report to MOFTEC for the 
record their locally designated companies and ports involved in 
small-scale trade with Taiwan, as well as notifying the Customs 
Office and State Council Taiwan Affairs Office. Unless MOFTEC 
objects within 30 days of receiving all data on companies and 
ports involved in small-scale trade with Taiwan, the reported 
cases will automatically go into effect. 
  Article 10 Small-scale trade with Taiwan should be 
conducted mainly in the form of barter, with the prices of all 
bartered commodities being calculated in U.S. dollars. 
  Small-scale trade with Taiwan conducted in cash should be 
settled with foreign currency converted with the approval of the 
state. All cash earned by both sides should be handled 
according to the pertinent state foreign-exchange control 
provisions. 
  All export-earnings foreign exchange will be retained by 
companies engaged in small-scale trade with Taiwan. 
  Article 11 All import-export commodities, ships, 
and sailors involved in small-scale trade with Taiwan must 
accept supervision and control by local customs, border 
inspections, and other joint port-inspection departments, as 
well as paying taxes and fees per regulation. 
  No commodities or ships involved in small-scale trade with 
Taiwan may display symbols that violate the "one China" (the 
PRC) principle, such as words, flags, insignias, or names. 
  The articles for personal use carried by individual sailors 
should be limited to reasonable amounts for personal use. 
Sailors may not carry articles which under provisions are 
prohibited entry or exit, and individuals may not use ships to 
carry articles for others. Equipment, fuel, and materials 
necessary for navigation by ships that are brought in should be 
taken out on the original ship. Such articles may not be 
involved in commodity exchange. 
  Commodities not declared to customs or given inspection 
releases may not be loaded or unloaded. 
  Article 12 Except as the state provides otherwise, 
import-export commodities involved in small-scale trade with 
Taiwan are subject to preferential customs tariffs in line with 
the "PRC Customs Import-Export Tariffs" and taxation according 
to the "PRC Product-Tax Regulations" and "PRC Value-Added Tax 
Regulations," as well as being subject to control by the 
pertinent customs tax provisions. 
  Article 13 When companies engaged in small-scale 
trade with Taiwan violate these regulations, the original organs 
that examined and approved them can penalize them based on the 
seriousness of the case by warnings, severe warnings, and 
revocations of their operating authority. Penalties involving 
revocations of operating authority should be reported promptly 
for the record to MOFTEC and the Customs Office. 
  As to companies and ports involved in small-scale trade with 
Taiwan that are not qualified for such trade, MOFTEC is 
authorized to revoke their operating authority. 
  Violations of customs provisions will be investigated and 
prosecuted by customs according to the "PRC Customs Law" and 
pertinent laws and regulations. And such violations that 
constitute crimes will be turned over to judicial organs for 
investigation and fixing of criminal liability. 
  Article 14 The responsible foreign trade organs in 
provinces and cities engaged in small-scale trade with Taiwan 
should, prior to the end of January each year, sum up and report 
to MOFTEC their previous year's small-scale trade with Taiwan. 
  Article 15 These regulations are subject to MOFTEC 
and Customs Office interpretation, oversight, and enforcement. 
  Article 16 These regulations take effect the day 
on which they are promulgated. Where there are inconsistencies 
between these regulations and pertinent ones written previously, 
these regulations will be the standard. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59270 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar002___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  5 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Poll on `Deteriorating' Local Political Ecology </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0090A Taipei TIENHSIA [COMMON WEALTH] in Chinese No 150, 
1 Nov 93 pp 68-72, 75 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0090A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TIENHSIA [COMMON WEALTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chiang Hsueh-ying (1203 7185 1758): "Three Local </F>
Evils: Land Speculation, Embezzlement, and the Underworld--Of 
the 21 Counties and Cities, Which Has the Most Serious 
Problems?"] 
  [Excerpts] [Passage omitted] To find out the views held by 
people throughout the province on the changes in local political 
culture and ecology, the magazine TIENHSIA [COMMONWEALTH] 
conducted a public opinion poll by telephone interviews with 
voters in Taiwan's 21 counties and cities. 
  The poll reveals that the public cannot help but feel 
concerned about the deterioration of local politics, a 
phenomenon which is spreading and striking down to the roots. Of 
the numerous local political irregularities, the worst one is 
the abuse of power by local government officials in buying and 
reselling land for profit. This problem has reached a serious or 
very serious extent, according to as many as one-third of the 
voters. [passage omitted] 
  In addition, embezzlement, corruption, and the 
underworld's interference in politics have become so serious 
that the public cannot remain indifferent. Over one-fifth of the 
voters (22.5 percent) point out unequivocally that embezzlement 
and corruption have become a rather serious problem among local 
governments. Another serious problem, in the opinion of 
one-fifth of the public (20.2 percent), is interference in 
politics by the underworld. 
  In terms of counties and cities, the voters hold that 
political deterioration is most serious in Taipei, Taoyuan, and 
Tainan counties. These counties, they say, are the top three as 
far as embezzlement, corruption and land speculation by local 
officials are concerned. Among the interviewees in Taoyuan, 73.1 
percent point out the seriousness of land speculation by county 
officials. The same problem is revealed by nearly 70 percent of 
the interviewees in both Taipei and Tainan counties. Meanwhile, 
as many as 77.4 percent of the interviewees in Taipei County say 
that abuse of power by local councilors in buying and reselling 
land for profit has reached a serious extent. 
  The problem that government officials and councilors are 
profiteering from land speculation by taking advantage of their 
privileges, such as access to land rezoning plans, is not 
limited to just a few counties and cities. More than one-half of 
the interviewees in 10 of the province's 21 counties and cities 
hold that land speculation by local officials and councilors has 
become a serious problem (counties and cities where land 
speculation by government officials has reached a serious extent 
are Taoyuan County, Tainan County, Taipei County, Taichung City, 
Hsinchu County, Taichung County, Tainan City, Changhua County, 
Hualien County, and Chia-I City; those with a serious problem of 
land speculation by councilors are Taipei County, Taichung City, 
Tainan County, Tainan City, Chia-I City, Taichung County, 
Pingtung County, Taoyuan County, Hsinchu City, and Keelung City). 
  In addition to embezzlement and land speculation, the 
rampancy of the underworld is another cause for public concern. 
Yunlin County, Chia-I City, and Changhua County are the three 
places noted for the rampancy of the "underworld." About 
one-half of the local public say that the underworld's 
interference in politics is serious. 
  However, what makes us feel relieved is that despite the 
worsening situation in most counties and cities, there are some 
comparatively clean places. In Ilan County, Nantou County, and 
Hsinchu City, only less than 20 percent of the people say that 
their local governments have a serious problem of embezzlement 
and corruption. 
  As for who should be held responsible for the 
deteriorating political style, close to one half (45.5 percent) 
of the voters agree the chief reason for the worsening situation 
is that political parties need assistance from land-holding 
financial groups and the underworld in winning the election. 
  Now that all political parties and candidates are well 
aware of the voters' discontent with interference in politics by 
landholding financial groups and the underworld and are trying 
to break off relations with them, what are the images of the 
candidates of various parties in the eyes of voters? 
  According to the poll, though the Kuomintang has put forth 
the slogan of "opposing embezzlement and ferreting out vote 
buying" in its election campaign, the voters' greatest concern 
is still the relations between the Kuomintang candidates and 
land holding financial groups, considering the fact that it is 
hard for the Kuomintang, a longtime ruling party, to sever its 
mutually dependent ties with local political factions and 
financial groups. Close to 40 percent (37 percent) of the voters 
express concern about the Kuomintang candidates' relations with 
land holding financial groups. 
  Although the Democratic Progressive Party [DPP] has 
pledged to be corruption-free, still over one-quarter (26.3 
percent) of the voters express concern about the relations 
between the DPP candidates and land holding financial groups. 
[passage omitted] 
  While the Kuomintang and DPP candidates, in the voters' 
eyes, have different degrees of relations with land holding 
financial groups, the two big parties' relations with the 
underworld are more or less the same and equally deserve concern 
according to about one-third of the voters. 
  Of the three principal parties, the Chinese New Party 
[CNP], which was founded not long ago, has nominated only a few 
candidates for the election. The vast majority of the public 
still take a cautious and reserved attitude toward this party, 
which styles itself as a party "opposed to embezzlement and with 
a new clean image." Upwards of 60 percent of the voters say that 
they are unclear about the CNP candidates' relations with land 
holding financial groups and the underworld. 
  Who should be held responsible for the serious political 
irregularities and the deteriorating social and political style 
in various localities? Now that all kinds of political 
irregularities have sprung up, who should be relied upon to 
improve the local political style? Most people say it is 
necessary to rely upon "the public themselves." It appears that 
the awakening of the local "people's force" has loomed up in our 
country. 
  According to the poll, over 30 percent of the people 
interviewed hold that "the public themselves" should undertake 
the greatest responsibility for the deteriorating local 
political style, and they are also most capable of improving the 
situation. [passage omitted] 
  Apart from the public, county magistrates and city mayors, 
usually regarded as the local people's parental officials, 
should also bear the primary responsibility for the 
deteriorating local political style (26.9 percent). In some 
people's opinion, county magistrates and city mayors, who 
control local resources and are responsible for local 
development, are the next capable persons to improve the local 
political style--they are only second to the public in such 
capability (20.8 percent). 
  To improve the local political style, voters not only "put 
demands on themselves," but also place high expectations on the 
news media which sways public opinion. "Exposure of inside 
information by the media can help make the people aware of 
government officials' embezzlement and their abuse of power for 
land speculation. It can also reeducate the people," says an 
individual in the interview. 
  A fact worthy of attention: As far as individuals are 
concerned, the public believe that, in the central government, 
President Li, holding the nation's supreme power and noted for 
his strong leadership, is the most capable person to improve the 
local political style; his importance in this regard surpasses 
the premier, the president of the Judicial Yuan, the minister of 
justice, and the provincial governor. This opinion is, on the 
one hand, indicative of President Li's prestige among the 
people. On the other hand, it shows the expectation that the 
people put on the highest official in the hope that "action at 
the top will be followed by those below and will set an example 
for the people." This matter deserves earnest consideration by 
President Li, who has evoked the people's concern because of his 
frequent uses of an "illegally established golf court" and the 
purchase of an expensive villa in Tahsi. 
  With regard to the concrete steps to begin with in 
improving the local political style, many people hope that the 
government will "take down-to-earth action to arrest embezzlers 
and members of the underworld" (45.2 percent). As for the people 
themselves, some express the hope to use their ballots to 
boycott those candidates supported by land holding financial 
groups and the underworld (36.3 percent). 
  Ironically, among the four choices of action to improve 
the political style, the "Sunshine Act," which used to be 
considered as a very promising approach, is not well supported 
by the people interviewed. As a matter of fact, in the lists of 
public servants' assets released separately of late, the 
disputable "super-low property value" disclosed by a number of 
officials has become a topic of people's leisure conversation in 
our country. The result of the poll in this respect seems to 
reflect that the public have not much confidence in the 
"Sunshine Act." [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59271 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tibet's Individual, Private Economy Expanding </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94P30020A Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO in Chinese 26 Nov 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94P30020A </F>
<F P=104>  Lhasa XIZANG RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Text] In recent years, Tibet's industrial and commercial 
individually owned enterprises have seen relatively rapid 
development, with as many as 37,235 enterprises employing 50,289 
people. Self-investment has amounted to 151.91 million yuan, 
and total sales and revenues have amounted to 735.93 million 
yuan. Retail volume has reached 38.11 million yuan. Privately 
run enterprises have also developed somewhat, with 38 
enterprises employing 351 people and with 7.41 million yuan in 
registered capital. This reporter collected this information at 
the 16 November meeting of representatives of individual 
industrial and commercial enterprises and privately run 
enterprises. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59272 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economist's Suggestions for Faster Finance Reform </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0078A Chongqing GAIGE [REFORM] in Chinese No 5, 20 Sep 
93 pp 93-97 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0078A </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing GAIGE [REFORM] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article with overall responsibility by Wu Jinglian (0702 </F>
2417 6969): "Suggestions for Accelerating Financial Reform"] 
  [Text] The 14th CPC National Congress unequivocally made 
the establishment of a socialist market economy China's 
paramount goal. To achieve this goal, it is imperative that we 
urgently speed up economic structural reform to resolve the 
deep-seated underlying contradictions in economic development in 
China. As a key link in the economic system, the financial 
system is enormously significant for the development and 
stability of the national economy. Since the beginning of the 
year, runaway economic growth has been accompanied by 
over-investment, soaring prices, a money supply that has been 
expanding excessively, and disorder in the financial sector. All 
of that shows that problems in the financial system have become 
the bottleneck impeding the sustained and stable development of 
the entire national economy. The only fundamental solution is to 
accelerate and intensify the reform of the financial system. 
<H3>  I. Underlying Structural Root Causes of Current Financial 
Plight and Its Effects on the Macroeconomy </H3>
  The problems in the financial system are wide-ranging. Here 
we will limit ourselves to an analysis of the more important 
ones that impact macroeconomic regulation and control. 
  A. The People's Bank of China does not have clearly defined 
objectives and functions. Its tools of regulation and control 
are obsolete and its organization and financial system are 
irrational. 
  1) For years the People's Bank of China has consistently 
pursued a dual-objective -- economic growth and a stable 
currency -- monetary policy, with emphasis on the former. This 
has resulted in constant conflicts with the fight against 
inflation. With the People's Bank putting fast economic growth 
first, not only do policymakers have trouble knowing how far 
they can properly go in using the monetary policy to stimulate 
economic growth while avoiding inflation and economic 
boom-and-bust, but the optimal allocation of resources is also 
out of the question. 
  2) Generally speaking, the primary function of the People's 
Bank is to regulate and control the money supply and ensure the 
safety of the banking system. Nowadays, however, the People's 
Bank has taken up the responsibility of adjusting the economic 
structure while failing to set quantitative management standards 
for the assets risk and mobility requirements of specialized 
banks or to carry out stringent inspection. Instead it has 
limited itself to using administrative orders to put forward 
general policy demands. The result is a steady decline in the 
quality of the assets of China's banking industry even as the 
industry is becoming a more and more risky business. 
  3) Although the central bank has adopted a number of 
indirect 
regulatory and control tools since reform began, they have not 
been used to good effect because of the constraints of external 
conditions and the push of internal interests. Many loopholes 
still exist. The old reliance on quota management continues. 
Moreover, the lending management is lax and interest rates are 
not used flexibly enough for leverage. 
  4) At present branches of the People's Bank are set up at 
each level of the hierarchy of administrative divisions. On the 
one hand, this puts the central bank under enormous pressure 
from the local governments. Power tends to be fragmented and 
localism is a major problem, which militates against the effort 
by the central bank to assert its authority and independence. On 
the other hand, the People's Bank meddles in the operations of 
the branches of specialized banks level after level, breaking up 
the integrity of specialized banks. This does nothing to help 
the big banks discharge their responsibilities. Nor does it 
facilitate macroeconomic regulation and control. 
  5) The central bank these days is an unwieldy massive 
organization plagued by financial problems. Branches of the 
People's Bank are forced to pay the workers' wages and benefits 
out of retained net income, a situation out of step with the 
general practice in the world, where the central bank of a 
nation is independent and removed from profits. As a result, 
government administration and enterprise management are 
inseparable in the People's Bank, which has lost its 
impartiality and there is a built-in credit expansion mechanism. 
  B. In specialized banks government administration and 
enterprise management are merged. There is no autonomy for 
credit activities within the prescribed limits while credit 
activities outside these limits lack effective discipline. 
  1) Right now specialized banks discharge both policy-making 
and commercial responsibilities. There is confusion over their 
goals. Responsibilities are ill-defined. On the one hand, the 
policy-making function is not assured. On the other hand, the 
commercial risk they take and losses they incur as commercial 
entities are masked by their policy-making function. This works 
against both their operations as commercial ventures and the 
realization of their policy-making goal. 
  2) Specialized banks have interest motivation and a credit 
expansion mechanism without, however, a corresponding risk 
restraint mechanism. On the one hand, there are no funds to make 
loans in the plan, On the other hand, they continue to extend 
more and more loans in the form of through inter-bank lending. 
On the ne hand, the state strictly controls the level of 
interest rates and the difference in interest rates between one 
trade and the next. On the other hand, because of the acute 
demand for funds on the money market, grassroots branches of 
specialized banks and credit managerial personnel have in effect 
been extending loans at higher interest rates. The difference in 
interest rates translates into a huge loss. The covertness of 
the real interest rates has caused the unhealthy tendency to run 
rampant. 
  3) There is a rising demand for specialized banks to become 
comprehensive multi-function entities, yet the state does not 
have a coherent management system for each industry or trade. As 
a result, credit funds are being transferred in large 
quantities, sometimes causing destructive competition. 
  C. The financial market has gotten more mature but there is 
disorder in the market and its development has been irregular. 
  1) What is lacking is a clear set of rules defining who 
should be the principal players in the financial market. Even 
when regulations exist, they are not strictly enforced. 
Investors which should not enter a certain type of market do so 
anyway. Case in point: enterprises entering the market for 
inter-bank lending. 
  2) The market has lost its original meaning and is becoming 
a 
credit market outside the banks characterized by excessively 
long maturing periods and overly high interest rates. 
  3) The enterprise bonds market is not standardized and does 
not operate in the open. All sorts of internal fund-raising 
takes place in a chaotic manner and on an inflated scale. 
Supervision by the market is ineffectual. 
  4) With no support from the banking system, the national 
debt 
market has yet to put together a national debt market operating 
mechanism that integrates the banks closely with public finance. 
Some actions by the treasury on the market have affected the 
reputation of national debt. Today the national debt market is 
in a bind. 
  5) Fund prices on the entire financial market are distorted 
and the market is disorderly. Official interest rates are too 
low, undermining the stability of the macroeconomy. Nominally 
all interest rates are planned interest rates. In fact what is 
in effect are market interest rates. 
  It is clear from the above analysis that China's current 
financial system amounts to a formidable barrier to any effort 
to ensure sustained and stable economic growth while maintaining 
the total size of the economy on an even keel by fully utilizing 
all the tools of macroeconomic regulation and control. A 
particularly striking problem in recent years is this. Against 
the general backdrop of local economic management, the entire 
banking system shows signs of returning to the traditional 
system of the People's Bank controlling everything. What is 
happening is that with their control over funds, branches of the 
People's Bank set up level after level to coincide with the 
hierarchy of administrative divisions have been engaging in 
commercial activities on their own. Moreover, they have been 
giving orders to local branches of specialized banks when it 
comes to funds, thus severing the integrity of specialized 
banks. In addition, most of them having adopted the retained net 
income system, local branches of the People's Bank have a strong 
profit-driven incentive to expand re-lending and special lending 
by the central bank. An inevitable product of this system is a 
mechanism for expanding credit, forcing the central government 
to keep pumping money into the money supply at the grassroots 
level, which, in turn, results in the excessive growth of the 
money supply and spawns new inflation. This tendency to lose 
control locally on the financial front leads to organizational 
over-staffing and widespread inefficiency. We can see that if we 
do not end this system, the pernicious boom-and-bust cycle will 
keep on repeating itself and the stabilization of the 
macroeconomy will become just empty talk. 
<H3>  II. Objectives for Financial System Reform During the Ninth 
Five-Year Plan </H3>
  To create a favorable environment for the rapid and stable 
development of the national economy, we must speed up the pace 
of financial reform starting today and go all out to complete 
the reform of the financial system before the end of the Ninth 
Five-Year Plan, creating the rudiments of a modern financial 
system that is structurally sound and operates efficiently. 
  The goals of reforming the financial system during the Ninth 
Five-Year Plan are: 
  A. The complete unification of the goals of the monetary 
policy of the People's Bank. The central bank should keep a 
tight lid on the money supply mainly by effecting macroeconomic 
financial regulation and control through the regulation and 
control of basic money and base interest rates. Replace 
mandatory quota management with window guidance. Reorganize the 
People's Bank structurally. Ultimately, it shall be streamlined 
into a system consisting of the headquarters, regional branches, 
and local currency control and supervisory bureaus. 
  B. Complete the transformation of the operating mechanism of 
specialized banks now under way, turning those banks into 
genuine commercial banks. The distribution of the branches of 
specialized banks should coincide with that of economic regions. 
Be consistent with international practices in the financial and 
accounting systems and methods of operations. The main 
commercial banking groups should go after internationalization. 
  C. Complete the establishment of a bank with policy-making 
responsibilities and run it properly. At the same time, the 
People's Bank should give up its function of regional economic 
regulation and that of regulating the industrial structure. 
Lower the mandatory deposit reserve rate as appropriate. 
  D. Establish a standardized nationally unified financial 
structure and extend the reach of the existing stock exchange. 
Launch the financial futures business across the board and 
provide good financial services for the development of 
commodities futures trading. Speed up financial law-making. 
Regularize the currency market, stock market, bond market, 
credit market, and insurance market in accordance with the law, 
forming an orderly financial market. 
  E. Complete the reform of the foreign exchange system. Put 
together a standardized foreign exchange market. Make the 
renminbi essentially convertible in international payments and 
trade. 
<H5>  III. Procedures for Reforming the Financial System </H5>
  Looking at the underlying structural causes of the financial 
predicament that China is in today, we can see that the People's 
Bank controlling everything and losing control at the local 
level are the main forces working against macroeconomic 
stability. The key to successful financial reform, therefore, is 
to steadfastly focus on the People's Bank and stick to a 
dual-level banking system. To achieve the goal of reforming the 
financial system before the Ninth Five-Year Plan ends, our 
philosophy of reform and actual reform measures now and in the 
near future must help prevent organizationally the localities 
from interfering in the economy, thus hurting the macroeconomy, 
as is happening today: 
  A. Emergency measures 
  To dampen runaway investment fever, check inflation, and 
ensure sustained and steady economic growth, we must now take a 
string of emergency measures. The crux of our emergency response 
is to redirect the flow of funds back into the banks and tighten 
credit and the basic money supply, thereby easing payment 
difficulties. 
  1) The People's Bank should immediately reassert control 
over 
funds while decentralizing organizational, operational, and 
managerial responsibilities. Specifically, its head office 
should take back from its branches at all levels the control 
over funds. In the future the People's Bank should limit the 
objects of its re-lending to the head offices of specialized 
banks. There should be no more re-lending from the People's Bank 
to nonbank financial institutions. Loans already issued must be 
paid off within a set period. In view of transitional 
requirements, procurement funds for agricultural byproducts this 
year should be handled in a special way. At the same time, the 
responsibilities of specialized banks and other financial 
institutions should be decentralized to the People's Bank at the 
provincial and municipal levels. 
  2) The People's Bank should gradually end its present de 
facto function of regulating funds between different specialized 
banks and different regions. No longer will branches of the 
People's Bank at all levels manage the deposit reserve fund of 
the branches of specialized banks. Nor will they continue to 
help out branches of the specialized banks at the grassroots 
level by shifting money around to solve their payments 
difficulties. The headquarters of a specialized bank should 
tighten its management of the provision fund of the entire bank 
along with its responsibility for fund regulation within the 
bank. All specialized banks must maintain their provision fund 
above 5 percent. Should a situation occur where payment is not 
ensured, we must firmly investigate the culpability of the bank 
president in order to protect the reputation of the bank and 
social stability. Hold the specialized bank accountable for 
payment. 
  3) By strictly controlling the scale of lending and sorting 
out funds, the People's Bank should immediately regulate and 
control the operating system of basic money in accordance with 
the increase in the money supply. All financial institutions 
must purchase a specified amount of treasury bonds depending on 
the total volume of deposits they have received. Instead of 
using credit as the only way to regulate the size of the basic 
money supply, we should gradually switch to a variety of 
instruments, including treasury bonds, the mortgaged trading of 
the financial bonds issued by the policy-making bank, bills 
rediscounted, and unsecured discounted loans. 
  4) Further raise the interest rates on loans and deposits. 
Such a move will boost savings, speed up the withdrawal of money 
from circulation, and slow down the expansion of the M1. 
Moreover, it will cut down on the amount of idle social funds 
and will successfully lower the level of market interest rates. 
For the short haul, it is proposed that the interest rate on 
one-year bank savings deposits be raised to 10 to 12 percent, 
and that the interest rate on one-year loans be raised to 12 to 
15 percent. 
  5) Speed up the development of a policy-making bank and a 
system for making policy-based investment and short-term loans. 
Everything must be done to complete the creation of a national 
long-term development credit bank and import/export specialized 
bank within the year and the establishment of an agricultural 
policy bank next year. In the period before the policy-making 
bank opens for business, we must introduce special account 
management to the policy-based lines of business of specialized 
banks. The policy-making bank must adhere to the principles of 
paying back principal with interest and not making a profit. 
Guided by the national industrial policy and planning, the 
policy-making bank must exercise decision-making authority in 
its operations and assume risk on its own. By inviting bids on 
the market, it should contract out certain functions to be 
performed by commercial financial institutions. 
  6) The People's Bank, including the head office and its 
branches at all levels, should immediately sever ties with the 
for-profit financial institutions, investment companies, and 
other businesses that it had set up. For the time being, at 
least, it should sever all personnel and financial links with 
those institutions as soon as possible. 
  7) Improve the lending quota management system within the 
People's Bank. Announce this year that in the future the amount 
of lending a specialized bank can make in any given year will be 
determined by its share of the liabilities of the entire banking 
system for the preceding year. The idea is to make the 
distribution of lending quotas less arbitrary. 
  8) At a time when the relations between public finance and 
banks have not been straightened out, give the central bank 
special permission this year to issue bonds to finance 
short-term loans in order to regulate cash flow between banks. 
In the future, we should develop the central bank's open market 
business through established procedures. In view of the fact 
that this year the treasury has stopped making overdrafts on the 
People's Bank or asking for advances from it, the treasury bonds 
purchased by the various financial institutions should be 
counted as part of the lending for this year. In the future, 
adjust the scale of lending as necessary. 
  9) Handle the host of major and serious illegal fund-raising 
cases promptly. Educate the public about the risk of different 
financial instruments. Announce to the public through government 
orders that fund-raising schemes, bonds, and stocks unauthorized 
by the financial agencies in charge will not be protected under 
the law. Also, liberalize the conditions for the proper issue of 
shares. Simplify examination and approval procedures. Speed up 
the examination and approval process. 
  10) The state should put some of the publicly held shares on 
the market in the coming months. At the same time it should 
speed up the examination and approval of new shares for which 
conditions are ripe so that they could be traded on the market 
soon. Increase the supply of shares on the market. Curb share 
over-pricing and dampen stock fever as appropriate. 
  B. Financial Reform in the Near Future, Last Two Years of 
Eighth Five-Year Plan 
  1) Reorganize the People's Bank. In the near term, we may 
consider setting up a branch in each economic region. Next, we 
may phase out the bank branches at the county, prefectural, 
municipal, and provincial levels in stages. Meanwhile we should 
set up banking supervisory and control bureaus in the various 
localities if necessary, all under the leadership of the 
People's Bank. The branches of the People's Bank in the major 
regions are to be responsible for monitoring the monetary policy 
and the buying and selling of national debt. The function of the 
banking supervisory and control bureau is to supervise and 
monitor the financial institutions registered in the local 
jurisdiction and conduct economic studies and research. As part 
of the reorganization of the People's Bank, we should hive off 
the bank's existing financial services, forming independent 
yunchao companies and clearing centers. In addition, we should 
set up a nation-wide commercial bank to accommodate the 
personnel made redundant by the reorganization of the People's 
Bank. In general, offices and departments within the People's 
Bank should be set up to discharge macroeconomic regulatory and 
control responsibilities. 
  2) After the existing nation-wide banks -- the Bank of 
China, 
Industrial and Commercial Bank, and the Agricultural Bank -- 
have turned over their policy-making function to the newly 
created policy-making bank, they should be downsized as 
appropriate. By centralizing managerial powers, these banks 
should live up to the role of major banks. The various 
specialized banks may be organized into a number of 
comprehensive banking groups under the industry-specific 
management of the state. The methods of operations of these 
groups as well as their management system must be consistent 
with international practices. Both the Construction Bank and 
China Investment Bank should also transfer their policy-making 
function to the newly created policy-making bank and then be 
reorganized as a pair of long-term credit commercial banks. 
  Set up an urban cooperative bank and a rural cooperative 
bank, both as local commercial banks, and put the currency 
supervisory and management bureau in charge of their 
registration and supervision. All branches of the urban 
cooperative bank and rural cooperative bank at all levels shall 
be independent legal persons. Below the head office , branches 
of the urban cooperative bank should be set up at just two 
levels -- grass roots and municipal -- down to the prefectural 
municipal levels. Branches of the rural cooperative bank would 
go up to the municipal level only, at three levels -- municipal, 
county, and township -- altogether. The rural cooperative fund 
should be transformed into a genuine community fund and mutual 
aid organization. 
  Develop regional commercial banks as appropriate. Besides 
the 
several already in existence along the southeastern coast, a few 
more may be set up in the northeast and in central and western 
China. Income taxes to be paid by these banks shall be 
considered central taxes. The People's Bank shall not make 
short-term loans to them. 
  3) Abolish the retained net income system for the branches 
of 
the People's Bank at all levels. The financial system of the 
People's Bank should be modelled on the "Financial System for 
Financial and Insurance Enterprises" and its profits should be 
turned over to the Ministry of Finance. The wages and benefits 
standards of the People's Bank must be reformed based on the 
level in financial enterprises. The necessary wage and benefits 
expenses should come out of the Ministry of Finance. 
  4) Set up a board of supervisors for state banks to monitor 
the utilization of state capital and preserve and increase its 
value. In the future, banks should be allowed to go bankrupt 
under the law, with mergers and acquisitions being the best 
option so as to ensure the orderly transfer of the assets and 
liabilities of the bank going under. While the People's Bank 
will no longer interfere in the personnel arrangements of the 
branches of specialized banks and commercial banks, it must 
strictly supervise and evaluate their business activities, being 
authorized to take disciplinary actions against the violators of 
banking laws and regulations, which specialized banks and 
commercial banks must comply with as a rule. 
  5) Establish a mechanism whereby the central bank can 
flexibly utilize the base interest rates to regulate the 
supply-demand of funds. The central bank must be swift in 
adjusting the interest rates paid by specialized banks on 
deposits and the range within which they are allowed to 
fluctuate in light of the objectives of macroeconomic regulation 
and control and the supply-demand of funds. 
  6) We should waste no time in giving specialized banks the 
power to set the interest rates they charge borrowers within a 
set range. Gradually translate the decision-making authority of 
specialized banks and commercial banks into a reality, enabling 
them to exercise autonomy in their operations within legally 
prescribed limits, including the power over personnel, financial 
resources, materials, deposits, lending, and foreign exchange, 
as well as the power to pursue new lines of business. Commercial 
banks should introduce management by the assets:liabilities 
ratio and establish assets risk management and a bad debt 
reserve system. Commercial banks must adopt international 
practices when it comes to the financial and accounting systems, 
methods of operations, and management system. They should create 
a practical and feasible self-restraint mechanism and risk 
responsibility mechanism. 
  7) The People's Bank should intensify the risk management of 
the assets of specialized banks. Formulate effective methods 
with binding force to evaluate the quality of bank loans. Modify 
the mix of assets and liabilities of specialized banks. 
  8) Adhere to the principle of industry-based management. A 
strict separation system should be applied to the personnel, 
finance, funds, and information of the stock, securities, trust, 
and insurance companies set up by banks and various agencies. 
They must be registered separately, operate independently, be 
responsible for their own profits and losses, and assume the 
risk themselves. 
  9) Speed up the creation of a People's Bank satellite 
clearing network. Establish a clearing center with a membership 
system to take up such tasks as bank clearing and mail 
remittances clearing. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59273 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Analyzes Causes of Bank Money Loss </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0112A Beijing JINGJI GUANLI [ECONOMIC MANAGEMENT] in 
Chinese No 9, 5 Sep 93 pp 29-30 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0112A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI GUANLI [ECONOMIC MANAGEMENT] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Nie Zhimin (5119 1807 2404) and responsible </F>
editor Yang Jianxiu (2799 3005 0208): "Causes of Bank 
Unprofitability Analyzed"] 
  [Text] Since China's specialized banks ran up their first 
losses in 1982, their margin of profit has been shrinking 
steadily. By 1992 the red ink had spread to every specialized 
bank. 
  According to studies in Hunan Province, money-losing 
county-level specialized banks accounted for a mere 6.5 percent 
of all county-level specialized banks in the province in 1982. 
By 1985, the proportion had risen to 15.6 percent; 1989, 34.8 
percent; and 1992, 65.8 percent, having increased 6.2 percent 
annually on the average. Nationwide, the grass-roots bank with 
the most severe losses is 30 million yuan into the red annually. 
The main causes of this grim situation are: 
<H3>  I. Loans Are Not Repaid on Time; More and More Loans Have To 
Be Written Off as Bad Debts </H3>
  Taking stock of their lending in 1988, 1990, and 1992, a 
municipal bank in Hunan discovered that in 1988 overdue loans 
amounted to 65 million yuan; idle loans, 52 million yuan; and 
bad debts, 45.58 million yuan, for a total of 162.58 million 
yuan, or 40.5 percent of the bank's combined credit funds. In 
1990, overdue loans were valued at 95 million yuan; idle loans, 
84 million yuan; and bad debts, 73.25 million yuan, for a total 
of 25,225,000 yuan, or 63.5 percent of the bank's combined 
credit assets. By 1992, overdue loans reached a high 110 million 
yuan; idle loans, 146 million yuan; and bad debts, 135 million 
yuan, for a total of 391 million yuan, 86.9 percent of the 
bank's total credit funds. Behind the overdue loans, idle loans, 
and bad debts is a multitude of reasons, of which three are most 
important. One, loans are being made because somebody knows 
somebody, or as a personal favor. There have been policy errors 
and dereliction of duty on the part of the leadership. Two, 
"eating from the big rice pot" continues to exist at two levels 
in a big way within the banks. For one thing, banks at the lower 
level continue to "eat from the big rice pot" at the expense of 
higher-level banks. The administrative style of management 
remains in place. As soon as the finance office opens its mouth, 
the banks write a check; as soon as the higher level gives the 
order, the lower level obeys unconditionally. Funds flow from 
bottom to the top while targets are handed down from top to 
bottom. Banks and leaders at the grass-roots do not take 
economic risk or are held economically liable. Under these 
circumstances, overdue loans, idle loans, and bad debts are 
bound to increase, not decrease. Secondly, employees continue to 
"eat from the big rice pot" of banks. Within the banking system 
today, whether or not loans and interest are recouped has no 
bearing on an employee's earnings. Banks over-emphasize lending 
but overlook management and are half-hearted in seeing that they 
are repaid. This is the achilles heel in banking management and 
operations. Thirdly, policy errors have been made and 
policy-making departments intervene excessively in credit work. 
<H3>  II. Operating Costs Are Too High, Profits Have Been 
Declining by the Day </H3>
  In recent years specialized banks have been competing with 
one another to build the tallest buildings and office blocks, 
put together the most luxuriously appointed small local branches 
and savings banks, purchase the most upscale sedans, and raise 
workers' benefits beyond what is standard. Consequently, 
operating costs have been soaring even as profits took a 
nosedive. Each year the grass-roots branches of some specialized 
banks spend far more money to pay for the things mentioned above 
than what they collect in revenue, causing heavy losses. 
<H3>  III. Excessive Government Interference Hampers the Exercise 
of Autonomy by Banks in Their Operations </H3>
  When the government wants to support certain projects or 
certain enterprise loans, all the banks can do is to go along. 
As far as this kind of loan is concerned, banks cannot hope to 
recoup even the principal in 90 percent of the cases. Some local 
governments go so far as to issue written instructions to the 
banks directing them not to demand the repayment of a particular 
loan or to stop charging interest on it. Naturally the results 
of such practices on the banks' bottom line are disastrous. 
  The decision-making authority of grass-roots banks is 
severely constrained by banks at the higher levels. There are 
too many mandatory loans and policy-based loans. Also, they 
carry very low interest rates. In some cases, the banks even 
have to subsidize the interest, further squeezing their margin 
of profit. 
<H3>  IV. The System of Interest Rates Is Extremely Unsound; 
Difference Between Interest Rates on Loans and Those on Deposits 
Is Small While Inflation Has Been Rising Rapidly; Together They 
Mean an Absence of Profits for Banks </H3>
  In China today, the total value of loans to be made, whom to 
lend money to, fund costs, and interest rates on loans and 
deposits are all controlled by the state through administrative 
methods. Moreover, interest rates on loans have traditionally 
been low in this country while interest rates on deposits have 
always been high. Banks derive little profits from this very 
narrow differential in interest rates. 
  Besides, even after commodity prices began shooting up in 
the 
first half of 1992, interest rates on loans and deposits were 
not adjusted promptly, causing bank deposits to plummet. 
According to statistics, the nation's total savings deposits 
broke the 800 billion yuan barrier for the first time in 1991 
only to drop below 750 billion yuan in the first half of 1993. 
In the same year, however, the amount of loans issued rose 100 
billion yuan on top of what had been lent in 1991, further 
exacerbating the imbalance between bank loans and bank deposits. 
Squeezed in the middle, banks cannot begin to think about making 
a profit. 
<H3>  V. The Number of Delinquent Enterprise Loans Has Jumped 
Sharply Even as Bank Profits Slip Year After Year </H3>
  That numerous enterprises have fallen behind in making 
interest payments to their banks for long periods is the most 
important reason why banks have been losing money in a big way. 
Take, for instance, the 10 county and municipal banks under the 
Bank of Construction in Changdeshi, Hunan Province. In 1988, 
they were owed a total of 7,332,000 yuan in interest by 
enterprises. By 1989, that figure had risen to 18,634,000 yuan; 
1990, 29,597,000 yuan; and 1992, 36,673,000 yuan. As a result, a 
historically profitable bank has been reduced to a money-losing 
institution. In the banking system of Hunan Province, each year 
the amount of unpaid interest owed by enterprises is 16 times 
that of the combined profits realized in the same period, and 
the amount is growing 21 percent annually, a number 
significantly higher than the annual GNP growth rate of 8 
percent. In Hunan Province, 75 percent of unprofitable 
county-level specialized banks can attribute their steep losses 
to enterprises which are in arrears. 
<H5>  VI. Flawed Policy Making and Mismanagement by the Leaders </H5>
  The standards of thinking, operations, and management of 
most 
of the current leaders in grass-roots banks are not high. The 
notion of occupying a position (iron chair) for life, the idea 
of "eating from a big rice pot," and nepotism are deeply rooted 
in their thinking. Some people simply do not allow the 
existence of opinions different from their own. According to 
some studies, flawed decisions and dereliction of duty on the 
part of the leaders account for 75 percent of all overdue loans, 
idle loans, and bad debts; policy errors, 10 percent; errors 
caused by employees breaking the law or violating the rules, 10 
percent; and other reasons, 5 percent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59274 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Local Government Financial Management Described </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0112B Beijing CAIMAO JINGJI [FINANCE AND TRADE 
ECONOMICS] in Chinese No 9, 11 Sep 93 pp 40-42 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0112B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CAIMAO JINGJI [FINANCE AND TRADE 
ECONOMICS] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Su Zhongyi (5685 0022 0001) of the State </F>
Council's Center for Development Studies Macro Department, and 
responsible editor Chen Lingshu (7115 0109 3219): 
"Characteristics of Local Government Financial Management"] 
  [Text] Public finance in China essentially takes place at 
four levels. At the top is the Ministry of Finance; at the 
second level, the finance departments of provinces, autonomous 
regions, and municipalities directly under the central 
government; at the third level, the finance offices of counties, 
municipalities, autonomous counties, and districts directly 
administered by municipalities; and at the fourth level, the 
finance departments of townships and towns. Of these four 
levels, the last three make up local public finance, the 
foundation of the national financial system. If we compare 
public finance at the national level with local public finance, 
we readily see that the latter is a pillar of national public 
finance. Through their operations, local financial management 
regulates and controls the workings of the economy at the local 
level and provide financial backing for both central and local 
governments in the discharge of their responsibilities. Now that 
the 14th CPC National Congress has called for the creation of a 
socialist market economy, local public management plays an even 
more important role. Thus correctly understanding the principles 
of local finance is enormously significant for straightening out 
the financial relations between the center and the localities 
and promoting national economic development. 
  These are the basic characteristics of local financial 
management: 
  Characteristic one: Local financial management is the main 
force in national financial management. 
  Statistics show that not only do revenue and expenditure at 
the local level account for the lion's share of all revenue and 
expenditures in the nation numerically (exceeding 60 percent in 
most cases) but they also make up a steadily rising portion of 
all national revenue and expenditures. In China, total 
government revenue consists of three components: revenue 
collected by the central government, revenue collected by local 
governments, and national debt income. After adjusting for the 
factor of national debt income, we see that revenue collected by 
local governments has consistently exceeded 66 percent of total 
government revenue, often by as much as 6 percentage points. 
(See Table 1, Row III.) This highlights the remarkably 
outstanding role played by local revenue in revenue collection. 


---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 1. Local Revenue and Expenditures as Percentage of Total National R-| 
|evenue and Expenditures                                                   | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year          |1988          |1989          |1990          |1991          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|I. Revenue    |60.2          |62.5          |56.5          |64.1          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|II. Expenditu-|60.8          |63.6          |60.2          |60.2          | 
|res           |              |              |              |              | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|III. Revenue  |67.1          |69.1          |66.2          |70.2          | 
|After Adjusti-|              |              |              |              | 
|ng for Debt I-|              |              |              |              | 
|ncome         |              |              |              |              | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Characteristic two: The deterioration in local public 
finance 
as a surplus gave way to a deficit. 
  For a long time in the past, local governments collected 
more 
in revenue than what they spent, as Table 2 indicates. 
  In Table 2, the period 1963 to 1965 is not comparable with 
other periods because of the dissimilar duration. In these three 
years, revenue exceeded expenditures 39.32 billion yuan, or 
13.11 billion yuan per year on the average. For a five-year 
period, the combined surplus would have been 65.53 billion yuan. 
So we can conclude that from the First Five-Year Plan through 
the fourth, the broad trend was for local revenue to exceed 
expenditures by a steadily widening margin. However, beginning 
with the Fifth Five-Year Plan, the surplus in local finance 
started to shrink so much so that by the Seventh Five-Year Plan, 
it was replaced by a 26.95 billion yuan shortfall. 



Table 2. Local Revenue and Expenditures: A Comparison (Units: billion yuan) 

Period          First        Second       1963-1965    Third        Fourth       Fifth        Sixth        Seventh 
                Five-Year    Five-Year                 Five-Year    Five-Year    Five-Year    Five-Year    Five-Year 
                Plan         Plan                      Plan         Plan         Plan         Plan         Plan 

Revenue minus   39.13        44.91        39.32        75.84        159.4        152.89       118.63       -26.95 
expenditures 


  One important reason for the deterioration in the local 
budgetary situation is national financial reform that replaced 
"eating from one stove" with "eating from separate stoves." The 
central government has delegated to the local authorities a 
measure of financial power but also entrusted them with 
additional responsibilities. In other words, even as local 
authorities collected more in revenue, their spending also went 
up. When spending increased faster than revenue, the excess of 
revenue over spending began to diminish, perhaps even to the 
extent of turning a surplus into a deficit. As a matter of fact, 
the size of the surplus began shrinking in the latter part of 
the Fifth Five-Year, that is, after 1979, exactly the point at 
which China embarked on full-fledged economic management reform 
following the 3d Plenum of the 11th CPC Central Committee and 
localities began experimenting with the 
"eating-from-separate-stove" system. In this sense, therefore, 
that revenue at the local level did not outgrow expenditures as 
much as it used to is justifiable. 
  However, we must see that local revenue plunged relative to 
expenditure after the Seventh Five-Year Plan, even falling into 
negative territory. After 1988, in particular, the local budget 
deficit really took off (see Table 3), approaching or overtaking 
the budget deficit at the national level in some years, a 
situation that is clearly unjustifiable. There are four reasons 
for this state of affairs. 1) The contract system between the 
state and enterprises has put a tight lid on local government 
revenue. 2) Local general financial contracting, which began in 
1988, not only prevented central government revenue from rising 
at the same pace as local revenue, but also encouraged the local 
finance departments to calculate income based on institutions. 
When its share of the income derived from organizations, or 
institutional income is insufficient to meet local needs (but is 
high enough to affect the issue of subsidies by the finance 
department at the higher level), a local government may cut 
taxes or defer tax payment in order to keep local wealth local. 
3) The practice of fixing base figures virtually encourages the 
localities to minimize revenue collection while maximizing 
expenditures to avoid a situation in the future in which they 
would be stuck with a high income base figure and a low spending 
base figure in the event of a change in system, which would work 
to their disadvantage. 4) The economy has not been performing 
too well lately and has yet to emerge completely from the 
doldrums. And then there is inflation, which causes a shortfall 
in local government revenue, on the one hand, and sharply rising 
outlays, on the other. 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 3. Imbalance Between Local Revenue and Expenditures Since Seventh Fi-| 
|ve-Year Plan and Impact on National Budget Deficit                         | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year              |Imbalance Between |National Budget D-|Local Imbalance a-| 
|                  |Local Revenue and |eficit (in billio-|s Percentage of N-| 
|                  |Expenditures (in  |n yuan)           |ational Budget De-| 
|                  |billion yuan)     |                  |ficit             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1986              |-25.0             |70.5              |35.5              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1987              |46.5              |79.6              |-.-               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1988              |-63.4             |78.6              |80.7              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1989              |-92.6             |92.3              |100.3             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1990              |13.47             |13.96             |96.5              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1991              |-84.6             |202.7             |41.7              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Budget deficits have been plaguing China's public finance 
and 
even the workings of the national economy in a big way since 
1990. For years the national government has been running a 
deficit in its budget, which keeps going up relentlessly: 12.12 
billion yuan in the Sixth Five-Year Plan; 46.07 billion yuan in 
the Seventh Five-Year Plan; 20.27 billion yuan in 1991, which 
fell within the Eighth Five-Year Plan; and 23.75 billion yuan in 
1992. For 1993, the budget deficit is projected to top 20 
billion yuan as well. It should be said that the current 
budgetary situation is still not ideal. After the drive in 1990 
to improve the economic environment and rectify the economic 
order, in particular, the national economy entered a phase of 
growth, yet the budget deficit has stubbornly refused to budge. 
The objective demand is that the local authorities help the 
central government balance its budget. In recent years, however, 
local financial units have not been collecting enough revenue to 
cover their own expenses. Among county-level financial units, 
especially, operating in the red is most common. (Units running 
a deficit account for about half of all budgetary units at the 
county level.) Local financial units are not currently 
authorized to change tax rates, levy new taxes, or issue bonds, 
not to mention overdrawing from the bank. Hence the budget 
deficit, which effectively means tapping into special funds and 
overdrawing from one's account, thereby disrupting the normal 
functioning of the economy. Working through their local people's 
congresses, many localities have even legalized their deficits, 
to the detriment of the effort to balance the budget at the 
national level. We should take note of these problems. 
  Characteristic three: Emphasis in local public finance on 
institutional income. 
  We can distinguish between institutional income and 
noninstitutional income. Noninstitutional income refers to the 
income derived by finance departments at all levels as a result 
of their participation in social product and labor distribution 
by virtue of their state power. Such income is created before 
the budgetary appropriation and distribution process and is at 
the disposal of the Ministry of Finance. Institutional income 
refers to the income at the direct disposal of finance 
departments at all levels after the budgetary appropriation and 
distribution process. Noninstitutional income is an important 
prerequisite for institutional income while institutional income 
is in inevitable extension of noninstitutional income in the 
budgetary appropriation and allocation process. The reason is 
that without institutional income, there would be no 
distribution basis for the budgetary allocation of incomes and 
expenditures. On the other hand, what a local finance agency 
collects in revenue often is not the same thing as revenue that 
it is free to keep for its own use. Some units collect a good 
deal of revenue but retain only a small portion for their own 
use, while just the opposite happens in other units. The 
budgetary process requires that a unit which collects more in 
revenue than what it spends turn over an appropriate share of 
its revenue to the higher authorities, forming revenue turned 
over to the higher authorities for the latter's disposal. A unit 
that spends more than what it collects in revenue will be given 
a certain amount of subsidy by the higher authorities, forming a 
subsidy income. In this way noninstitutional income is converted 
into institutional income through distribution within the 
financial system. 
  Against the backdrop of "eating from separate stoves," it is 
clear that as far as local finance agencies are concerned, only 
institutional incomes are real incomes. While they attach 
importance to noninstitutional incomes, therefore, most of them 
take institutional incomes even more seriously. One of the key 
missions of national financial management is to ensure an 
adequate income (essential to the discharge of duties and 
responsibilities by the central government) for the state 
coffers, that is, noninstitutional income, through the pursuit 
of institutional incomes by local governments. Only by clearly 
understanding the laws governing the amount of institutional 
incomes at the local level and its growth can we develop a sound 
distribution relationship between the finance agency at the top 
and its local counterparts. Since reform has been under way, 
China adjusted the local financial system rather extensively in 
1980, 1985, 1988, and 1992. Every round of adjustment was well 
suited to the circumstances at the time and has enriched our 
experience with the financial management system of "eating from 
separating stoves." Nevertheless, we must also realize that 
establishing a sound local financial management system is a 
highly complex piece of systems engineering. It requires an 
appropriate degree of stability, yet the local financial system 
is open to influence by a host of internal variables (the scale 
and structure of economic development, the scale of government 
spending and the mix of expenses, and changes in the fiscal 
policy) and external variables (price changes, changes in other 
management systems). If we are just a tad careless, some 
localities may end up with too much financial power while others 
may have too little, putting national financial management in a 
passive position. 
  Characteristic four: To a certain extent deficit budgeting 
is 
forced upon the localities. 
  On the one hand, deficit budgeting is forced upon the 
localities by institutional shortcomings. In a basic sense, a 
locality cannot balance its budget if the local economy is not 
developed enough. But we also must see that the financial system 
has a major impact on revenue and expenditures. To begin with, 
errors in the revenue management system may turn a surplus in 
many a local budget into a deficit. In some areas, for instance, 
revenue used to exceed expenditures. Then came a system of 
turning over revenue to the higher level at sharply escalating 
rates, which slowed revenue growth relative to the increase in 
expenditures until the surplus finally was replaced by a 
deficit. At the spending end, moreover, there may be loopholes 
in the management system which also could turn a surplus into a 
budget deficit. Take, for instance, the practice of using a base 
number to establish a spending base level. A locality with 
relatively modest expenses in the base year would end up with a 
contact spending base number that is quite low, while another 
locality with substantial expenses in the base year would end up 
with a contract spending base number that is higher. Suppose 
these two localities are similar in every other aspect, but just 
because they differ in the contract spending base number, their 
spending burden in years to come would also be different. The 
burden on the former will be a little heavier; on the latter, a 
little lighter. Those which are overburdened may run a deficit. 
Furthermore, the fact that financial power and responsibilities 
are not clearly divided among the various levels has also forced 
some localities into the red. For one thing, there is irregular 
enterprise transfer. Many localities are only too keen to take 
care of profitable enterprises while dumping unprofitable ones 
on the lower level. As a result, many local governments at the 
lower levels had their "plums" taken away from them but found 
themselves saddled with new baggage. Although enterprise 
transfer did include some adjustment of financial power by the 
higher levels, in most cases adjustment only took care of the 
immediate, not the long run, making a budget deficit inevitable. 
In some cases, the "higher level comes up with the policy and 
the lower level writes the check." Some areas were already 
shouldering a heavy burden to begin with. After the higher level 
unveiled the policy of increasing subsidies to reward growth, 
they either dragged their feet (which is hard to do) or went 
along reluctantly, which inevitably led to deficit budgeting. 
Moreover, tax levying was overly influenced by the tax 
collection plan, instead of following the tax code fully. As 
presently constituted, the tax collection plan does not take 
into consideration all the factors in a comprehensive way, but 
mainly uses the revenue level a year ago or for the past several 
years as the bench-mark. The natural outcome is a substantial 
gap between the amount of planned revenue and the amount of 
revenue that would be collected if the tax law is followed. When 
the former is smaller than the latter, tax departments would cut 
taxes or defer tax payment in an unprincipled way, which may 
push a local budget into the red unnecessarily. 
  On the other hand, the budget deficit is forced upon the 
locality by the lack of variety in revenue-raising methods. On 
the national level, the state can try to balance its budget in a 
host of ways. On the revenue side, it can enhance its regular 
income by making laws and policies and boost its irregular 
revenue by borrowing against the national debt, making 
overdrafts at banks, and borrowing from localities. Local 
governments, in contrast, basically must fall back on 
institutional income to balance their budgets; there is 
relatively little room for them to maneuver. As with the central 
government, local governments also resort to borrowing when they 
have no other choice. Yet thus far we have not formulated any 
clear and sound regulations governing how much borrowing there 
can be, the mix of loans, their periods of maturation, or 
interest rates. 
  Accordingly we must work mighty hard to eliminate the 
institutional causes of the deficits in local budgets as we 
further our reform. We must waste no time in adopting a 
factor-based method for fixing spending base numbers. We must do 
a better job relating the tax collection plan to local economic 
realities. We must also regularize the debt relations between 
the Ministry of Finance and local finance offices and the debt 
relations between local finance offices and other areas by 
writing them into law. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59275 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Importance, Difficulties of Managing Assets </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0191A Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO in Chinese 30 Nov 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0191A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhou Shulian (0719 2579 5571) and Zhang Jixiang </F>
(1728 0370 3276): "Reorganizing State-Owned Assets, Propping Up 
Pillar Industries; Key and Difficult Points for Current 
State-Owned Property Rights Management in China"] 
  [Text] I. Urgency and Necessity of Reorganizing 
State-Owned Assets 
  When we refer to reorganization of state-owned assets, we 
mean this to contain, chiefly, the following three levels of 
reform: first, carrying out reorganization of state-owned assets 
concerned with the enterprise property organization system, 
which means incorporating the great majority of state- owned 
enterprises, converting them into joint stock enterprises with 
state single capital, state-controlled capital and state-shared 
capital; the second is to reorganize state-owned assets within 
the scope of an industry, which means putting support for pillar 
enterprises at the center, and perfecting the organization of 
state-owned enterprises' assets within the same industry, to 
form a "national class group" of enterprises within that 
industry which will have competitive strength in international 
markets; the third is to reorganize assets among industries, 
which means allowing state-owned assets to be withdraws from 
ordinary industries, while gathering in the domestic pillar 
industries and other major industries through transfer of 
property rights. 
  The necessity of accelerating reorganization of state-owned 
assets is determined by the inappropriate contradictions between 
the state-owned economy's competitiveness in the current period 
and the missions it should undertake, and the circumstances 
surrounding these missions. 
  First, after 14 years of reform, up to the beginning of this 
decade, there has been a fundamental change in the traditional 
Chinese economic pattern which was characterized by state 
monopoly. The nonstate-owned economy developed rapidly, and 
especially with a great deal of foreign capital coming in over a 
wide scale. This brought competitiveness in international 
markets not only to ordinary manufacturing industries, but also 
to the raw materials and excavating industries. It even had this 
result for the backbone industries of the domestic economy which 
were originally regarded as natural monopolies, ones which 
should be state monopolies, such as railways, aviation, finance, 
insurance, electric power, etc. State-owned enterprises must be 
highly efficient and high profitable in order to survive. If the 
state-owned enterprises lack the ability to compete, not only 
will they be unable to play the key role in the domestic 
economy, they cannot become China's main force for joining in 
the international market competition, and they will even lose 
what positions they already hold in the domestic economy, and 
will not demonstrate the superiority of the socialist 
state-owned economy. Therefore, strengthening "commercial 
battle" knowledge and "competition" knowledge should become the 
principal idea in the 1990s for state-owned property rights 
management in China. 
  Second, the practical situation of China's state-owned 
economy is very unsuitable to the heavy assignments it is 
undertaking and the conditions of serious competition. Looking 
at the world wide picture, about one-third of the state-owned 
enterprises are obviously losing money, one-third are of 
potential losers, and assets operations never get themselves out 
of the difficult position of low efficiency. Looking at the 
industrial scale, big enterprises are not really big, small 
enterprises are specialized, and there is serious competition 
and regional and production separation as well. Compared with 
overseas competitors, the state-owned enterprises are obviously 
quite distant from being a powerful force. What is especially 
deserving of attention is this kind of distance among our pillar 
industries. Taking automobile manufacturing as an example, the 
16 overseas automobile manufacturing enterprises which occupied 
over 70 percent of the world's gross output had an average scale 
of assets of $45 billion, with an average yearly output of over 
2.5 million cars, while the entire fixed assets of China's 
automobile industry was only 18 billion yuan (RMB). In addition, 
this industry was scattered over 2,600 enterprises, among which 
the fixed assets of the eight major automobile manufacturers 
occupied only 30.5 percent of the entire industry. It is 
forecast that by the end of the Eighth Five-year Plan, the gross 
assets of these eight major enterprises will be up to 50 billion 
yuan, which is still less than $10 billion. Our industry's 
average assets scale is even less than the amount major overseas 
enterprises invest annually in scientific and technical research 
and development. Looking at the distribution of output, the 
output of over 95 percent of the enterprises in our automobile 
industry is less than 50,000 cars, with 80 percent of the 
enterprises having an annual output of less than 10,000 cars. 
Obviously, if we do not soon alter this situation of scattered 
resource distribution and increase enterprises' economic power, 
joining the competition in the international market will be 
merely an illusion. 
  How to change the inappropriate situation between China's 
economic competitive ability and its mission, given its 
circumstances? One way is to rely on the state's investment. 
This is doubtless necessary, but presents considerable 
difficulties. Some concerned experts estimate that if before 
2000, we can form two to three pillar enterprises in China's 
automobile industry, making their output occupy over 80 percent 
of the gross national output, the production capacity of each 
pillar enterprise should be at least one million cars, and the 
gross assets should be over $6 billion, which is about 35 
billion yuan RMB, and this will be 10 times again the net assets 
of the No 1 Automobile Group--the largest automobile 
manufacturing enterprise group at present. Our state finances 
have no way of assuming such a huge investment increase at the 
present time. Another way is to rely on the enterprises 
themselves, aided by the market operation system, going the way 
of association and merger. This is the basic means of remolding 
the state-owned assets under the market economic operation 
system. But it will be a long process for the market economy 
operation system to come into full play. At present, the market 
economic operation system in China imperfect, so this process 
will be a very long one. Another way is by using the state-owned 
assets property rights controlled by the government, 
reorganizing state-owned assets. This method can compensate to a 
certain degree for shortcomings in financial capacity, as well 
as speed up perfecting the enterprises' self-reorganization. We 
believe that under the conditions of the socialist market 
economy, it is not necessary that the state- owned economy must 
be manifested in the industries to the same degree as state 
ownership, but function chiefly as the state-owned enterprises' 
competitiveness and play the lead role in the domestic economy. 
Thus, we must change our thinking, conscientiously adjust the 
operational scale and structure of the state-owned economy, 
strengthen pillar industries and increase their competitiveness 
ability, and bring the state-owned economy's leading role more 
efficiently into the domestic economy. 
<H3>  II. Difficult Points, Countermeasures in Reorganizing 
State-Owned Assets </H3>
  To reorganize state-owned assets we must smash the old 
pattern of making regional and production distinctions in asset 
allocation for industrial economic development, perfecting 
reorganization. Because each industrial management department 
undertakes a "united management" (industrial management) 
function for enterprises of their entire industry and 
simultaneously a "responsibility" (state-owned assets property 
rights management) function for its attached enterprises, in 
practice, it is usually the case that "united management" is 
false, "responsibility" is genuine, as industrial plans and 
policies are often difficult to implement efficiently due to 
interference from the departments responsible for enterprises. 
This can be regarded as the major point of difficulty in current 
state-owned assets reorganization work. 
  How to ease the contradiction between "responsible" and 
"united management" in the process of industrial management? Our 
conclusion from the past 14 years' experience and lessons from 
reform is that in order to reach a basic resolution of the 
contradiction between "responsible" and "united management" in 
the process of industrial management, to guarantee and promote 
successfully the reorganization of the state-owned assets 
system, we should set out to support reform from multiple 
directions, including the following major six aspects: 
  First, accelerate establishment of a modern enterprise 
system. The contradiction between "responsible" and "united 
management" comes first from the undivided responsibility for 
administration and enterprise activity in the state-owned assets 
operational activities. The state-owned enterprises cannot 
become merchandise producers and operators of enterprises which 
are self operated, responsible for their own profits and losses, 
self restricted, and self developing. Through defining 
enterprises' property rights, establish a modern enterprises' 
legal person system. Remolding state-owned enterprises by 
incorporation will aid in correcting the property rights 
relationships between the state and state-owned enterprises, 
will achieve the separation of enterprises from administration, 
will permit state-owned enterprises to become genuine 
merchandise production operators and independent principal 
entities in market competition, and will establish a good 
foundation for resolving the contradiction between government's 
"responsible" function and "united management" function. 
  Second, government management of industries gradually tends 
to be synthesized. The finer the division of labor among 
industrial management departments, the more specialized will be 
their management, the more numerous will be the number of 
responsible departments, and the easily will there occur the 
contradiction between "responsible" and "united management." In 
determining the management departments, there must be attention 
to letting the scale of their management be suitably wider, so 
that the number of responsible departments will be fewer; this 
will help to weaken the contradiction between "responsible" and 
"united management," which will be favorable to reorganizing the 
state-owned assets. 
  Third, have different patterns for state-owned asset's 
property right management for different industries. For ordinary 
industries, such as food processing, beverages, etc., which are 
regular daily consumption producing industries and some service 
industries, the state-owned assets can by plan be gradually and 
automatically withdrawn, and the contradiction between 
"responsible" and "united management" will disappear with it. 
For competitive domestic economy pillar industries, such as 
automobile manufacturing, the oil and chemical industry, heavy 
machinery, electricity, etc., we should cultivate and develop a 
state-owned enterprise group which is centered on pillar 
enterprises. This will more densely concentrate the state-owned 
assets in that industry, as well as handling well the 
relationship between "responsible" and "united management" by 
making pillar enterprises the intermediary. As for domestic 
economy pillar industries which are natural monopolies, e.g., 
railways, posts, electric power, etc., which have such technical 
and economic characteristics as constituting a high proportion 
of the state-owned economy, with large scale enterprises, single 
products, little crossover between industries, etc., these can 
take on the state-owned assets' property rights management 
pattern of taking industrial management departments as dominant 
factor. 
  Fourth, establish an organic combined organizational pattern 
and system which will be favorable to state-owned assets 
property rights management and industrial management. Looking at 
the current situation, one task is to establish an 
interdepartmental coordinating committee for remolding 
state-owned assets, to strengthen leadership. A second is to 
establish an industrial or comprehensive state-owned economy 
strategic study center. This will strengthen research on 
strategy and tactics for the state-owned economy to compete in 
the market, and provide reference service for industrial 
management departments and management of state-owned assets. A 
third is to establish work relationship between the branch 
organs of state-owned assets property rights management inside 
industrial management departments and state-owned assets 
management departments. These branch organs should also make 
policy suggestions concerning the scale of state-owned assets 
operations and the structural readjustment and operational 
policies for the industry. 
  Fifth, change the concept of state-owned property rights 
management, to improve the quality of managers. The 
qualification of managers is the key to whether the management 
system can operate regularly. However, if we do not completely 
abandon the state-owned property rights management concept which 
formed under the traditional system, it will be impossible to 
establish a new type of state-owned property management system. 
So, we must further liberate our ideas, study and grasp market 
economic theory and the operating regulations for state-owned 
property under the conditions of the socialist market economy. 
  Sixth, vigorously cultivate and develop a market for 
enterprises to exchange property rights. Although state-owned 
assets reorganization is a planned governmental property rights 
management activity, we absolutely cannot look upon it as 
identical to the "close, stop, merge, and exchange" of 
enterprises under the traditional system. We should build a base 
on enterprise self operation, provide appropriate intervention 
and policy guidance to accelerate necessary concentration of 
state-owned assets. The formation of an enterprise property 
rights exchange market is a necessary condition for reorganizing 
state-owned assets and propping up pillar industries and 
enterprises under the market economy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59276 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> SMALL-SCALE ENTERPRISES </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Different Forms' of Rural Shareholding System </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0084A Beijing ZHONGGUO NONGCUN JINGJI [CHINA'S RURAL 
ECONOMY] in Chinese No 9, 20 Sep 93 pp 3-7 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0084A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO NONGCUN JINGJI [CHINA'S RURAL 
ECONOMY] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by a Joint Investigative Group comprised of the </F>
Party Central Committee Political Research Department's Rural 
Group, the State Council Research Department's Rural Economy 
Group, and the Ministry of Agriculture's Rural Research Center: 
"Investigative Report on the Rural Shareholding System and 
Shareholding Cooperative System"] 
  [Text] Different forms of the shareholding system and the 
shareholding cooperative system have been spreading rapidly in 
China's rural areas in recent years. This is a reorganization 
and a new breakthrough in the system in the aftermath of the 
family-based, output-related contract responsibility system as 
the rural management organs adapt to the market economy and the 
development of the productive forces. What is the future of the 
development of this management style? What intrinsically brought 
on this new style? What general and specific policies should we 
adopt now? We brought these questions to Guangdong, Shandong, 
Zhejiang, Jiangsu, Hubei, and Hebei as we conducted our 
investigations and studied other typical local examples. In 
association with NONGCUN TONGXUN ZAZISHI [RURAL COMMUNICATIONS 
MAGAZINE PUBLISHER], we invited comrades from relevant research 
units to a symposium in which the following basic viewpoints 
were developed: 
<H3>  Various Forms of the Shareholding System and Shareholding 
Cooperative System Are Becoming an Important Management Style 
and Organizational System in the Rural Areas </H3>
  1. Like the family-based, output-related contract 
responsibility system, the rural shareholding system and 
shareholding cooperative system are chosen from among mass 
practices and are the peasants' own magnificent creation. 
In recent years, especially since Comrade Xiaoping's 
southern-tour speech and the 14th National Party Congress, in 
the wake of the development of the rural productive forces and 
the growth of the market economy, the development of different 
forms of rural shareholding system and shareholding cooperative 
system has gained momentum, and they have become increasingly 
widespread. Among industries, not only have they appeared in 
many township enterprises but they have become popular in the 
forestry and fishery industries and are gradually spreading to 
the planting and breeding industries. Regionally, not only have 
they developed quickly along the coastal areas and the suburbs, 
but they are also growing in the central regions and showing up 
in many western areas. In many localities, what used to be the 
spontaneous action of the peasants and the grass-roots cadres 
has turned into deliberate decisions at the leadership level. In 
the wake of this vigorous development, these systems have taken 
on many forms, and it has become difficult to use one name to 
cover all of its rich contents. For simplicity's sake though, we 
will temporarily call them rural shareholding systems. 
  2. The rural shareholding systems of different trades 
have some common characteristics but also have their own 
features. Township enterprises' shareholding system is 
primarily a way to pool capital to set up factories. In some 
cases, the collectives contribute land, buildings, and 
equipment; the villagers contribute funds, technology, and 
labor; and shares are calculated based on the price of factors 
of production contributed. In other cases, it is not only a 
joint effort between the collectives and the villagers but units 
and individuals and even foreign businesses are also invited to 
buy shares. And there are cases which started out with 
collectives and peasants in individual townships and villages 
pooling resources to set up factories, using labor to attract 
capital or capital to attract labor. Everybody had the same 
number of shares, giving each person one vote. But as those 
enterprises developed and exceeded the share quota and the 
community-set limit on the public's share participation, the 
system was changed to give one vote to each share. We 
encountered a typical example of this kind in a shareholding 
enterprise in Laiyang City's Rulinbo Village in Shandong 
Province. The village set up the Terrazzo Company, Ltd. in June 
1992. Each share was worth 100 yuan, and a total of 29,700 
shares were sold, generating share capital of 2.97 million yuan. 
There are four kinds of stocks: One, collective shares -- the 
village itself bought shares using its houses and land-use 
rights and its own money; there are 13,420 such shares. Two, 
workers' shares -- the workers bought 3,400 shares with their 
own money. Three, public shares -- enterprises, institutions, 
and groups bought 1,000 shares. Four, foreign-invested shares 
--Hong Kong's Huayi Industrial Development Company bought shares 
with their transportation equipment, office equipment, and spot 
exchange, which converted to 11,880 shares. It took only four 
months for this enterprise to go from preparation to production, 
and it has already produced 10,000 sq m of terrazzo flooring 
material. 
  The planting and breeding industries' shareholding system is 
similar to those of the township enterprises. Here we will use 
another example in Laiyang to explain the basic approach. A 
prototype is Tuanwang Township's method of pooling resources to 
build large, hothouse-type vegetable barns. Each share is worth 
100 yuan, and there are 10,114 shares, generating 1.0114 million 
yuan in capital. Specifically, the township government bought 
2,000 shares; two villages bought shares with their land and 
water conservancy facilities, which converted to 6,070 shares; 
the peasant households that contracted to work the barns bought 
1,330 shares; the villagers' labor input converted to 714 
shares. The township used this method to build 102 large 
vegetable barns which went into production last winter, and 
today, they are generating nearly a million yuan in income. 
Another typical example is the dairy cow farms set up in 
Tangezhuang township under a joint stock system. Each share is 
worth 1,000 yuan, and there are 271.1 shares, raising 271,100 
yuan in capital. Specifically, the township's improved-breed 
farm contributed the dairy cows, land, and equipment and has 105 
shares; two villages used their dairy cows and cash to buy 163 
shares; the workers' cash input converted to 3.1 shares. This 
method brings into play not only the improved-breed farms' land, 
equipment, and technological superiority but also the two 
village's fund superiority and promotes the development of the 
cattle industry. 
  The forestry industry's shareholding system primarily uses 
stock conversion and resource-pooling to develop tree farms. In 
Fujian's Sanming City, 80 percent of the villages use the 
shareholding cooperative system to set up tree farms. 
Specifically, one, the collective rights to the hillsides are 
converted into shares, known as hillside shares; two, trees, 
which are assets created by the villagers' labor input, planted 
after the cooperative effort began are converted into shares, 
known as basic shares; three, the villagers' input of cash, 
technology, and labor are converted to shares, known as 
investment shares. This approach is called "allocating shares 
but not the hillsides; distributing dividends but not the 
forests." Some localities have even crossed community 
boundaries and let the state-run units, village collectives, 
peasant households, and the general public set up tree farms and 
develop forestry resources. As for orchard management, the 
shareholding system is even more popular. 
  For the fishery industry's shareholding system, collective 
fishing boats were converted to shares in the early days of 
reform, but it has since developed into a system where the 
fishermen pooled their resources to buy large fishing boats or 
used their boats to buy shares into fishing companies. These 
methods are constantly being developed in the coastal regions. 
Using the shareholding system to set up fish farms and develop 
fresh-water aquatics is increasingly popular in the interior 
provinces. Some fishermen pool their resources with other 
fishermen to set up joint operations; others pool their 
resoruces with the village collectives, and some ignore the 
boundaries between regions, trades, and ownership systems to 
pool their resources in their operations. In localities rich in 
fresh-water resources, such management styles have spread very 
rapidly. Hubei Province's Hanchuan County alone has 79 
shareholding fish farms. 
  Some production links have also adopted the method of 
raising 
capital and labor input as a way to pool resources and set up 
service projects and operate them like enterprises. Inner 
Mongolia's Qahar Qianqi has been using the shareholding system 
to run their electric motor-pumped wells since 1988. They have 
converted into shares their hydroelectric equipment purchased as 
collective investment or with state-support funds and the 
peasants' labor spent on drawing water, and the wells are 
managed like enterprises. Whoever water the land must pay, and 
the income earned is distributed according to the number of 
shares. Some localities pool their resources to set up 
farm-machinery service teams, repair services, and gas stations 
to serve the peasant households. The results have been very good. 
  3. The shareholding system not only has spread to many 
rural trades but has become a part of many different economic 
components. Many localities' village collective enterprises, 
community collective economic organizations, and individual 
private economies have introduced the shareholding system or 
have restructured themselves under the shareholding system. 
To reorganize themselves under the shareholding system, rural 
collective enterprises first sort out their assets and have them 
assessed. Equity rights are drawn up according to the primitive 
sources of the existing stock of assets; meanwhile, enterprise 
workers and the general public are invited to buy shares with 
cash. Generally, equity shares are divided into the following 
types: Village collective shares -- they are created by the 
village collective economic organizations' direct investments, 
and the shares belong to all members of the community; 
enterprise shares -- they are created by the enterprise's own 
profit retention, and the shares belong to the entire enterprise 
staff; staff allocated shares -- they are accumulated by the 
workers' labor and are only the basis for distribution and 
cannot be redeemed, transferred, put up as collateral, or 
bequeathed; workers' investment shares--they are newly created 
by the workers' cash input; public shares--they are created by 
group or individual investors; foreign-funded shares--they are 
created by foreign investors. The last three kids of investment 
shares can be redeemed, transferred, collateralized, and 
bequeathed. 
  As far as we know, the earliest example of introduction of 
the shareholding system into the community collective economic 
organizations is in Zibo City's Changxing Village in Shandong 
Province. When this village was implementing the output-related 
constract responsibility system in the early 1980's, it already 
had five enterprises and more than 3 million yuan in fixed 
assets. In the course of promoting the separate household 
contract responsibility system, only the cheap, consumptive farm 
tools were distributed on the first day, and it went smoothly. 
On the second day, they simply could not find a way to allocate 
the village's nine cows: If several households shared one cow, 
it would be difficult to raise, and it would be of little use. 
Some people suggested slaughtering the cows and selling the meat 
for money. The party branch secretary halted the allocation 
process, and upon giving it a lot of thought, he came up with 
the idea of allocating shares but not the assets. After a 
thorough discussion by the villagers, this method was applied to 
most fixed assets. Subsequently, this village's economy really 
took off, and today, it has 15 industrial enterprises and has 
become the first village in the area to generate more than 100 
million yuan in output value. In the wake of very rapid economic 
development, the collectives in Shenzhen City's Baoan District 
and Guangzhou's Tianhe District, which are at the leading edge 
of reform and opening up, have become increasingly wealthy, and 
the villagers are increasingly more vocal about participating in 
management and sharing in the profits. The collectives have also 
brought in the shareholding system. Their common approach is to 
assess the value of the communities' collective properties and 
convert them into shares. Some become collective shares, and 
some become personal shares. The collective shares' dividends 
are used on expanded reproduction and collective welfare; 
personal shares are only basis for dividend distribution and 
cannot be redeemed, transferred, put up as collateral, or 
bequeathed. 
  Examples of individual private economies and household-run 
enterprises that are linked to the collectives adopting the 
shareholding system are fairly common in Zhejiang's Wenzhou, 
Anhui's Fuyang, and Guangdong's Shantou. Some of their 
enterprises occupy collective lands or factory buildings; some 
utilize the collectives' business reputation; some are given tax 
exemptions and reductions under the state's preferential 
policies, and they draw up property rights by converting their 
properties to shares. Perhaps it was for the purpose of 
expanding the business scope or for mobilizing workers' 
enthusiasm, or because of the state's preferential treatment 
toward the collective economies, or because of their intention 
to turn into a cooperative economy, some enterprises too have 
invited their own staff and workers or the community's own 
collectives to buy shares, or they sell shares to the public as 
a way of converting to the shareholding system or shareholding 
cooperative system and set up new operating mechanisms. 
  4. The different forms of rural shareholding system and 
shareholding cooperative system fall into two major 
categories. The first category is those businesses for 
which people pooled resources to create because they were 
motivated by the concentration of factors of production. In 
terms of the entities that actually pooled their resource, some 
are partnerships among peasants; some are partnerships between 
peasants and collectives; some are partnerships of different 
components, including peasants, collectives, the state's 
relevant units, social groups and individuals, and may even 
include foreign businesses, etc. In terms of the different forms 
of organization, some are integrated shareholding entities run 
by the peasants; some are enterprises whose shares are held 
internally; some are shareholding cooperatives and associations; 
some are shareholding companies that sell shares to the public; 
and some are enterprise groups pooling their resources. Their 
common characteristics are that they are all market-oriented, 
and efficiency is their goal, and profit is their link, and they 
put together funds, land, housing, equipment, technologies, 
labor and other factors of production by pooling resources and 
buying shares. They become economic communities with many 
property owners [as published] and become a productive force 
very quickly. Among such economic organizations, some are very 
much like cooperatives; others cross the boundaries that 
separate different trades, communities, and ownership systems 
and give one vote to each share and implement a decision-making 
system comprising of the shareholders, the board of directors, 
and factory directors (managers); they are very much like a 
modern shareholding system. 
  The second category is the restructured entities motivated 
at 
first by the need to resolve the internal conflict of economic 
interests within the community collective economy and 
enterprises themselves. The common characteristic of these 
economic organizations is that they define property rights by 
assessing the original assets, converting them into shares, and 
setting up mechanisms to resolve the conflicts of interest among 
collectives and between the collectives and individuals. After 
the community collective economy and village collective 
enterprises adopted the shareholding system, because most equity 
shares allocated under the names of individuals cannot be 
redeemed, transferred, put up as collateral, or bequeathed; 
because the enterprises are managed democratically according to 
the principles of cooperation which give each person one vote, 
and because there is nonseverable common accumulation, it very 
much resembles a cooperative system. On the other hand, in the 
restructuring of the individual, private economy, some convert 
assets to shares or offer shares to the village collectives or 
enterprise workers while embracing the principles of the 
cooperative system; they are more like a cooperative system. 
Others convert assets or sell shares to the public and make 
decisions and allocations according to the principles of the 
shareholding system; they are more like the shareholding system. 
  5. Looking at the developmental trend, there is a 
tendency for the restructured shareholding economy to gradually 
merge with the newly created shareholding economy. While 
more and more rural economic organizations are being 
restructured under the shareholding system, they are also 
recruiting investors and pooling capital to expand enterprise 
scale and are gradually turning one-man-one-vote into 
one-man-multiple-votes and one-share-one-vote, thus displaying 
even more of the of characteristics of the newly created 
shareholding enterprises. For various reasons, practice has 
caused the rural shareholding system to resemble the cooperative 
system even more, and some localities have even named all 
economic alliances formed under the shareholding system the 
"shareholding cooperative system." If we look at international 
experiences, the cooperative system tends to have more vitality 
in the agricultural and tertiary industries while the 
shareholding system is more popular among the industrial 
enterprises. Judging by the law of development of the modern 
market economy and China's rural practices, the diverse forms of 
the rural shareholding system and shareholding cooperative 
system will become an important management style. As the 
township enterprises and other nonagricultural sectors develop, 
they may even become the primary management style in some 
localities. 
<H3>  The Emergence of the Rural Shareholding System and 
Shareholding Cooperative System Was an Intrinsic, Objective 
Inevitability; They Will Play an Important Role in Promoting the 
Development of the Rural Socialist Market Economy </H3>
  6. A precondition to the rural shareholding and 
shareholding cooperative systems' rapid development is the rapid 
development of the rural commodity economy and rapid market 
expansion. In this kind of economic environment, an 
economic organization must attain a certain scale, handle the 
internal interest relationships properly, improve management and 
administration, and enhance its own ability to adapt to changes 
in order to effectively enter the market place and expand its 
market share amid competition. The shareholding system and the 
shareholding cooperative system have flourished in recent years 
because they not only uphold the property owners' ownership 
rights in and the right to the profit generated by the factors 
of production but they also optimize the composition of various 
factors of production to meet the objective needs of the 
development of the rural socialist market economy. 
  7. The most striking feature of the rural shareholding 
system is its ability to gather various kinds of scattered 
factors of production and management quickly and create a new 
productive force quickly. Marx said, "If we had to wait for 
accumulation to enable a unit of capital to grow to the point 
that it could repair the railroad, I am afraid we still would 
not have a railroad today. But the shareholding companies can 
accomplish this task in no time." This ability of the 
shareholding system to raise capital is the main reason for its 
rapid development. In our investigation in Hubei's Xiangfan, we 
learned that the city began testing the shareholding cooperative 
system last year, and by March of this year, it has raised more 
than 300 million yuan and set up 1,820 shareholding cooperative 
projects. This left us with a even deeper impression of the 
fund-gathering ability of the shareholding system. Many 
localities have been able to use the shareholding cooperative 
system to block the massive flow of rural funds to the cities, 
and they have turned the peasants' consumption funds into 
production funds. Today, many localities' peasants not only have 
money in the banks but they also have idle money under their 
mattresses and in their suitcases. If we can use the 
shareholding system and the shareholding cooperative system, 
which the peasants are happy to accept, to gather the scattered 
funds and other factors of production and set up various 
production and management projects, it no doubt will have a 
tremendous effect on the development of the rural economy. 
  8. The rural shareholding system also helps to break 
the bounds of different regions, departments, trades, and 
ownership systems and uses the market economic mechanisms to 
optimize resource allocation and expand production and 
management scopes, so that the rural economy can become an even 
bigger and broader market. In our investigation, we saw an 
example of "chicken wings turning into airplane wings" that 
helped one rural economy take off. In 1989, Shandong's Yantai 
City's Dongmotang village greatly expanded its export of chicken 
wings and gained fame as a wealthy village. In 1990, it invested 
12.5 million yuan and entered into a partnership with the 
railroad department to build railway freight yards. At that 
time, the central government leading comrades encouraged them, 
saying, "Think big, do big things, and you not only can build 
railway freight yards, you can even run a civilian airline." 
Last September, they really pooled resources with the Great Wall 
Airline Company. The shareholding company has helped this 
village that sits next to the airport and the railroad "take 
off." Last year, its total income topped 150 million yuan. This 
year, they have set up a Sino-foreign shareholding enterprise in 
a joint venture with some Hong Kong and Shenzhen companies. 
  9. The rural shareholding system plays an important 
role in perfecting the rural collective enterprises' management 
and administration system and operating mechanisms and in 
setting up an enterprise system that meets the needs of the 
development of the socialist market economy. In the rural 
areas, many of the village collective enterprises shared the 
same serious problem: they were unable to manifest all the 
attributes of a collective. The cadres said that the enterprises 
belonged to everybody, but the people said they belonged to the 
cadres. This problem reflected the collective enterprises' 
ill-defined property rights, inability to separate the 
government from enterprises, and inability to straighten the 
interest relationships. From the point of the relationship 
between enterprises and the village leadership, enterprises were 
still plagued by administrative interventions and unreasonable 
burdens. From the point of enterprises' internal relationships, 
there was no restraining mechanism, and the masses could not 
apply effective supervision. When the village enterprises adopt 
the shareholding system, property rights are defined when assets 
are converted to shares to create many property owners, and 
power, responsibility, and profit are integrated by share 
ownership. According to the masses, "the shareholding system 
links responsibility, profit, and hearts." A screw dropped on 
the floor is still one's property, and it will be picked up. A 
village cadre from Shandong's Laiyang said to us, "Once we 
gathered some cadres to visit Yantai and wanted to use the 
village-run enterprise's car. The factory director told us that 
we now had to answer to the board of directors above and the 
shareholders below and could no longer use the car as we 
pleased. He turned us down. This proves that the shareholding 
system can truly keep the village administrative organs in line 
so that the village enterprises can make their own management 
decisions, take responsibility for their own profits and losses, 
initiate their own development, and discipline themselves." 
  10. The rural shareholding system and shareholding 
cooperative system play an important role in stabilizing and 
perfecting the responsibility system -- led by the family-based, 
output-related contract system -- and in amplifying the two-tier 
management system and the socialized service system that 
integrate centralization and decentralization. Judging by 
local practices, using the shareholding system to develop the 
water conservancy project, the farm machinery service team, the 
large vegetable barns, the forests and orchards, etc., we can 
effectively enhance the service capability of collective 
centralized management, help to tap the family-based contract 
management system's potential, and solve problems individual 
families and households cannot solve. In some localities, the 
science and research units, the agricultural colleges, the 
supply and marketing departments, and the peasants unite under 
the shareholding system to form a new community that share the 
same interests, and that has improved the socialized 
agricultural system and has vigorously promoted high-output, 
high-quality, high-efficiency agricultural development. 
<H3>  Policy Suggestions for Promoting Healthy Development of the 
Rural Shareholding System and the Shareholding Cooperative System </H3>
  11. More and more people have come to recognize the 
important role of the rural shareholding system and the 
shareholding cooperative system in deepening the reform, 
promoting opening up, and promoting development. Some 
localities have made promoting the shareholding cooperative 
system an important move in the development of the rural 
socialist market economy. They provide careful guidance and 
active support, and they have had good results. But many 
localities are still not paying sufficient attention to the 
rural shareholding and shareholding cooperative system. Today, 
some problems are jeopardizing the healthy development of the 
rural shareholding system. Primarily: a) There are no definitive 
guiding ideology and complete policies and laws and regulations. 
Many grass-roots cadres fail to hold up state policies and are 
afraid to do anything. b) There is no minimum, unified 
understanding of the different kinds of rural shareholding 
system and shareholding cooperative system, nor is there a 
proper administrative system. For similar types of enterprises, 
some are registered as collective enterprises; others are 
registered as shareholding cooperative enterprises, shareholding 
enterprises, or private enterprises, and this makes the 
implementation of the tax, credit loan, and other policies 
chaotic. c) The rural shareholding system itself is 
under-developed; it is not standardized and not complete. With 
regard to assessing property values, determining equity rights, 
verifying equity shares, distributing share dividends, and 
circulating equity rights and so on, different localities and 
economic organizations have different methods that can vary 
significantly. For example to prove equity rights, some issue 
beautiful stock certificates, some issue share certificates, 
some issue receipts, and some issue no documented proof, which 
often leads to disputes. 
  12. The development of the shareholding system and 
shareholding cooperative system in essence is a reshaping of the 
rural micrcoeconomic organization to meet the needs of the 
market economy. In this respect, not only the masses of 
peasants and grass-roots cadres but also the decision-making 
strata of various levels and departments must go through a 
learning, understanding, and practical process. They must not be 
impatient and rush into mass action. Starting out from the 
reality of China's rural areas, perhaps the general principle 
for dealing with the different types of rural shareholding 
systems may be to "guide the action according to circumstances 
and set standards in gradual steps." 
  Guiding the action according to circumstances means 
encouraging the peasants and using different forms of the rural 
shareholding system to combine the factors of production to 
promote the development of the rural socialist market economy. 
Regardless of which form, so long as it helps to raise the 
standard of the rural productive forces, it should be vigorously 
supported. We must base the development of the rural 
shareholding system on the standard of the rural productive 
forces and the wishes of the masses. We should never go against 
the people's wishes, even less should we use administrative 
orders to force them to do something. 
  Setting standards in gradual steps means, as the system 
develops, we should use policies, laws and provisions, and 
regulations to put it on the legalized, institutionalized track. 
However, standardization does not mean rejecting 
diversification, even less stifling the creativity of the masses. 
  13. In order to promote the healthy development of the 
rural shareholding system, the following points urgently need to 
be further clarified: 
  We should advocate using the shareholding system to raise 
capital to launch agricultural development, rural 
infrastructure, and hydroelectric power projects and other 
socialized services to stabilize and perfect the responsibility 
system as led by the family-based, out-put related contract 
system. 
  We should encourage the village households to work with the 
state's relevant enterprises and institutional units and the 
general public to set up different types of township enterprises 
under the shareholding system. 
  We should use examples to guide the village collective 
enterprises, delineate property rights based on their assessed 
value and their sources, and accept other shareholding systems 
when restructuring enterprises. Those who are not willing to 
change should not be forced to do so. 
  We should allow community collective economic organizations 
to adopt the shareholding system and turn the collective economy 
into a shareholding cooperative economy. 
  We should support the individual, private economies in 
restructuring themselves under the shareholding system. Share 
conversion must be fair and equitable. Stock participation 
should be voluntary. The principles of the cooperative system 
should also be brought in; the essence of the shareholding 
cooperative system should be recognized. 
  We should encourage the people to use the shareholding 
system 
to achieve enterprise mergers and combinations and set up 
shareholding enterprises and enterprise groups. 
  We should encourage people to cooperative with foreign 
businesses to set up "three kinds of wholly or partially 
foreign-owned" shareholding enterprises. 
  In view of the fact that the rural shareholding system 
is already fairly widespread, we suggest prompt and proper 
formulation of some guiding principles and policies. This should 
be accomplished before the end of the year and should best be in 
the form of a central government or State Council special 
document. In order to formulate practical general and 
specific policies, we should do more investigations and studies 
and review the masses of peasants' creations and local practical 
experiences. We suggest that the pertinent departments 
diligently study and formulate legislation-type regulations. We 
must start out from the rural areas' actual conditions and 
reference the general principles of a modern market economy when 
setting legal standards. The departments should promptly come up 
with some suggestions on how to deal with problems that urgently 
need to be resolved -- such as assessment of the value of 
properties for stock conversion, registration of legal persons, 
and circulation of equity rights. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59277 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sino-U.S. Joint Venture Develops New Xerox Copier </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  OW2311084093 Beijing XINHUA in English 0742 GMT 23 Nov 93 </F>
<F P=103> OW2311084093 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Shanghai, November 23 (XINHUA) -- The Shanghai 
Xerox Copier Company, a Sino-U.S. joint venture, on Monday [21 
November] announced the development of a new multi-functional 
product -- the Xerox 5416 copier. 
  At a news conference here to introduce the new product, Paul 
Allaire, chairman and chief executive officer of the Xerox 
Corporation of the United States, said that the Chinese-designed 
new product was not only a "pride" for the Xerox Corporation, 
but also a "glory" for Shanghai and the whole of China. 
  He said that like other Xerox products, the new copier 
enjoys 
the full quality guarantee of his company. 
  A new factory will be built in Brazil later this year to 
manufacture the new copiers with parts provided by the Shanghai 
Xerox Company and it will begin exporting to southern Latin 
America early next year, he said. 
  Joseph Donaro, general manager of the Shanghai Xerox Copier 
Company, said that in developing the new copier, Chinese workers 
and technicians received full support and assistance from the 
Xerox Corporation of the United States. 
  "So we should say the new product is a crystallization of 
cooperation between Chinese and American engineers and 
designers," he added. 
  The 5416 copier -- 550 mm wide, 340 mm high and weighing 45 
kilograms -- is the smallest of Xerox copiers. It takes just 30 
seconds to start it. 
  Since it opened in 1987 with a total investment of $30 
million, the Shanghai Xerox Company has built 60,000 copiers, 
1,300 of which have been exported to Western Europe. It has 
acquired a 50 percent share of the Chinese mainland's market. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59278 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Incentives in Foreign Investment Laws Analyzed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0065A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] in Chinese No 
141, 15 Sep 93 pp 31-32 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0065A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lin Shaoqin (2651 1421 3830), Law Department, </F>
Xiamen University: "Incentives in Foreign Investment Laws 
Analyzed"] 
  [Text] Since China opened up to the outside world in 1979, 
its effort to attract foreign investment has been so successful 
that the whole world has paid attention. 
  The substantial flow of direct foreign investment has 
injected new life into economic development in China. However, 
we must see that the pattern of the sources of direct foreign 
investment, which directly determines where investment goes in 
the Chinese economy, is not ideal, thereby adversely affecting 
Chinese economic development. This article offers a preliminary 
analysis of China's foreign investment incentives from a legal 
perspective. 
<H3>  I. How the Pattern of Origins of Foreign Investment Affects 
Distribution </H3>
  The bulk of direct foreign investment in China comes from 
Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan. Little originates in Japan and 
United States and even less comes from developed nations in 
Western Europe. 
  It should be noted that the imbalance in the origins of 
direct foreign investment undermines our effort to utilize 
foreign capital effectively and speed up economic development in 
a way that cannot be ignored. 
  1) Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan are related to China's 
southeastern coastal provinces geographically and through 
consanguinity in myriad ways, which explains why investors in 
these places are so inclined to pour capital to China's 
southeastern coast, particularly the two provinces of Guangdong 
and Fujian, creating a striking geographical imbalance in the 
distribution of foreign investment. Furthermore, since there is 
a dire shortage of natural resources in China's southeastern 
coastal region, the restaurant, hotel, and other service 
industries naturally became the destinations of most of the 
investment dollars. According to statistics, the tertiary 
sector accounted for 54.96 percent of the total value of 
projects involving foreign capital that were approved in the 
period between 1979 and 1988. Within the tertiary sector itself, 
more foreign investment went into the building of hotels and 
recreational facilities and real estate than anything else, 
constituting 57.57 percent of all foreign investment in the 
tertiary sector. In other words, geographically foreign capital 
is over-concentrated in the southeast and industrially it is 
over-concentrated in nonproductive industries. It is only too 
obvious that this pattern of foreign investment hampers the full 
utilization of the abundant natural resources in the interior, 
the optimalization of the industrial structure, and the 
achievement of balanced economic development in China. 
  2) Most foreign investment projects are small projects. Take 
1991 for instance. Projects with a price tag over $10 million 
each accounted for just 2 percent of the total value of foreign 
investment projects negotiated in that year; between $500,000 
and $1 million, 24 percent; and under $500,000, 52 percent. The 
main cause of this phenomenon is the influx of Hong Kong, Macao, 
and Taiwan capital financing small projects. With so many small 
projects, economies of scale do not come into play. 
  3) Most direct foreign investments come from Hong Kong and 
the bulk of them are destined for labor-intensive projects. Of 
all enterprises financed with foreign investment and approved in 
the past dozen years or so, an overwhelming majority of those in 
the primary and tertiary sectors were labor-intensive projects. 
In the secondary sector labor-intensive projects such as those 
in the light and textile industries also accounted for a 
substantial portion. These labor-intensive projects were 
technologically low-grade and few were at an internationally 
advanced level. According to statistics compiled by the 
departments concerned, only 660 projects were rated 
"technologically advanced" by late 1990, a mere 4.55 percent of 
all enterprises financed with foreign capital that opened for 
business in the period concerned. This militates against our 
drive to create an export-oriented economy and participate in 
international economic competition and cooperation. 
<H3>  II. How Incentives in China's Foreign Investment Laws Impact 
Pattern of Origins of Such Investment </H3>
  The imbalance in the pattern of origins of foreign 
investment 
adversely affects the distribution of foreign investment by 
industry, thereby constraining the nation's economic 
development. While there are many factors behind such an 
imbalance, I think the law plays a major role in steering the 
flow of investment. The reason is that of the numerous factors 
shaping direct foreign investment, the legal factor is most 
critical. Direct foreign investment has been increasing steadily 
in recent years, which proves that incentives written into 
China's foreign investment legislation have been enormously 
effective. Yet they are precisely the reason why the pattern of 
origins of direct foreign investment in China has been so 
lopsided. 
  1) Tax incentives. Most tax incentives in China's foreign 
investment laws are contained in provisions regulating corporate 
income taxes. They include not only lower tax rates than those 
found in other developing nations or regions, but also longer 
tax abatement periods, something absent from other nations. 
Nevertheless, China's tax incentives do not tie in with the 
appropriate tax laws in the United States or Europe. All these 
countries take a compensation and exemption approach toward the 
issue of double taxation on foreign investment, which means that 
it is the government of the investment-originating nation, not 
the investor, which gets to enjoy foreign investment tax 
incentives. Therefore even though China has reached an agreement 
with some nations aimed at avoiding double taxation, China's tax 
incentives have only limited appeal to investors from the United 
States and Europe. In contrast, China's tax incentives, 
especially its array of liberally applicable tax exemptions and 
tax cuts, are tremendously appealing to capital in Macao, 
Taiwan, and, particularly, the free port of Hong Kong. Moreover, 
China's foreign investment legislation discriminates in favor of 
investors from Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan. Both Article 11 of 
the "State Council Regulations on Encouraging Investment by 
Taiwan Compatriots" and Article 11 of the "State Council 
Regulations on Encouraging Investment by Overseas Chinese and 
Compatriots from Hong Kong and Macao" stipulate explicitly that 
enterprises financed by compatriots from Hong Kong, Macao, and 
Taiwan are not required to pay import tariffs or the combined 
industrial and commercial tax on imported machinery, vehicles, 
and office equipment essential to the operations and production 
of their enterprises. Also exempt from import tariffs and the 
combined industrial and commercial tax are the articles of daily 
use and means of transportation imported for the personal 
consumption of compatriots from Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan 
during the period of operations of their enterprises provided 
such imports are within a reasonable quantity. With the 
exception of products whose export is restricted, enterprises 
are allowed to export their output without paying export tariffs 
and the combined industrial and commercial tax. These incentives 
are not available to enterprises financed by other foreign 
investors. Not only are such practices inconsistent with 
international tax rules, but they also do nothing to improve the 
pattern of origins of direct foreign investment in China. 
  2) Non-tax incentives. China's foreign investment laws also 
confer more nontax incentives on Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan 
investors than their counterparts from elsewhere. About the 
methods of raising capital, for example, when an enterprise 
financed by a Hong Kong, Macao, or Taiwan investor applies for a 
loan from a financial institution on the mainland or overseas, 
it can "use its own assets and rights as collateral." In 
contrast, most Sino-foreign joint ventures are required to 
report to the State Administration of Exchange Control or one of 
its branches for the record when they want to borrow foreign 
exchange funds from a foreign bank. Furthermore, things are 
easier for Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan investors when it comes 
to entry/departure procedures. All of this facilitates the 
influx of investment from Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan. 
  3) China distinguishes among three kinds of enterprises 
involving foreign investment, namely Sino-foreign joint 
ventures, Sino-foreign contractual joint ventures, and 
enterprises wholly owned by a foreign investor, and treats them 
differently, its incentives in such areas as taxation, methods 
of raising capital, and degree of market openness becoming 
progressively less generous as we go down the three kinds of 
enterprises. This arrangement is a magnet for Hong Kong, Macao, 
and Taiwan capital because as a form of investment, the joint 
venture is the right choice for most investors from those places 
who are small-time investors or who want to build small or 
medium-sized enterprises. In contrast, most investors from the 
United States and Europe are well-heeled multinational 
corporations which have a long investment history, which are 
technologically advanced, and which traditionally invest heavily 
overseas. For these corporations, setting up a wholly 
foreign-owned enterprise in China is better suited to their 
needs. The practice of favoring joint ventures helps attract 
capital from Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan but works against the 
effort to woo investors in the United States and Europe. 
<H3>  III. Measures To Improve the Pattern of Origins of Foreign 
Capital </H3>
  Laws adopted to encourage an inflow of Hong Kong, Macao, and 
Taiwan capital into China are well-intentioned, but objectively 
the results have not been satisfactory. To improve the pattern 
of origins of direct foreign investment and hence eliminate 
their negative effects on the distribution of foreign 
investment, it is proposed that: 
  1) Enterprises financed by foreign investment should be 
regulated by a single set of rules. China distinguishes among 
three different kinds of enterprises financed by foreign 
investment and has adopted different legislation to regulate 
them separately. The idea is to encourage foreign investors to 
invest in China by setting up joint ventures. However, in recent 
years it is foreign-funded enterprises that have been growing 
the fastest. As enterprises financed by foreign investment 
mature and develop, the formulation of a single law 
for"enterprises financed by foreign investment" has become a top 
priority in foreign investment legislation in China. Moreover, 
no time should be wasted in preparing related legislation, such 
as an "Insurance Law," "Anti-Illegitimate Competition Law," and 
"Mortgage Law." 
  2) Considering the fact that Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan 
capital makes up an excessive share of all direct foreign 
investment and that most of it goes into small projects, China's 
investment incentives should bias in favor of large- and 
medium-sized projects. The larger an enterprise financed by 
foreign investment, the more extensive its area of related 
operations, the more advanced and scientific its methods of 
management, and the greater its overall social benefits. Thus, 
building more large- and medium-sized enterprises financed by 
foreign investment will accelerate the modernization of China's 
industry and is in line with the need for China to participate 
in global competition and cooperation. Accordingly, we must 
offer special incentives to large- and medium-sized enterprises 
financed by foreign capital, giving priority to their 
applications to ensure that production needs are met. Needless 
to say, to be effective, the policy of favoring large- and 
medium-sized enterprises must go hand in hand with the 
industrial incentive policy. 
  3) Open up the domestic market selectively, step by step. It 
is the large markets inside developing countries that mainly 
attract developed nations in Europe and the United States to 
invest in them. In this repect, China, with its vast territory 
and huge population has an overwhelming edge. In my opinion, we 
should target large- and medium-sized projects, 
technology-intensive projects, and projects in primary 
industries such as agriculture, energy, and transportation as we 
open up the domestic market. In view of the fact that China's 
price system has not been sorted out and the practice of 
underpricing certain primary products, including energy and raw 
materials, we should give enterprises financed by foreign 
capital more leeway in setting the prices of their products. In 
industries whose development the government is trying to 
promote, foreign enterprises should be allowed to charge higher 
prices than official prices. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59279 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Issues Surrounding Export Tax Rebates </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0068A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI WENTI [INTERNATIONAL TRADE 
JOURNAL] in Chinese No 129, 30 Sep 93 pp 22-25 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0068A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI WENTI [INTERNATIONAL TRADE 
JOURNAL] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Hongwei (7115 4767 0251), Lin Xihui (2651 </F>
3305 6540), Yang Bin (2799 2430), and Zhou Kexing (0719 0668 
5281): "On Macroeconomic Control of Export Tax Rebates"] 
  [Text] The key items involved in macroeconomic control of 
export tax rebates include: The distribution form of export 
tax rebate responsibility (the division of treasury rebates 
among central and local revenues), the operating grounds for 
export tax rebates (mostly planning or law), and the initiative 
for regulating export trade through export tax rebates 
(particular treatment aimed at specific conditions). 
<H3>  I. The Features of China's Macroeconomic Control of Export 
Tax Rebates </H3>
  Since 1991, China has rigorously strengthened its planned 
control over export tax rebates in the following detailed ways: 
We have linked tax rebate plans to export plans, with those 
without export plans not to be approved in principle for tax 
rebate plans; we have linked tax rebate plans to 
exchange-earning plans, with those not fulfilling 
exchange-earning duties having their tax rebate quotas reduced; 
we have broken down tax rebate plans to all regions and export 
enterprises; and we have made local revenues responsible for the 
excesses when tax rebate plans are exceeded. 
  These provisions show that China's macroeconomic control 
over 
export tax rebates is characterized as follows: 
  1. Treasury rebates are mostly the responsibility of central 
revenues. The criteria for treasury-rebate division are tax 
rebate quotas, with central revenues being completely 
responsible for those within quotas, and local revenues 
completely responsible for those beyond quotas. 
  2. Export tax rebate operations are dependent mostly on tax 
rebate plans, not on fixed laws and regulations. 
  3. We exercise overall control over export trade, with all 
exports, both those that exceed and those that do not fulfill 
export plans, subject to restrictions and constraints without 
respect to particular conditions. We lack individual 
regulation and correct guidance of export trade. 
<H3>  II. Existing Problems in China's Macroeconomic Control 
Method for Export Tax Rebates </H3>
  1. Our Control Method Has Mutual Conflicts with Export Tax 
Rebate Legalization. Article 3 of the "PRC Tax Collection 
Management Law" states clearly that: "Tax impositions and 
cancellations, as well as reductions, exemptions, rebates, and 
make-up payments, are enforced according to legal provisions; 
State Council provisions authorized by law are enforced 
according to the provisions of the administrative laws and 
regulations drawn up by the State Council." So export tax 
rebates, just as tax collections, should have legal mandates and 
permanence. While China's export tax rebate legislation is 
still very inadequate, lacking the legal norms of our supreme 
organs of power, the pertinent Ministry of Finance provisions 
approved by the State Council similarly do have a certain legal 
standing, so should be regarded as a component part of China's 
tax law system. As matters, such as export tax rebate scope, 
tax rebate rates, and tax rebate calculation methods, are 
clearly set forth in our pertinent legal documents, certainly 
not varying because of the amount of export turnover or exchange 
earnings, all export products that conform to China's external 
economic laws and regulations should enjoy tax rebate 
qualifications and rights. 
  But in our current control method, whether export products 
win tax rebate qualifications depends on whether there are 
export plans and export tax rebate quotas, with above-plan 
exporters subject to local government constraints as to whether 
they will get tax rebates, and the future tax rebate treatment 
of export enterprises that do not fulfill plans subject to 
restrictions, etc. Such a control mechanism operating on 
planning grounds adds many artificial factors to China's export 
tax rebates, largely diluting the proper permanence, solemnity, 
and force of laws and regulations. 
  2. It Puts a Heavier Burden on Central Revenues. In China's 
current graded revenue-control system, most flow-tax revenue is 
shared by the center and localities at a 50-50 rate (in 
minority-nationality regions, the local share is greater; 
commissioned customs collections revert to the center). For 
1991 and 1992, China's export tax rebates respectively totalled 
25.4 billion RMB and 27.6 billion RMB. If export tax rebates 
and real export product tax inclusion were in overall balance, 
then the central revenue from export products before tax rebates 
would have been only 12.7 billion yuan and 13.8 billion yuan. 
But as tax rebates are mainly the responsibility of central 
revenues, the figures for these two years reduced central 
revenues about 13 billion yuan a year for this one item alone, 
thus putting a heavier burden on central revenues. 
  That tax rebates are mainly the responsibility of central 
revenues was set years ago. In 1991, in order to reduce the 
impact of tax rebates on central revenues, while the state was 
forced to institute quantitative control of export tax rebates, 
using the quota method to break them down to all regions and 
export enterprises, this merely alleviated the symptoms without 
getting at the root of the problem. As we expand our reform and 
opening, China's exports and export tax rebates are bound to 
increase year after year. So if we do not thoroughly reform 
our treasury-rebate methods, central-revenue difficulties are 
also bound to grow increasingly more serious. 
  3. It Affects the Initiative of Local Governments To Support 
Export Growth, Acting as an Inducement to New Regional Economic 
Barriers. The provision that above-plan tax rebates are the 
responsibility of local government treasury rebates is a 
restriction on export growth per se. As to regions with rapid 
export growth but revenue difficulties, it is undoubtedly a 
blow. So proceeding from revenue-balance considerations, some 
local governments take a negative approach to export growth, 
even to the point of using administrative means to restrict it. 
  Although many export enterprises could buy in products from 
other areas to expand their exports, the taxes would be 
collected in other areas while the tax rebates would be the 
responsibility of local revenues, causing strong opposition by 
local governments. In many areas, governments demand that 
export products be produced locally, forbidding exports of 
products bought from outside, which not only restricts export 
growth, but also forms new regional economic barriers. 
  4. It is Detrimental to the Intensified Reform of Our 
Foreign 
Trade System. Our foreign trade system reform is aimed at 1) 
achieving a corporate status for foreign trade enterprises and 
2) reducing the scope of planning. An essential prerequisite 
for enterprise incorporation is enterprise operating 
independence, so that as long as they conform to state export 
policy, enterprises should have the right to decide their own 
export orientations and scales based on domestic and foreign 
market information. But export tax rebate quotas directly 
restrict enterprise export scales, thus indirectly controlling 
their export orientations. While a market economy intrinsically 
requires the reduction of government administrative interference 
and directive planning, combining export guidance-plans with 
quota-type tax rebate plans turns them into mandated plans in 
reality as well as in name. Our foreign trade sector has 
clearly pointed out recently the need to reduce planning-list 
commodities, as well as the export commodity varieties subject 
to quota and licensing controls, in order to expand the scope of 
market regulation. In this case, our export earnings plans 
grounded on tax rebate quotas should mostly no longer exist, 
with tax rebate quotas becoming like water without a source or a 
tree without roots. This means that the establishment of a new 
and scientific export tax rebate control form is imperative, 
without which it will be hard to move forward with 
intensification of our foreign trade system reform. 
  5. It Is Adverse to the Optimization of Export Product Mix 
and the Diversification of Export Markets. In recent years, 
China's export products have been concentrated mainly in a few 
varieties, such as toys, textiles, clothing, and machinery and 
electronic products, with our export markets being mostly in 
Hong Kong and Macao, Japan, the United States, the West European 
EC, and the five ASEAN countries. When formulating export 
operating tactics, enterprises are subject to tax rebate-quota 
constraints, being forced to consider matters such as the tax 
rebate rates of various products and the prices on various 
international markets; thus not daring to add new export 
varieties or open up new export markets. How many domestic 
products actually miss out on good opportunities of being 
exported to new markets due to tax rebate quotas? While we do 
not know this, we can say with certainty that as tax rebate 
quotas are set according to export plans, which in turn are 
basically set according to the real achievements of past years, 
keeping export tax rebates under overall quota control 
ultimately can only ensure that past export products and markets 
continue to maintain their dominant positions, while the export 
growth of new varieties and the development of new international 
markets are restricted. 
  6. It Apparently Strengthens but Actually Weakens. While the 
quota-type method apparently strengthens control, it is actually 
a mere formality that exists in name but not reality. 1) As tax 
rebate quotas have become a scarce item similar to our past 
coupons when we practiced supply by coupon, having become a 
special "commodity" transferred at a price privately among 
controllers and enterprises, among enterprises, and among 
regions, they have become the source of a certain amount of 
corruption and law violation. 2) tax rebate-quota control 
forces enterprises to pay attention only to fulfillment of 
export earnings plans instead of RMB-accounted profits and 
losses, while providing an opening for tax fraud. 3) When 
enterprises and regions exceed tax rebate quotas, the relevant 
departments are forced to grant further ones on pretexts, such 
as supplementary quotas. In both 1991 and 1992, real tax 
rebates exceeded the planned figures at the beginning of the 
year. 
<H3>  III. Suggestions on Improving China's Macroeconomic Control 
Method for Export Tax Rebates </H3>
  Our guiding reform ideology is to standardize export tax 
rebates in order to bring them more into line with market 
economy demands, in order to push forward with normal export 
trade development and intensified foreign trade system reform. 
Reform should observe the following principles: treasury 
rebates should be tied to revenue jurisdiction; we should treat 
individual products or enterprises appropriately differently, in 
order to guide export trade to a sound growth; and macroeconomic 
control should be mostly through legal institutions. Our 
specific suggestions are as follows: 
  1. We Should Reform Our Treasury-Rebate System, by Dividing 
Up the Responsibility of Revenues at All Levels According to 
Revenue Jurisdiction. China' macroeconomic control method for 
export tax rebates was at first treasury rebates being the joint 
responsibility of the center and localities, then was changed 
after a relatively short time to central treasury rebates, which 
was a blow to central revenues, and then was changed again to 
the method of quantitative control and overall quota control, 
which took export tax rebate control off of a legal track, and 
finally created the many above-analyzed adverse results. This 
shows that in order to reform our current macroeconomic control 
method, we will first have to begin by reforming our 
treasury-rebate system. 
  We favor bringing order to revenue relations, by dividing up 
central and local revenue treasury-rebate responsibility 
according to revenue jurisdiction. As the customs-commissioned 
part of flow taxes come under central jurisdiction, the central 
revenue treasury-rebate responsibility should be appropriately 
higher on the basis of revenue-sharing percentages. 
  The greatest obstacle to local responsibility for tax 
rebates 
is local revenue sustainability. According to 1992 tax rebate 
calculations, the tax rebate responsibility per province, 
municipality, and autonomous region averaged 400 million yuan, 
reaching about 800 million yuan for certain provinces and 
municipalities with large export volumes, which was adverse to 
the local balance between revenue and spending. In addition, as 
product export tax rebates and pre-export taxation could be 
separate regionally, local governments also formed new regional 
economic barriers to increase local revenues and decrease tax 
rebate responsibility. This shows that while reforming our 
treasury-rebate system, we must also appropriately resolve the 
following matters. 1) As central revenues have over 10 billion 
yuan more in revenues on the current basis, giving them the 
capability to regulate the relations between local revenues, 
they should provide local revenues with appropriate fiscal 
subsidies based on their varying conditions. 2) In our tax 
separation reform process, we could appropriately increase local 
shares and tax categories. 3) When our market economy is being 
established, in order to keep the powers devolved by the center 
to enterprises from being intercepted by local governments, we 
must also perfect our administrative and economic laws and 
regulations, in order to reduce local government interference in 
the economy, and effectively promote export growth and 
interregional economic ties. 
  Changing central treasury rebates to joint treasury-rebate 
responsibility by the center and localities will certainly not 
be merely a simple change of the form of transfer of revenue 
funds, but will rationalize relations by linking 
responsibilities to rights, not only increasing central 
macroeconomic regulation and control capability, but also paving 
the essential way for overall reform of our macroeconomic 
control method for export tax rebates. 
  2. We Should Abolish Our Quantitative Control and Overall 
Quota-Control Method, and Adopt a Selective Quota-Control 
Method. In order to abolish our current method, we will need to 
clarify a theoretical question, i.e., does export and export tax 
rebate growth affect the growth of overall state revenue? 
  Our answer to this question is no. 1) Export tax rebates 
involve only domestic flow taxes, not other tax categories or 
revenues. 2) Domestic flow taxes are divided into two parts: a) 
taxes involving export products, being revenue that the state 
"renounces;" b) domestic consumption (final consumption) taxes, 
being genuine revenues. As to certain supply-constrained 
products or resources (such as oil) that are scarce, for which 
domestic supply does not meet demand (effective demand), and for 
which increased exporting would lower domestic consumption, the 
state restricts or bans exports, also not granting export tax 
rebates. So for most products, export growth and 
domestic-consumption (meaning substitute-product consumption) 
growth should occr together, with the latter necessarily being 
more stable growth. As long as domestic consumption grows, 
regardless of whether consumers buy domestic or imported 
products, this will provide the government with steadily growing 
domestic flow-tax revenues. If the phenomenon of simultaneous 
export growth and government flow-tax revenue decline occurs, 
the inherent causes will be either economic recession or lower 
domestic effective demand, or not having brought taxes into line 
with tax rebates. In other words, as long as the tax rebate 
system is designed to implement the principle of taxes being in 
line with rebates, with particular operations avoiding or 
reducing incorrect tax rebates and tax fraud, then export and 
export tax rebate growth will absolutely not bring a decline in 
domestic flow-tax revenues. 3) As to long-range development, 
export tax rebates will be converted to funding sources for 
individual income and enterprise expanded production and 
operation scale, finally promoting production and 
domestic-consumption growth, thus providing the state with more 
revenues. The practice of all countries in export tax rebate 
method shows that export growth has never yet caused a decline 
in national revenues. 
  Of course, this analysis refers to overall state revenues. 
If 
the form of treasury-rebate sharing is inappropriate, export tax 
rebates will have varing impacts on revenues at various levels. 
But even in this case, export tax rebates will not affect 
overall revenue growth. This shows that there is a full 
rationale for abolishing our current method. 
  We favor the adoption of a selective quota-control form: 
  1. We need to continue to draw up export tax rebate plans 
each year, as well as bringing them into line with the national 
budget (or budgets at all levels), the goal being to enable the 
government through such projection planning to fully grasp 
future national economic development trends, thus enabling it to 
adjust and perfect its macroeconomic and macrosocial policies. 
But we must not substitute planning for tax rebate laws and 
regulations, and even less so mandate plans for markets and 
enterprises, which would constitute forceful interference in 
export trade. 
  2. As to enterprises, such as those still within foreign 
trade export plans, those with low added-value products, and 
export enterprises with high exchange-conversion costs and poor 
economic efficiency, we should practice rigorous tax rebate 
quota control, with quota overages being the responsibility of 
treasury rebates from local revenues. While particular 
operations can be directed at export products and export 
enterprises, such products or enterprises should be the 
minority, as well as being clearly distinguished. 
  Enterprises that export new or high added-value products and 
actively develop new international markets should be provided 
incentives. Despite the amount of their tax rebates, they must 
all be given priority tax rebates to speed up their fund 
turnover, with an appropriate increase in the central revenue 
share for their treasury rebates. 
  As to the majority of export enterprises and export products 
that do not fit into these two categories, we must not exercise 
quota control, and we must grant special preferences for a 
regular system of tax rebates. 
  3. We Should Reinforce Our Legislation. Our current export 
tax rebate legislative inadequacies are quite glaring: 1) Our 
legislative norms are quite low. Except for the provisions on 
tax fraud and penalties in the NPC "Tax Management Law," the 
only higher standard is the provisions in the pertinent Ministry 
of Finance "Circular" approved by the State Council in 1985. 2) 
Our various provisions are quite disorganized, with many 
conflicts and duplications, and lacking a systematic and 
complete legal article. 3) The liabilities of all parties to 
violations of our tax rebate system are not detailed and clearly 
distinguished, equating tax fraud with tax evasion. 4) 
Penalties for violators are too lax. In 1992 for instance, we 
investigated 178 export enterprises throughout China for tax 
fraud involving 580 million RMB, averaging a high of 3.25 
million a case. But according to the provisions in our "Tax 
Management Law," tax fraud of over 10,000 yuan is penalized by 
only up to three years of imprisonment or service in detention. 
In comparison to the "three to seven year sentences for tax 
arrears that are not paid and cannot be collected of over 
100,000 yuan," and the penalties for tax evasion or other 
economic crimes, such criminal penalties for tax fraud are 
obviously too lax. 
  We hold that macroeconomic control of export tax rebates 
should be mostly through the legal system, the prerequisite for 
which is legislative perfection. In a market economy, the lack 
of legislative guarantees for the export tax rebate system will 
have many harmful consequences. From a long-range perspective, 
the export tax rebate method is absolutely not a matter of 
expediency, but rather a permanent way to promote trade 
development and fair international competition either for China 
or other countries. So we are recommending that the NPC draft 
and promulgate as quickly as possible a systematic and complete 
"Export Tax Rebate Law," to restrain the fiscal and 
administrative behavior of the government sector and the 
economic activities of export enterprises, clearly distinguish 
the liabilities and rights of the control sector and tax rebate 
applicants, and thus lay the foundation for achieving the 
legalization of our export tax rebates. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59280 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> TRANSPORTATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Air Express Venture With DHL Expands Service </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  OW2311115893 Beijing XINHUA in English 1138 GMT 23 Nov 93 </F>
<F P=103> OW2311115893 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Beijing, November 23 (XINHUA) -- DHL-Sinotrans, 
China's first and largest international air express joint 
venture, announced here this afternoon that it has opened seven 
more branches in China and is ready to venture into the 
untouched domestic market. 
  The seven new branches are located in Tianjin, Qingdao, 
Dalian, Hangzhou, Wuhan, Shenzhen and Xiamen, all relatively 
prosperous cities in China. With its existing offices in 
Beijing, Shanghai and Guangzhou, the company now has 10 business 
subsidiaries in China. 
  The company succeeded last month in obtaining a license to 
operate a domestic service from China's Ministry of Foreign 
Trade and Economic Cooperation. 
  The company, a joint venture between Sinotrans, China's 
leading cargo transport company, and DHL Worldwide Express Ltd., 
the world's leading international air express company, has also 
made an investment of 200,000 U.S. dollars to equip its Shanghai 
and Beijing branches with advanced computer systems. 
  The systems will link DHL-Sinotrans to DHL's business 
network 
worldwide. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59281 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Reports Shenyang Railway Bureau Changes </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0050B Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 23 Sep 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0050B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Text] In the course of realizing its transportation 
potential the Shenyang railway bureau has made rectifying 
corrupt practices its important starting point and method. Thus, 
the bureau receives double results from changing the 
enterprise's image and expanding the transport capacity. The 
Shenyang railway bureau bears one-fourth of the nation's 
railroad travellers departures and arrivals, and one-seventh of 
the cargo's departures and arrivals. Owing to this year's 
continuous increases in arrivals and departures of customers and 
cargo, the conflicts between transportation capacity and 
transportation quantity have become more and more serious, and 
corrupt practices more and more striking. This railway bureau 
holds that inadequate transport capacity and corrupt practices 
are mainly reflected in "hot" lines, directions, trains and 
tickets. The high demand of these "four hots" not only causes 
the noted intensity in transport, but also provides a convenient 
opportunity for people to engage in corrupt practices. The 
corrupt practices of increasing prices and charging additional 
money at will, and making profits with trains and tickets ruins 
the reputation of the bureau, and at the same time blocks and 
fragments transport capacity. Based on this consideration, 
Shenyang bureau has closely integrated rectifying corrupt 
practices with realizing transport potential. The bureau and its 
sub-stations constantly send more than 230 transport and corrupt 
practices working groups to important transport sections and 
local bureaus of the entire system to guide and help in better 
managing transport production and rectifying corrupt practices. 
  First, this bureau recognizes model organizational behavior 
as an important aspect for rectifying corrupt practices and 
accordingly builds cadre teams. The bureaus' director, Lui 
Zhijun [0491 1807 6511], party committee secretary Ma Zengqing 
[7456 1073 3237], and the party committee directors of the nine 
sub-bureaus together signed a reward and punishment agreement 
titled "Deeply Rectifying Corrupt Practices and Taking Full 
Responsibility" which clearly states the two-stage goals of the 
bureaus to rectify corrupt practices initially by 1 October and 
finally by the end of the year. This agreement enables combining 
the rectification of corrupt practices with different levels of 
cadres' personal benefits. Increasing the profile of passenger 
and cargo transport, improving society's supervision, and 
publicly and reasonably arranging the transport capacity are 
Shenyang bureau's other methods for rectifying corrupt practices 
and improving transport capacity. At the beginning of September, 
Shenyang bureau published an announcement in newspapers in 
Liaoning and Jilin provinces stating that it will provide 
information concerning transport capacity and the number of 
trains to the public; on 15 September all windows of the whole 
bureau's customer and cargo service sections adopted the habit 
of wearing badges while working, clearly marking prices, and 
publishing telephone reporting hot-line numbers in order to 
accept the supervision of the entire society. Lui Zhijun, the 
bureau director, said that "We should want to `accept the 
people's authority,' and receive the entire society's 
recognition." At the same time this bureau's main directors also 
came to Liaoning and Jilin provinces, the Shenyang Military 
District, and the party leadership organizations in eleven 
cities (alliances and prefectures) to introduce this situation, 
ask for opinions, and ensure support of production and transport 
methods for the 47 state-owned "double assurance" enterprises. 
Taking Liaoning province as an example, it can be seen that the 
Shenyang railway bureau's modified transport capacity for the 
"national team" resulted in a reduction of funds on the order of 
250 million yuan. Shenyang bureau has received clear successes 
in combining rectifying corrupt practices and realizing 
potential transport capacity. In the first four months of this 
year, the quantity of Shenyang bureau's transported goods not 
only was lower than that planned by the department, but also was 
more than 1.9 million tons less than that in the same period of 
last year. However, starting in May, the bureaus' daily loading 
and unloading records continuously improved, and entered a new 
stage of increased transport capacity and income. At present, 
Shenyang bureau has completely paid off its debts according to 
the annual plan. The quantity of cargo transported and the 
number of customers served, are all above the established annual 
progress plan. A positive change from corrupt practices has made 
the limited transport capacity truly realize its efficient 
contribution to society, and fully attain its railway transport 
potential. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59282 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Analysis of 1994 Corn Market </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0213A Changchun JILIN RIBAO in Chinese 8 Nov 93 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0213A </F>
<F P=104>  Changchun JILIN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Shen Taikang and Li Guoqiang of the Economic </F>
Information Center of Jilin Province: "A Forecast and Analysis 
of the Corn Market Next Year"] 
  [Text] This year the supply and demand situation has been 
tight on the corn markets across China. There have been no 
sufficient spot goods in the producing areas, resulting in 
increases in the corn price. The per kilogram futures trading 
price is 0.06-0.10 yuan higher than last year. The prices at the 
wholesale grain trading markets in Zhengzhou, Heilongjiang, 
Shandong, Hubei, Weihai, and Qinhuangdao are respectively 20 
percent, 10.7 percent, 8.3 percent, 27.4 percent, 29 percent, 
and 21.8 percent higher than the same period last year. The main 
reason for the rise in the corn price and the tight supply and 
demand situation regarding corn has been the substantial 
increase in the demand for corn across the country. For 
instance: 1) Industry nationwide consumes 8 million metric tons 
of corn each year; 2) the demand for corn on the domestic feed 
market amounts to more than 30 million metric tons; 3) 
nationwide the consumption of corn for medical purposes and by 
the light and food industries already amounts to over 1.7 
million metric tons; 4) as the United States has reduced its 
corn exports, Japan, the ROK, and Southeast Asian countries have 
all tried to buy corn from China; this year corn exports are 
expected to total more than 8 million metric tons. We believe: 
that next year corn from China will still sell well and at a 
good price. With regard to the domestic market, this year the 
output of corn will fall by around 2 percent from last year, and 
at the same time the stock of corn will also fall by over 15 
percent; next year corn consumption will continue to grow at the 
rate of 4-5 percent, and the corn demand and corn supply on the 
domestic market are each expected to be around 92 million metric 
tons. Consequently supply and demand on China's domestic market 
will be in basic equilibrium, and there will be a small surplus. 
  With regard to the world corn market, according to the 
forecasts made by the United Nations Food and Agriculture 
Organization, this year the total grain output of the world will 
decline; the output of wheat will increase, but the output of 
coarse cereals will decline. The main reason for the decline in 
coarse cereals was that the floods in the midwest of the United 
States and the drought in the southeast of the United States led 
to a decline of around 22 percent in the output of corn. We 
believe that next year the corn price on the world market will 
continue to be high. Furthermore, as exports from the United 
States, the main corn-producing country in the world, will 
continue to be reduced, Japan, the ROK, and Southeast Asian 
countries will be more inclined to try to buy corn from China. 
Next year corn exports from China will continue to grow at a 
high rate, resulting in the need to use another 4-6 million 
metric tons of stocked corn. This will reduce China's national 
corn stock to the level of the previous four years. The analysis 
above shows that because of the impact of the world corn market, 
it will be rather challenging for China to use the corn produced 
this year and a part of the corn stock to achieve a balanced 
situation and meet the domestic and external demand next year. 
For this reason the average corn price on the domestic market 
is expected to increase by over 10 percent again on the basis of 
the substantial increase this year. 
  This year our province achieved a bumper grain harvest, but 
the output of corn is believed to be largely the same as last 
year. Corn exports from our province are expected to total over 
5 million metric tons this year, thereby creating a historical 
record. Next year our province should seize the opportunity 
provided by the strong demand for corn on the domestic and 
international markets so as to try to climb another step in the 
area of exporting goods to earn foreign exchange. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59283 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shanghai Farmer Mobility `Difficult' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0213B Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 12 Nov 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0213B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xiao Lin: "Shanghai Farmers Have Difficulty in </F>
Enjoying Mobility"] 
  [Text] Shanghai has pursued rural economic development by 
exploiting its advantage of being the largest industrial city in 
the country. Large amounts of rural labor force have moved into 
rural nonagricultural businesses, and the employment structure 
of rural labor force is becoming increasingly rationalized. 
Presently Shanghai's rural economy has begun the transformation 
from a planned economy into a market economy, and agricultural 
production is also going through the change from traditional 
agriculture mainly based on manual operations into modern 
agriculture. The rural secondary industry is already of a 
substantial size, and is changing from pursuing extensive 
development into pursuing intensive development. 
  In this transformation process there have emerged some 
problems which are affecting the further transfer and proper 
placement of rural labor force. The main manifestations are: 
  1. Rural labor force, especially agricultural labor 
force, is to a large extent characterized by low cultural and 
technical qualities; thus there are only a small number of 
employment opportunities available for selection, and getting 
into high-grade industries is difficult. According to a 
survey, in 1992 13.1 percent of Shanghai's rural labor force was 
illiterate or semiliterate; 34.7 percent had received elementary 
education; 43.8 percent had received lower secondary education; 
8.4 percent had received upper secondary education or more; and 
19.2 percent had received professional and technical training of 
various kinds. The labor force engaged in agricultural 
production had even lower cultural and technical qualities. 
  Currently rural secondary and tertiary industries, 
especially 
some high-grade industries, have very high demands on the 
quality of labor force. Thus, in view of its present quality, it 
is very difficult to transfer rural labor force to rural 
nonagricultural businesses, especially to high-grade industries. 
  2. The capacity of township industrial enterprises to 
absorb surplus rural labor force has weakened, and there have 
even occurred relative surpluses in some regions. Before 
1988 Shanghai's township industry mainly concentrated funds on 
developing new enterprises. After the start of 1989 it began to 
change from developing expanded reproduction mainly based on 
extensive development into developing expanded reproduction 
mainly based on intensive development through carrying out 
enterprises' technological transformation and through renovating 
equipments; township industry has changed from being 
labor-intensive into being technology-intensive. As a result, 
the capacity of township industry, the main actor which absorbs 
surplus rural labor force, to absorb surplus rural labor force 
has weakened, and the problem of transferring difficulty is 
becoming increasingly prominent. 
  3. The rural tertiary industry is developing slowly, 
and thus is unlikely to absorb surplus rural labor force on a 
larger scale. In 1992, citywide 476,700 rural workers were 
working in the tertiary industry, accounting for 19.5 percent of 
the total rural labor force; however, if the 261,000 workers who 
have left their native places are not counted, only 215,700 
rural workers are actually working in the rural tertiary 
industry, accounting for 8.8 percent of the total rural labor 
force. In recent years, compared with the secondary industry, 
Shanghai's rural tertiary industry has not developed quickly; 
especially, the development of some relatively high-grade 
industries has been slow, and is thus not meeting the demand of 
comprehensive development. 
  4. The difference in comparative gains between 
agriculture and rural nonagricultural businesses is growing, 
leading to surplus rural labor force's unwillingness to engage 
in farming. In recent years, as prices for agricultural 
production materials have grown continually, agricultural 
production leads to little gains or even losses; peasants' 
interests have been harmed, and there is a widespread 
agriculture-despising mentality. 
  Currently most of those working in the front line of 
agriculture are female workers who are of low cultural qualities 
and at the age of 35 or older. The long continuance of this 
situation is sure to result in the decline of the quality of 
agricultural production and economic returns, leading to a new 
crises in agricultural production. As the difference in 
comparative gains between agriculture and nonagricultural 
businesses is growing, the surplus labor force is unwilling to 
return to the front line of agriculture, although the phenomenon 
of relative surpluses of secondary-industry labor force is 
widespread in many regions where township enterprises are less 
developed. 
  As proven by practice, the transfer of surplus rural labor 
force is one of the important ways to make peasants become rich. 
Finding ways to complete the transfer process through 
rationally allocating rural labor force will be of great 
significance not only to the steady growth of peasant income, 
but also to the comprehensive development of the rural economy 
as a whole. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59284 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journal Examines Criminal Societies </TI></H3>
<H4>   Overview of Organized Crime </H4>
<F P=102> 94CM0068A Hong Kong CHIU-SHIH NIEN-TAI [THE NINETIES] in 
Chinese No 11, 1 Nov 93 pp 43-45 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0068A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHIU-SHIH NIEN-TAI [THE NINETIES] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Cheng Ying (2110 1305): "Special Editorial: </F>
Criminal Gangs Challenge Security on Mainland--The Rise of 
Secret Gangs on the Mainland"] 
  [Text] In Shaoyang City, a secret gang openly proclaimed in 
a public announcement that it had executed a policeman. This 
gives us a small indication of the rise and rampancy of criminal 
gangs on the mainland. Higher authorities acknowledge that 
secret society organizations have appeared in a number of 
provinces and cities. In Guangdong Province, at least 100,000 
persons are suspected of being involved in secret societies. 
  Data reveal that crimes committed in various parts of the 
mainland in recent years, such as gun running, drug trafficking 
in the border regions, car and highway robberies, plundering and 
murder, and also the overt and covert operations of underground 
gangs leading to serious crimes of great viciousness committed 
in groups, are becoming more blatant with each passing day. 
<H5>  Startling and Frightening </H5>
  Let us first look at a few truly frightening incidents: 
  In the summer of 1991, a policeman of Shaoyang City in Hunan 
Province was shot and killed on a public square in the middle of 
the city. The next day, a public announcement was impudently 
posted on the board for municipal judicial notices. It said: 
"This is to give notice that the Xiao Xiong [Hsiao Hsiung] 
Society of China has executed a policeman." It was signed Kuang 
Long [Mad Dragon], president of the society. 
  The "Xue Shou [Hsueh Shou] Gang," that had been extinct in 
Fujian Province for the last few decades, has been revived, 
headed by a man named Hua Ruya [5478 1172 1509]. Membership of 
the gang is made up of inkstone carvers. In a big fight that 
erupted on 7 April 1991 with quarry workers, the gang, using 
various weapons, enacted a slaughter that had blood flowing in 
streams. 
  In October 1991, a series of murders occurred at Tangshan, 
in 
which the "Sanjianke [Three Swordsmen] Gang" were involved. The 
"three swordsmen" were Liu Zuo [0491 0146], Wang Xincheng [3769 
2450 1004], and Lei Yunhai [7191 0061 3189]. The "oath of 
allegiance" sworn by gang members was: "Together in life and 
death, together in enduring adversity, and no betrayals of the 
cause." The purpose was stated as "causing the Communist Party 
as much trouble as possible," and their principle of action was 
"to perform world shaking deeds." 
  In May 1990, the public security department of Hebei 
Province 
broke up the "Jianghu Langren [Vagrants of Rivers and Lakes] 
Gang," said to be the country's largest gang of thieves and 
burglars. Its chief called himself "Langli Aoyou Yi Quexian," 
which translates as "a crippled immortal roaming 
unrestrainedly." He has a 30 year history as pickpocket and 
thief, and his real name is Yao Zunxian [1202 1415 6343]. This 
gang has gathered up local thieves and burglars and plagued city 
and countryside, raking in as much as 100,000 yuan every week 
from thefts and burglaries. The gang has a chieftain, a person 
in charge of public business, and also a person in charge of 
military affairs. Some of its gang members come from highly 
educated families, and some have also studied law and have on 
several occasions evaded prosecution. The gang also controls a 
group of female camp followers, on the one hand, for the purpose 
of satisfying the desires of gang members when on long overland 
treks without wives, and on the other hand, to screen 
activities, having the women appear as serving as young lady 
secretaries. 
  There have been reports that the lodges of the triad society 
set up in Guangzhou control prostitution and trade in smuggled 
pornography throughout the entire Huanghuagang district. Control 
of all underground trades in Guangzhou is divided up between 
different gangs, a fact that has already been verified very 
early by security personnel. 
  Most of the independent small street vendors in the 
country's 
largest small commodities market, the Hanzheng Street in Wuhan, 
are being harassed by hosts of self-styled "secret societies." 
They enforce payment of "protection money," and it is suspected 
that some wear military police uniforms, so that the vendors are 
reluctant to report them. 
<H3>  Main Occupation of Criminal Gangs: Smuggling, Drug 
Trafficking </H3>
  Whether in the market towns of the southwestern border 
region 
or in the "opened-up" zones along the southeastern seaboard, 
underground secret gangs have arisen everywhere in recent years, 
and they live by victimizing the people. They expand their power 
by depending merely on five lines of "trades," namely smuggling, 
drug trafficking, arms trading, controlling the immoral trade, 
and controlling gambling houses. The following are some 
instances of such: 
  Car thefts and smuggling of stolen cars has been a serious 
vexation for the police in Hong Kong and Macao since 1987. The 
underground gangs in Guangzhou, Shenzhen, and Dongguan 
collaborate with underground gangs in Hong Kong, have them steal 
lots and lots of high class Hong Kong limousines, and then get 
them shipped over in repeated successful operations. In 1992 
alone, 6,500 limousines were stolen in Hong Kong, and every 
month over some 600 cars were transported to the mainland along 
secret routes. 
  Guangzhou's public security department acknowledges that the 
criminal gangs on the mainland that steal and smuggle motorcars 
are broadly organized and have also infiltrated security, 
customs, and border defense agencies. In Huizhou City alone, 
security personnel received "goodwill fees" from criminal gangs 
amounting to over 10 million yuan. 
  A certain Tan [6223], leader of the car theft criminal gang 
in the Huiyang district, has 34 underlings, and their equipment, 
from communications to transportation, is much superior to that 
of the security forces. 
  Some gangs have set for themselves extremely strict 
regulations as "society admission" or "gang admission" rituals. 
The reason why people are willing to face the risks and join the 
gangs is no other than the lure of high reward. The sale of one 
stolen car in Guangzhou can often bring a profit of from 30,000 
to 50,000 yuan. Quite a few gangmembers are former convicts or 
former inmates of "reform through labor" institutions, or have 
escaped from prison. They will risk their everything to fight 
the police to take personal revenge. 
<H5>  Arms Trading, A Casual Affair </H5>
  On New Year's Day of 1986, a military convoy on its way to 
relieve a garrison on the Sino-Vietnamese border was stopped 
when it approached a small town near Menglian. A crowd of young 
girls and boys swarmed around the vehicles, peddling 
pornographic books and magazines and golden trinkets to the 
soldiers. In the baskets of some of these people there were, 
open for everybody to see, Soviet-made pistols and ammunition. 
One pistol, to be given with 50 bullets in the bargain, was 
marked out at 50 yuan. These trading activities were completely 
uncontrolled, going on as nonchalantly as fruit sales on inland 
railway stations. A few steps further on, in the people's homes, 
you could discover baskets full of hand grenades and U.S.-made 
semiautomatic weapons. Arms trading in the border region seems 
to be a relaxed and free occupation, but actually in most cases 
firmly in the hands of some criminal gangs. Some of these people 
are indeed the "little Red Guard generals" who 20 years ago had 
gone to Vietnam and Cambodia to "support the world revolution." 
They have settled and become lawful residents in Laos and 
Cambodia and have become quite powerful members of local gangs. 
Some have mounted gangs at their disposal and have hired gunman 
to protect the arms smuggling and trading on both sides of the 
border. The local criminal gangs have their own "Ho Chi Ming 
Trails" and are hard to catch and to bring to justice. All these 
large and small weapons have a ready market among Hong Kong's 
criminal gangs and among the bands of drug dealers in Southeast 
Asia. On some routes of the drug trade, local people serve as 
well-paid hired guards. 
  The following are some figures released by southwest border 
defense units and other related agencies: 
  Nov 1988: Sichuan Province broke up an arms case, seized 17 
pistols. Sep 1989: Fujian broke up an especially large arms 
smuggling case, seized over 1,000 pistols and arrested 30 
gangmembers. Apr 1990: Guangzhou broke up a gun and ammunition 
case; seized over 100 rifles and over 1,000 bullets. In 1992: 
the two provinces of Yunnan and Hainan broke up 21 arms 
smuggling cases; involved were 84 rifles, 1,100 bullets, and 90 
suspected gangmembers. 
  In the public security regulations promulgated after the 
establishment of the PRC, unauthorized possession and 
concealment of firearms is an extremely serious crime. However, 
by the 1980's, smuggling of guns and ammunition by devious 
routes is no more a unique occurrence. In the hands of the 
criminal gangs, these weapons are like time bombs that can go 
off at any time and do great harm to society. 
<H5>  Some Peculiarities of Criminal Gang Activities </H5>
  Public security agencies are well aware of the rise of 
criminal gangs all over the country. As early as at the 
All-China Public Security Work Conference in May 1989, Ren 
Jianxin [0117 1696 2450], president of the Supreme People's 
Court, indicated: "The important and large burglary and robbery 
cases that have occurred are clearly of a criminal gang nature." 
This acknowledgment is more and more verified by actual facts. 
In Shanghai alone, the following gang-type secret societies have 
been broken up: The Qing Tian She [Blue Sky Society] (in the 
suburbs), the Shisan Taibao [Thirteen Guardians] (in the Zhabei 
district), the Jiangnan Qixia [Seven Heroes South of the 
Changjiang] (in the Nanshi district), and also some others. 
  When a cadre of the Guangzhou Police Bureau, who did not 
want 
to reveal his name, was privately interviewed by a certain 
Japanese writer, he made some frightening revelations about the 
grouping and organization of criminal gangs in the Guangdong 
region. He said, there are at least 100,000 suspected criminal 
gangmembers in Guangdong. They generally operate as follows: 
  1. Most make a living in the free market. The government 
leaves large loopholes in its control of illegal actions by 
small vendors and individual entrepreneurs. Hiding among those 
has become like a natural protective screen for the criminal 
gangmembers. 
  2. The link between the criminal societies of the mainland 
and the criminal organizations across the border, such as the 
Triad Society and the Xin Yi An [Sun Yee On] Society, is 
becoming stronger with each passing day. The forces of the 
various factions establish "contacts and backing" with and from 
the outside, always seeking behind-the-scenes backers and 
accomplices for their deeds. 
  3. Although the territory on the mainland is divided up 
between local gang powers, internal rivalry has not yet been 
serious so far. For instance, the passenger minibuses in the 
cities of Guangzhou and Dongguan are controlled by different 
gangs for different routes. They either cajole people to ride 
their buses and then halfway rob them clean, or they act in 
collusion with the drivers and take from the passengers whatever 
they have. This is the root of the scourge expressed in the term 
"car thieves and highwaymen." However, if conflicts arise 
between different gangs as to "territorial jurisdictions," they 
have their own bigwigs who will privately arrange peace. In 
Guangzhou there are over 1,000 minibuses that will have to buy 
"insurance" from various gang lodges. At 20 yuan per day per 
bus, it gives them an average daily income of 20,000 yuan. 
  4. Places of nightlife entertainment in such big cities as 
Guangzhou and Shenzhen are about 80 percent, and to varying 
degrees are controlled or infiltrated by underground gangs. Some 
of them have their own security guards (thugs), some force girls 
into prostitution, and some call all the shots in illicit 
gambling operations. 
  5. Whenever they run afoul of the authorities or are 
threatened with a police raid, they have immediate operative 
underground "communications channels" that will take the matter 
up with the police or the authorities in power and work out a 
compromise. In serious cases, they will finally alert the high 
and mighty in Hong Kong to personally allay the dispute. In 
actual fact, much of the immoral trade in Shenzhen is tacitly 
permitted by the police, and the criminal gangs have their 
informers right inside the police. 
  6. It has come to light in recent years that the criminal 
gang organizations, for more effective operations, have started 
to hire intellectuals at great expense. For instance, the 
criminal gang organization in Xiamen already has highly educated 
people as ringleaders, and they even have the services of 
specialized lawyers who will absolve them from guilt or blame, 
besides criminal gangs do not just rob, kill, and commit 
misdeeds all day long. They are also very much engaged in 
legitimate trade as a shield, and that fact creates great 
difficulties for investigating personnel. 
<H5>  "Secret Societies Have Become Part of Society" </H5>
  It is not possible to narrate one by one all the large cases 
of national significance, but it has to be emphasized: Although 
their history is a short one, the underground criminal societies 
on the Chinese mainland have a savage and cruel character that 
is frightening, as they display an extreme hatred for society. 
In April of this year, at the Mudanjiang railway station in the 
Northeast, it was necessary to call up 300 fully armed policemen 
to prevent interception by powerful criminal gangs of the 
transfer to jail of a group of 15 prisoners convicted of serious 
crimes, because the gangs had threatened that they would use 
their guns to rescue the prisoners. Interrogation of the 15 
prisoners led to the breakup of a criminal gang of over 90 
persons. As a show of force against the police, these people had 
committed over 200 crimes of various kinds and had publicly 
declared that they would fight the police to the very end. This 
case was a great shock to the state's public security and to the 
heads of the Chinese communist regime. 
  To sum up, "secret societies have become part of society" 
was 
the conclusion reached in one of the internal documents of the 
public security department of Guangdong Province. Communist 
China has for a long time boasted that secret societies like the 
"Qing Bang" and the "Hong Bang" societies, have disappeared from 
mainland society. Now we witness their revival in such cities as 
Shanghai, Nanjing, Guangzhou, and Hangzhou. 
  As I finish these lines, there is news that the city of 
Harbin in Heilongjiang Province has won a "complete victory" in 
wiping out its criminal gangs. Prior to this, the ringleader of 
the criminal gang in the city of Harbin had just been planning 
to take the precious seat of a member of the Municipal Political 
Consultative Conference. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59285 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journal Examines Criminal Societies </TI></H3>
<H4>   Gang Influence Seen Growing </H4>
<F P=102> 94CM0068B Hong Kong CHIU-SHIH NIEN-TAI [THE NINETIES] in 
Chinese No 11, 1 Nov 93 pp 46-47 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0068B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHIU-SHIH NIEN-TAI [THE NINETIES] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ming Hua (2494 5478): "Criminal Gangs Grow </F>
Internally and Infiltrate Abroad"] 
  [Text] Clan power controls village and township 
enterprises, has command over the local economic lifelines, and 
creates local criminal gangs of its very own kind. 
  Many Hong Kong and Taiwan criminal gangs extend their 
operations to the mainland; they directly or indirectly build up 
their power. "Investment" is the protective coloration that 
allows them to establish bases. 
  In addition to the well organized activities of underground 
criminal gangs in the big cities, gang activities on the Chinese 
mainland--characterized by clan power--are now extending to many 
towns and townships. Especially in areas where town and township 
enterprises have had a good start, these gangs have gradually 
become a dominating one-sided power, as they claim to work for 
the interests of the clan. 
<H5>  Control of the Rural Economy by Clan Power </H5>
  GAIGE SHIBAO once reported that it was discovered that 
control of part of the rural enterprises in Anhui Province was 
completely in the hands of certain big families. Certain clans 
monopolized the positions of heads of townships, towns, and 
villages. Anyone of a different clan seeking work in the 
enterprises was up against all kinds of difficulties, and the 
distribution of wages and other benefits was decided 
unilaterally by the head of the clan in question. Such clan 
power conglomerates also had their own law enforcement 
personnel. Anyone who would violate the "clan rules" or would 
not follow orders, would suffer physical punishment. The only 
way for weaker and smaller families and clans is to submit to 
the bullying and the willful oppression by the powerful clans. 
In some rural factories, they forcibly seized all incoming 
orders and business contacts, and that has led to quarrels 
between some clans and even fighting with weapons. Local 
government and police are always very much afraid to get 
involved in such cases because the so-called "local snakes" 
[gang bosses] are too powerful. Some clan forces hold most of 
the administrative leadership power in the villages and 
townships and have command over the economic lifelines of the 
areas in question. In September of 1991, the bloody "7 
September" riots that occurred in Qinghai Province and that 
shocked and frightened the central authorities, were also caused 
by different clans fighting for local farming and grazing 
resources. At the start of the riots, the public security 
authorities found it impossible to effectively intervene, and 
after the event they asked clan chiefs and local notables to 
mediate. There had to be no pressuring, only a peaceful 
procedure could do it in order not to evoke anti-government 
sentiment. 
  Starting this year, officialdom is sounding off all its 
propaganda instruments to create momentum for starting the Three 
Gorges project and to prepare public opinion for the large scale 
resettlement of population from the reservoir site. The 
propaganda is mostly praising the transferees at the reservoir 
area for the way they support the government project, and for 
the way they are willing to "give their homes to the 
government." However, in actual fact, according to the 
revelations of a nongovernment newspaper in Wuhan, resettlement 
of people from Fengdu, Zhenxi, and other transfer areas in 
Sichuan is meeting with great resistance. Main resistance comes 
from the clan forces, now agglomerated into one force and not 
averse to getting into clashes with government personnel. The 
purpose pursued by this kind of clan power is not the commission 
of criminal acts, but rather the protection of the people's 
homesteads, of course also hope of gaining more benefits from 
the transfer. Whenever faced with this kind of a situation, the 
special work team in charge of population resettlement had to go 
to great trouble buying over or persuading the various clan 
chiefs. It has to be acknowledged, though, that the inflation of 
clan power in the villages has created a new pattern of its own 
among the local gangs. 
<H5>  Criminal Societies Encroaching on Religious Organizations </H5>
  Now that there is strong popular demand for religious 
freedom, it is a matter of great concern for officialdom that 
more and more common people have taken to various religious 
activities, breaching the "three freedoms" policy of officialdom 
as far as it concerns religion, and weakening the centripetal 
force in politics. But an even greater concern is that the 
increased religious activities provide another sanctuary for 
underground gangs. 
  One of this year's issues of the NEIBU BAODAO warns of the 
encroachment on religious organizations by criminal gangs. It is 
reported there that the several nationwide religious incidents 
in recent years, such as the activities of the Hu Han Pai in 
Yiwu County in Zhejiang Province, the "Da Zhao Sheng" incident 
at the time of the Asian Olympiad involving followers from ten 
provinces, and the "end of the world" incident started in 1991 
by a Protestant sect in Hebei Province, are all cases of 
infiltration by "underground hostile forces" and by "religious 
forces from abroad." The actual fact was that in all these 
incidents some underground criminal organizations seized the 
opportunity to make capital by cheating religious followers out 
of their "offerings." When banned and suppressed by the 
government, members of the criminal gangs involved will proclaim 
their "religious belief" as justifying their resistance against 
the government. The cohesion among religious believers is a 
factor that the government cannot ignore. 
<H5>  Infiltration by Criminal Societies from Hong Kong and Taiwan </H5>
  One contributing factor for the appearance of local criminal 
gangs and underground criminal societies on the mainland was the 
deterioration of public order on the mainland itself, but then 
there was also the catalytic effect of infiltrations by criminal 
gangs from abroad. Judging by news and case histories published 
by the public security agencies, criminal societies from Hong 
Kong and Taiwan are expanding their activities to the mainland 
in a variety of forms. One is the direct dispatch of persons to 
contact on the mainland criminal gangs or former convicts or 
former inmates of "reform through labor" institutions, set up 
lodges, and then slowly broaden out. It has been revealed that 
Hong Kong criminal societies have expanded their territory in 
Guangdong Province to include Shenzhen, Shantou, Dongguan, and 
Guangzhou. Criminal societies from Taiwan, while being 
constantly subjected to mopping up operations by the 
authorities, are also expanding their activities to the 
mainland. Their main areas of operation are Fujian Province and 
Xiamen, but they have also appeared in Guizhou and Guangxi. 
  Of course, the Hong Kong and Taiwan criminal societies had 
to 
camouflage their infiltrations of the mainland. For this 
purpose, the economic reform and opening up on the mainland 
provided the criminal societies from abroad with an excellent 
opportunity and shield. It was then that "mainland investments" 
became for some of these criminal elements the best protective 
talisman. 
  Investments were not only sure of being welcomed by the 
local 
governments, who were eager for quick success and instant 
benefits, but the mainland public security agencies and police 
forces frequently became eager behind-the-scenes backers for 
personages of criminal societies that came over as Hong Kong or 
Taiwan businessmen. Quite a few case histories show that some 
personnel of the public security agencies on the mainland had 
been bought over by the criminal societies. 
  At one time the case of Zhang Zhen [1728 4176] had caused a 
sensation. The case showed clearly that authorities on the 
mainland would pay no heed to any other consideration when it 
comes to attracting investments. The great boss of Taiwan's 
criminal society, (gangster emperor) Zhang Zhen, after spending 
money lavishly, became for a time the honored guest of high 
cadres. It is difficult to verify whether Zhang Zhen really 
"washed his hands in a golden bowl," but with his "outstanding 
business achievements" in Taiwan and his "reputation" he was 
indeed accepted by the mainland, and he also became joined in 
sworn brotherhood with an artist, a painter. 
  Wu Dongtan [0702 3159 3389], president of the "Tiandaomeng 
Taiyanghui" [Sun Society of the Divine Truth Brotherhood] of 
Taiwan, invested 100 million yuan in Fujian Province, which made 
him a favorite person in that place, and a luxurious villa 
became his base. 
  In their exploration of the mainland territory, Hong Kong 
and 
Taiwan criminal societies have nothing else in mind but 
"profit." According to data with the Hong Kong police, most of 
the many firearms cases, large-scale drug smuggling cases, and 
illegal labor cases prosecuted since 1988 involved criminal 
organizations from the mainland, which goes to show that 
commission of crimes by joint operations of criminal societies 
within and across the border have now become the trend. 
  It is already common knowledge that some members of criminal 
mainland societies cross the border and commit crimes in Hong 
Kong, with the plotting and organizing having been done by 
lawless elements across the border. To evade arrest by police, 
members of Hong Kong's underworld escape and hide out in 
Shenzhen and Guangzhou, where they are protected by local 
criminal gangs. 
<H3>  Toward Improved Weaponry and the Use of Science and 
Technology </H3>
  A publication of a certain public security agency revealed 
that there were criminal gangs operating in certain areas of 
Jiangsu Province under such names as "Xiaoyao [Carefree] Gang," 
"Mudan [Peony] Gang," and "Meihua [Plum Blossom] Gang." Some of 
these organizations have an obvious political character, as they 
declare their intention to actually constitute a "second 
political regime" in their region. 
  The criminal societies on the mainland are in the process of 
getting better weapons and applying more science and technology. 
With the cooperation of criminal societies in Hong Kong and 
Taiwan, they equip themselves with advanced items of armament 
and communication instruments, such as cordless telephones, high 
frequency radio stations, various kinds of rifles, and high 
speed boats. In an anti-drug campaign carried out in November of 
1991 with the participation of regular army units in the 
southwestern border region, it was discovered that the bandit 
gangs in the hinterland had not only radio stations transmitting 
orders from bosses across the border, but also excellent 
weapons, even rocket launchers. After their annihilation, large 
amounts of weapons of an advanced type were captured. Whenever a 
criminal organization launches a large-scale action, they will 
temporarily hire forces to cover their operations. Along the 
Fujian coast, so-called "snake heads" [gang bosses] will 
surreptitiously ship over "human snakes" to Taiwan, and this 
according to an entire set of operational processes, in which 
each link is carried out in a division of labor, and every item 
done to perfection. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59286 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   October Foreign Orders Up 3.79 Percent </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  OW2011093493 Taipei CNA in English 0809 GMT 20 Nov 93 </F>
<F P=103> OW2011093493 </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei CNA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [By Danielle Yang] </F>
  [Text] Taipei, Nov. 20 (CNA) -- Taiwan received US$7.42 
billion worth of foreign orders in October, up 3.79 percent, or 
US$430 million, from October 1992, the Ministry of Economic 
Affairs (MOEA) said Saturday [20 November]. 
  The figure also represented a 6.08 percent increase compared 
with September of this year, the MOEA tallies showed. 
  From January to October 1993, Taiwan received a total of 
US$71.13 billion worth of foreign orders, a growth of 6.25 
percent over the same period of 1992. 
  MOEA attributed the increase in October foreign orders to 
increasing foreign demand. 
  Increased orders were placed for plastic and rubber 
products, 
textiles, and electronic products, while the precision machinery 
industry saw a decline in orders. 
  In terms of area, orders from Europe increased the most, up 
17.35 percent over September 1993 totals. 
  However, Hong Kong was responsible for the most orders, 
registering increases of 21.4 percent and 30.68 percent when 
compared with October 1992 and the January-October period of 
1992, the statistics showed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59287 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Taiwan Import-Export Controls Analyzed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0074A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] in Chinese No 9, 
14 Sep 93 pp 40-41 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0074A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Shanbin (4545 0810 2430), Research Office, </F>
Anhui Provincial Superior People's Court: "Critique of Taiwan's 
Import-Export Control Laws"] 
  [Text] I 
  In the course of trading with foreign countries over a long 
period of time, the fiscal and legislative authorities in Taiwan 
have gradually formulated and perfected basic laws and 
regulations for the control of imports and exports. The most 
important of these are the "Draft Trade Law," the "Commodity 
Export Examination Regulations," the "Commodity Import 
Examination Regulations, "Import-Export Classification, 
Examination and Control Methods" and applicable rules and 
regulations. Standards for imports and exports are found in the 
"Classification Table for Imports and Exports," which prescribes 
methods for controlling imports and exports of all categories of 
commodities. Using these laws and regulations as a basic 
framework, a fairly complete and integrated legal system for the 
control of imports and exports has been fashioned. These laws 
play an extremely important role in promoting the development of 
Taiwan's externally oriented economy. 
  The purpose of this article is to explore the pros and cons 
of Taiwan's import-export trade control laws, summarizing how 
well they have succeeded or failed in developing Taiwan's 
foreign trade economy to provide lessons that we might use. 
  1. Import Trade Legal System 
  Article 3 of Taiwan's Import-Export Classification, 
Examination, and Control Methods" divides imports into three 
types, namely prohibited imports, controlled imports, and 
permitted imports. 
  Prohibited Imports. This applies mostly to the 
prohibition of imports to safeguard social order or public 
health. It applies specifically to 14 harmful substances 
including narcotics and toxic drugs. 
  Controlled Imports. This category includes mostly 
things in which Taiwan Province is self-sufficient or luxury 
goods that need not be imported. In principle, traders may not 
import them. However, should an enterprise have a genuinely 
special need for them application may be made to import them 
within certain limits. The purpose of controlled imports -- 
conservation of the province's foreign exchange aside -- is to 
protect the development of Taiwan's industry. In general, the 
control period for controlled imports is two years. If the 
original reason for control has not been eliminated by the time 
the control period expires, the control period must be extended. 
Special regulations also apply to methods for certification of 
this category of commodities: First, Taiwan's "International 
Trade Bureau" must approve. After obtaining an import license, 
certification procedures are completed at a designated bank. At 
the present time, Taiwan's controlled imports consist mostly of 
weapons and ammunition, explosives, ships and boats, radioactive 
isotopes, gold and gold alloys, camcorders, electronic game 
machines, gambling equipment, and some goods that Taiwan can 
itself produce. 
  Permitted Imports. All commodities that Taiwan 
cannot manufacture or produce in sufficient amounts may be 
imported (prohibited and controlled imports excepted). In 
general, certification procedures for such goods may be handled 
directly at designated banks. However, for the importation of 
specially designated commodities, one may complete certification 
procedures at a designated bank only after having obtained an 
import license from the "International Trade Bureau." For the 
importation of certification-exempt commodities, a firm need 
only request a development credit application from the 
certifying bank. Following bank examination and approval, it may 
then make foreign exchange conversions for importation. 
  Taiwan also places certain restrictions on the areas from 
which goods may be imported. For economic and diplomatic 
reasons, the Taiwan authorities have designated the following 
areas as permitted import areas, terming them trading partners. 
They are: Hong Kong and Macao, Malaysia, Singapore, Japan, 
Europe, Australia, New Zealand, North America, and other areas. 
  Taiwan law also contains special provisions about who is 
qualified to import. Import applicants must be one of the 
following: a national enterprise such as the "Central Trust," 
and the Taiwan "Materials Bureau"; a nongovernment production 
enterprise; direct users of fishing industry machinery and 
equipment; a factory in an export processing zone; or a trader. 
A nongovernment production enterprise is a firm that produces 
goods or provides labor services that is capitalized at more 
than NT [New Taiwan] $500,000, that is registered with the 
"international Trade Bureau," and that engages in the 
import-export business. A trader is an import-export corporation 
with a capital of more than NT$2 million whose exports total 
more than $200,000 per year. 
  Pertinent data show 26,751 different commodity categories in 
Taiwan, 14, or 0.05 percent, of which are prohibited imports; 
649, or 2.43 percent, of which are controlled imports; and 21, 
or 0.08 percent, of which are suspended imports. This is a total 
of 684 different imports in the enumerated three categories, or 
2.56 percent of the total. Thus, the number of Taiwan 
prohibited, controlled, or suspended imports is not large. Among 
the permitted imports, 331 may be imported only by certain 
applicants. This is 1.24 percent of the total number. 
Ninety-eight, or 0.37 percent may be purchased only from certain 
areas; and 2,156, or 8.06 percent, require inspection documents. 
Clearly, a fairly large number of permitted Taiwan imports carry 
restrictions of other kinds. 
  To summarize, the licensing system is the import control 
system used in Taiwan today. In principle, licenses are required 
for imports, only a small number excepted. Although, for the 
sake of simplifying procedures, Taiwan no longer requires that 
import license documents be presented for half of products, 
since bank procedures are so complex, importing firms rarely use 
such licenses. Consequently, in order to balance imports and 
exports, and change the steadily rising favorable balance of 
trade, the Taiwan authorities have changed import controls to 
"freedom in principle, restrictions being the exception" in the 
course of amending trade laws in recent years. In principle, no 
import license is required for any goods. Gone are the strict 
controls of the period when trade was first being developed. 
This was necessitated by Taiwan's import expansion and export 
expansion strategy. However, restrictions have not been relaxed 
on rare farm products, rare animals, and toxic substances. Under 
these circumstances, Taiwan will employ a negative schedule 
method by which prohibited imports, imports requiring 
application for certification (including imports covered by 
place of origin restrictions and restricted imports), and 
imports requiring customs clearance documents are specifically 
listed. Commodities not listed on the schedule may be imported 
freely, no formalities required other than presenting the goods 
to the Customs. If these regulations can be put into effect 
smoothly, they will be bound to help firms expand imports. They 
will also help change American attitudes about Taiwan being a 
high trade barrier "country." 
  2. Export Control System 
  In order to encourage exports and help get goods into 
international markets, Taiwan had no strict limitations on 
exports during the 1950s and 1960s. The law provided that so 
long as one applied to the "International Trade Bureau" as an 
exporter, a firm had authority to export. Taiwan's import-export 
legal requirement to register as an exporting firm was a capital 
of NT$500,000, annual exports of $200,000 or more following 
registration, and possession of a card showing the filing with 
agencies concerned of an imprint of the firm's official seal. 
Firms whose annual exports fell short of $50,000 were to lose 
their foreign trader status. However, since this provision was 
not strictly enforced, for a time Taiwan import-export firms 
were both too numerous and too freewheeling. Firms too small in 
size, and products that did not measure up, the international 
competitiveness of Taiwan's exports was impaired and Taiwan's 
foreign trade was chaotic. In recent years, Taiwan has been 
generally subjected to the import restrictions of developed 
western countries. In order to diversify markets and improve the 
reputation of Taiwan's exports, the Taiwan authorities have 
realized the urgent need to decrease the number and increase the 
size of trading firms. They have gradually adopted stricter 
export controls. 
  In accordance with provisions of Article of "Import-Export 
Classification, Examination and Control Methods, "exports are 
divided into three categories as follows: 
  Prohibited exports: All commodities not approved 
for export by Taiwan authorities in charge such as the 
"International Trade Bureau" may not be exported. 
  Controlled exports: This applies mostly to 
commodities for which Taiwan is not fully self-sufficient. The 
Taiwan authorities fear soaring prices that might trigger social 
disorder thereby impairing implementation of the set economic 
policy of "development with stability"; thus, they strictly 
control exports of commodities for which Taiwan is not fully 
self-sufficient. One specific category of commodities concerned 
is agricultural products, livestock products, fishing industry 
products, minerals, and industrial products. Another is 
strategic materials. Should the export of strategic materials be 
necessary, application must be made to the "International Trade 
Bureau," export permitted only after obtaining an export license. 
  Permitted exports: Except for commodities on 
which the United States, Canada, and the EC countries set 
quotas, and commodities for which the "International Trade 
Bureau" specially requires an export license, all products that 
Taiwan produces in abundance, and products geared for the export 
market may be freely exported upon completion of certification 
procedures with designated banks. 
  Firms that may apply for export rights in accordance with 
provisions of Taiwan law are principally the following: 
government-owned trading organs, public and private production 
enterprises that export, specially designated traders, 
industrial plants in export processing zones, and other 
designated organizations. 
  Applicable data show that Taiwan has no commodities whose 
export is prohibited. It has 499 commodities whose export is 
controlled, and it has eight commodities whose export has been 
suspended. The two categories cover 507, or 1.9 percent, of all 
commodities. Clearly, the number of commodities whose export is 
controlled or has been suspended is not great. Of the 
commodities permitted export, 234, or 0.87 percent, require 
"International Trade Bureau" certification. Commodities 
requiring bank certification number 23,292, or 87.07 percent. 
Commodities exempted from certification number 27.8 kinds, or 
10.16 of the total. Clearly an overwhelming majority of Taiwan's 
permitted exports must be certified by a certifying bank. 
  In short, Taiwan's commodity import-export control system is 
primarily a licensing system. The law divides imports and 
exports into permitted, controlled, and prohibited categories. 
Permitted imports and exports are further divided into those to 
which applicant or place of purchase restrictions apply, those 
requiring inspection documents, and those to which other 
provisions apply. Except for exempted commodities, firms 
applying to import or export must have required documents in 
hand to be presented with an import or export license 
application to the "international Trade Bureau" or a certifying 
bank for certification . Only after obtaining an import or 
export permit may they complete import or export procedures. 
<H6>  II. </H6>
  For the past more than 40 years, the Taiwan authorities have 
used the trade control laws as an important tool for spurring 
trade and economic development; however, quite a few problems 
exist, and some regulations even conflict with economic and 
trade strategy. 
  1. Problems in the Classification of Taiwan Commodities 
  At the present time, classification of Taiwan's import and 
export commodities is based on Taiwan commodity standards. The 
uniform commodity classification standards (STTC or HS) used 
internationally are not applied. Thus, statistics on Taiwan's 
imports and exports cannot be compared directly with applicable 
foreign import-export statistics. Furthermore, since Taiwan's 
commodity classifications are not sufficiently clear or 
complete, it is impossible to determine immediately the 
classification of many products -- particularly new products. 
They must be semt to the commodity classification committee for 
a determination, and this takes a fairly long time. Since 
application must be made and certification obtained for imports 
and exports, the category to which the import or export for 
which application is being made must be determined in advance in 
order to obtain approval. Should a commodity's classification 
not be easily determined, a fairly large amount of time must be 
spent on determining it, the importer or exporter possibly 
losing a fine opportunity in consequence. Additionally, the 
division of imports and exports into prohibited, controlled, and 
permitted categories, and the further limitations on applicants 
and place of purchase of imports or exports and the necessity 
for inspection documents makes import-export business procedures 
onerous. They increase the troubles of importers and exporters, 
and they are a greater bother for the "International Trade 
Bureau" or certifying banks, thereby impairing normal 
import-export trade activity. 
  2. Problems With the Certification System 
  Under existing Taiwan trade control laws, except for 
"International Trade Bureau" exempted commodities, application 
and certification is necessary to engage in the import-export 
business, and only after obtaining an import or export license 
can one export or import. This certification system violates 
modern free trade principles and increases business concerns' 
export procedures and expense. 
  3. Problems With Period of Validity of Import and Export 
Licenses 
  All Taiwan import and export licenses are valid for a 
certain 
period. When they expire, the concern must apply for an 
extension or renewal. For example, the period of validity for an 
export license is only 30 days, no extensions permitted. The 
period of validity for an import license is 4 months, and a 
multiple shipment license is valid for 1 year. Formerly, when 
Taiwan was short of foreign exchange, the period of validity 
provision made for rapid circulation and allocation of foreign 
exchange. It was genuinely necessary. Today, however, Taiwan's 
exchange reserves are fairly ample, and the allocation of 
foreign exchange is no longer a problem. In today's complex 
international trade climate, such a regulation appears 
inconsistent with reality. 
  4. Problems With Alteration of Import and Export Licenses 
  Applicable Taiwan trade regulations provide that import and 
export license applications must be stamped once, and may not be 
altered. This was originally intended to prevent abuses. 
However, in actual operation, this means an increase in 
processing fees that importers and exporters pay. 
  5. Problems With the Limitation of Place of Purchase 
  In order to even the bilateral balance of trade, diversify 
trading areas, and protect the island's industry, as well as for 
other reasons, the Taiwan authorities have set place of purchase 
restrictions on numerous commodities. Economically speaking, 
this is a violation of market rules of equal competition. It 
distorts the laws of resources allocation, and increases the 
operating costs of producers on the island. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59288 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG, MACAO </F>
<H3> <TI>   Differing Views on Importance of Manufacturing </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0121A Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] in 
Chinese No 35, 6 Sep 93 pp 10-11 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0121A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHING CHI TAO PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wu Feng-Hsia (0702 7685 7209): "Mr. Ch'en </F>
Shao-kan Discusses the Need for a Correct Understanding of the 
Position of Hong Kong's Manufacturing Industry"] 
  [Text] Since the manufacturers in Hong Kong's manufacturing 
industry have moved their production lines to inland China, many 
Hongkongers hold that industry will have increasingly less 
impact on Hong Kong's economy, and that Hong Kong is gradually 
becoming a society dominated by a service economy. But this view 
is certainly not endorsed by all. Mr. Ch'en Shao-kan [7115 
1421 1949], Secretary General of the Hong Kong Productivity 
Council, holds that since Hong Kong's industry has moved north, 
industry has not only not become less important to Hong Kong, 
but is growing increasingly important instead. So we have 
these two absolutely differing views involving different 
understandings of the manufacturing industry and different views 
on its position. Mr. Ch'en Shao-kan favors a new and correct 
understanding of the manufacturing industry, with a continued 
upgrading of the production capacity of Hong Kong's 
manufacturing industry, so that Hong Kong can develop along with 
southern China into a world-class manufacturing center. 
  Hong Kong's economic structure has undergone a great change 
in the last two or three decades. In the 1950s and 1960s, Hong 
Kong changed from an entrepot-trade port to an export-oriented, 
light-industrial manufacturing center. Then in the 1970s, it 
turned to diversified development, with a rising financial 
industry, so that Hong Kong became one of the world's key 
financial and service centers. 
  Particularly in the last 15 years, along with China's reform 
and opening, Hong Kong's economic structure has once more seen 
new changes. In order to lower production costs, a stream of 
Hong Kong industrialists have moved their plants to inland 
China, to exploit China's cheap manpower and land resources in 
the service of Hong Kong's manufacturing industry. Hong Kong 
manufacturers now have more than 6,000 independently run or 
joint-venture plants in Guangdong which, in addition to many 
other types of projects, employ about 3 million workers, or five 
times the number in Hong Kong's manufacturing industry. 
Meanwhile, Hong Kong's entrepot trade is flourishing again. 
Hong Kong is now the world's tenth largest trade zone, with 
its industrial and commercial development stimulating further 
growth of its financial and service industries. 
  This is precisely why many experts and academics, and even 
the Hong Kong government, all hold that Hong Kong's economy has 
now been converted to mostly service industries, or that Hong 
Kong has become a service-type economy. 
  As to this view, Mr. Ch'en Shao-kan, Secretary General of 
the 
Hong Kong Productivity Council, and Dr. Huo Ting-yang [7202 1353 
3152], an official in the design and automation sector, have 
various differences. 
<H5>  Is the Manufacturing Industry in Hong Kong Not Important? </H5>
  At a meeting with inland experts, they said: In Hong Kong, 
many hold that since Hong Kong's production process has been 
moved north, Hong Kong has gradually become a service-type 
society, with the manufacturing industry of increasingly less 
importance to Hong Kong's economy, which argument is of great 
concern. If Hong Kong turns into a service society, Hong 
Kong's economy may become "hollowed out," which would not be in 
line with Hong Kong's interests. In fact, as to Hong Kong's 
current situation since its factories have been moved inland, 
the manufacturing industry remains increasingly important to 
Hong Kong's economy for the following reason. While Hong Kong 
products used to be basically assembled in Hong Kong (the 
process has now been moved to southern China), Hong Kong 
manufacturers have certainly not abandoned industrial 
production, but are simply putting more emphasis on aspects, 
such as product design, manufacturing design, industrial-pattern 
manufacturing, parts deals, and packing. It could be said that 
if Hong Kong did not have an industrial-production manufacturing 
capability, the current factory growth in the Zhu Jiang [Pearl 
River] Delta zone would not necessarily be in its current state. 
Even more importantly, Hong Kong plays a role as an 
industrial-support port, doing all that it does for industrial 
production, a role that is still not reflected in any 
statistical data. 
<H3>  How Do We Distinguish the Manufacturing From the Service 
Industry? </H3>
  This point also illustrates the confusion and narrowness in 
Hong Kong's definition of the manufacturing industry. For 
instance, in the current manufacturing industry, employees are 
differentiated by all in-factory sanitation workers and 
accounting personnel being listed as manufacturing-industry 
employees, while product designers in offices are often listed 
as service personnel. Such a statistical method is very 
primitive and backward, unable to reflect the current state of 
economic development. The manufacturing industry certainly does 
not refer to assembly and processing alone, as the assembly 
costs for higher-precision products generally make up less than 
10 percent of overall cost, with manufacturing being a process 
of turning raw materials into components, and then components 
into manufactured products. The work of a comprehensive 
manufacturing enterprise includes all processes, such as R&amp;D, 
design, tool assembly, material selection, component purchasing, 
quality control, assembly, packing, and retail sales. As 
manufacturing operations become increasingly precise and 
diverse, such "service" components of the production process 
increase correspondingly. 
<H3>  Is It Not More Suitable To Say That Hong Kong Is a 
Comprehensive Manufacturing Center? </H3>
  It should be said that Hong Kong is now developing from a 
simple assembly center into a more complete 
comprehensive-manufacturing center. From this perspective, it 
can be said that China and Hong Kong are beginning to evolve a 
division of labor in which the Zhu Jiang Delta zone handles most 
assembly operations, while Hong Kong is responsible for 
preparatory work and later storage, such as marketing, 
dissemination, purchasing, product development, design, and 
quality engineering, as well as services, such as final product 
quality and retail sales. This preparatory work and after 
service sharply raises the added value of products produced 
through assembly in China. 
  Taking stock of the economic development of various 
countries, particularly the United States and Japan, they had 
already moved their labor-intensive industries as long as two to 
three decades ago to low-cost zones, such as Hong Kong and 
Southeast Asia, emphasing the upgrading of their own technology 
and continuing control of their outside planned development. So 
Japan remains a very successful industrial nation. 
  There is not much difference in the route taken now by Hong 
Kong in moving some labor-intensive industries to the mainland 
and that taken by the United States and Japan two to three 
decades ago, the only one being that the United States and Japan 
still emphasize that they are industrial nations, while Hong 
Kong says that it will and has developed into a service center. 
But the reality is that Hong Kong's industry has not been 
"hollowed out" or made responsible for goods flow alone due to 
the move north, with Hong Kong still in control of design and 
production technology, and responsible for technology flow. And 
it is only by controlling these key links that that it can 
promote industrial development in the Zhu Jiang Delta zone. 
<H5>  Should the Emphasis Be On Conversion or Added Value? </H5>
  From another perspective, the crucial issue is not whether 
the economy should be converted, but rather whether added value 
can be increased. If the industrial conversion to service trades 
increases added value, this will be a good thing, but if added 
value drops instead, this will certainly be bad. The U.S. is 
certainly now experiencing the problem of its industry being 
"hollowed out," with its secondary industries being converted to 
tertiary ones with lower added value. U.S. wages show that an 
ordinary service worker makes about $40 a day, while the daily 
wage for manufacturing industry workers is $66, with it being 
very hard for workers eliminated from manufacturing jobs to find 
comparable new ones, as manufacturing wages are higher. This 
shows that added value is lower in U.S. tertiary industries. 
  Another example is post-production semiconductor assembly, a 
labor-intensive industry for the United States, which, as far 
back as the 1960s, was transferred to places such as Hong Kong 
and Southeast Asia. So Americans today absolutely do not know 
how to package semiconductors, no longer having such technology. 
Japan is different, in that while it similarly moved 
labor-intensive industries abroad in the 1960s and 1970s, it 
kept high added-value production, such as packaging, at home. 
In other words, while Japan, like the United States, moved its 
low added-value industries abroad, it never "hollowed out" its 
own industry, always keeping its highest technology on Japanese 
soil. Although the United States designed the notebook 
computer, it does not have high-precision electronic-assembly 
technology, so cannot produce it. But as Japan has this 
technology, it can design and produce it. Even Taiwan and Hong 
Kong can design and produce the notebook computer, as Hong Kong 
has learned these technologies over a period of time. 
  The crux of the matter is that the distinction between the 
manufacturing and service industries is certainly growing 
increasingly blurred, with the need for care being the 
added-value issue. While certain service added value in 
support of manufacturing is quite high, the added value of the 
service industry alone is lower. When service industries are now 
mentioned, many think first of finance, commerce, service 
trades, catering, and tourism.... Taking the financial industry 
as an example, while its added value is not low, it provides 
very few jobs, meaning that not many can serve in finance. As 
Hong Kong's overall economy needs to grow, it will always need 
manufacturing growth. 
<H3>  Does Dealing Well With Accumulated Manufacturing Experience 
Concern Only Hong Kong? </H3>
  It finally needs to be pointed out that Hong Kong should 
continue to raise the production capacity of its own 
manufacturing industry. In this area, Hong Kong is ahead of 
China, having accumulated rich experience. So if Hong Kong 
strives to become a service society, no longer engaging in 
industrial-production manufacturing, this would mean abandoning 
all of its accumulated experience, which would have to be called 
a waste of resources, as well as a regrettable matter. 
  It is obvious that the rapid growth of southern China's 
economy is due to Hong Kong's having moved its long-accumulated 
experience there to benefit southern China too. So continued 
investment in Hong Kong industry will continue to move Hong 
Kong's production ahead, actually also continuing to promote 
China's development. 
  As Hong Kong's human and land resources are now inadequate, 
with S&amp;T forces also not rich, which might become limiting 
factors shortly, if Hong Kong and the southern China region can 
link up closely to form an integrated economic region, most of 
Hong Kong's resource limitations can be resolved through 
reciprocal supplementation, mutual benefit, and joint 
development. Hong Kong is now in an advantageous position, so 
should do all it can to provide the management and S&amp;T 
needed to 
develop this economic region into a world-class manufacturing 
center, in order to bring its economic potential and impact into 
full play. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59289 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Xu Jiatun's Memoirs on Drafting Basic Law </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0051A Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 16, 17, 18, 19 
Jun 93 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0051A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Installments No 43, 44, 45, and 46 of the serialized </F>
memoirs of Xu Jiatun (6079 1367 1470): "Xu Jiatun's Hong Kong 
Memoirs"] 
<H5>  [16 Jun p 2] </H5>
<H3>  British Cooperation Still Needed After 1997; Britain 
Participates in Entire Process of Basic Law Drafting </H3>
  [Text] During discussions of issues relevant to other 
agencies, authorities from those other agencies under the State 
Council joined the meetings. For example, authorities from the 
Ministry of Finance participated in the discussions on finance 
matters. Relevant officials from the General Staff Headquarters 
of the Central Military Commission participated in discussions 
on the stationing of troops. Authorities from the General 
Administration of Civil Aviation joined in discussions of 
navigation rights. After discussion, amendment, and arrival at 
consensus, the Hong Kong Macao Office put the conclusions in 
writing to be implemented after approval by the Central 
Committee. 
  During the process of drafting the Basic Law, many views 
were 
raised by the secretariat of the drafting committee. In this 
respect, the Hong Kong Macao Office and the secretariat of the 
drafting committee overlapped and were difficult to distinguish. 
  The drafting committee included many experts in China such 
as 
famous legal scholars Zhang Youyu and Yuan Shaoheng and 
international law experts Shao Tianren and Wang Jilan. Hu Sheng, 
one of the drafters of China's constitution, was also a vice 
chairman of the drafting committee. He and Y.K. Pao jointly led 
a subcommittee which summarized and organized the proposals and 
views discussed by each of the special topic subcommittees. 
These experts are all very influential in China. They weighed 
every word with extreme prudence and attention to detail in the 
discussions on the Basic Law. The Hong Kong Branch of the XINHUA 
NEWS AGENCY participated in the entire process of investigation 
and research, consultations, suggestions and discussions on the 
drafting of the Basic Law. We did this in two ways. First, the 
Hong Kong Macao Office handed down a "topic" and asked the 
XINHUA NEWS AGENCY Branch to provide background information, 
views and suggestions. Second, the NEWS AGENCY Branch 
voluntarily offered background information and suggestions. This 
was the usual approach. 
  Using investigation and research units as a basis, the 
XINHUA 
NEWS AGENCY Branch selected relevant people to form a political 
system research subcommittee. With Qiao Zonghuai and Mao Junnian 
in charge, the subcommittee was tasked with studying political 
systems by gathering materials on the development of democracy 
and political systems in various countries in the world. They 
then studied various types of cases and discussions in Hong 
Kong. After approval by the working committee, written reports 
on their views and suggestions were submitted to the Hong Kong 
Macao Office and to the drafting committee. 
  Actually, the British government participated in the 
drafting 
of the Basic Law from the start to the finish. They primarily 
used diplomatic channels, through both countries' embassies and 
through the PRC-UK Liaison Team. Many issues were touched on in 
Beijing, but some issues were communicated through the XINHUA 
NEWS AGENCY Hong Kong Branch. Although the drafting of the Basic 
Law was a Chinese affair, it relates to the implementation of 
the PRC-UK Joint Communique. Also, in light of the fact that 
during the next 12 years of transition, Hong Kong will still be 
administered by Britain; after 1997 some issues relevant to the 
content of the Basic Law will require the cooperation of 
Britain. The Liaison Team will be retained until the year 2000. 
During this time, some issues may require British cooperation. 
  In summary, the special position and situation of Britain in 
Hong Kong before and after 1997 led the Chinese government to 
hold respect for Britain's views and to adopt a welcoming 
attitude towards Britain's participation. We understand that 
they not only used public figures employed in the Hong Kong 
government but also other persons with no official titles to 
find out what was happening in the meetings. It can be said that 
Britain participated in the drafting of the Basic Law from the 
start to the finish. The degree of Britain's participation 
extended to offering objections to every chapter, section, and 
paragraph, even to individual words. This level of specificity 
and detail is seldom seen. [Installment No. 43] 
<H5>  [17 Jun p 2] </H5>
<H3>  Tan Yaozong's Proposal To Protect Labor Interests Rejected; 
Nomination of Li Zhuming and Liao Yaozhu to Drafting Committee 
Provokes Controversy </H3>
  [Text] Hong Kong residents participated only indirectly in 
the Sino-British talks because these were negotiations between 
two nations. The Chinese government did not allow the British 
government to use Hong Kong's opinion as a bargaining chip. In 
Beijing and Hong Kong, the Chinese government had contact with 
social organizations and public figures from various spheres in 
Hong Kong. The government listened to the views and suggestions 
of the Hong Kong people and paid attention to the views and 
information on Hong Kong reflected in the Hong Kong media and 
took these into consideration in making policy. 
  The formulation of the Basic Law was different. It required 
the direct participation of the people of Hong Kong. As Beijing 
was considering whether to include Hong Kong people as direct 
participants in the drafting committee, there were two views. 
One side felt it was not necessary. The other view was that the 
committee should include Hong Kong people. The views of the Hong 
Kong Macao Office belong to the latter category. I discussed 
this issue with Ji Pengfei in Beijing. We both felt that the 
people of Hong Kong should participate. 
  My view at the time was that the Basic Law would determine 
the future of the people of Hong Kong and that representatives 
from Hong Kong should participate in drafting and formulating 
the law. Only in this way would the majority of the people of 
Hong Kong then accept the law as their own Basic Law. In 
addition, the participation of Hong Kong people would allow for 
greater understanding of the feelings of all classes of people 
in Hong Kong during the formulation process and would also allow 
for a more realistic effort to win the desire of Hong Kong 
people to rejoin China. 
  Ji Pengfei agreed with my view and asked me to consider a 
list of names after my return to Hong Kong (this method is the 
mainland "custom," at the moment in Hong Kong we still have not 
been able to change this). After he reported this suggestion to 
the Central Committee and obtained approval, we would proceed 
formally. I returned to Hong Kong and immediately received 
notification from the Hong Kong Macao Office that the Central 
Committee had given approval for 18 people from Hong Kong to 
participate in the Basic Law Drafting Committee. We had two 
major "headaches" in preparing the list of names. The first was 
representativeness; the second was the number of people. The 
first issue should have been the main principle for 
consideration, but then 18 people would not have been enough. To 
increase the number of people, we had to obtain permission from 
Beijing. Thus, we started working on a preliminary list of names 
and at the same time requested Beijing to increase the number. 
Ji Pengfei agreed to add two people, to increase the total to 20. 
  Participation in the drafting of the Basic Law was a matter 
for all Hong Kong people. In theory, there should be 
participants representative of all classes of people, but the 
number of people was too limited. The working committee agreed 
with my thought that the emphasis should be on representatives 
from the upper and middle levels, with fewer people from the 
lower classes. There would be quite a few Communist Party 
members among the mainland representatives to the committee, and 
these representatives would compensate for the omission. Later 
events demonstrated that this approach was not thorough enough. 
When the 8th plenary meeting of the drafting committee was held 
in Guangzhou, the section proposed by Tan Yaozong on the 
protection of labor interests was rejected. I objected to Ji 
Pengfei and Li Hou about this and tried to rescue the situation. 
  To reassure the British capitalists, some people with close 
connections to the Hong Kong British Government also 
participated in the drafting process. 
  To allow Taiwan to be informed on the drafting situation and 
be involved in the reuniting of Hong Kong with China, we also 
tried to get public figures with close connections to Taiwan to 
participate. Finally, however, due to the limitations of the 
Taiwan political situation at the time, the representative 
persons could not accept our invitation, and those who could 
accept our invitation lacked that representativeness and were 
dropped from consideration. 
  There was controversy within the working committee over two 
names on the preliminary list. One was lawyer Li Zhuming. At the 
time, some felt that Li Zhuming leaned towards Britain, 
advocated radical democratization, and frequently said "no" to 
proposals from China. I felt that we needed to be tolerant and 
win over the friendship of this type of person. In the end, I 
convinced my colleagues who opposed him. The other was Liao 
Yaozhu, a member of the Hong Kong Legislative Council and a 
representative to the National People's Congress. Colleagues at 
the XINHUA NEWS AGENCY branch office all viewed her as a person 
who was patriotic but tended to express contrary views and put 
other people on the spot. The new and old vice directors of the 
news agency as well as many people from cooperating agencies all 
objected to nominating her. I had visited her father, Liao Ende. 
He gave his frank opinion of his daughter, "She is a knife that 
cuts both ways, if she has something to say, she can't hold it 
in, but she is truly patriotic." I used old Liao's words to 
convince my colleagues. "What's wrong with cutting both ways! 
Even for unfriendly criticism, we say `if it is true, correct 
it; even if it is not, then increase vigilance.' We should 
follow this even more for criticism from a patriot." 
[Installment No. 44] 
<H5>  [18 Jun p 2] </H5>
<H3>  Misunderstood Zheng Weirong But Nominate Him to Drafting 
Committee; Britain Pleased Tan Huizhu, Li Fushan To Join 
Committee </H3>
  [Text] After working the list back and forth, we still had 
23 names, three over the quota. The list was submitted to Ji 
Pengfei with the explanation that it could not be shortened 
further, and it was approved. 
  The Hong Kong Macao Office submitted the draft list of 
mainland committee members to the working committee to seek an 
opinion. This list included authorities from relevant Chinese 
agencies (including Mao Junnian and myself), authorities from 
various democratic parties, well-known figures from various 
circles, and senior figures from legal circles. We had no 
objection, except that among the individuals from the relevant 
agencies were several retired former XINHUA NEWS AGENCY branch 
directors. I suggested to Ji Pengfei that these be replaced by 
younger persons with greather familiarity with Hong Kong and 
more "liberated" thinking. Ji indicated that it "might be 
considered." 
  Ji Pengfei convened a meeting of the Hong Kong Macao Working 
Committee to discuss the drafting of the Basic Law. During the 
discussion on the namelist for the drafting committee, I 
repeated my suggestion on the mainland members from relevant 
agencies. Ji Pengfei immediately agreed and asked everyone: "Who 
would be suitable?" For the moment, no one responded. I 
suggested, "What about Zheng Weirong?" No one at the meeting 
objected. Ji Pengfei said: "Then it will be Zheng Weirong." I 
did not know much about Zheng Weirong. At the time, I thought 
that he met the criteria I was considering. Only later did I 
learn that I had not completely understood him. Only after the 
final namelist was approved by the Central Committee did the 
XINHUA NEWS AGENCY Hong Kong branch make contact with the 
nominees to seek their views and determine whether they were 
willing to be nominated. Generally speaking, most were pleased 
to accept. We took pains to seek the views of the Hong Kong 
British Government on the nominations of public figures with 
Hong Kong government positions such as Tan Huizhu, who was 
called the four-fold representative by Hong Kong people (because 
she simultaneously served as a member of the Executive Council, 
Legislative Council, the Hong Kong City Council, and a District 
Council); and Appellate Court Investigation Division (Senior 
Judge) Li Fushan [Simon Li Fook-Sean]. The government responded 
"pleased to see them serve." 
  Hong Kong society expressed satisfaction with this, 
indicating that it was a very significant issue for the people 
of Hong Kong to participate directly in the drafting and 
formulation of the Basic Law and to directly reflect the views 
of Hong Kong people and strive for Hong Kong people's rights. 
They also felt that this namelist "embraced the best from every 
sphere, and considered the interests of all sides." 
  However, there were also many discussions such as on the 
view 
that there was an overemphasis on the upper class and on 
commercial circles, with inadequate representation from the 
local districts and the middle and lower classes. 
  On July 1, 1985, a grand ceremony in Beijing inaugurated the 
first plenary session of the Basic Law Drafting Committee. 
Twenty-three Hong Kong committee members and 36 mainland 
committee members began to discuss the Basic Law to be 
implemented in Hong Kong 12 years later. Coincidentally, on this 
day 12 years hence, that is, on July 1, 1997, China will resume 
the exercise of sovereign rights in Hong Kong. 
  The Central Committee of the Chinese Communist Party and the 
Standing Committee of the National People's Congress viewed the 
participation of Hong Kong people in the drafting of the Basic 
Law as very important. Before the first plenum of the drafting 
committee, National People's Congress Standing Committee 
Chairman Peng Zhen personally sent invitations to all of the 
committee members and held a grand ceremony. This was an 
approach never before used by the National People's Congress. In 
the past when new committees were established by the National 
Peoples' Congress, there had never been a ceremony with written 
invitations issued by the chairman of the Standing Committee. 
[Installment No. 45] 
<H5>  [19 Jun p 2] </H5>
<H3>  Youde Waives Registration for Advisory Committee; Zhong 
Shiyuan, Deng Lianru Decline To Participate </H3>
  [Text] Before the first plenary session of the Basic Law 
Drafting Committee, there was already consideration of how to 
achieve more extensive participation by the people of Hong Kong 
because the 23 drafting committee members were, after all, a 
small group. 
  I exchanged views with Ji Pengfei, noting that the Hong Kong 
Government had over 300 advisory bodies to carry out "essential 
democracy." We could also form an advisory committee in Hong 
Kong on the Basic Law, as a non-governmental organization, to 
allow the people of Hong Kong to participate in the drafting of 
the Basic Law on a broader basis. Ji Pengfei may have already 
reported this suggestion to the Central Committee and obtained 
approval, because at the first meeting of the drafting 
committee, he raised this tentative plan with the Hong Kong 
representatives and asked for their reaction. They unanimously 
approved and suggested that the drafting committee vice chairmen 
in Hong Kong be in charge of setting up the advisory committee. 
  The five vice chairmen in Hong Kong included An Zijie, Bao 
Yugang [Y.K. Pao], Fei Yiming, Li Guobao (Executive Director and 
General Manager of the Bank of East Asia), and Xu Jiatun. I was 
the only one not from Hong Kong. The reason given internally for 
my inclusion was that I was an authority from the working 
committee and I should be responsible for matters of principle, 
but the other four vice chairmen were told that I was included 
because they might need to draw on me to make arrangements for 
some specific tasks. 
  Ji Pengfei convened a meeting of the chairmen and vice 
chairmen of the drafting committee to discuss this proposal. The 
vice-chairmen from Hong Kong all actively approved, Y.K Pao 
being the first to express approval. An Zijie mentioned that 
according to Hong Kong law an organization established in Hong 
Kong must register wth the Hong Kong Government. It might be 
awkward, however, for an advisory committtee on the Basic Law to 
register. He felt that we should ask the Hong Kong British 
Government to waive the registration requirement. He suggested 
that we discuss this with Tan Huizhu and ask her to communicate 
with the Hong Kong British Government. Everyone agreed we could 
try this. After the meeting, An Zijie and Tan Huizhu, Huang 
Lisong, and Situ Hua [Szeto Wah] (Chairman of the Hong Kong 
Teachers Professional Association) immediately contacted Hong 
Kong Governor Youde who was then in London, by long-distance 
telephone. Youde immediate agreed that the advisory committee 
would not need to follow the procedures to register as an 
organization. An Zijie indicated that we should ask the Hong 
Kong Government for written confirmation of this and also for 
full support. No one would openly indicate their views on this. 
Privately, Ji Pengfei asked me to urge An Zijie not to push the 
Hong Kong Government on this. After registration was waived for 
the advisory committee, the charter of the committee then did 
not require the approval of the Hong Kong Government and there 
was no requirement to report on the activities or membership 
list to the Hong Kong Government. 
  To establish the advisory commmittee, we first had to 
arrange 
for a draft charter and funding. The five vice chairmen from 
Hong Kong consulted on whether to call a meeting of the drafting 
committee members from Hong Kong to talk over this issue. An 
Zijie again raised a question. If we held a meeting in Hong Kong 
would we run up against Hong Kong law and be labeled an illegal 
gathering? The other vice chairmen all felt that since the Hong 
Kong Governor had already indicated that the advisory committee 
would be treated as a special case which did not need to 
register, holding a meeting should not be a problem. Thus we 
decided to invite all the drafting committee members from Hong 
Kong (the 23 Hong Kong representatives plus Mao Junnian and 
myself) to the meeting hall on the 50th floor of the Huarun 
building in Wanchai to discuss issues related to the 
establishment of an advisory committee. 
  The meeting was chaired by Y.K. Pao who suggested that five 
people be selected to draft a charter for the advisory 
committee. Of the 25 committee members present, there were four 
from the legal profession. These were Li Fushan [Simon Li 
Fook-Sean], Li Zhuming, Tan Huizhu, and Liao Yaozhu. They were 
the obvious choices. An Zijie nominated XINHUA NEWS AGENCY 
branch vice secretary and drafting committee vice chairman, Mao 
Junnian, to join the group, because in fact setting up the 
advisory committee would require the News Agency to assist with 
certain tasks. At this time, Szeto Wah nominated himself to join 
the group, but Li Fushan objected and very emotionally 
announced: "If he joins, I will withdraw." The atmosphere in the 
meeting suddenly became very tense. I consulted with Y.K. Pao 
and said that one person more or one person fewer would not make 
a difference in principle. Whether the group is an odd number or 
an even number would not matter because it was only to draft the 
charter. If the small group had different views, three votes 
against three votes, they could hand it over to the whole Hong 
Kong delegation of the drafting commmittee to decide. Pao then 
smoothed things over, and calmed the atmosphere so that finally 
it was agreed that the six people would form a team responsible 
for drafting the charter. The advisory committee needed funding. 
During the fund raising process, Y.K. Pao, Li Jiacheng [Li 
Kashing], Cha Jiming and others voluntarily took on this burden. 
They did not want this to be public. To respect their wishes it 
was not publicized. The XINHUA NEWS AGENCY did not ask for 
specific details. The secretary and vice-secretary of the 
advisory committee reported directly to the chairman and 
vice-chairman. Regarding the number of members of the advisory 
committee, the Hong Kong Macao Office notified the XINHUA NEWS 
AGENCY branch that they proposed 80 people, not to exceed 100. 
Some of the Hong Kong drafting committee members suggested 200. 
I instructed Mao Junnian and Yang Sheng, the director of the 
coordination division who assisted him, to "come up with a 
namelist and then we'll see." I advocated a broader range and a 
larger number of members. The namelist had to include the upper, 
middle and lower; the left, middle and right; Chinese and 
foreign; male and female; old and young; and the so-called 
"right", including those who opposed the Communist Party, and 
those who did not approve of Hong Kong reuniting with China. We 
drew up three lists of 100 people, 180 people and 200 people. 
After repeated comparisons and deliberation, we finally decided 
upon a list of 180 members for the advisory committee. After the 
list was approved by the vice chairmen from Hong Kong, it was 
submitted to the Hong Kong Macao Office for the record. 
  While deliberating on the namelist, we considered trying to 
get Zhong Shiyuan and Deng Lianru to join. We sent people to 
seek their views on this but they tactfully refused without 
giving much of a reason, just that it was inconvenient for them 
to participate. [Installment No. 46] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59290 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar001___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  4 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Problems With Farm Product Procurement </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0213c Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 12 Nov 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0213c </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Xiaohong: "Problems in the Procurement of </F>
Agricultural Products Are Prominent"] 
  [Text] The series of policy measures adopted by the CPC 
Central Committee and the State Council this year to support 
agricultural production and protect the peasants' interests have 
produced preliminary good effects. But there still exist some 
problems unhelpful to the sustained and steady development of 
agriculture in the functioning of the rural economy. The 
prominent manifestations of those problems are: 
  The situation regarding the implementation of preferential 
agricultural policies is not totally satisfactory. In order to 
effectively protect the peasants' interests, the state decided 
to enhance the regulation of prices for agricultural production 
materials, imposing ceilings on the prices of some major 
products. But some places have seen widespread phenomena of 
carrying out unauthorized business operations and conducting 
business operations without proper permits. According to the 
data provided by the supply and marketing cooperative of Hubei 
Province, in Tianmen City of that province there are 1,469 
establishments buying and selling agricultural production 
materials in violation of the state's regulations; 1,043 of 
those are individual business operators, and there are 42 other 
fixed establishments carrying out unauthorized business 
operations. Thus, naturally, price ceilings cannot be 
maintained. The Putuan cooperative in Huarong District, Ezhou 
City, distributed the entire township's 600,000 yuan 
agricultural credit funds through substituting fertilizer for 
loans. Fertilizer, substituting for loans, was issued to 
peasants who demanded loans whether the peasants intended to buy 
farm cattle or farm implements, resulting in a great deal of 
complaints from the peasants. In order to resolve the problem of 
the peasants' fund shortages, the state decided to make advance 
payments for forward procurement early this year. But according 
to an investigation in Hunan Province, most farm households did 
not receive advance payments for forward procurement. For 
instance, according to people in Linfeng County, peasants of 
approximately 60 percent of the 80 farm households subjected to 
a sample survey in that county did not receive advance payments 
for forward procurement, and a small number of farm households 
did not fully receive the advance payments. After the urgent 
circular on reducing the burdens on the peasants was issued in 
March, governments at various levels and the organizations 
concerned adopted a series of active measures. In the first half 
of the year the peasant's burdens were reduced to some extent, 
but some regions still saw increases. For instance, Inner 
Mongolia saw a per capita increase of 5.57 yuan; Liaoning saw an 
increase of 3.57 yuan; and Fujian saw an increase of 2.68 yuan. 
The increase in each of those cases was more than 35 percent; 
and in some cases the increases ware faster than the increases 
in cash income. 
  The problem of fund shortages remains prominent. Because of 
the diverting effects of the excessive scale of fund gathering 
in society and the practice of various organizations all 
engaging in financial operations, there is still a shortage of 
funds for the procurement of agricultural products this year 
despite the tremendous efforts made by the center to resolve 
fund problems. According to the calculations made by the 
organizations concerned, the procurement of this summer's 
agricultural products will require 38.5 billion yuan, and most 
provinces have indicated that they may each experience a 
shortage of around one-third. The third and fourth quarters are 
the busy season for the procurement of agricultural products, 
and may see even more prominent problems of shortages of 
procurement funds. For instance, Jiangxi needs 1.33 billion yuan 
in fund for cotton procurement, but has a shortage of as much as 
910 million yuan; Gansu has a 45 percent shortage of funds for 
cotton procurement. According to Henan Province, since the 
beginning of August, it has been very difficult to gather funds 
for grain and cotton procurement; by 20 September, the grain 
systems of 17 prefectures and cities had only accomplished 5.4 
percent of the fund-gathering task, and only a 2.2 billion jin 
part of the task of the negotiated-price procurement of 4.8 
billion jin of wheat had been completed. This autumn the 
province's planned procurement of grain, oil crops, cotton, 
hemp, and tobacco will require 9.706 billion yuan in funds, but 
by 20 September the grain, supply and marketing, tobacco, and 
agricultural bank systems had altogether gathered 3.218 billion 
yuan, representing only 33.2 percent of the planned amount. 
  Prices for agricultural production materials have risen too 
rapidly. Since early this year, prices for agricultural 
production materials have risen on a monthly basis. Although the 
state adopted the policy of imposing limits on prices for 
agricultural production materials, the first half of the year 
still saw a 12 percent increase over the same period last year. 
In the first three quarters the cumulative increase in the 
prices for agricultural production materials over the same 
period last year was 13.8 percent. On the one hand the 
excessively rapid increase in the prices for agricultural 
production materials has suppressed the peasants' input in 
agricultural production; In January-August, nationwide the total 
cumulative sales of agricultural production materials, if 
adjusted for inflation, decreased by 10 percent in real terms. 
On the other hand, the increase in the prices for agricultural 
production materials has also reduced the peasants' income; this 
year the peasants' cash income is expected to increase by around 
10 percent over last year, and will, if adjusted for inflation, 
represent the maintaining of the same level or a slight 
increase. In this way the peasants' are trapped in a vicious 
"small income-small input" cycle. This situation is certain to 
adversely affect the peasants' enthusiasm for production, and 
constrain the steady development of agriculture. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59291 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   NPC Finance Committee Official Views Economy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0086A Hong Kong CHING-CHI TAO-PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] in 
Chinese No 35, 6 Sep 93 pp 26-27 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0086A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHING-CHI TAO-PAO [ECONOMIC REPORTER] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yang Bo (2799 3134) (vice chairman of the NPC </F>
Financial and Economic Committee): "Comments on China's Current 
Economic Problems"] 
  [Text] Vice Premier Zhu Rongji set forth "a few simple 
rules to be observed by all concerned" respectively at two 
recent national working conferences on finance and on 
revenue-taxation. This step was a very directed one, being a 
sound strategy for rectifying the previously existing chaos in 
the financial and the revenue-taxation orders, as well as a key 
step in intensifying financial and revenue-taxation reform, 
which is going to play a key role in ensuring the sustained, 
rapid, and sound growth of the Chinese economy. 
  Zhu Rongji's statement touched off widespread interest and 
admiration both in China and abroad, with public opinion 
favorable but still posing certain questions. I have recently 
received letters from certain friends, asking for my comments on 
several current problems and growth trends in the Chinese 
economy. So I am taking this opportunity to express my personal 
views, in response to my friends who are concerned about China's 
economic problems, and as instruction for all experts and 
academics. 
<H5>  New Conflicts and Problems Under Current Conditions </H5>
  In 1993, China's economy has continued to grow rapidly on 
the 
heels of 1992's 12.8-percent growth, with the first half of 1993 
seeing GNP up 13.9 percent over the same period in 1992, retail 
commodity sales up 21.6 percent, fixed assets investment up over 
60 percent, foreign trade continuing to expand, a bumper 
summer-grain harvest, and urban and rural incomes also growing 
very quickly, for a generally good state of affairs. While 
these are generally established facts, there is no use denying 
that the advances have also seen the appearance of certain new 
conflicts and problems. Some of these are quite glaring ones, 
such as investment being too large in scale and irrational in 
structure, too much currency put into circulation while capital 
supply remains tight, increasing inflationary pressures and too 
sharp price rises, and revenues being in a rather grim state, 
all of which problems merit much attention. The appearance of 
these problems is directly related to the chaos in the financial 
and the revenue-taxation orders, such as the illegal lending 
among financial institutions, the chaotic fundraising at high 
interest rates by all parties, the construction on a scale 
larger than capability, the new shops and projects going up 
everywhere, the casual misuse and takeover of agricultural funds 
and priority construction-project funds, the willful reduction 
and exemption of taxes and interception of state revenue, and 
the banking and the revenue and taxation sectors exploiting 
their own facilities to operate various types of economic 
entities in search of departmental interests, as well as being 
affected by macroeconomic regulation and control steps not 
having kept up in a timely fashion during the course of 
conversion from the old system to the new. So rectifying our 
financial and our revenue-taxation orders, by enforcing 
financial and revenue-taxation discipline, intensifying 
financial and revenue-taxation reform, and tightening our 
macroeconomic regulation and control measures, has become a top 
priority, being a smart countermeasure for promoting sound 
growth and a good cycle for our national economy. 
<H3>  The "Few Simple Rules To Be Observed by All Concerned" Have 
Begun To Show Results </H3>
  Have these "few simple rules to be observed by all 
concerned" 
been effective? My view is that they have. Let us take a look 
at the results of their application in the last few months. 1) 
Illegal lending has been curbed. Of the funds illegally loaned 
by all financial institutions, some has been and some is being 
recouped, basically by the set 15 August deadline. This was a 
key step in restoring and establishing a normal financial order. 
2) The wave of chaotic public fundraising at high interest 
rates has been stopped, with the additional raising of deposit 
interest rates having brought a clear rebound in urban and rural 
savings deposits, in which individual savings deposits in banks 
increased as much as 10 billion yuan in less than 10 days. The 
previously very slow sales of treasury bills are now 
satisfactory, with their treasury payment rate already topping 
90 percent. This has had a very good impact in reducing 
currency put into circulation, as well as in ensuring the prompt 
payment of the funds needed for industrial and agricultural 
production and infrastructure construction. 3) All areas are now 
inventorying and dismantling the financial institutions that 
were set up without PBC approval, strictly enforcing the 
provision that nonfinancial institutions may not provide 
financial services. The various economic entities set up by 
banks and revenue-taxation departments at all levels are in the 
process of being dislinked, with the injection of new credit 
capital having been stopped. Meanwhile, all revenue credit 
loans are being inventoried, with recoupment as necessary. 4) 
We have stopped the enforcement of the tax reduction and 
exemption provisions drawn up by all areas beyond their 
authority, strengthening tax collection and control. We have 
strictly controlled spending demand, particularly cutting back 
on group purchasing power demand, with all areas and sectors 
acting conscientiously. A general investigation of national 
finance and taxation organized by the State Council is about to 
begin. 
  It is not hard to see from a summary of these results that 
while the "few simple rules to be observed by all concerned" 
have been in effect for only a very short time, they have begun 
to succeed. Of course, while we still need to do much work and 
are faced with a difficult mission, I believe that if we 
continue to act in such a down-to-earth manner, by making 
rigorous demands, strictly enforcing orders and prohibitions, 
intensifying reform, and tightening macroeconomic regulation and 
control, it will not be long before our financial and 
revenue-taxation orders will get back on a normal track, which 
is precisely the prerequisite needed for building a socialist 
market economy system. 
<H5>  We Are Certainly Not in a Financial Crisis </H5>
  Some friends have asked: Is China in a financial crisis? I 
hold that this is not so, as the facts certainly do not support 
it. As rectifying our financial order, enforcing financial 
discipline, examining work flaws, and pushing forward with 
financial reform have been to strengthen and improve our 
financial work, in order to more effectively bring the 
macroeconomic regulation and control role of finance into full 
play in our overall national economy, we are certainly not in 
any financial crisis. While we need to acknowledge that China 
is now facing inflationary problems, this is occurring while our 
economy is growing rapidly and our people's real living 
standards are rising steadily, as well as appearing while our 
national economic might is increasing and our market commodity 
supplies are abundant, which is fundamentally different from the 
conditions arising in some countries with economic recessions 
and declining living standards, such as large amounts of 
currency being issued beyond economic capability, skyrocketing 
prices, and sharp currency devaluation. 1) As our currency issue 
is now under strict central government control, being controlled 
by the demands of overall national economic operations, serious 
inflation will not and cannot occur. 2) While our 
national-average retail price and cost of living indexes both 
reached double digits for the first half of 1993, our real urban 
and rural incomes increased even faster. The data corrected for 
inflation show real incomes up an average of 13.5 percent for 
city dwellers and about 7 percent for rural individuals. The 
RMB still has very high prestige among the vast public, proof of 
which is that urban and rural savings increased 124.4 billion 
yuan in the first half of 1993. 3) China's foreign payment 
capability is reliably ensured, and our international prestige 
is high. The recent temporary foreign-exchange conversion-market 
supply and demand imbalance and sharply rising exchange rates 
were touched off mainly by market speculation, which was 
unusual. Most recently, through our rectification of the 
financial order and tightening of macroeconomic regulation and 
control, our exchange rates quickly fell back, and are gradually 
getting onto a normal track. This shows that China is certainly 
not in a financial crisis. 
<H5>  Foreign Investment Has Not Been Affected </H5>
  Other friends have asked: Might not rectification of the 
financial order, tightening of macroeconomic regulation and 
control, and strict control of fixed assets investment affect 
investment in China by overseas entrepreneurs? I hold that 
while such concern is understandable, the reality will not 
occur. China's policy of opening up to the outside world is 
unshakeable, our large market is very attractive, and our 
preferential policies on the use of foreign investment will not 
change. The facts prove that foreign investment in China 
continued to maintain a high growth momentum in the first half 
of 1993. MOFTEC data for the first half of 1993 show 43,632 
foreign-financed projects approved, with an agreed foreign 
investment of $58.7 billion and an actually utilized foreign 
investment of $9.4 billion, up respectively 234 percent, 300 
percent, and 180 percent from the same period in 1992. Since 
July, this momentum has certainly not slowed, with several large 
import projects having been concluded. For instance, the Jilin 
Industrial Chemicals Factory's import project for 100,000 tons 
of high-carbon alcohol for an accessory installation to its 
300,000-ton ethylene project, and the $30-million investment 
contract between Suzhou City and the United States for a 
joint-venture construction of the first stage of the 
Puqiang-Suzhou Pharmaceuticals Plant, were signed in Beijing in 
late July. Vice Premier Zhu Rongji pointed out very clearly 
that the tighter macroeconomic regulation and control was not 
an overall retrenchment, but rather a structural adjustment. I 
hold that it will not only not affect foreign investment in 
China but, as the macroeconmic climate further improves, will 
even be bound to be favorable to attracting yet more investment. 
We welcome investment by overseas entrepreneurs that is in line 
with China's industrial policy. 
<H3>  A Projection of the State of the Economy in the Second Half 
of 1993 </H3>
  What are our economic growth trends for the last half of 
1993 
and on into 1994? Are we likely to see sharp volatility? My 
view is an optimistic one. Our state of economic growth can 
only improve, and we will not see either stagnation or sharp 
volatility. The Chinese Government has faced up to the 
problems that are appearing in the midst of rapid economic 
growth, having taken a series of key steps to intensify reform, 
in order to solve them safely and steadily. The excessive 
fixed assets investment scale has been strictly controlled, with 
the irrational investment structure being adjusted, ongoing 
projects being inventoried according to the principle of acting 
in line with capability and the demands of industrial policy, 
continuation or shutdown as necessary (for instance, we have 
shut down construction on ones, such as unapproved development 
zones, and certain duplicate construction projects), and a 
shortening of our construction front. Our chaotic financial 
and revenue-taxation orders are being rectified, with some 
initial success. Excessive price rises have been strictly 
controlled, with the previous sharp price rises due to inflation 
for capital goods, such as rolled steel and cement, having 
been curbed, and beginning to recede. Our agricultural 
production has been reinforced, with a bumper summer grain 
harvest, and expectations of a good harvest of fall crops short 
of an exceptional disaster. Our industrial production 
continues to grow at a higher rate in line with production 
dovetailed with demand and improved efficiency. Our market 
commodity supplies are abundant. Our foreign trade will also 
continue to maintain a good momentum. All reforms, 
particularly of our financial, revenue-taxation, and investment 
systems, are advancing with emphasis. In short, I hold that 
while our overall national economic growth rate for the last 
half of 1993 will be somewhat slower than for the first half, 
this will be rational and more balanced. As to the whole of 
1993, our overall growth rate will not fall below 10 percent, to 
surpass the annual plan approved by the first session of the 
eighth national party congress. 
  The Chinese Government leadership is firm and strong. All 
areas and sectors are conscientiously implementing the center's 
macroeconomic regulation and control measures. The initiative 
of the people of all nationalities throughout China to build 
socialism is very high. The call sent forth by President Jiang 
Zemin, according to the spirit of the key speeches of Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping, to seize, treasure, and use well opportunities to 
develop the economy better and faster, is increasingly 
permeating the Chinese mindset. It can be projected that 
China's economic growth in coming years will, in line with the 
adjusted Eighth Five-Year Plan, grow in both a rapid and a 
sustained and balanced manner. I am full of confidence in this. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59292 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shanghai Combines Price Reform With Curbing Inflation </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0171A Beijing JIAGE LILUN YU SHIJIAN [PRICE: THEORY AND 
PRACTICE] in Chinese No 9, 20 Sep 93 pp 18-22 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0171A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIAGE LILUN YU SHIJIAN [PRICE: THEORY AND 
PRACTICE] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Pan Jianxin (3238 1696 2450), deputy director of </F>
Shanghai Prices Bureau: "Shanghai Combines Price Reform With 
Curbing Inflation"] 
  [Excerpt] Reform, the open policy, and economic 
construction have continued to flourish in Shanghai since the 
beginning of the year. In the new era price departments at all 
levels in the municipality have grasped the opportunity to push 
ahead in the direction of developing a socialist market economy. 
They have continued to introduce price reform energetically but 
steadily after considering the ability of all quarters in 
society to cope with it, and worked hard to hold down the 
overall price level in the interest of social and economic 
stability. Their actions have helped Shanghai function even more 
effectively as a mega-city diffusing technology to its 
surrounding areas and a leader in reform and openness and better 
serve economic development in the Chang Jiang valley and the 
entire nation. 
  1. Price Work in Shanghai Since Beginning of Year 
  1) Grasping the opportunity and pushing ahead with price 
reform energetically but steadily. 
  The year 1993 is a critical year in Shanghai's three-year 
transformation in economic development, reform, openness, and 
urban development. It is also the last year of the municipal 
government's three-year drive to "basically sort out prices." 
Shouldering the heavy responsibility of pushing ahead with price 
reform and holding down the overall price level are price 
departments. Under the correct leadership and unified planning 
by the municipal CPC committee and municipal government, 
Shanghai has continued to make new progress on the price reform 
front since the beginning of this year, working hard to 
facilitate the transformation of the price mechanism even as it 
adjusts prices structurally. To begin with, two major price 
reforms were introduced in the first half of the year in 
accordance with the appropriate central regulations, namely 
decontrolling the buying and selling prices of oil and grain and 
adjusting the charges of some public utilities. Because of the 
effort of all quarters, because the municipal CPC committee and 
municipal government made it a priority, and particularly 
because related measures such as tapping market supply and 
offering workers' subsidies were carried through, things have 
largely been normal since the reform measures were introduced. 
Their smooth implementation is a boost to the economy. They will 
also help Shanghai better fulfill its comprehensive urban 
functions and contribute to the improvement of the investment 
climate and the living environment for the public. Second, even 
as it made structural price adjustments, Shanghai has devoted 
itself to replacing the old price formation mechanism and old 
price management system with a new price formation mechanism and 
new price management system. It has further decentralized price 
management power, restricted the scope of price setting by the 
state, and increased the share of prices regulated by the 
market, all revolving around the two core missions of developing 
Pudong and transforming the enterprise operating mechanism. At 
present the city controls 12 kinds (categories) of commodity 
prices and fees, down 90 percent from 1991. In the first half of 
this year, 91 percent of all agricultural by-products procured 
in the entire municipality had market-regulated prices. In the 
same period, market-regulated prices accounted for 74 percent of 
the sales revenues of all enterprises in the city that turned 
out elements of production and practiced independent accounting 
and 96 percent of all social commodity retail sales. The demand 
put forward by the municipal government -- basically sorting out 
the price system in Shanghai and letting the market set the 
prices of the bulk of commodities within three years or so, 
starting in 1991, while maintaining social and economic 
stability -- has tentatively been met. Third, by taking strong 
and timely steps to resolve price conflicts in the first half of 
the year, when there were personnel turnover in the people's 
congress, the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference 
[CPPCC], and the municipal government, when the East Asian Games 
took place, and when the business tax rate was revised, we 
managed to ward off price fluctuations on the market and a sharp 
rise in the overall price level, thereby creating a good social 
and economic climate for the staging of large-scale events. The 
three-way relations among prices, wages, and output were 
essentially in a state of equilibrium in the first half of the 
year. Between January and June revenues from the sale of the 
budgeted output of local industrial enterprises owned by the 
whole people rose 27 percent over the same period last year 
while the workers' average monthly wages increased 24.7 percent, 
up 6.3 percentage points after adjusting for the rise in living 
costs, thereby meeting the basic demand that output increase 
faster than wages and wages increase faster than prices. 
  2) Taking vigorous measures and working hard to hold down 
the 
overall price level. 
  Inflationary pressures intensified in the first half of this 
year because of structural price adjustments and a tightening of 
the macroeconomic climate. Starting from a high level, the price 
index climbed month after month, up 13.8 percent in January over 
the corresponding period a year ago; 15.5 percent in February; 
16.4 percent in March; 17.1 percent in April; 19.8 percent in 
May; and 19.5 percent in June. In all the retail price index 
rose 15.5 percent in January through June over the corresponding 
period last year. During the same period, the workers' cost of 
living index jumped 17.3 percent. According to a preliminary 
analysis of the main reasons behind the rise in commodity 
prices, one important explanation is the quickening pace of 
price reform affecting major nonstaple foodstuff in the city in 
the past two years. Of the overall rise of 15.5 percent in the 
retail price index in the first half of the year, about 4 
percentage points could be attributed to structural price 
adjustments. Another reason is that by raising energy costs, 
transportation charges, and the costs of other basic materials 
and by adjusting tax rates, interest rates, and exchange rates, 
the central government has boosted production and operating 
costs. In June, for instance, the overall price level of raw 
materials, fuels, and power in the entire municipality rose 34.5 
percent compared to the corresponding period last year, thereby 
pushing up the prices of daily industrial goods rather 
significantly. Increases in the prices of apparel, shoes, 
furniture, washing machines, bicycles, and refrigerators raised 
the retail price index by 3.2 percentage points in the first 
half of the year. Furthermore, growing urbanization in recent 
years has pushed back vegetable growing bases from the inner 
suburbs to the outlying suburbs, which means longer 
transportation routes. In addition, the growers have to pay more 
for land, gas, water, electricity, and wages. As it becomes 
increasingly expensive to operate vegetable markets in urban 
areas, the prices of some vegetables and other non-staple food 
also go up. Third, the rise in retail prices was in part driven 
by the brisk demand for some investment goods and consumer 
goods. The expansion of the scale of fixed assets investment has 
caused the shortages of some capital goods (such as building 
materials), driving up retail prices. As the city is further 
opened up to the outside world and with the urban infrastructure 
developing apace, the urban floating population keeps rising, 
which translates into a stronger demand and higher prices for 
some agricultural products and articles of daily use. Fourth, 
the improvement in living standards and changes in consumption 
patterns have led to higher consumption of mid- priced or 
upscale clothing, furniture, domestic electrical appliances, 
gold jewelry, building and furnishing materials, and fresh fruit 
and vegetables, all commodities with relatively high costs. Some 
of these commodities are in short supply, which explains why 
their prices remain at persistently elevated levels. And then 
there is a growing tendency on the part of the public to 
purchase nonstaple food at the country market, which too helps 
nudge up the retail price index. In June, for instance, township 
residents purchased 72.8 percent, 65.7 percent, and 60.2 percent 
of all fresh vegetables, aquatic products, and fruit consumed, 
respectively, at the country market, up 15.3, 5.7, and 21.3 
percentage points, respectively, from late 1992. 
  Taking aim at the excessive rise in the overall price level, 
the municipality has taken the following measures in a major 
push to curb inflation and ensure the successful implementation 
of structural price adjustments and basic livelihood for vast 
numbers of citizens. 
  1) Determined correctly how intensive price reform should be 
by considering the ability of all three parties -- the state, 
enterprises, and households -- to cope with it. As far as the 
content of price reform is concerned, all the municipality did 
this year was to adjust the two sets of prices which were 
particularly distorted, namely the prices of grain and oil and 
the charges of urban public utilities. As for timing, reform 
that was originally slated for implementation in the first 
quarter was rescheduled to be phased in during the second and 
third quarters. Turning to the extent of price adjustments, 
increases in the price of gas for civilian use and the prices of 
public transportation monthly tickets were scaled back. 
  2) Offered workers appropriate subsidies in an earnest 
effort 
to ensure basic livelihood for the general citizenry. After 
conducting repeated studies and soliciting opinions from the 
people's congress, CPPCC, and other interested parties, the 
municipal CPC committee and municipal government worked out 
workers' price subsidy standards. They have also announced the 
minimum income level for urban workers and a minimum guaranteed 
livelihood for urban residents for this year. A worker whose 
income falls below the minimum income level and residents whose 
living expenses are lower than the minimum guaranteed livelihood 
would be given a subsidy to close the gap. A price compensation 
system was introduced under the basic pension fund system to 
benefit retirees. Moreover, a policy was drawn up to aid 
enterprises with an excessive burden. 
  3) A reserve system was created for individual commodities 
to 
ensure their availability on the market. For each of the 15 
commodities which are daily necessities to the public, namely 
grain, cooking oil, salt, sugar, soy sauce, vinegar, pork, eggs, 
toilet paper, soap, laundry 2etergent, matches, T-shirts, vests, 
and mosquito-repellent incense, a reserve system was created so 
that there is an adequate supply in the warehouses to meet any 
sudden market demand. 
  4) The municipality has set up a staple and nonstaple food 
production and market risk fund in order to round out the lineup 
of regulatory and control tools. In June and July for instance, 
thunderstorms, high temperatures, and other climatic conditions 
led to reduced vegetable output and soaring prices. In response 
the municipal government decided to put an additional 2 million 
yuan into the 20-million yuan risk fund to find new supplies and 
hold down market prices. 
  5) Step up price management and curb chain reactions. It has 
worked hard to stabilize the prices of staple and non-staple 
food, including grain, oil, pork, and eggs, with the state 
commercial sector fulfilling its role as the primary channel and 
stabilizer of market prices. Among the commodity prices and fees 
that have been decontrolled, 23 are for daily consumer goods 
inseparable from the daily lives of the people, including soap, 
laundry detergent, toilet paper, and sugar, and fees for 
haircutting and bathing. The government has set up a price 
increase reporting system applicable to those prices and fees. 
For 10 categories of upscale sensitive commodities, such as 
color television sets, video cameras, refrigerators, washing 
machines, and automobiles, the government has set up a price 
increase filing system. As for other deregulated commodities, 
the price department is to work out negotiated prices in 
conjunction with the department in charge of the industry and by 
working through the price association of the industry concerned. 
When there is coordination, prices will not skyrocket. 
  6) The government has cracked down hard on the unjustifiable 
collection of fees and tightened price supervision and 
inspection. A number of service fees has been the subject of 
most public complaints, such as the service charges for using a 
public toilet, bicycle stand, or public telephone. In those 
areas, new fee-setting standards have been developed. The 
restaurant industry and entertainment business were told to 
display their prices clearly. In conjunction with the 
introduction of price reform measures, an intensified general 
price inspection was launched in an earnest effort to prevent 
people from raising prices covertly, jacking up prices, 
collecting fees at will, and charging exorbitant prices. 
  7) The government has promptly formulated a price policy in 
conjunction with the unveiling of the revised business tax rate. 
In a written regulation, the municipal government demanded that 
after the state revised the business tax rate, operating 
enterprises must absorb on their own the extra tax burden. 
Enterprises are not allowed to raise the selling prices of 
profitable commodities arbitrarily. Regarding the handful of 
commodities whose prices do need to be adjusted, the margin of 
increase must not exceed the increase in the business tax rate 
so as to prevent commodity prices from rising across the board. 
  8) To stabilize all-embracing projects in outlying counties, 
they have been given preferential treatment and support when it 
comes to prices. Beginning this year, the key pig farms and 
chicken farms in the outlying outskirts are supplied with water 
and electricity at favorable prices to help lower the costs of 
the livestock industry and stabilize the prices of nonstaple 
food. 
  Because of unified thinking, meticulous organization, and 
solid work, and because the measures were carried through, a 
variety of price reform measures have been introduced 
successfully in Shanghai this year. Supply is normal on the 
market, prices are basically stable, and there is a high level 
of public confidence. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59293 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Stock Market Undergoing `Futures Craze' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0077A Hong Kong PAI-HSING HSIN-WEN CHOU-K'AN [PAIHSING 
NEWSWEEK] in Chinese No 26, 24 Sep 93 pp 56-57 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0077A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong PAI-HSING HSIN-WEN CHOU-K'AN [PAIHSING 
NEWSWEEK] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Li-wei (7115 0500 3634): "Futures Storm </F>
Sweeps the Mainland"] 
  [Text] In present-day mainland the term that people are 
most envious of and that most makes people's hearts pound and 
that is the most fashionable and richest in stimulation is not 
"speculating" on owning something, but what is sweeping the 
Divine Land like a storm after the stock craze, and the real 
estate craze, is that a futures craze has suddenly risen in 
China. 
  The Futures Market Is In Its Ascendancy 
  To adapt to the rapid development of the mainland's market 
economy, [the futures market] is catching up with world trends. 
The government at the end of 1992 began to gradually relax its 
restrictions on approval of futures companies. Beginning with 
Shanghai's metals, coal production, petroleum, and chemical 
industry exchange; Nanjing's petroleum exchange; Shenzhen's 
nonferrous metal exchange; Zhengzhou's wholesale grain market; 
and Hainan's exchange, they opened the first stream of mainland 
futures exchanges and advanced them to international standards. 
And in the past year, an even larger number of futures companies 
have been sprouting up all over. At the end of 1992, the first 
large, national futures company -- the Chinese International 
Futures Corporation -- came into being in Beijing. At the 
beginning of this year, the first state futures broker -- the 
Guangdong General Futures Brokerage -- was established in 
Guangzhou. On 18 April, the mainland's largest-scale 
international futures exchange was opened in Nanjing. The 
largest comprehensive futures exchange in the country -- the 
Dalian Commodity Exchange -- also opened. In addition, the first 
high-level futures markets in west central and south China -- 
the South China Commodity Futures Exchange and the Chongqing 
Capital Goods Exchange --will be starting business soon. The 
first settlement firm in the country -- the Extensive Futures 
Settlement Firm -- formally went into operation recently. The 
Hainan International Futures Exchange with 100 million yuan 
invested has broken ground and begun construction. According to 
incomplete statistics, not counting the numerous underground 
brokerages conducting business without a license, the mainland 
presently has more than 360 licensed futures companies. A great 
many of these are Chinese-Hong Kong joint ventures, that is, 
branch organizations of Hong Kong brokerages in the mainland. 
There are presently more than 40 exchanges at various places 
throughout the country. 
  Underground Companies Stir Up Trouble 
  As regards the content of the business, mainland futures 
companies mainly conduct commodity and foreign exchange futures 
exchanges. The futures market plays an ever more important part 
in the economic life. The transaction price of the first futures 
market in the nation -- the Shanghai Metals Exchange -- has 
become the standard price or the reference price for metals 
exchange throughout the country. After being open less than a 
year, its total transactions have reached more than 60 million 
tons and the value of its transactions has broken 100 billion 
yuan and has elicited at great deal of respect and interest in 
the international futures field. 
  Presently, mainland underground futures brokers are 
extremely 
active. But current laws and regulations are very unsound. They 
lack rudimentary supervision and there are obvious corrupt 
practices in the business. 
  Internal management of underground futures brokers is 
extremely chaotic. They only care about collecting commissions. 
Futures is still an unfamiliar term to the vast majority of the 
people in the country. Even several individual investors who are 
"speculating" on futures do not have a deep understanding of the 
method. And underground futures companies keep their mouths shut 
about the risks. They only play up that "playing" futures can 
earn a lot of money. Some even engage in business trickery such 
as delaying reporting the price and secretly overcharging. 
Because good and bad people are mixed in, there are no rules and 
regulations, and their accounts do not receive the accounting 
oversight of relevant departments, it is very easy to falsely 
report a few figures and mislead investors. Moreover, when there 
is a dispute with a customer, the department concerned does not 
pursue it, because they have no legal basis. 
  Private Investors Suffer 90 Percent Losses 
  A broker pointed out that, with the exception of specialized 
investment organizations, private individuals engaging in 
commodities and foreign exchange futures exchanges have losses 
as high as 90 percent or more. A few customers who are expecting 
excessively high earnings have a hard time accepting [the 
situation] and public indignation is aroused, which can easily 
trigger the outbreak of an incident. Several foreign futures 
specialists early on expressed deep concern about this. 
Excessive speculation not only can dampen the confidence of 
Chinese investors, ultimately it will have an impact on the just 
beginning Chinese futures market. 
  In another respect, the appearance of underground futures 
companies affects the business of regular licensed futures 
companies. A regular Guangzhou broker established at the end of 
last year is presently Guangdong's most standardized company. 
But in the last two months, their total number of customers has 
fluctuated around 50 and their daily transactions at around 200, 
far from the ideal 500. The main reason is that the internal 
management of regular companies is rather strict compared to lax 
management of "underground" companies, creating several 
imperceptible inconveniences for their customers to the point 
that the customers do not dare to lightly "patronize." 
  To Guard Against Losing Control There Must Be 
Legislation 
  Several experts have pointed out that despite the general 
reliability and soundness in the initial development of the 
mainland futures market, in present-day China, the development 
of various types of futures brokers is too fast, too numerous, 
and too indiscriminate, and they are facing the danger of losing 
control. Moreover, the more than forty futures exchanges are 
essentially specialized and the scope of their business is very 
narrow and they are limited in the way that their operations 
follow international practice. Some have even become forward 
contract and wholesale markets. Even the Shanghai Metals 
Exchange and the Shenzhen Metals Exchange, in the view of 
foreign specialists, are forward merchandise exchanges and are 
not strictly futures exchanges. 
  Presently, many mainland futures brokers settle with foreign 
exchange and exchange renminbi for foreign exchange and send it 
out of the country. But if they do not have permission, this 
amounts to foreign exchange flight. Because the departments 
concerned are not in agreement whether futures exchanges are a 
form of financial instrument or a business activity, regulations 
on futures exchanges are not distinct, not clear, and not 
specific. This situation has raised the concern of the state. 
  Somewhat earlier the State Foreign Exchange Control Bureau 
gave approval for the Guangdong Foreign Exchange Subbureau to 
grant permits this year to run three or four futures companies, 
but they must be strictly checked by the department concerned 
and obtain an operating license before they can operate. If they 
go into operation on their own without approval, they will be 
considered in violation of the law and prosecuted. The first 
Guangzhou futures exchange laws and regulations, and the first 
in the nation, were formally promulgated a while ago. On 27 
April, the State Industry and Commerce Administrative Control 
Bureau promulgated the Provisional Control Procedures for 
Futures Brokers and from that day the industry and commerce 
bureaus of various localities no longer handled futures brokers 
registrations, generally they are registered by the State 
Industry and Commerce Bureau. 
  It is understood that the departments concerned are studying 
how to improve mainland futures markets and standardize futures 
brokering activities. The specialists concerned are appealing to 
the government that when they develop the futures market, they 
should become familiar as quickly as possible with futures and 
establish standard rules and regulations for the operation of 
futures markets at an early date and not incite futures fever 
too early. They must now establish a centralized futures 
oversight and control organization and they can consider 
expanding the present National Securities Control Commission to 
a National Futures and Securities Control Commission. At the 
same time, they must formulate unified national futures exchange 
rules and regulations. 
  bold&gt; Caption 
  1. p. 57 (top left): A Futures Management and Administration 
Person Sent From Hong Kong Lectures Guangzhou Brokers 
  13619 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59294 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpcar003___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Says State Revenues Falling Rapidly </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0144A Hong Kong TANGTAI [CONTEMPORARY] in Chinese No 31, 
15 Oct 93 pp 40-42 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0144A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TANGTAI [CONTEMPORARY] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ti Fei (3321 7236): "An Internal Report on the </F>
State of the PRC Shows That Its Treasury Is So Empty That It Is 
Going To Be Hard for Even a Sage To Rescue It"] 
  [Text] In this "perilous autumn" of Zhu Rongji's 
emergence, what is the state of the PRC central government's 
revenues? PRC national affairs experts Hu Angang [5170 7254 
6921] and Wang Shaoguang [3769 4801 0342] disclosed certain 
facts about them a few months ago. A pertinent PRC party has 
also transmitted their substance internally. 
  On 2 July 1993, the PRC's "top ace" in solving knotty 
problems -- Vice Premier Zhu Rongji, took the helm as the 
president of the Peoples' Bank of China [PBOC]. As Zhu has been 
responsible in recent years for curing various complicated 
cases, such as inflation and state enterprise losses, the 
liquidation of triangular debt, and the suppression of peasant 
wrath, there have been both official and unofficial expectations 
that this grand master could cure today's "national disaster" -- 
all economic problems, such as the "empty" treasury coffers 
caused by financial corruption. 
  But while the collapse of a tall building is hard to prop up 
with just one log, the magic wand wielded by Zhu Rongji could 
not go wrong. He was going to rectify the financial order to 
adjust the investment orientation, with the efficacy of this 
magic wand completely dependent on the financial regulation and 
control capability of the central government. 
  So in this "perilous autumn" of Zhu Rongji's emergence, what 
is the state of the PRC central government's financial 
capability? PRC affairs expert Hu Angang and a U.S. PRC 
scholar, Wang Shaoguang, recently disclosed certain facts in a 
"Report on China's National Capability." 
<H5>  How Strong Is the Central Revenue Capability? </H5>
  Hu and Wang pointed out in this report that: "Since the 
general separate revenue' package system was instituted in 1980, 
the state's financial capability has declined rapidly, with 
government revenues extremely decentralized, and the center's 
macroeconomic control capability down." 
  This has shown up in detail as: 
  1. The ratio of revenues to GNP has dropped steadily, 
already 
being less than one-half that of industrialized countries with 
market economies. This revenue ratio had dropped from 31.2 
percent in 1978 to 14.7 percent by 1992, and is projected to be 
down to 11.3 percent by the year 2000. But in 1989, it was 34.6 
percent in the United States, 45.9 percent in Germany, 46.1 
percent in France, and 37.1 percent in Australia. 
  2. Revenue growth elasticity is down, being in a state of 
low 
elasticity. From 1986 to 1991, revenues grew only 0.66 percent 
per 1 percent growth of GNP. In comparison, from 1979 to 1988, 
this revenue-growth elasticity value was 0.95 percent in the 
United States, 1.094 percent in Britain, 2.821 percent in Japan, 
1.143 percent in India, and 0.899 percent in Indonesia which, 
while ranking lowest, was still higher than China's for the 
period. 
  3. Central government revenue capability is down to its 
lowest point in PRC history. In 1989, China's ratio of central 
revenue spending to GNP was only 1.6 points higher than that of 
the former Yugoslavia, or one-fifth to two-fifths that of large 
developing countries with populations of up to hundreds of 
millions, such as India. 
  Revenues and expenditures are quite decentralized. While the 
ratio of central revenues to all revenues during the Seventh 
Five-Year Plan was about 40 percent, with local revenues at 60 
percent, IMF data for the period show the ratio of central to 
all revenues at 88 percent in France, 63 percent in Germany, 59 
percent in the United States, 69 percent in India, and 97 
percent in Indonesia, with the only exception being Yugoslavia, 
where it was 28 percent. If we include extrabudgetary funds in 
revenues, then central revenues make up only one-fifth of all 
revenues, with local revenues accounting for the other 
four-fifths. World Bank experts have come to the conclusion 
that "there is probably no other country in the world where 
revenues and expenditures are more decentralized than in China." 
  Having made this comparison, Hu and Wang point out that: "In 
comparison to industrialized nations with market economies or 
large developing countries with populations of hundreds of 
millions, the Chinese Government's central revenue capability is 
severely inadequate, meaning that unless it takes resolute 
steps, it will be hard for it to fulfill its missions of market 
economy development during its conversion period." As to the 
causes of the Central Government's declined financial 
capability, Hu and Wang hold unanimously that: As opposed to the 
contemporary revenue systems in general use in industrialized 
nations with market economies -- tax separation and uniform 
taxation, Mainland China's current revenue package system has 
the severe defects of being nonstandard, unscientific, and not 
uniform. 
<H5>  Where Is State Revenue Flowing? </H5>
  Due to the revenue shortage, the long-hoped-for sharp 
increase in salaries for employees in institutions and state 
organs will again not occur in the short-term. 
  Mainland China's revenue losses are all through the 
following 
channels: 
  1. Tax Erosion. Under mainland China's current 
separate-revenue package system, the phenomenon of localities 
and enterprises acting out of local interests to arbitrarily 
institute tax reductions and exemptions is unstoppable, with 
enterprise tax evasion and avoidance quite common. A pertinent 
poll and projection shows that tax evasion and avoidance exists 
in about 50-60 percent of China's state and collective 
enterprises, and in over 90 percent of its individual and 
private enterprises, with China's annual tax losses amounting to 
about 50 billion yuan. 
  2. Profit-Payment Losses. This is seen mainly in 
the interception and shift of profits that should be paid to the 
government, through the following common methods: After 
fulfilling contracted profits, some intercept and shift surplus 
profits, even to the point of artificially fabricating book 
losses; some "accomodate" through counterfeit documents (not 
only are such counterfeit invoices and documents boldly 
fabricated by certain operating sectors, but they are also 
openly offered for sale on markets), making fraudulent 
applications and claims, and shifting income; some shift 
general-account income, such as joint-venture or tertiary 
enterprise income and unit nonoperating income, fine and 
confiscation income, and even some business income, to unit 
"small treasuries," or even "fly it across the sea," shifting it 
to temporary deposits in overseas units; and others include 
nonproduction expenses in costs. Such losses are so large that 
they are hard to even investigate or measure. 
  3. Dual-Track-Price Erosion. In the process of 
economic and financial reform, some units, groups, and 
individuals that hold great authority over commodities have 
accurately seen the opportunity of "dual-track prices," taking 
advantage of their authority to buy long and sell short, and 
seeking exorbitant profits without personal participation, 
with over 70 percent of such income flowing into private 
pockets. Data beginning in 1988 show that such revenue erosion 
has reached a high of about 100 billion yuan. In recent years, 
the reduction in state revenues due to dual-track prices has 
again expanded from the field of circulation into other fields. 
  4. Rebate Losses. Mainland China's rebates 
[commissions, kickbacks] are certainly not like those in other 
market-economy countries, i.e., a form of profit concession 
between industrial and commercial enterprises. The "rebates" 
prevalent in China's purchase and marketing field are actually 
"advantage fees," landing directly in private purses. 
Incomplete data from one small Chinese city show that the 
accumulated spending on rebate fees in 1991 of over 5,000 
industrial and commercial enterprises topped 100 million yuan. 
  5. Interest Losses From Private Deposits of Public 
Funds. A typical poll published on a certain province finds 
that private deposits of public funds make up about 5-10 percent 
of financial-institution deposits. Projecting from this, China 
has private deposits of public funds topping 100 billion yuan, 
causing annual interest losses of about 3 billion yuan. 
Certain local finance and banking departments act in 
collusion, using state-revenue funds for phoney commissioning, 
lending, and division of interest. Banks collude with 
enterprises to profit from financing, which losses are also 
sizeable. 
  6. Grey Distribution. This refers mainly to 
certain enterprises and institutions violating state policy, by 
recklessly issuing property to employees. A poll and estimation 
by a concerned department finds that the wage income of 
employees throughout China shot up from its 1985 level of 20.08 
billion yuan (15 percent of payrolls) to 77.3 billion yuan by 
1990 (26.2 percent of payrolls). Grey distribution is now still 
expanding, in some cases making up 40-50 percent of all employee 
income, and even as high as several or dozens of times. 
  7. Entertaining. The variety of pretexts for and 
ways of entertaining at public expense in China can be said to 
be unmatched anywhere else in the world. The State Statistical 
Bureau estimates that 60-70 percent of the business turnover of 
large- and mid-sized hotels and restaurants throughout China 
comes from entertaining at public expense. The most conservative 
estimate is that China loses as much as 80 billion yuan a year 
in public funds through entertainment. 
  8. Conferences and Publicly Funded Tourism. The 
current various forms of exchange conferences, demonstration 
meetings, appraisal gatherings, cooperation get-togethers, and 
symposiums, as well as investigation groups leaving the country 
mostly for tourism, are innumerable, with the size of their 
spending leaving one speechless. The Ministry of Finance has 
disclosed that during the Seventh Five-Year Plan, domestic 
conference spending grew at an average of 21 percent a year. 
  9. Group Consumption. Many government organs and 
enterprise units compete with each other to see "which can 
consume the most." Some units compete in purchasing air 
conditioners, color TVs, and expensive cars, indiscriminately 
installing telephones, going in for ostentation and 
extravagance, and parading wealth, with all sorts of 
extravagance and waste prevalent, and social group consumption 
up sharply. In the first three quarters of 1992, nonproductive 
group-consumption spending grew over 30 percent in 21 mainland 
Chinese provinces, cities, and autonomous regions. There is 
basically no way to calculate the group-consumption spending 
through other channels. 
<H5>  Corruption and Abuse of Power Are the Causes. </H5>
  This revenue erosion is essentially due to those with 
varying 
amounts of power and influence taking advantage of their 
authority to plunder public assets unscrupulously, with the 
opening of all ways being subject to the means of corruption and 
bribery. In recent years, there have been numerous major 
cases of graft and bribetaking involving millions and tens of 
millions of yuan, with such graft and corruption having spread 
to all government-authority sectors, such as public security, 
industrial commercial, taxation, banking, land management, 
administration and law enforcement, and labor and personnel. 
This lamentable reality shows that the mainland Chinese 
government is beyond cure. It could be said that it is 
precisely the corrupt political system that has created this 
corrupt bureaucracy, with China's current overall situation 
being the result of the "endeavors" of those so corrupted. 
  The Chinese Government also seems to have awakened to the 
cause of its current plight, with its "rectification of the 
financial order" being accompanied by an "anti-corruption 
struggle," which the people call anti-corruption led by the 
corrupt," so whose effects will certainly be suspect. As so 
many central figures of authority have princes, princesses, and 
sons-in-law doing their utmost to get by improper means, what 
hope is there that those below will not follow the example of 
those above throughout China? 
  As China is now on the verge of paying for its autumn grain 
harvest, with peasants holding IOUs for years angry to the point 
of bursting, any further passing out of IOUs will be bound to 
touch off an "autumn-harvest uprising." So in order to bridge 
this pass, all specialized banks throughout China have turned 
over to the PBC all of their savings that are not out on loan 
(it is still not known how interest is to be paid on this), with 
recent transfers of 13 billion yuan from Guangdong and nearly 8 
billion yuan from Jiangsu. While this is injecting a little 
blood into the exhausted state revenues, it is undoubtedly 
merely a drop in the bucket. With such a state financial 
capability to undertake the many heavy duties in the conversion 
period, such as stopping the slide in agricultural production, 
adjusting the slanted investment structure, easing the 
increasing inflation pressures, and opening up the bottleneck 
restraints in areas such as transportation and energy, even if 
Zhu Rongji had the nerve to "clear up the whole mess 
thoroughly," it is feared that he lacks such tremendous power. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59295 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Predicts Gold Market Could Surpass U.S. </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0143A Hong Kong PAI-HSING HSIN-WEN CHOU-K'AN [PAIHSING 
NEWSWEEK] in Chinese No 28, 8 Oct 93 pp 50-52 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0143A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong PAI-HSING HSIN-WEN CHOU-K'AN [PAIHSING 
NEWSWEEK] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tang Wei-min (0781 3634 3046): "A Gold Buying </F>
Frenzy Has Burst Forth in China--For the World Gold Market It Is 
a Case of `The East is Red'"] 
  [Text] Apart from anything else, if every Chinese woman 
would wear a golden necklace, how many tons of gold would that 
take? 
  According to a conservative estimate of the World Gold 
Association, in 1992, gold sold on the Chinese mainland for 
ornamental purposes amounted to somewhat over 250 tons, enough 
for China to overtake the United States which has held the 
record for the last 25 years as the world's largest buyer of 
gold. 
  On passing into the "Year of the Rooster" [1993], the gold 
ornament market throughout China has "turned the whole landscape 
red" [a poetic quote, red being the color of great zeal and 
flourishing prosperity] somewhat like an immense fiery explosion. 
<H5>  Gold Prices on the Mainland Rose in Five Consecutive Stages </H5>
  On the basis of last year, let us look more carefully at 
gold 
sales in Beijing, as gold prices rose within five months in five 
consecutive stages. They rose from the original 100 yuan/gram to 
150 yuan, to 115 yuan, to 120 yuan, 135 yuan, to 140 yuan/gram, 
with swarms of buyers still eager to buy more. 
  As gold prices on the mainland rose briskly almost daily, 
the 
temporarily declining world gold prices were thereby given a 
boost and restored to great splendor. Since March, world gold 
prices have risen 25 percent. London, Zurich, New York, and Hong 
Kong became bullish, prices rising from $325 to $360 per ounce, 
and after a short development at a slower pace, again suddenly 
jumping in May and June, piercing the $400 per ounce ceiling in 
the first week of July, when prices reached the highest level 
since 1991. 
  After the Spring Festival, the heat came on strong in the 
otherwise frosty northern city of Harbin, namely the heat of 
purchasing gold ornaments. One customer, who had selected a gold 
necklace of 80 grams at Harbin's Asia Modern Dress and Jewelry 
Store, then found it still too small, and he finally preferred 
to buy 200 grams of other gold ornaments. 
  At the ornamental gold counter of the Qiulin Company, daily 
sales at most amounted to 200,000 yuan. Some gold shops that 
normally sold about 10,000 yuan could also increase their sales 
three- or four-fold, and many shops warned the market that they 
received insufficient supplies. 
  In Changsha, the gold ornament sales outlets at the various 
large markets continuously brought in new supplies, but still 
found all their supplies insufficient to meet demand. At times, 
frantic buying emptied the shelves. Average daily transactions 
at the gold ornament counters reached to over 100,000 yuan. 
<H5>  Frantic Buying Clears All Gold at Exhibition </H5>
  Formerly, the market for gold ornaments in Hunan had always 
been weak, and shops had already reduced 24 K gold ornaments 
from 100 to 95 yuan per gram, which still evoked little consumer 
interest. Now, however, even such ornaments as bracelets of less 
than 99.99 fineness, which had been unwelcome in the past, have 
become fast selling items. 
  In Nanjing, according to information from relevant quarters, 
a total of 312 kilos of gold ornaments were sold during January 
this year, which was something hardly ever seen before. During 
1992, the slightly more than 60 sales outlets in Nanjing, sold 
1.9 tons of gold ornaments, on the average only 158 kilos per 
month, but since coming into the "Year of the Rooster," there 
has been a steep rise in the sales of gold ornaments. 
  The last few days, according to news from the Third Shanghai 
Jewelry Exhibition, sales of various kinds of gold ornaments 
there amounted to 36.5 million yuan, which was four times the 
amount sold at the first such exhibition which had taken place 
last year. 
  At the exhibition, the buying public still mainly preferred 
ornaments of pure gold. During the first three days of the 
exhibition, gold sales reached the high figure of 6.2 million 
yuan, which was 70 percent of the total sales. Chains, 
necklaces, and bracelets sold fastest at the exhibition. The 
original intention was to have three days for the sale of the 
chains and necklaces, but unexpectedly almost all were sold out 
at the first day of the exhibition. Small pendants for children, 
such as small butterflies, small keys, or small roosters of 
about 1 gram each, altogether somewhat over 700 pieces, were all 
sold out the first day. 
  The Shanghai Far Eastern Gold and Silver Jewelry Factory 
exhibited items it planned to put into production, such as 
artistic replica in gold of the 12 animals of the Chinese 
zodiac, also a "golden boy of wealth" and a "Tang-Dynasty-style 
imperial goblet." Each item was priced at several tens of 
thousands yuan, and all were carried off by eager customers. 
<H5>  China Enters Its Golden Age </H5>
  This was the banner headline in the NEW YORK TIMES, 
used--certainly with some irony implied--when it reported on 
this subject, "..and speaking of the world's gold mines, the 
next specially large gold mine will be the Chinese consumers." 
What an eye-catching headline, what a perceptive vision! 
  Main reasons for the present gold-buying frenzy are the 
desire to preserve value and the people's traditional 
infatuation with gold. It was made possible by the higher living 
standards of the citizens and their increased consumption 
capacity. A spokesperson of the State Statistics Administration 
revealed that individual bank deposits of common people amounted 
to RMB 1.8 trillion yuan. After an individual will have spent on 
the "three old things," namely watches, bicycles, and sewing 
machines, and will have gone through the "three new things," 
namely TV's, washing machines, and electric refrigerators, and 
while he will find his capacity insufficient for the purchase of 
the trendy new commodities of the 100,000-plus level, such as 
motorcar and house, there will be nothing else for him to buy. 
This will leave the citizen with some money, which will then 
unavoidably be idle, awaiting a future opportunity. 
  Since there are no further commodities being offered at the 
10,000 yuan level, and even though bank interest rates have been 
raised, the Chinese economy is still undergoing dramatic 
changes, resulting in periods of turbulence, so that the common 
people are suspicious of a possible currency inflation, 
therefore take refuge in the value-preserving function of gold. 
Although the value-preserving function of gold is continuously 
declining, the traditional mentality of the people seemingly 
will not accept this fact in a short time, and gold, thus, 
remains in the minds of the people a safe, all-weather 
life-line. It is therefore natural to expect a gold-buying 
frenzy and its continuation. 
<H5>  Startling Effects on the World Gold Market </H5>
  In their analyses of the world gold market, experts believe 
that the continued demand for gold by Chinese consumers is to 
blame for the continuous increase in gold prices during the last 
decade. They furthermore believe that the more active China's 
economic development will become -- China being the world's most 
populated country -- the more money will be available to the 
Chinese consumers, and the larger will become the demand for 
gold, which in future will be a demand for several million or 
even several tens of millions ounces of gold. 
  As these experts see it, reasons for the large purchases of 
gold by China are, for one thing, China's rapidly growing 
economy and lenient government policies, combined with the 
limited channels for the use of cash savings; secondly are the 
preparations by the government to take action against the 
country's currency inflation and the devaluation of China's 
currency. 
  Ordinary Chinese women had not worn gold necklaces for quite 
a few decades, but now, with the higher living standards, they 
have started again to wear gold and silver, and this alone has 
been sufficient to exert a surprisingly strong effect on the 
world gold market, so that traders are beginning to watch more 
carefully the huge market that the 1.2 billion people of China 
represent. 
  The international organization that has for some time been 
promoting gold sales, the World Gold Association, held a meeting 
early in 1993 at the Beijing Hotel for the exchange of opinions 
on developments in China's gold market. Said organization also 
undertook, for the first time, investigations at Beijing, 
Shanghai, and Guangzhou, and as a result of these investigations 
revealed that among China's gold buyers 19 percent were women 
and 11 percent were men. As to the proportion of the various 
uses of gold, the ratio of gold used for ornamental purposes was 
15 percent, used ornamentally for the mounting of precious 
stones 2 percent, used for gold coins and gold bullion only 0.3 
percent, the ratio of gold ornaments bought for personal use was 
11 percent, and gold used in presents to others 6 percent. 
Overall, the rate of domestic gold purchases has not yet reached 
the degree of full saturation, and compared with other 
countries, where people own six or seven articles of gold, there 
is here still a large disparity. The said association therefore 
concluded that China offers the largest ever potential in the 
world for becoming the largest consumer of gold. China will, in 
effect, induce a shift in the entire market toward the east. 
<H5>  Vigorous Inception of Privately Operated Gold Markets </H5>
  Faced with the strong demand in China's gold ornament market 
and the steady rise in the prices of gold ornaments, gold 
markets of every description are vigorously being developed, as 
the times seem to require. In Ganwang Township, within Haicheng 
City of Liaoning Province, famous for its production of 
vegetables and for its clothing market, an open, privately 
operated gold market was suddenly, and quite unostentatiously, 
initiated. During the period from 1 September 1992, when 
firecrackers announced the opening of the first privately 
operated gold ornament shop, until the beginning of 1993, 106 
business licenses to operate gold shops have been applied for, 
73 were to be operated by private individuals and only 3 to be 
operated by collectives. The privately operated gold market has 
had over 1,000 visitors per day, and has transacted tens of 
millions of yuan. Businessmen have come to investigate and to 
buy not only from 10-odd provinces and municipalities of China, 
but some have even come to gain information on conditions and to 
negotiate business from more than 10 foreign countries and 
territories, among them Canada, Russia, Japan, South Korea, Hong 
Kong, and Taiwan. 
  With their courageous action, the people of Ganwang have 
challenged the last aristocratic stronghold in the financial 
system, namely gold. Their example will be emulated all over the 
country by "chiefs who challenge their overlords." 
  In Yantai City, the foremost gold producing city, the city's 
Gold Bureau initiated, on 28 April 1993, a Yantai Gold, Silver, 
and Jewelry Trading Center. At this place, trading proceeds 
openly and fairly, and is also favored by the development zone's 
preferential policy regarding tax exemptions. 
  On 10 May 1993, the country's second largest gold-producing 
city of county rank, Lingbao City in Henan Province, did 
similarly, and its gold, silver, and jewelry center came into 
being as a timely event. It was a place where 75 state-run, 
collectively run, and privately operating gold, silver, and 
jewelry shops were concentratedly engaged in production, 
processing, and sales. 
<H5>  Indecision as to the Imposition of Controls </H5>
  On 19 June 1993, the Tongguan Gold, Silver, and Jewelry 
Street was inaugurated in Tongguan County, a key gold producing 
center in Shaanxi Province. It had resulted from the fruitful 
cooperation between the said county and the Wanlida Jewelry Co., 
Ltd. of Hong Kong. 
  A well-informed person at the People's Bank of China 
revealed 
that there have by now been about 11 cases throughout the 
country, where local governments or trading firms in this way 
took the lead in setting up gold markets. Besides these, there 
have also been many underground, concealed markets, not 
controlled by any authority or government department. They 
blossom forth and disappear all of their own, and there is no 
way to cover such cases statistically. 
  Even so, the People's Bank of China has issued circular 
notices in which it repeatedly stated that prior to any state 
plan for the opening up of the gold market, no local authority 
or unit may of its own institute gold markets. However, abstract 
and monotonous notices and government decrees are no match for 
the very concrete and explosive gold price developments, and 
will therefore naturally end in defeat. Faced with the tidal 
wave of gold market formations, the government agency charged 
with the control of gold must come to a decision: shall there be 
an opening-up or shall it be a closed area. The competent 
authorities are still in a quandary as to their next move. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59296 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Analysis of Township, Town Extra Revenue, Expenditure </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0117A Beijing JINGJI YANJIU [ECONOMIC RESEARCH] in 
Chinese No 9, 20 Sep 93 pp 38-44 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0117A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI YANJIU [ECONOMIC RESEARCH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Sun Tanzhen (1327 3389 6966) and Zhu Gang (2612 </F>
6921) of the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences Rural 
Development Research Institute: "Analysis of China's Township 
System Extra Revenue and Expenditure"] 
  [Text] The rural reforms begun in 1978 have brought about a 
great increase in the commercialization rate of agricultural 
products, and in peasants' income, as township enterprises have 
become a new force suddenly coming to the fore. As for the 
"great contract" in the rural organization system, along with 
popularization of the responsibility system of production, rural 
political power since 1984 has taken the road of standardization 
marked by establishment of town governments and village 
committees. This development in China's rural economic pattern 
and organization system has brought with it some obvious changes 
in township revenues and expenditures, which can be summarized 
as: 
  1. The implementation of contracted revenue system for all 
levels started in 1990 with the "separated responsibility" of 
revenue and government which linked local revenue income and 
expenditures bringing clearly practical benefits to all levels 
of local government, and initiated an economic development model 
which has a special plane in the history of world economic 
development -- one which is centered on the local government. 
  2. The traditional rural revenue and expenditure system in 
China consists of internal budget revenue and external budget 
revenue; at the end of 1982, although there were 20,000 people's 
communes in China which had established a commune level revenue 
and expenditure system, it was a revenue and expenditure 
administration system which relied chiefly on "unified 
collection and distribution." As development of the market 
economy provided the chief impetus to the continuous development 
of local economies, all sorts of contradictions which had built 
up under the traditional revenue and expenditure system grew 
increasingly acute, and produced a new type of revenue and 
expenditure -- extra revenue and expenditures for dealing these 
contradictions, and, as soon as this one was born, it spread 
rapidly and wildly catalyzed all manner of contradictions. 
  We define revenue and expenditure here as the collection and 
application by the authorities of capital to support government 
activities, using their legal enforcement powers, in accordance 
with the practical situation of current local revenue and 
expenditure operations in China. All free capital collected by 
the enforcement powers of authorities by township governments 
are revenue income of this level of government, while all costs 
for all kinds of activities of township governments are 
expenditures of this level government. According to this broad 
meaning of revenue and expenditure, we divide revenue and 
expenditures into internal system revenue and external system 
revenue. The former refers to the internal and external budget 
revenue under the current financial administration system. The 
latter refers to self collected capital by township governments 
through all kinds and forms and to governmental expenditures 
caused by these. 
  Along with continuous reform of the revenue and expenditure 
system and the constant development of the rural economy, the 
extra revenue and expenditure of rural township governments has 
extended rapidly, increasing at a pace which has surpassed that 
of internal revenue and expenditure. In 1990, the gross income 
of township revenue nationwide was 48.5 billion RMB, a 1.1-fold 
increase over 1986, with an annual average 20 percent rate of 
increase. Included in this was 36.1 billion RMB internal budget 
income, and 3.1 billion RMB external budget income, and 9.2 
billion RMB in towns' self-collected capital income, increases 
of 86 percent, 181 percent, and 241 percent respectively from 
1986.(Footnote)(Xiang Cai: "Strategic Study of China's Rural 
Revenue and Expenditure Development," CAIZHENG No.5, 1992). From 
1990 to the present we taken representative samples in areas 
which had different levels of development. The evidence showed 
that external revenue and expenditure has occupied a decisive 
position in the overall township revenue and expenditure. For 
instance, in 1989, in a town in suburban Beijing which has well 
developed township enterprises, out of a total of 61.25 million 
RMB gross yearly revenue and enterprises income, extra revenue 
and expenditure accounted for 77.4 percent, while budgeted 
income only accounted for 21.4 percent. In a town in Zhejiang 
Province in the same year, out of a gross yearly revenue income 
of 902,000 RMB, extra revenue and expenditure accounted for 72.5 
percent, while budgeted revenue and expenditure accounted for 
only 27.5 percent.(Footnote)(Sun Tanzhen, Wang Zhaocai, Yaogang, 
Sanbenyumei: "China's Economic Development and Agricultural 
Revenue and Expenditure," published by the Japanese Institute of 
Asian Economy, as No.92 in the Special Overseas Joint Research 
Report Series, 1991. This report's analysis showed that these 
towns' extra revenue and expenditure amounted to very little at 
all.) In 1991, in a town in suburban Guangzhou, out of a gross 
yearly revenue and expenditure of 4.3 million RMB, extra income 
accounted for 91.6 percent, while budgeted income for only 8.4 
percent; of the gross yearly expenditures of 4.026 million RMB, 
extra expenditure accounted for 91.2 percent. In a town of 
Dalian in the same year, the budgeted revenue income was over 17 
million RMB, while extra expenditure was over 50 million RMB. In 
a suburban town of Shanghai, the gross revenue income was 4.06 
million in 1991, of which 67 percent came from extra revenue, 
while 59 percent of the gross expenditure of 4.49 million RMB 
came from extra expenditure. Even in areas in which the 
agricultural economy is the dominant factor, extra revenue and 
expenditure still occupied a considerable portion. According to 
our representative sample, a town in Hunan provides a good 
example: of its 1991 gross revenue income of 1.077 million RMB, 
41.3 percent came from extra revenue; of the gross expenditure 
of 1.012 million RMB, extra expenditure accounted for 41.7 
percent. In one town in Zhejiang, out of a gross revenue income 
of 808,000 RMB in 1989, extra revenue income accounted for 49.8 
percent. 
  Because extra revenue and expenditure have played an 
increasingly important role in developing township local 
economies and in bringing township government into full play, 
therefore analyzing the causes and the operating system of 
township extra revenue and enterprises will aid in correctly 
grasping the current township revenue and expenditure system in 
China's rural areas, and in adopting correct policies to make 
township revenue and expenditure play a bigger role in rural 
economic and social development. 
<H5>  1. The Causes of Extra Revenue and Expenditure </H5>
  The rapid expansion of rural township extra revenue and 
expenditure in China was produced by an increasingly acute 
contradiction between financial system reform which was lagging 
and rural economic development which was increasingly focused on 
a market economy. It can be analyzed from the two aspects of 
supply and demand. We will look at supply first: 
  A) The currently operating financial administration system 
creates supply insufficiencies. The rural financial 
administration system has taken four basic forms in China: (1) 
the system of "united collection and distribution"; (2) the 
system of "fixing income and expenditures, handing over revenues 
to higher authority, partially sharing income according to a 
certain rate, allocating expenditures, not re-supplying those in 
deficit, and reserving surpluses"; (3) the system of "checking 
and ratifying revenues and expenditures, linking up revenues and 
expenditures, sharing the gross amount at a certain rate, and 
sharing part of excessive revenues at a certain rate"; (4) the 
system of "dividing revenues and expenditures, checking and 
ratifying cardinal numbers, contracting revenues and 
expenditures." Looking at development, towns which operated 
under the "united collection and distribution" two line system 
of revenue and expenditures showed a steady decline, while those 
towns which carried out linkage of revenues and expenditures 
showed a progressive increase. By the end of 1990, there were 
32,700 towns which had operated under the latter two systems, 
and this was more than 60 percent of all township financial 
offices.(Footnote)("Accelerate Development of Township Revenue 
and Expenditure to a New Level," CAIZHENG YANJIU ZILIAO No.32, 
1991) These two systems expanded the jurisdiction of township 
revenues and expenditures, aroused the enthusiasm of township 
governments to organize financial income and reduce 
expenditures. However, because most township economies are still 
focused on agriculture, and with a few exceptions are at a lower 
development level in the rural areas of China, so the gross 
amount of budgeted revenue income which is focused on industrial 
and commercial taxes is low, and the tax resources unstable. 
Relevant documents show that in 1990, there were about 25,000 
towns with budgeted revenue income between 800,000 and 1 million 
RMB, 21,800 towns with budgeted revenue income between 100,000 
and 800,000 RMB, and about 10 percent of the total number of 
towns were below 100,000 RMB. (Footnote)(Meng Chun: "Strategic 
Studies on China's Township Development" in: Collected 
Essays on Township Revenue and Expenditure in Jiangsu, Zhejiang, 
and Anhui, 1992) Because most of the township governments 
have lower budgeted internal revenue income, according to the 
rules of the current revenue system their revenue income is 
severely limited. 
  Meanwhile, although many towns have now implemented a 
financial management system in which the towns themselves 
control that part of the excess profits above a base figure 
which is handed up after contract completion, still, it is also 
true that implementation of "handing up all revenue income to 
higher authority, allocating expenditures by checked and 
ratified amounts," etc., is obviously off the track of "united 
collection and allocation." In addition, most towns did not fix 
a state reserve, and therefore, indeed, the budgeted revenue 
income which can be supply to towns for their own use will be 
discounted for a variety of reasons. Meanwhile, it is extremely 
inconvenient to use township level financial capital, while at 
present, the means and the rate at which capital is shared has 
not been systematically or legally stabilized, so is affected by 
such things as changes in policy, town leaders' negotiating 
ability and the attention paid to their personal careers as 
officials, etc. This is highly unstable, and has led to a 
situation wherein controllable revenue income of township 
revenue and expenditures has not changed regularly along with 
changes in tax collections, etc., so that the surplus funds are 
often insufficient, while revenue income shortages continue to 
exceed the base. So the imperfection of the budgeted revenue 
management system presents a serious obstacle to building and 
developing township revenue and expenditures, which leads 
township governments to try creating other financial resources 
to break out of the limitations of the budgeted financial system. 
  2. The imperfections in the tax collection administration 
system currently in operation induces local governments to 
expand extra revenue income. China's local revenue chiefly 
depends on taxes collected from local enterprises. These are the 
three types of industrial and commercial taxes, that is, 
products tax, business tax, and value added tax. These three 
taxes constitute the largest proportion, and divided into 
central and local taxes; meanwhile, current policy provides that 
local governments share certain tax deduction rights, which 
leads local governments to convert this kind of revenue sharing 
into a benefits system for local revenue. With this motive, 
local governments take full advantage of tax deduction rights, 
and put tax resources into the principal taxable economic 
entity. Township governments of each locality use every possible 
means in the attempt to get favorable tax deductions for 
township enterprises, especially for collective township 
enterprises, so that enterprises pay less taxes or none at all. 
They then use other means to turn tax resources into township 
self collected capital income; an example of this is turning 
over township enterprises benefits and administration fees, fund 
raising, apportion, strong financial support, etc. 
  3. The development of local economy has expanded sources of 
extra revenue and expenditure. Since 1978, the development of 
local economy as represented by township enterprises has been 
the most vigorous and distinct. In 1991, the gross output of 
township enterprises reached 1,162.17 billion yuan, an increase 
of 20 times that of 1979, and with a 29 percent average annual 
rate of increase. The rapid development of rural economy 
represented by township enterprises created wide financial 
resources for township extra revenue. This has especially been 
the case in some township enterprises developed areas, where 
township governments have directly gained considerable extra 
revenue from profits turned over to them by enterprises. 
  In addition, from the standpoint of needs, what is required 
for development of the local economy and society's self 
development, population growth, inflation, and new types of 
consumption which have appeared along with the development of 
the economy, etc., have all caused expenditures to increase 
rapidly. Especially rapid has been the development of local 
economies and expenditures related to the supply of public 
products and the need to deal promptly with external economic 
influences. Because the nature of public products is manifested 
in "nonexclusivity" (meaning it is impossible to collect usage 
fees or ask excessive costs) and "noncompetitiveness" in 
consumption, so, under market economy conditions, the supply of 
public products can only be resolved by governmental means 
through financial expenditures. As for dealing with external 
influences under market economy conditions, when there are 
inconsistencies between the societal cost of a product or 
service and the individual cost, and between societal usage and 
individual usage, it demands that government do something to 
deal with those external influences. 
  In the current situation, the following are the reasons for 
requiring that township revenue and expenditures increase in 
rural China: 
  (1) The population tends to be urban. With development of 
township enterprises and the rural economy, the development 
level of townships and market trends in the countryside have 
improved greatly. The developing tendency of township and market 
has led to an increased demand for social capital-type products; 
for example, the demand for telecommunications facilities, 
sewers, park constructions, etc., has been vigorous. (2) The 
educational level has improved. With the income level of the 
peasants improved, their educational needs are increasing daily. 
Meanwhile, because society's usage of education is far bigger 
than individual usage, so, in addition to farm families bearing 
part of the educational costs, the government has to bear a 
substantial part of educational costs as well. (3) With 
deepening reform and the progressive establishment of a market 
economic system, there has been a constant need to maintain the 
basic framework and order of socio-economic life; for instance, 
legislation, law enforcement, public security, statistics, 
resource management and general executive affairs, etc. (4) The 
short supply and dispersal of private capital, the peasants' 
love of consumption and savings combined with their weak 
knowledge of risk investment, forms pressures on the conduct of 
direct investment and expansion of township economy development 
by government revenue and expenditure. (5) Township leaders have 
an affinity for pursuing short term profits, official 
achievements, and all sorts of "reaching standard" activities, 
etc., cause increases in every kind of nonconstructive costs. 
(6) The scale and standard of expenditure for every type of cost 
which is fixed in the revenue and expenditure regulations 
currently in operation are far lower than the practical needs of 
each locality; for some projects, higher authority promised to 
increase such revenue allocations, as the wage subsidy, grain 
price subsidy, transport subsidy, etc., but did not do so, which 
required that the townships add expenditures. All these pushed 
townships to look for sources of extra revenue and expenditure. 
  2. Sources and characteristics of township extra 
revenue and expenditure. 
  At present, township extra revenue in rural China comes 
chiefly from the following several sources: 
  1) Profits and administrative fees handed over by township 
enterprises. In 1991, the net after-tax profits of the two 
levels of town and village from collective enterprises had 
reached 28.47 billion RMB. (Footnote)(China Statistical 
Yearbook 1992 China Statistics Publishing House) A guess at 
the gross income ratio of town-run to village-run enterprises 
would be that half of the net after-tax profits must come from 
town-run enterprises. Meanwhile, because of such factors as 
untruthful reporting, the actual profits are far more than the 
statistical figure. Profits and administrative fees which are 
handed over to township governments by town-run enterprises 
constitute the main body of extra revenue and expenditure. In 
addition, enterprises run by villages, associated families, and 
individual industrial and commercial families, etc. should all 
hand over a fixed amount of administrative fees to township 
governments. 2) Capital uniformly collected by townships, 
including revenue collected by township governments according to 
state regulations. Up to 1990, there were as many as 149 
projects which were authorized in documents of every state 
ministry and commission to collect funds from peasants. These 
included chiefly: educational fees, family planning fees, fees 
to provide special care to family members of revolutionary 
martyrs and servicemen, training fees for militiamen, subsidy 
fees to rural cadres, construction fees for social public 
affairs, etc. 3) All types of fund raising and monetary 
contributions. This includes enterprise and personal fund 
raising and monetary contributions on the township scale, as 
well as from overseas people and organs, e.g., contributions of 
money from countrymen residing abroad, etc., This type of 
revenue has recently been on the increase in many localities. 4) 
Incomes from various kinds of fines and confiscations. During 
the period of establishing, maintaining, and implementing a new 
economic system and social life, this type of income will tend 
to increase. 
  Through analyses to actual surveys in some localities, we 
know that the extra township revenue and expenditure in rural 
China differs in nature from budgeted revenue and expenditure. 
  1. In areas with differing levels of economic development, 
the extra revenue and expenditure structure differs as well. 
Generally speaking, in economically developed areas, those with 
stronger collective economic power, not only is the extra 
revenue and expenditure at a high level, the resources are also 
relatively concentrated. Revenue is reliant chiefly on profits 
handed over by collective township enterprises, administrative 
fees, and united capital collection by townships. For instance, 
in 1989, the extra revenue from a town in Beijing was 47.425 
million RMB, including 30.093 million RMB which was handed over 
by township enterprises, 63.5 percent of the total. In 1991, the 
extra revenue from a town in Guangzhou totalled 3.936 million 
RMB; included in this was 2.282 million RMB from enterprises, 
which was 58 percent of the gross revenue, and 1.43 million RMB 
united capital collection by townships, which was 36.4 percent, 
and these two revenues together constituted 94.4 percent of the 
gross income. In 1991, the extra revenue from a town in Dalian 
was 2.96 million RMB, including 1.65 million RMB from 
enterprises, which was 55.7 percent of gross revenue, and 
920,000 RMB in united capital collection by townships, which was 
31.1 percent, these two incomes in total constituting 86.8 
percent of total revenue. Indeed, in many areas where the 
collective economy developed to a higher level, the townships' 
united capital collection came chiefly from collective economic 
profits handed over by village-run enterprises, and this 
extended the extra revenue from enterprise profits, both in 
amount and rate. 
  In areas where the economy is undeveloped, extra revenue and 
expenditure are at a low level, chiefly reliant on direct 
resources from townships' united collection of capital which 
comes from budget income of farm families and land contract 
administrative fees and other temporary fund raising, monetary 
contributions, etc. Take Yunnan as an example: in 1990, 20 
percent of the province's township self-collected capital came 
from profits of township enterprises and institutes, which was 
concentrated in a few areas where the level of economic 
development was higher; all items of united capital collection 
usually constituted about 75 percent.(Footnote)(Chen Yingxuan: 
"Gradually Perfect Construction of Township Revenue and 
Expenditure to Promote Comprehensive Development of Rural 
Economy," YUNNAN CAIZHENG YANJIU, No 10, 1991) Take Hunan as 
another example: in 1991, the extra revenue totalled 445,000 
RMB, and of this, 130,000 RMB was from enterprise profits, which 
was only 29.9 percent, far lower than the rate for the same type 
of revenue in economically developed areas; the townships' 
united capital collection was 106,000 RMB, which was only 23.8 
percent of the total. Fund raising of various kinds and 
contributions of money came to 80,000 RMB, which was 10 percent 
of the total; penalties of all kinds and confiscated income came 
to 80,000 RMB, which was 18 percent. The extra revenue structure 
in this town was very representative of the current situation in 
the undeveloped areas, that is, a low level of income, highly 
scattered resources, and enterprises which find it difficult to 
constitute a main revenue and expenditure entity. 
  2. Prerogative is characterized by the authorities using 
their powers to collect capital as they choose. But, a township 
government operates at one level of governmental power, and this 
kind of enforcement power of the authorities is often executed 
through direct or attached relationships, and is usually 
characterized by prerogative and subjectivity. As for township 
enterprises, because of a lot of these enterprises are run by 
collective investment, their property rights are very unclear, 
so that the township government then truly become the owner of 
enterprises, and leaders of the enterprises are appointed by 
government. Township governments take advantage of this special 
status and executive privilege, so they not only can establish 
the rate and standard of profits and administrative fees for 
enterprises to hand over as the governments will, the can also 
assign quotas and fund raising to enterprises. This also was the 
major reason why at present township extra revenue is the 
easiest to collect from township enterprises. Speaking of 
township united capital collections, township governments have 
collected this capital through village cooperative economic 
organs. Although the state has already fixed a certain rate and 
standard for this capital to prevent adding to the peasants' 
burden, it has been hard to restrain the actions of some 
township governments, while peasants have such strong dependence 
on township executive organs, which makes it hard to restrain 
either. Based on a nationwide rough estimate of rural economy 
supervision departments of the Ministry of Agriculture, the 
average peasant's cost for executive fees, all kinds of 
penalties, fund raising and quotas, etc., which are countable, 
amounted to 13.8 RMB in 1991, which was 2.5 percent of the 
average peasant's income. Reserves of directly assumed 
collections and united collective fees by peasants came to 29.2 
RMB per peasant, which was 5.3 percent of last year's average 
per peasant income.(Footnote)(Cooperative Agricultural Economics 
Guidance Office of the Ministry of Agriculture: "Comprehensive 
Analysis of the Burden on China's Peasants" in: NONCUN HEZUO 
JINGJI, Supplementary Issue, 12 June 1992) Among the burdens 
listed above, in addition to those parts which were withdrawn, 
reserved by higher level departments or village committee, quite 
a substantial share became township extra revenue and 
expenditure. 
  3. Lack of continuity and stability in yearly and specific 
revenue projects. The reasons are: first, extra revenue is 
determined to a large degree by the profit situation of township 
enterprises. As the state cancels all kinds of favorable 
policies to develop township enterprises, enterprise development 
is facing increasingly fierce market competition, their 
advantages are steadily disappearing, so that within the scope 
of a township, enterprise profits are always unstable, which 
causes yearly fluctuations in extra revenue. Second, because 
extra revenue is often collected according to the demands of 
temporary expenditure, so there is a lack of continuity in 
specific income. 
  3. Functions and Uses of Township Revenue and 
Expenditure 
  In the process of building a socialist market economic 
system, the rural township government is the basic authority 
organ of the state, and plays an absolutely essential role in 
developing the rural socialist market economy. International 
experience has proven that under market economy conditions, the 
following several functions must be assumed by government which 
represents public benefits. 
  1. The function of supplying public products and dealing 
with 
external effects. This function of government revenue and 
expenditure acts to rationally allocate resources between 
practical benefits and future benefits, individual benefits and 
societal benefits, in order to satisfy the greatest need for 
public benefits by the whole of society's members. 
  2. The distribution function. This function serves chiefly 
to 
guarantee fairness in income distribution to those members of 
society who are at the lowest living standard, especially under 
the conditions of a market economy operations system, to resolve 
the problem of unbalanced income distribution that is caused by 
this, reducing the gap between rich and poor; it also includes 
implementing protective policies for special industries such as 
agriculture, carrying out regional redistribution to reduce 
regional variations. 
  3. The function of stability. In this, the government 
maintains the employment level and price stability through its 
macroeconomic management of gross supply and demand, for 
example, such adjustments as the currency supply, interest 
rates, foreign exchange rates, and tax rates, etc. to bring 
about stability in macroeconomic activity and social life. 
  4. The function of promoting economic growth. In developing 
countries, it directly drives economic development in developing 
areas by means of the government's investment action to 
compensate for the restrictions of such factors as a lack of 
essential capital and weak risk knowledge among the 
microeconomic main body. 
  But, there are definite divisions of labor and emphasis 
placed on the aforementioned governmental functions by the 
central and local governments, and the various levels of local 
governments. Generally speaking, the stability function plays a 
lesser role in rural township government public revenue and 
expenditure. Speaking of the distribution function, in 
economically developed areas the peasant standard of living has 
improved considerably due to development of township 
enterprises. Although there certainly are income differences 
among farm families, the phenomenon of absolute poverty has been 
basically eradicated, and governments need to provide only a 
part of transferred expenditure for a few households which enjoy 
the five guarantees. In some towns where the collective economy 
is at a higher level of development, governments limit expansion 
of the gap between rich and poor through the united distribution 
policy inside the collective economy. The distribution function 
of township revenue and expenditure in areas of this sort is 
enacted chiefly through the policy of subsidizing agriculture by 
industry, to level the income gap inside the collective. In 
economically undeveloped areas, it relies chiefly on various 
kinds of relief money and poverty assistance funds from the 
state and higher levels of government to resolve the poverty of 
peasants. Township governments need not do this, nor do they 
have the ability to supply more transferred expenditure. 
Speaking of the stability function, only the central government 
can make adjustments in currency issuance, interest rates, 
foreign exchange rates, tax rates, etc.; it is impossible for 
local governments to be involved with these matters. 
  But looking at the functions of supplying public products, 
dealing with external effects, and promoting economic growth, we 
see that local governments can grasp various kinds of 
information better, because residents in society's different 
regions place differing stresses on different public products, 
and make different selections as to type of economic and social 
development. Therefore, local governments can better supply 
public products and deal with external effects, so township 
government's effect in this regard especially has potential. 
Investigation of the current operational situation for China's 
rural township revenue and expenditure shows that extra revenue 
and expenditure play a very important role in supplying public 
products, dealing with external effect and promoting economic 
growth. 
  At present, there are three major types of rural revenue 
expenditure: 1) expenditure for development, which chiefly 
includes investment in fundamental facilities, expenditures on 
investment to township enterprises, and on support for 
agricultural production; 2) expenditures on administrative 
matters, which mainly consists of operational and administrative 
fees for each department of township government; 3) expenditure 
on societal affairs, which chiefly include culture, education, 
health fees, social welfare, etc. In the scope of the above 
listed expenditures, extra revenue obviously differs in nature 
from budget revenue, so it shows its positive effect in township 
economic and social development. 
  1. In many towns, the distinct, constructive character of 
extra revenue and expenditure in supplying public products and 
dealing with external effects, makes it the main body of public 
investment. At present, among the first class township budget 
expenditures in rural China, fees for cultural, educational, and 
health affairs predominate, reaching more than 70 percent in 
many towns. But these expenditures are totally consumable, of 
consumption, going chiefly for population fees and daily costs, 
so it is necessary to use surplus capital on constructive 
investment. The situation is different for extra revenue and 
expenditure, where the rate of use on such capital construction 
as public facilities, etc., is higher. For example, in a certain 
town in Hunan Province, several million RMB were expended on 
establishment and enlargement of the township people's 
hospital's clinic building, bridges, etc. Other than a part of 
these projects which were aided by higher level departments, 
this was handled for the most part by township extra revenue. In 
1988, a certain town in Dalian put ten million RMB into 
construction of a middle school, and most of its capital was 
provided by the township's own fund raising. At present, major 
public expenditures of township extra revenue include social 
service type investments such as school buildings, hospitals, 
etc., and construction of infrastructural facilities such as 
roads, bridges, telecommunications, etc. 
  2. Expenditure on productive construction. No matter whether 
in towns which are economically developed or undeveloped, budget 
revenue is rarely expended on township enterprises and 
agricultural production, but extra revenue has had a distinctly 
positive effect on promoting economic growth through its 
investment activities. This is effect is even more prominent in 
economically developed towns. For example, in 1991, among the 
extra expenditure of a Dalian suburb, direct investment on 
agriculture and industry was up 1.69 million RMB, which was 37.1 
percent of the total extra expenditures; in 1991, a Guangzhou 
suburban town's invested 1.208 million RMB on township 
enterprises, which was 32.9 percent of the total extra 
expenditure. In many Chinese towns, because of the severe 
shortage and scattered nature of private capital, the peasants' 
strong emphasis on consumption and slight knowledge of risk 
investment, plus their being in a lower income situation, kept 
financial organs undeveloped and caused a serious shortage of 
productive investment in rural areas, which restricts economic 
development. Therefore, township government concentration on 
extra revenue for investment must play a role in strongly 
pushing local economic development, and this has already been 
proven by practice in some economically developed areas in China. 
  3. It plays an important role in supply public products 
concerned with establishing, maintaining and operating a new 
order. Since 1978, the state has added or strengthened organs 
related to economic activities, such as statistics, law 
enforcement, public security, technical quality supervision and 
service, township enterprises administration and resources 
management, etc. Among all these new organs and their increased 
staffing, a part of them were obviously consistent with the 
functions and work assignments of government bestowed on it by 
the new economic system. Among expenditure of this sort, extra 
revenue took on quite a bit. In 1991, in a certain town in 
Shaanxi Province, our investigation of organs and employees 
added since 1978 showed that among these newly added organs and 
employees, those employees who worked in the public products 
listed above and whose sphere was concerned with economic 
activities constituted 94 percent of the total of new employees. 
Newly added employees inside the state's budget occupied only 40 
percent, 30 percent were budgeted by county revenue and 
expenditure, and the remaining 30 percent were borne by extra 
revenue and expenditure of township. In 1991's investigation of 
a town in a Guangzhou suburb showed that among organs newly 
added since 1978, except for the township party school and the 
township office of the national congress, all organs were 
related to economic administration, legal services, urban 
residents' life services, and administration functions. In this 
town, employees newly added since 1978 constituted 69 percent of 
all township cadres, and of these, cadres who were employed by 
township self collected capital occupied 44 percent of the total 
of newly added employees. Practical investigations in other, 
different type, areas (such as Dalian, Shandong, Beijing, 
Zhejiang and Shanghai, etc.) had similar results. 
  4. Conclusion 
  1. At present, there now are a great deal of problems with 
extra revenue and expenditures, including the common criticism 
that there is a lack of an efficient system of supervision and 
administration. This makes it easy to form a "small treasury" of 
township leaders, and produce a "breeding bed" of regulation 
violations. According to our understanding of relevant 
documents, since three major investigations were launched in 
1985, analysis of the volume of money involved showed that 90 
percent of the problems were related to this part of the 
capital. (Footnote)(Li Jinwen, et al.: "Reflections on Several 
Problems Related to Township Revenue and Expenditure," CAIZHENG 
YANJIU ZILIAO No 31, 1991). However, the aforementioned analysis 
showed that extra revenue and expenditure was the product of a 
contradiction between development of the market economy and the 
regressiveness of financial system reform. It has the 
characteristics of being productive, supplying public products 
and dealing with external effects, and plays an important role 
which cannot not be ignored in the process of developing local 
economic and social development; thus, we cannot simply add 
denials and restrictions to it. 
  2. As for the expenditure type of extra revenue, it is an 
important part of supplying external public products and dealing 
with external effects. Theoretically, local governments in 
different localities can determine their expenditure actions 
according to demand for public products in their own local 
areas, whatever is best for meeting the demand to deal with 
external effects, for meeting the people's needs, and for 
maximizing the public welfare of the residents of that local 
society. Especially if the concern is only with a relatively 
small area of towns, it is easier to do it. But, due to various 
shortcomings in the current Chinese administrative system, the 
short term actions of local grassroots level leaders, and some 
other factors, this has often led to governmental actions 
deviating from what is favorable to the members of their local 
society, twisting resources allocation, and adding to the 
peasants' burden. This, then, is a problem demanding 
conscientious study and resolution: how to supply public 
products and collect capital for dealing with external effects 
according to what is favorable to and capable of dealing with 
the burden on societal members. 
  3. Because most rural township enterprises have strong 
attachments to the rural community executive organs in China, 
they lack the power to restrict government activities, which 
causes extra revenue and expenditure to be quite unstable and 
subject to whim. Under the conditions of limited rural domestic 
income and average income level, if re-allocation to enterprises 
and peasants after they have handed over taxes to the state is 
done at will, it must have unfavorable effects on the economic 
activities of enterprises and peasants, and ultimately lead to a 
reduction in revenue a weakening of the revenue function. One 
of the options for improving this situation is to convert a part 
of the extra revenue and expenditure projects into local taxes, 
regulate it through legal means, and allow it to be budgeted by 
local governments. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59297 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Further RMB Depreciation Expected </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0077B Hong Kong PAI-HSING HSIN-WEN CHOU-K'AN [PAIHSING 
NEWSWEEK] in Chinese No 25, 17 Sep 93 pp 54-55 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0077B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong PAI-HSING HSIN-WEN CHOU-K'AN [PAIHSING 
NEWSWEEK] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ch'en Kang (7115 1511): "Confidence in the </F>
Renminbi Insufficient, Renminbi Could Further Depreciate"] 
  [Text] The mainland's renminbi (RMB) recently has been 
rather stable, making for a temporary lessening of official 
pressure. But there still is danger of a further decline in the 
RMB. Several experts have come out with analyses of this problem 
and made proposals to the central department. But these 
proposals have all been tied up in the upper echelon and the 
experts all are upset. 
  The RMB Devaluation View Is "Killed" 
  What is worse, the mainland departments concerned have 
recently told dissemination units that they may not report the 
view that the RMB could be further devalued, making the 
situation more mysterious. The analysis and opinion that this 
reporter is expressing in this article is among the opinions 
"killed." 
  Of course, this reporter has not written off the official 
efforts to adjust and control the RMB. Actually, the Chinese 
Government recently has adopted extremely strict measures and 
ordered local banks to recall conversion funds and loans to 
assure key projects and agricultural byproduct purchasing funds. 
So, all the local banks are adopting measures to recall funds 
one after the other. The RMB money market is extremely tight, 
and the State Council has now issued a notice that within the 
year it will abolish the foreign exchange quotas of foreign 
trade enterprises, causing some enterprises with rather large 
foreign exchange balances to sell off large quantities of 
foreign exchange. 
  Strong Measures Only Reap Temporary Effects 
  In another previous period when the banks forced enterprises 
that were hoarding foreign exchange to pay back, they also sold 
off large quantities of foreign exchange one after the other and 
rushed to convert it to RMB to pay back. With this background, 
the RMB exchange rate went straight up. At the same time, the 
Bank of China twice raised the savings interest rates, causing 
savings interest rates to reach double digits and temporarily 
calming the fear of devaluation of the RMB among Chinese 
citizens. It certainly was temporarily useful in restoring 
confidence in the RMB. 
  But it was all the temporary change of strict measures 
adopted by central authorities. With the passing of time, these 
central policies gradually lost their effectiveness and the RMB 
was further devalued. Because in the present situation the RMB 
is receiving more and more pressure, measures adopted by the 
central authorities cannot thoroughly eliminate pressure on the 
RMB. 
  The Balance of Payments Could Change From Surplus to 
Deficit 
  As regards the overall foreign trade situation, China is 
changing from a surplus to a deficit. From 1990 through 1992, 
the mainland had three successive years of surpluses and 
accumulated US$20 billion in foreign exchange. With the Bank of 
China's foreign exchange supply added, it totalled US$40 
billion. Since 1992 China's export situation has worsened. 
Imports have increased by 25 percent, but exports have only 
increased by 18 percent. This year the situation is even more 
serious. Imports are clearly greater than exports and the 
surplus is getting smaller and smaller. It is estimated that in 
the last half of this year, a deficit in the balance of payments 
will occur. Looking at the first half of this year, it is quite 
obvious that the lowering of the exchange rate on the RMB to 
help exports of Chinese enterprises by no means accomplished 
this result. China's present reduction in the money supply is 
leading to a rise in the RMB exchange rate and is even more 
unhelpful to the exports of Chinese enterprises, and China's 
balance of payments deficit could increase, thereby essentially 
creating greater pressure on the RMB. 
  Sustained growth of China's imports could lead to greater 
pressure on the RMB. According to mainland statistics for the 
past thirteen years, three months after every 100 million yuan 
increase in domestic investment, imports increase by about US$15 
million. In the recent rapid growth of the Chinese economy, the 
reason that the retrenchment policies adopted by the central 
authorities have not had the necessary effect is because the 
central authorities can only control the portion in the central 
plan and they can by no means control the large portion of 
provincial, municipal, and local investment and the investment 
outside the plan. If the central authorities adopt total 
retrenchment and administrative measures, it also could have a 
serious impact on the domestic economy. So, future imports could 
still increase greatly. Certainly, "restoration to the General 
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT)" also could force China to 
lower tariffs, leading to a large increase in imports. This 
obviously could increase pressure on the RMB. 
  It presently appears that the RMB exchange rate could 
temporarily decline, but it cannot be sustained. And once the 
RMB exchange rate declines again, the Chinese government 
obviously cannot use economic force to sell off large quantities 
of foreign exchange to safeguard the strength of the value of 
the RMB. Because the Chinese Government understands this, the 
exchange rate for the RMB will decline. It is necessary to 
promote exports and it is necessary to cope with the vigorous 
increase in imports after "restoration to GATT" and its impact 
on national industry. 
  High Estimate of the RMB Value Leads to Black Market 
Rates of Exchange 
  It is extremely obvious that China in not establishing a 
favorable balance of payments base for the stability of 
adjustments in the exchange rate, but using administrative 
methods to control and limit foreign exchange prices, ultimately 
can only create a high appraisal of the RMB. Individuals and 
companies that have foreign exchange do not want to take their 
foreign exchange to the adjustment market to sell, causing the 
foreign exchange adjustment market "to have a price, but no 
market." This situation can only promote the pouring of a large 
amount of foreign exchange into the black market for sale and 
China's black market value has for a time reached the high level 
of 11 yuan to the U.S. dollar. So, China's reform of the 
exchange rate will impel further devaluation of the RMB. 
Eliminating the foreign exchange quota and changing "quota 
controls" to "spot price controls" requires that the posted 
exchange rate price of the RMB be devalued to the level of the 
adjusted exchange rate, that is, from the current official rate 
of 5.8 yuan to the U.S. dollar to approximately 9 yuan. This 
will force the RMB exchange rate to be further devalued to 
between 8.5 and 10 yuan. 
  Foreign exchange black market trends are determined from the 
supply and demand relationship of RMB and foreign exchange. When 
foreign exchange supply and demand are unbalanced, the RMB can 
be devalued. But the domestic economy is presently contracting 
and issuance of RMB is controlled. The RMB could increase in 
value for a period of time and the the government could at the 
same time adopt measures to reduce the economy. So, a policy to 
tighten the RMB could temporarily support stability. But a 
rather great number of Chinese economists agree with this 
reporter that the goal of reducing the economy will not 
necessarily be effective and it is not easy to be optimistic 
about the situation. If it is not handled properly, serious 
inflation could quite possibly occur and control of the issuance 
of the RMB could be lost, causing further devaluation. 
  Agitation to devalue the RMB also causes Chinese citizens to 
develop a mentality anticipating devaluation. This mentality is 
extremely unhelpful to maintaining the stability of the RMB. 
From the present situation it appears that mainland citizens 
generally expect that the RMB could be devalued. There is 
insufficient confidence in the RMB, although the monthly 
interest on domestic foreign exchange deposits is only 3 
percent, two thirds or more lower than the interest on RMB 
deposits. But the vast majority of citizens still do not want to 
sell large quantities of foreign currency to buy RMB. Rather 
they have a tendency to save much foreign exchange to maintain 
their worth. According to this reporter's statistics, mainland 
citizens' private savings have reached US$10 billion, half the 
national foreign exchange reserves. It can be affirmed that in a 
short while, in addition to stocks, stockpiling foreign exchange 
will be mainland citizens' future way of maintaining their worth 
and the principal method of guarding against risks. With the 
trend of this kind of mentality of Chinese citizens, it will be 
very difficult to avoid further devaluation of the RMB. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59298 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   More High-Tech Enterprises Set Up in Shanghai </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  OW2012011393 Beijing XINHUA in English 0020 GMT 20 Dec 93 </F>
<F P=103> OW2012011393 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Shanghai, December 20 (XINHUA) -- 146 hi-tech 
enterprises have been approved this year in Shanghai, the 
leading industrial city in China, double the figure of last year. 
  The city now has 261 high-tech firms. 
  The enterprises cover micro-electronics, computers, fiber 
optic communications, bioengineering, lasers, space and aviation 
technology, and energy. 
  The total output value of these enterprises has exceeded 14 
billion yuan. Per capita output value and profit are much 
higher than in traditional industry. 
  Shanghai has outlined a number of preferential policies to 
encourage the development of hi-tech enterprises. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59299 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   First Bonded Zone Customs Opens in Tianjin </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  OW1812113493 Beijing XINHUA in English 1047 GMT 18 Dec 93 </F>
<F P=103> OW1812113493 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Tianjin, December 18 (XINHUA) -- The first customs 
post set up in one of China's bonded zones officially opened 
today in this north China port city. 
  Among the country's officially-approved 14 bonded zones, the 
one in Tianjin was established in May 1991, and went into 
commercial operation a year later. 
  So far, more than 1,600 foreign enterprises have registered 
at the customs office, which handled 17,000 declaration forms 
and goods valued at nearly 950 million U.S. dollars in its trial 
operation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59300 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> POPULATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shortcomings of Family Planning Assessment </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0158B Beijing RENKOU YANJIU [POPULATION RESEARCH] in 
Chinese No 83, 29 Sep 93 pp 62-64 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0158B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENKOU YANJIU [POPULATION RESEARCH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ma Lanmei (74356 5695 2734), party secretary in </F>
charge of family planning in Rugao City, Jiangsu Province: 
"Cursory Discussion of Shortcomings in the Performance 
Evaluations of Family Planning and Possible Remedies"] 
  [Excerpt] First, the target figures set in the performance 
evaluations are unrealistic, one and the same target is being 
assigned to lower levels, in a sweeping manner, at one time 
high, at one time low, or without differentiating between good 
and poor foundations at those lower levels. For instance, in the 
last few years, almost all the provinces and cities assigned a 
target of 15 per million as the norm for population birth rates. 
Taking Rugao as example, the city of Nantong assigned to Rugao 
an annual birth norm of 22,000 and a birthrate of 15 per 
million, while that city's actual birthrate for the last few 
years had only been around 10 per million, with around 15,000 
births. On the average, every village and township has a surplus 
of over 130 over the set birth norms, which also means that all 
these villages and townships, including even those that are 
backward in family planning work, can fulfill the norm without 
any effort. This has also the side effect that some regions that 
are backward in family planning work still feel very pleased 
with themselves because they have fulfilled the birthrate norm 
that had been assigned to them by higher authority, little 
caring that this was only possible because the target they were 
given had been set too loose. There are also other cases where 
equal targets were handed down, regardless of how large a 
disparity existed in the foundations of the different regions. 
The tendency will then be that region which have a very good 
working foundation, will need make no further effort, but may 
sit back and quietly await attainment of the target. But in the 
regions which originally had poor working foundations, it will 
then happen that their target is set very high, and since they 
will in that case anyhow not be able to fulfill their targets, 
they will assume a negative attitude, disheartened by the 
difficulties and the idea that all hard work would get them 
nowhere. Both these above-mentioned tendencies are having a 
detrimental effect on the further development of family planning 
work. 
  Second, the performance evaluation targets are too sweeping 
and too intricate; they are not scientific, and lack coherence 
and applicability. Targets are frequently set haphazardly, some 
targets set are later not checked, some items that ought to be 
checked had not been set down as required to be checked. No 
careful consideration is given to whether an item is reasonable, 
necessary, and useful, and as a result there are unpredictable 
changes in policy, there is no coherence between the targets, 
all this adding to the difficulties in the performance 
evaluations. For instance, for the evaluation of village and 
township populations in connection with the responsibility 
system for achieving the objectives of family planning, some 
counties (cities) will set five norms this year and ten norms 
next year, without inner connection between evaluation targets, 
and will thereby create difficulties for the actual operations. 
There are also some targets that are impracticable; for 
instance, the evaluation of the responsibility system for 
persons in the position of assistants in village and township 
family planning work, where norms had required strict abstinence 
from accepting dinner invitations and accepting gifts. There is 
simply no way to check things like that. Here, an evaluation can 
only rely on qualitative analysis or on the general impression. 
  Third, mere formalistic and insignificant performance 
evaluations. The special characteristics of these audits are 
that they don't touch on the realities, they merely pay lip 
service, appear on paper, or are stuck on walls. Sometimes false 
evaluations are prepared to humor higher authorities who want 
them for their investigations and appraisals by comparison. Some 
do not audit at ordinary times but prepare an estimation in 
place of a proper evaluation at the end of the year (or in the 
middle of the year). Others again do audit at ordinary times and 
keep records, then at the end of the year (or in the middle of 
the year) "play out their winning card," while those in higher 
authority will willfully add or reduce to balance things out. 
Others will again prepare performance evaluations in surges, 
sometimes they do and sometimes they do not, sometimes they are 
strict and sometimes they are lax, and sometimes they are 
ineffectual performance evaluations. 
  Four, no prior verification of the data in the statistical 
report forms submitted from towns and townships down to the 
villages in the areas under evaluation, and also no verification 
of the relevant registers of persons. This leaves loopholes, of 
which the units under evaluation may take advantage. Take, for 
instance, the case of a certain county that evaluated the actual 
performance of a town in 1990. The report form of the said 
village showed three persons with extra-plan births and 99 
percent plan-conforming births. On spot-checking two villages, 
there were indeed three persons with extra-plan births. Because 
the evaluating personnel did not first check the reports of 
birth conditions and register of persons submitted from the 
towns down to the villages, it was questionable whether these 
three extra-plan births had indeed originally been reported in 
the original report forms or whether it was fraudulently 
reported that checks had been made? The evaluating personnel had 
no clear idea about it. The unit that had been subjected to 
evaluation plausibly and at length also stated in support: It so 
happened that you precisely selected for investigation two of 
our aberrant villages, and you have indeed found out that in 
1990 there had been three extra-plan births throughout the 
entire town and township area area. Only after a lengthy 
reverification did the evaluating personnel come to know the 
true situation, namely that of the three extra-plan births, only 
one had been mentioned on the original report form, the other 
two were fraudulently reported. Similar cases must have happened 
many times during the performance evaluations. The units under 
evaluation frequently provide only the aggregate figures of the 
entire area, and do not provide the detailed figures and 
relevant registers of persons which villages and townships 
reported to the village organization, which would then allow 
getting hold of oversights and omissions, i.e. loopholes that 
some people will take advantage of. 
  Fifth, ignorance of the various ways in which units that are 
to be evaluated cope with evaluations and suitable 
countermeasures. To weather the critical evaluation process, 
some units that are to be evaluated adopt the strategy of 
"meeting a policy formulated by higher authority with 
countermeasures that will in fact inactivate that policy." Some 
will use every possible means, both hard and soft tactics, and 
will do their best to destroy or close off to access specimen 
points or draw lots to determine the specimen points. Others, 
after getting knowledge of the specimen points, will get busy 
day and night to fabricate false ledgers, false report forms, 
false birth records, false immunization certificates, etc. Some 
will even conspire with non-family planning households and 
people not practicing birth control, teaching them methods to 
cope with the performance evaluation, forming a united front 
against the outside. Others, about whom some shortcomings have 
been discovered would try at all costs to buy over the 
investigators, and with soft and hard tactics ask for data to be 
changed. On the other hand, some of our evaluating personnel, 
faced with these tricks to counter the performance evaluations, 
either are ignorant of the facts, or lack countermeasures, or, 
knowing that it is wrong, participate in these doings. This will 
have the performance evaluation become permeated with falsehoods 
and get it completely out of shape. 
  Sixth, specimen points are either too few or too many, which 
gives rise to two tendencies, one is to generalize basing on one 
partial aspect, and the other is tiring the people and draining 
the treasury. For instance, if a certain provincial party 
organization institutes sample evaluations in 33 counties 
(cities) ranked as key family planning administrations, and then 
uses the evaluation results as data to determine whether to 
abrogate their designation as key county (city) family planning 
administrations. In evaluations of such great import, one county 
(city) should only select three village work teams, i.e. one 
county (city) should select three towns and townships, each of 
these, in turn, to select one village. In a certain city where 
the actual level of family planning work is low, it so happens 
that three well-grounded "cun" villagers' work teams were chosen 
for evaluation. In that case, it will be a smooth process for 
the province to abrogate the designation of "laggard in family 
planning" for that city. If, instead, three poorly qualified 
villagers' work teams would have been selected, the designation 
of "laggard in family planning" would certainly not have been 
abrogated. Then there is the example of a certain province which 
in November of 1992 instituted a 1 percent sample investigation 
of family planning work throughout the province, choosing a very 
large number of specimen points, in general around 100 for each 
county (city). The huge expenditure of manpower, money, and time 
proved simply too much to bear for some of the economically less 
fortunate regions. It stands to reason that with so many 
specimen points, the investigation should have shown outstanding 
success, but not having given sufficient consideration to such 
problems as mentioned under numbers 4, 5, and 7 of the 
above-listed shortcomings, the malaise was not cured. As a 
result, in some few places misrepresentations abounded, and that 
had a serious detrimental effect on the actual outcome of the 
evaluation. 
  Seventh, the personal quality of a few of the evaluating 
personnel is deficient, as is their sense of principle. Some of 
the cadres in the regions under evaluation are not very 
proficient in their routine work, but prove masters in coping 
with performance evaluations. They have high standards in the 
cordial reception and treatment of evaluation personnel. Top 
leaders of party and government will make a personal appearance, 
and in addition to feasting and other excellent treatment, gifts 
will also be presented. Some will even pronounce that regardless 
of costs no shortcomings must be discovered in the evaluation. 
On the other hand, some of our investigators are, ideologically, 
not of high quality. After having accepted favors, they become 
pliable, kindnesses oblige, some violate discipline by 
abolishing or closing off access to specimen points prior to 
evaluation, some falsify investigation results according to the 
wishes of the unit under evaluation, and some close one eye to 
problems. No wonder that some people say, evaluation personnel 
come with one small empty bag, but leave with several bulging 
bags. What practical use are performance evaluations of this 
kind? [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59301 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> POPULATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Unplanned Births of `Unintended' Type </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0158A Beijing RENKOU YANJIU [POPULATION RESEARCH] in 
Chinese No 83, 29 Sep 93 pp 60-61 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0158A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENKOU YANJIU [POPULATION RESEARCH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lu Wenhuai (0712 2429 2037), Liaoning Population </F>
Information Center: "Analysis of Extra-Plan Pregnancies of the 
`Unintended' Type"] 
  [Excerpt] The term "extra-plan pregnancies" in the present 
article refers to pregnancies that occur contrary to the birth 
policy laid down in local (provincial, centrally controlled 
municipality, and autonomous region) family planning 
regulations. In recent years, a particular kind of extra-plan 
pregnancies has come to the attention of the family planning 
administration throughout the area of Liaoning Province and 
Municipality. The intention in these cases of extra-plan 
pregnancies is not at all to bear another child in excess of the 
legal limit, but clearly, or not so clearly, the intention here 
is otherwise. I call this phenomenon extra-plan pregnancies of 
the "unintended" type. Even though occurrences are rather few, 
they are on the increase, and they, furthermore, form an 
important part of the larger group of extra-plan pregnancies in 
the region. Undoubtedly, these extra-plan pregnancies of the 
"unintended" type are a new problem that has arisen in the 
present urban population and family planning administration, and 
it deserves our attention and study. 
  1. Groups, Causes, and Characteristics of "Unintended" Type 
Extra-Plan Pregnancies 
  There are mainly two groups of "unintended" extra-plan 
pregnancies. In the first group the intention is to use the 
extra-plan pregnancy as a kind of capital. When the government 
agencies or the units concerned are after them to take remedial 
measures, these people demand that certain economic problems or 
social problems be resolved for them first, and that they would 
take remedial measures only after that has been done for them. 
The economic problems to which they ask for help, generally 
comprise: their employment, their transfer to another line of 
occupation, work, or work place, increases in wages or 
allowances, asking for some kind of financial help, demanding 
help in resolving some housing difficulty or to improve their 
present housing, asking and to resolve some other economic 
dispute. The social problems generally comprise: reinstatement 
in a job after transfer or dismissal from an enterprise, 
demanding punishment for unit leaders or other personnel whom 
they accuse of "unfairness," and demanding resolution of other 
social disputes. All the above methods, whether economically or 
socially motivated, are conscious plans to get what they want by 
means of an extra-plan pregnancy; they may therefore be 
considered the "means to an end" type pregnancies. 
  The second group may be called the "accidental" type. There 
had been no intention to get pregnant, yet pregnancy 
unexpectedly occurred. They generally comprise: unexpected 
pregnancies due to illicit cohabitation, unexpected pregnancies 
due to prostitution, and unexpected pregnancies in cases of 
marriages before the legal marriageable ages. 
  The occurrence and increase of the "unintended" extra-plan 
pregnancies are not at all fortuitous phenomena. Let us first 
look at them from the angle of social change and social 
psychology. Reform and opening up are large social 
transformations; they have upset the norms of traditional 
behavior without establishing new behavioral norms. In this kind 
of a transitional period from old to new, all kinds of complex 
economic contradictions and social contradictions may arise. The 
people's mentality also will undergo great changes, and some 
people may develop an abnormal mentality and behave as if out of 
control. For instance, people, who for a long time remain 
unemployed in this society, are frequently developing serious 
psychic depressions, while personnel let out of enterprises on 
long leave may become suffering from inferiority complexes and 
may act out their discontent in obnoxious ways. 
  Second, in some cases of warped mentalities and 
out-of-control behavior, and prevelent, unhealthy social 
practices, the effect is adding fuel to the flames. There are, 
for instance, some responsible cadres in certain units who 
handle cases unfairly, use public office for private gain, 
misuse the powers of office, and subject people to injustices. 
When things become critical, the people who have been treated 
unjustly will try even the score by going to extremes. There are 
also people who are afflicted with inflated egos, who place 
money above all other considerations, who will turn right and 
wrong upside down, and who viciously cause trouble for no reason 
and use coercion against the party organization. 
  Third, the important position that family planning is now 
occupying as a fundamental state policy gives some people the 
wrong idea that here is a chance for bribery. At present, one 
"negative vote" in matters of family planning can already 
constitute a rigid indicator that will be critical in the 
assessment of a particular unit's performance, which, in turn, 
will have a direct bearing on the economic interests of the 
responsible cadres and the entire personnel of the unit in 
question. When people in such a situation will be looking for an 
opportunity to stir up trouble and to intensify the 
contradiction, they will think it a most powerful move to play 
the "extra-plan pregnancy" card. In the past, in the course of 
family planning and service activities, some agencies in charge 
had indeed rendered warmhearted assistance to some households of 
child-rearing ages that had gotten into genuine difficulties. 
Such normal cases may have aroused in a small number of people 
an abnormal and obnoxious motivation, having them erroneously 
assume that it would be possible by means of extra-plan 
pregnancies to "gain some illicit profit" and take undue 
advantage of a situation for one's own benefit. 
  Finally, in recent years, changes have occurred in Chinese 
social relations as to such concepts as chastity and marriage. 
The dirty dregs of prostitution have resurfaced, and unmarried 
cohabitation and underage marriages are widespread. This has had 
the numbers of "accidental" type and "unintended" type 
extra-plan pregnancies increase without any sign of abating, and 
has become a social phenomenon that is causing grave concern. 
  The following are some of the characteristics of the 
"unintended" type of extra-plan pregnancies: 
  1) Inferior quality of the relevant person as a work 
subject. 
Using extra-plan pregnancies as capital and as a means to make 
unjustified demands against the party organization are generally 
actions by a small number of people of inferior mentality and 
low level of general education. Some of these people have done 
time in the two institutions of "reform through labor" (reform 
of criminals through labor, reeducation of juvenile delinquents 
through labor), some are vagrant riffraff. Illicit relations 
between the two sexes and subsequent pregnancies are also mostly 
occurring among people of inferior personal quality. 
  2) The arduous nature of efforts at solution of the problem. 
If the relevant person as a work subject is not of a somewhat 
higher type, it is often the case that the conflict between the 
individual and the party organization has sharpened to a certain 
extent, that the individual believes that his problem cannot be 
resolved in a normal way, and that he will then heartlessly 
strike out in the wrong way and play the "extra-plan pregnancy" 
card. Behind what outwardly appears a simple "extra-plan 
pregnancy" phenomenon there is hidden in the background a 
complex contradiction, and effective resolution of these types 
of problems is a very thorny affair. 
  3) Widespread involvement of many departments and units. The 
economic and social contradictions that are background to 
"unintended" extra-plan pregnancies frequently involve many 
sectors of society, such as public health, civil affairs, 
industrial and communications, urban construction, public 
safety, and judicial departments. The contradictions cannot 
possibly be resolved by merely relying on the family planning 
departments. These types of contradictions involve a large 
number of large and small units of society. On the other hand, 
during the economic reform, the leadership system of many units 
has changed, the organizational structure has been abolished, 
and personnel has changed. Some units have even been completely 
abolished or merged, and all this has created many unbelievable 
difficulties for the resolution of the said contradictions. 
  4) The changing nature in the types of objectives. 
Regardless 
of whether the "unintended" extra-plan pregnancies had been of 
the "means to an end" type or of the "accidental" type, the 
initial and original objectives of the persons involved may not 
have been a childbirth in excess of the plan limits, but rather 
to take on manifestly the role of an extra-plan pregnancy. 
Following the many changes in such factors as the external 
environmental conditions, the eruption of contradictions and 
their treatment, the internal motivations in the pregnant 
persons may also change. If the problem is not dealt with 
appropriately, the objective pursued by the person having the 
extra-plan pregnancy may change from the intention of not having 
a childbirth to the intention of having a childbirth. Each case 
of this kind of a "pregnancy situation"; therefore, entails an 
extra-plan birth and the danger of it. 
  2. "Unintended" Extra-Plan Pregnancies Pose New Tasks for 
the 
Administration of Urban Family Planning 
  According to investigations conducted in a certain large 
city 
of Liaoning Province, it was found that although urban family 
planning work been a primary concern in recent years, 
nonetheless, many new situations and new problems gave arisen. 
Although the "unintended" type extra-plan pregnancies 
occurences are few, the tendency has been to develop from 
nothing to something and from few occurrences to many 
occurrences. For instance, in one city ward, from January to 
May in 1992 and in 1993, there were 62 cases of persons with 
extra-plan pregnancies doing ideological mobilization work, 
along with the participation of the party secretary in charge of 
family planning. A later analysis established that 38 cases 
were of the "unintended" type, i.e. 61.3 percent. The analysis 
showed that extra-plan pregnancies of the "unintended" types 
were the highest, floating population was second, and 
extra-plan pregnancies among personnel residents in who wanted 
more children was third. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59302 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> TRANSPORTATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Fujian Concentrates on Highway Construction </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  OW2012024093 Beijing XINHUA in English 0212 GMT 20 Dec 93 </F>
<F P=103> OW2012024093 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XINHUA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> English </F>
Article Type:BFN 

  [Text] Fuzhou, December 20 (XINHUA) -- Highway construction 
in Fujian Province is continuing in full swing through the 
winter season. 
  A provincial official in charge of transport said that this 
south-east China Province had already spent about 700 million 
yuan on laying 400 kilometers of roadbed this year. 
  "The high-grade highway in the province will be extended by 
241 kilometers by the end of this year," the official said. 
  Fujian is one of the provinces which piloted in the reforms 
and opening further to the outside world, and its economy has 
developed more rapidly over the past decade and more. 
  But its economic development has been hampered by poor 
transport facilities due to historical factors and geographic 
conditions. 
  To solve the bottleneck problem, Fujian last year decided to 
invest more in highway construction. 
  According to the decision, the province would build a 400- 
kilometer-long expressway running from Fuzhou, capital of Fujian 
Province, to Xiamen, one of China's special economic zones, and 
Zhangzhou in the southern province, and upgrade and expand five 
national and one provincial highways and a number of trunk 
highways to form a transport network. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59303 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Impact of GATT on Grain Output </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0097A Beijing ZHONGGUO NONGCUN JINGJI [CHINA'S RURAL 
ECONOMY] in Chinese No 9, 20 Sep 93 pp 48-51 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0097A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO NONGCUN JINGJI [CHINA'S RURAL 
ECONOMY] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Jiyuan (7115 0679 0337) and Deng Yiming </F>
(6772 0001 7686) of the Rural Development Research Institute, 
Chinese Academy of Social Sciences: "A Discussion of China's 
`Re-entry in GATT,' its Impact on Grain Production and Policy 
Recommendations"] 
  [Text] As China imports rather large quantities of grain 
every year, the main topics of analysis in this article are what 
beneficial and detrimental effects China's re-accession in GATT 
will have on China's grain system and what policies should be 
adopted to deal with these problems. 
  I. Analysis of Future of China's Grain Trading in the 
World Market 
  A basic question to ask before discussing how China's 
"re-entry in GATT" will impact on China's grain system is: 
Looking ahead, will China be importing or exporting grain? In 
1962-1991, China imported a total of 157.231 million tons of 
grain, at an average rate of 5.42 million tons annually. Looking 
ahead, and basing our estimate on the 1962-1991 average annual 
grain import rate of 5.42 million tons, China's grain imports 
will reach 50 million tons by the year 2000. We came to this 
conclusion after analyzing the following grain supply and demand 
trends in China. 
  (A) Analyzed from the standpoint of grain demand, the 
factors 
which influence grain demand increase are increase in population 
and rise in per capita income. China's population by century's 
end will be close to 1.3 billion. The annual population increase 
will add an additional grain demand of 3.15 million tons, using 
as estimates 200 kilo of grain consumption per capita and an 
annual increase of 15.75 million people. Rise in per capita 
income will also increase demand for grain. In many developing 
countries in the Asia Pacific area, the elastic rates of demand 
for grain relative to income range between 0.4-0.9; based on our 
analysis, China's elastic rate of demand for grain relative to 
income is 0.6. In recent years, the adjusted rate of our 
national economic development has been 8 percent, suggesting 
that the per capita income has also increased by a similar 
margin. Even the lowest estimate puts the rate of increase at 5 
percent. Using the following formula for calculating the rate of 
grain demand increase: D = P + eg &lt;sup&gt; 1&lt;/sup&gt;  (in 
which D is the rate of grain demand increase, P the rate of 
population increase, g the rate of per capita income increase, 
and e the elastic rate of grain demand relative to income), 
therefore D = 1.4 percent + 5 percent x 0.6 percent = 4.4 
percent. 
  (B) Analyzed from the standpoint of grain supply, the 3.1 
percent average annual rate of increase in 1950-1975 dropped to 
2.9 percent in 1975-1985, and further to 2.2 percent in 
1985-1992. The rates of grain supply increase are trending 
downward. It is estimated that by century's end, China's grain 
output will reach 520 million tons, with an average annual rate 
of increase of 1.9 percent. The reasons the rates of increase 
are dropping are: 
  1. Decreased amount of farmland under cultivation. From 
1957-1991, a total of 243 million mu of farmland were taken out 
of cultivation, an average of some 7 million mu per year. 
  2. Decline in soil quality in farmland under cultivation. 
According to statistics of China's Second Soil Quality Survey, 
the proportion of phosphorous-poor land was 59.1 percent of all 
farmland under cultivation, the proportion of farmland lacking 
potassium was 22.4 percent, and the proportion of farmland 
lacking both ingredients was 13.8 percent. Farmland with less 
than 0.6 percent of organic contents constituted 10.6 percent of 
the total area under cultivation. 
  3. Aging water conservancy facilities. A majority of water 
conservancy facilities were built in the 1950-1960 era, and all 
of these are aging. In 1978, only 55.4 percent of the irrigated 
farmland was irrigated by motorized or electric means; in 1991, 
it was 57.8 percent, an increase of only 2.4 percent in 13 years. 
  4. Prospects of increasing fertilizer use to boost grain 
production are not bright. The reasons are: a) In 1991, 
fertilizer use in China per hectare of cultivated land already 
reached 249 kilo, which is close to the fertilizer usage 
standard of developed countries, and further increase in the use 
of chemical fertilizer will not marginally increase grain 
productivity by much. b) Slowing down of peasant income increase 
means peasants lack the purchasing power to buy chemical 
fertilizer. Summarizing the above, the rate of grain supply 
increase by the year 2000 is likely to be around 2 percent. 
Thus, the rate of grain demand increase in China will exceed the 
rate of grain supply increase, with a differential of 2.5 
percent between the two. The gap between supply and demand by 
the year 2000 will be 50 million tons, requiring on average an 
annual import of 5.55 million tons, or over 50 percent of the 
world's grain exports. Looking ahead, therefore, China will 
likely become one of the world's largest grain importing 
countries. This is the basic finding in our analysis of the 
impact of "re-entry in GATT" on China's grain system. 
  Impact of "Re-entry in GATT" on China's Grain System 
  For a long period of time, world grain trade has not been 
subjected to control by the basic principles and regulations of 
GATT. Countries with developed market economies have all 
extended large financial subsidies to grain production by 
imposing quota or tariffs on grain imports and by subsidizing 
grain exports. Since the 1970's, developing countries have 
changed from subordinating grain producers in the interest of 
industrial development to protecting the former. Among Asia's 
most rapidly developing economies of Japan, Korea, China's 
Taiwan Province, all of them are now paying large subsidies to 
grain producers. This is by no means accidental. 
  1. Comparing grain production with manufacturing production, 
the former has a long production cycle, slow capital turnaround, 
low utilization rate of fixed assets, and very slow transfer of 
values. Manufacturing industries, on the other hand, have a 
short production cycle, fast turnaround of capital, high 
utilization rate of fixed assets, and rapid transfer of values; 
furthermore, manufacturing industries can, by enlarging the 
scope of manufacturing or increasing the number of factories, 
expand the overall scale of production, and can manipulate the 
time factors involved to expand the scope of production. Grain 
production, however, is limited by the area under cultivation, 
which allows little leeway for expanded production, and even 
less in terms of shortening the time frame required for grain 
production. 
  2. Grain production is easily exposed to ravages of weather, 
plant diseases and pests, and the ratio of input and output in 
production can usually not be guaranteed. On the contrary, 
manufacturing industries are seldom the victims of seasonal 
weather or natural disasters. 
  3. The price elasticity in grain supply and demand is not 
only lower than that of manufactured products, but also lower 
than those of other economic crops and animal food products. In 
terms of the elastic theory of supply and demand, the less 
elasticity in supply and demand, the greater the changes in 
prices linked to changes in fixed supply or demand. Therefore, 
[to deal with grain imports after China's re-entry in GATT] 
government interventions will be necessary not only within 
China, but at its borders as well. 
  4. The rate of grain price increase is slower than that of 
manufactured products. This is because manufactured products 
have numerous processing outlets, and with the completion of 
each processing cycle, prices are increased accordingly. Even if 
grain were to undergo further processing, however, the scope of 
processing would be limited and the rate of subsequent price 
rise rather slow. China will therefore have to support [its 
domestic] grain prices. 
  Summarizing the above, it is our judgment that China must 
stand on the principle of grain self-sufficiency and, since 
coordination on a worldwide basis is lacking, China must take 
steps to protect its own grain producers and to intervene in 
grain imports and exports at the border. This is a basic 
principle China must adhere to after "re-entering GATT." 
  (A) Beneficial Effects of "re-entry in GATT" on China's 
grain 
system. 
  1. The ultimate objective of the GATT negotiations is to 
promote free trade worldwide; only with free trade can capital 
be most efficiently allocated on a worldwide basis, which in 
turn can provide the impetus to individual countries to expand 
and develop production. Trade protectionism however interferes 
with efficient allocation of capital. At present, China's grain 
trade is basically not being protected. China has very low 
tariffs on grain, and in particular, none on the import of 
husked rice. China poses no obstacles to any negotiations to 
reduce tariffs on grain imports. After China's "re-entry in 
GATT"; however, world market grain prices will likely rise 
across the board. According to analyses of the U.N. Food and 
Agriculture Organization, if trade restrictions were eliminated 
by all developed market economy countries, prices of wheat would 
rise by 20 percent, coarse grain by 16 percent and husked rice 
by 14 percent. If free trade were engaged in by all 
wheat-trading countries, world market price of wheat would rise 
by 11 percent, and market price fluctuations reduced by 35 
percent2. 
  Based on our analysis, if the United States eliminated grain 
export subsidies, world grain prices would rise by 10 percent. 
See table 1. 


---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 1. Comparison of U.S. and World Grain Export Prices ($/ton)         | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|              |U.S. Share Wo-|World Grain   |U.S. Grain    |Difference    | 
|              |rld           |              |              |              | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Year          |Grain Export %|Export Price  |Export Price  |%             | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1975          |47.0          |162.3         |154.2         |5.0           | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1976          |48.5          |144.6         |132.0         |8.7           | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1977          |44.9          |130.2         |112.6         |13.5          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1978          |49.1          |137.2         |121.2         |11.6          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1979          |51.9          |155.7         |137.4         |11.8          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1980          |50.6          |182.2         |157.5         |13.6          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1981          |48.2          |187.7         |168.7         |10.1          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1982          |45.4          |163.5         |143.7         |12.1          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1983          |43.7          |159.3         |151.6         |4.9           | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1984          |43.8          |159.2         |159.2         |0             | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1985          |35.7          |141.3         |141.3         |0             | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1986          |30.4          |131.7         |114.9         |12.8          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1987          |38.4          |118.0         |92.8          |21.2          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1988          |43.2          |144.3         |119.8         |16.9          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1989          |45.9          |163.0         |139.6         |14.4          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Average       |44.5          |152.0         |136.4         |10.3          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source of data: statistical calculations from Handbook on China and World | 
|Grain Data, edited by Wang Xinhua [3769 2450 5478], pp 227-231.           | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Table 1 illustrates two issues clearly: a) The years in 
which 
U.S. export subsidies were low, grain exports also decreased. In 
1984-1985, U.S. subsidies were very low, and U.S. grain exports 
as a proportion of the world export market were only 35.7 
percent, but with world grain supplies thus reduced, grain 
prices shot up; b) if the United States eliminated export 
subsidies, world grain prices would rise by 10 percent. 
Therefore, after China "re-enters GATT," and assuming all the 
grain exporting countries eliminated export subsidies and trade 
restrictions (though elimination per se is extremely difficult 
to carry out), then world grain prices would generally rise; and 
if China's grain enterprises were operating by market mechanism, 
domestic grain prices would also rise and this would benefit 
China's grain producers. 
  2. In terms of the overall multilateral trading system, 
however, China as a country also exports agricultural products, 
and with the gradual relaxation of agricultural protectionism, 
China's agricultural products will gain a larger share of the 
world market. In addition, with the lifting of trade 
restrictions, prices of world agricultural products will rise 
which will increase the export earnings of China's agricultural 
products. As an indirect consequence, China's peasant income 
will also rise, which will lead to greater inputs and 
accelerated development in grain production. 
  B. Detrimental Effects of "Re-try in GATT" on China's Grain 
Output 
  1) China's main grain import is wheat. In 1991, wheat 
imports 
totalled 12.37 million tons, accounting for 92 percent of all 
grain imports that year. But China's wheat market price is 
higher than the world market price. In 1992, China's domestic 
wheat price was $146.55 per ton, while the world market price 
(i.e. U.S. Chicago future price) was $126 per ton.3 
Yet, the quality of China's wheat is lower than that of imported 
wheat. The wheat-to-flour ratio of China's wheat is lower than 
the United States by 7-8 percentage points. Assuming that all 
tariffs and non-tariff barriers were eliminated by wheat trading 
countries, the world market price of wheat would rise by 11 
percent to $140.6 per ton, calculated on the basis of the 1992 
world market price of $126 per ton. That price will still be 
lower than China's domestic wheat price. Therefore, after 
"re-entering GATT," China's wheat production will face the 
difficulties of high price and low quality. Large quantities of 
wheat from abroad will pour into China, invading our domestic 
market and causing our wheat market price to drop. China's wheat 
producers will be the victims. 
  2) China is a major importer of world grain; in 1991, China 
imported 13.45 million tons of grain, paying $1.64 billion in 
foreign exchange. After "re-entry in GATT," if world grain 
prices were to rise by 11 percent, then China would have to pay 
a total of $1.8 billion. Based on the 5.8 [yuan to the dollar] 
exchange rate, China's consumers will be paying 1.044 billion 
yuan more than before China's "re-entry in GATT." The government 
will also be sacrificing its precious foreign exchange reserves. 
  3) At present, a majority of grain are procured and sold by 
the government. Prices are also set by the government. This 
therefore severs any linkage between the domestic market and 
world market. Turbulence in world market grain prices cannot be 
transmitted to China itself. After "re-entry in GATT," however, 
China's domestic grain market will be linked up with the world 
grain market, and thus the latter's price turbulence will be 
felt inside China; this linkage will increase the rate and 
extent of grain market turbulence and add to the cost as well as 
difficulties of macro regulation and control on the part of the 
government. 
  4) After "re-entry in GATT," large quantities of grain from 
abroad will pour into China and greatly lower our domestic grain 
prices. This will reduce the peasant labor inputs in grain 
production and generate more surplus labor to add to the already 
large pool of surplus labor. 
  III. Main Policy Recommendations For Before and After 
China's "Re- entry in GATT" 
  A. Protect domestic grain producers 
  It is our judgment that China's "re-entry in GATT" will have 
greater detrimental than beneficial impact on China's grain 
system, and that unfavorable effects will outweigh favorable 
ones. We should therefore make use of those GATT articles which 
operate in China's favor to strengthen protection of and subsidy 
for our grain producers. 
  B. Strengthen border interventions in grain trade 
  China's tariffs on grain imports are very low; there is none 
on rice. In the circumstances where China's grain prices are 
close to or exceeding world market prices, China should carry 
out import quota control by continuing the system of issuing 
import permits. Although GATT Article 11 prescribes that: "Any 
contracting party will not establish or maintain quota, export 
or import permit or other measures to control or restrict the 
import of products from territories of other contracting 
parties, except for purposes of collecting taxes and other 
expenses," a GATT-prescribed "protective article" does allow the 
contracting parties to control both the quantities and values of 
goods permitted for import in order to protect the importing 
countries' external financial positions and international 
revenues and expenditures. On the basis of this article, China 
can utilize non-tariff measures or other means to control 
imports of grain from aboard in order to protect China's grain 
producers and other trades utilizing surplus labor. 
  C. Quicken the pace of grain market reform 
  From the standpoint of the fundamental principles of GATT, 
the essence of GATT is to promote a system of free trade based 
on market-oriented economy. From the perspective of this basic 
principle, there is still great disparity between that goal and 
China's current grain market reforms. Although some one-half of 
China's provinces and municipalities have freed their grain 
markets, the basic system at present is still a "dual-track 
system." If we want to re-enter GATT, we must quicken the pace 
of market-oriented reforms. 
  D. Implement the linkage between China's domestic grain 
market and the world market. To carry this out, we need to take 
the following concrete steps: 
  1) We should encourage grain export organizations and 
domestic grain enterprises to develop toward a market economy. 
We should establish and perfect a sales and service network 
oriented toward the world market. 
  2) We should adjust the composition of grain varieties and 
raise the quality of grain for exports. China now exports coarse 
grain, soybean and maize. Because their qualities are rather 
low, they lack international competitiveness. In pricing, we 
should differentiate quality by price. We should increase the 
area for cultivation of high- quality rice, soybean and maize. 
We should apply one unified international standard for all grain 
exports, and abolish the present dual domestic and international 
standards. 
  3) In grain production, we should import high-grade 
varieties 
and advanced techniques from abroad and raise both these areas 
to international standards. 
  E. Quickly establish and perfect a two-stage system of grain 
reserve and storage. 
  In order to complete the linkage of China's domestic market 
to the world markets, where turbulence in world grain prices 
will be transmitted to China's domestic market, we need to 
establish a domestic grain reserve and storage system which will 
alleviate the impact of imports due to world grain price 
fluctuations. 
  In summary, only if we conscientiously complete our 
preparatory work before re-accession in GATT will we be able, 
after entering that organization, to minimize the adverse impact 
it will have on China's grain system. 
Footnotes: 
  1. Cf. John Myers: Developmental Agricultural 
Economics. p 72 
  2. Cf. United Nations Food and Agricultural Organization 
edit: Agricultural Pricing Policies. p 175 
  3. Based on exchange rate of renminbi 5.8 yuan to one U.S. 
dollar. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59304 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Control Yuan Report Lists Wealthiest Officials </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0060A Taipei HSIN HSIN WEN [THE JOURNALIST] in Chinese 
No 345, 23 Oct 93 pp 34-38, 41-42 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0060A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei HSIN HSIN WEN [THE JOURNALIST] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ch'iu Ming-hui (6726 6900 6540) and Yang </F>
Sheng-ju (2799 2573 0320): "Billionaire Politicians; Midas Touch 
Financial Management Skill"] 
  [Excerpts] If the report of the assets of government 
officials that the Control Yuan published on 9 October were to 
be sent to Chin-shih-tang Bookstores throughout the province, it 
would certainly make the bestseller list. Even though it might 
not place first, it would certainly be the most captivating book 
this week. 
  This special publication not only satisfies the curiosity of 
the general public about the wealth of high officials, but it 
also virtually changes the views of many people about 
government. Everyone finds, to their astonishment, that without 
money, one is virtually unable to practice politics. 
Furthermore, money means not just NT$1 million, but NT$10 
million, or even NT$100 million. 
  Of the 90 public servants whose wealth was published, it is 
estimated that, surprisingly, 14 had assets of as much as NT$100 
million, and if President Li Teng-hui, who bought a villa at 
Tahsishan Village is included, one sixth of the public servants 
have a personal worth of NT$1 billion. 
  Twelve of them are government officials, including Prime 
Minister Lien Chan [6647 2067], Minister of Interior Wu 
Po-hsiung [0709 0130 7160], Control Yuan members K'o Ming-mou 
[2688 2494 6180] and Li Shen-i [2621 0135 0001], ministers 
without portfolio Kuo Yuan-jung [6753 1238 1369] and Huang 
Shih-ch'eng [7806 4258 1004], Examination Yuan President Ch'iu 
Ch'uang-huan [6726 0482 3562], Judicial Yuan President Lin 
Yang-kang [2651 3152 3263], Grand Justice Li Chih-p'eng [2621 
1877 7720], President's Office Secretary General Chiang Yen-shih 
[5592 1750 1102], and Deputy Director of the Planning Commission 
for Recovery of Mainland China Yeh Chin-feng [0673 6855 7685]. 
To use the term "diamond line-up" for this top echelon of power 
is no overstatement. 
  Not long after issuance of the Control Yuan communique, the 
latest popular opinion poll fully reflected the people's 
concerns. Fifty-one percent of the public felt that government 
officials whose property holdings were reported had more money 
than they thought. Another 46 percent of those interviewed 
believed that these government officials could not have 
accumulated their present wealth from their fixed salaries. 
  In other words, unless their ancestors passed tremendous 
family wealth along to them, or unless they had a wife or an 
investment advisor who was skilled at investing and managing 
wealth to help them rake in money every day, these billionaire 
government officials apparently deserved to be scrutinized by 
Minister of Justice Ma Ying-chiu [7456 5391 0046], who daily 
shouts his intention to crack down on grafters. 
  Careful scrutiny of this list of names shows some have lived 
up to the story of "the sparrow that turned into a phoenix." Who 
can imagine that an utterly destitute youth who had to go 
everywhere to collect animal dung for his family use, could, 
after several decades as a government official, suddenly shake 
himself and become transformed into someone having a billion New 
Taiwan dollars in assets. Challenged by the outside world, quite 
a few government officials frequently "cry foul," saying that 
their assets have been overestimated. However, for people like 
Lien Chan and Wu Po-hsiung, who were born with silver spoons in 
their mouths, whether they are truly worth a billion is not 
important. Possibly more important is how this great wealth 
should be handled. 
  Lien Chan, who has such good luck that even the sea gives 
way 
before him, and Wu Po-hsiung, whose only remaining constituency 
is Alishan, but who absolutely will not withdraw from the race 
for provincial governor, have been termed two immensely wealthy 
government officials; they are indeed. The wealth of both comes 
from land, and they also hold substantial bank shares. The 
difference between them is that Lien Chan's wealth stems not 
only from his father, Lien Chen-tung's [6647 7201 2639] 
patrimony, but also from his mother who reportedly was also 
quite adept at money management. In addition, he married Fang Yu 
[2455 3768], a well-educated woman from a well-to-do family. As 
a result of the combination of money and power, he has become 
known as the most wealthy government official since the removal 
of the Republic of China to Taiwan. This is no overstatement at 
all. 
  Just how wealthy is Lien Chan? Leaving aside his large 
tracts 
of land and real estate, and just looking at the value and the 
variety of the jewelry that his wife displays, for which 
possibly a whole drawer must be set aside, is enough to shame 
wives of officials who are not wealthy enough to declare their 
wealth. This is because the jewelry that Fang Yu wears on each 
occasion costs NT$1 million at minimum. Jewelry that costs less 
than a seven digit figure is apparently not to her liking. 
  Therefore, people joke that if ever Fang Yu takes it into 
her head to show off all of her jewelry, she will wear NT$3.5 
million worth of yellow gold rings on her hands, diamond 
earrings worth NT$2 million in her ears, necklaces of the finest 
jade worth NT$1.2 million around her neck, brooches worth 
several hundred thousand new Taiwan dollars on her chest, wear a 
name brand diamond wristwatch and name brand clothing, and carry 
a name brand purse. She will be like NT$10 million that can move 
right before your eyes. 
  Given the Lien family's circumstances and Fang Yu's 
background, the Control Yuan report figures may be somewhat low. 
Other antiques and works of art are not included in the report. 
People will find it hard to believe that the Lien family does 
not have a single calligraphy scroll or antique worth 
NT$200,000. Furthermore, the Lien family has invested more than 
HK$170 million in establishing the Yungsheng Investment 
Corporation, but information about how profitable this has been 
is also lacking in the report. 
  Although the value of Wu Po-hsiung's real estate holdings is 
far less, he has savings amounting to more than NT$42 million, a 
figure that Lien Chan cannot match. Wu Po-hsiung's wife, Tai 
Mei-yu [2071 5019 3768], does not come from a well-to-do family 
like Fang Yu. Tai Mei-yu's father was killed in battle in 
Southeast Asia during the Japanese occupation period; thus, she 
grew up in the home of Wu Po-hsiung, Wu's father bringing her 
up. For this reason, when the family land was parceled out, Wu 
Po-hsiung received one portion more than the other brothers. 
  Wu Po-hsiung comes from a family of medical doctors. In 
addition to the New Citizens Hospital, which he inherited from 
his ancestors, he has quite a large amount of other property. 
When this report on property was made, because of the difficulty 
in calculations resulting from the different apportionment among 
the brothers, there was some delay. Although Wu Po-hsiung 
studied enterprise management, he rarely manages his own 
finances. He has a special investment advisor to handle his 
financial affairs. Tai Mei-yu may carry as much as NT$10,000 in 
her purse, and if she uses it all, she can replenish it each 
day. Like Lien Chan, Wu Po-hsiung also set up an investment 
corporation -- the Chih-Te Investment Corporation -- in which he 
invested NT$140 million to obtain tax relief. 
  Tai Mei-yu's and Fang Yu's jewels are as different as night 
and day. More precisely put, her most valuable necklace is worth 
NT$330,000. It does not qualify at all to be listed in a report 
with Fang Yu's assets. Tai Mei-yu was formerly a teacher. Her 
professional background, as well as the frugal character of the 
Hakkas, means that Tai Mei-yu has declared only two necklaces, 
and the two together are worth only NT$660,000. 
  Rather oddly, Wu Po-hsiung personally reported one red 
dragon 
worth NT$200,000. Reportedly, he has kept this red dragon for 
almost 10 years. Originally, a friend suggested that Wu 
Po-hsiung by this fish for his home so that he would have fish 
and water, which would benefit the ambience and the atmosphere 
[the Chinese word for fish sounds exactly like the word for 
surplus and is a symbol of prosperity, and water symbolizes 
renewed wealth]. Thereupon, Wu Po-hsiung personally selected 
this red dragon. At first, Wu Po-hsiung pondered whether he 
should declare the red dragon, subsequently deciding that since 
it was worth more than NT$200,000, he should report it. 
  Wu Po-hsiung has no golf club membership since he plays golf 
mostly when others invite him. Furthermore, some golf course 
owners are his friends. Therefore, for him, a golf club 
membership is not all that necessary. In addition, Wu Po-hsiung 
and his wife have purchased nearly NT$100 million worth of life 
insurance, which may be an extraordinary amount for a government 
official. 
  Next August, Wu Po-hsiung may move to Tahsinshan Village at 
Hunghsi in Taoyuan to become a neighbor of President Li 
Teng-hui. The house that Wu Po-hsiung has purchased is only half 
as large as Li Teng-hui's. His original reason for buying it was 
that he wanted to maintain roots in Taoyuan while his old home 
there was being renovated. In addition, the geomantic influences 
at Tahsi are good, and he has ties there. So he bought a villa 
there. 
  Today, thanks to the presence of Li Teng-hui, Tahsishan 
Village at Hunghsi has become an abode of the powerful, and 
prices have crept up too. Now, ownership of his villa alone 
makes Li Teng-hui a billionaire president. By comparison with 
Lien Chan and Wu Po-hsiung, Li Teng-hui has gotten ahead more 
through hard work. Henceforth, more and more young students will 
resolve to become president. Li Teng-hui has been in government 
service for more than 30 years, four years as vice-president and 
five years as president. He has virtually no inherited wealth, 
but he has NT$44 million in savings, more than NT$7 million 
worth of stock, a golf club membership worth more than NT$11 
million, and jewels worth NT$1.8 million. This does not include 
calligraphic scrolls and objects of art that others have 
presented to him. 
  Maybe it is nothing out of the ordinary to have so much 
wealth on a president's salary, but the man in the street may 
change his view somewhat about political personages on this 
account. 
  An example is Ch'iu Ch'uang-huan whose "sexual escapades" 
were the talk of the town not long ago. Earlier, he often spoke 
about his hardships and difficulties as a youth in an utterly 
destitute family. The public learned, to its surprise, only 
after publication of his wealth that this Examination Yuan 
president has savings of NT$12 million, stocks worth NT$15 
million, jewelry worth NT$3 million, and five parcels of land. 
Furthermore, his son, Ch'iu Che-i [6726 2548 3015], and his 
daughter, Ch'iu P'ei-lin [6726 0160 3829], each have a house 
with a market value of approximately NT$20 million located at 
Tishih Garden Square on Anho Road, East. What is more, Ch'iu 
Ch'uang-huan is paying more than NT$100,000 rent on the house 
that he is currently occupying. 
  Ch'iu Ch'uang-huan's son, Ch'iu Che-ying [6726 3548 3379], 
feels that the public overestimates his father's wealth. He 
cites as an example the land located at Turtle Mountain in 
Taoyuan. He said that although these two parcels of land are 
zoned for building, they are too far distant from a highway. 
Entry is via a road that runs atop a ridge between fields. 
Furthermore, this place has high winds and is damp; thus, the 
value of the land is not high. Furthermore, land located along 
some fields is being used to grow fruit trees and bonsai that 
actually produce no economic returns. 
  Six or seven years ago, some friends of Ch'iu Ch'uang-huan 
persuaded him to buy between 500 and 600 ping of land at Turtle 
Mountain. At first, some members of his family were opposed, and 
later on when it was found that this land was too much off the 
beaten track for development, it was decided to sell it in 1993. 
But there were no takers. The Ch'iu family's financial affairs 
-- particularly stock purchases -- are the responsibility of 
Ch'iu Ch'uang-huan's wife, Bai Ling-yu [4101 6875 3768]. Except 
for the buying of land, Ch'iu Ch'uang-huan seldom asks about any 
other investments. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ranking of Billionaire Government Officials                                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ranking     |Official Po-|Name        |NT$ Value o-|NT$ Value o-|Total NT$ V-| 
|            |sition      |            |f Real Esta-|f Movable P-|alue        | 
|            |            |            |te          |roperty     |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1           |Prime Minis-|Lien Chan   |More than 70|More than 1.|1.82 billion| 
|            |ter         |            |0 million   |12 billion  |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|2           |Minister of |Wu Po-hsiung|256 million |284 million |540 million | 
|            |Interior    |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|3           |Control Yua-|K'o Ming-mou|330 million |21.4 million|More than 35| 
|            |n member    |            |            |            |0 million   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|4           |Deputy Chai-|Yeh Chin-fe-|210 million |9 million   |219 million | 
|            |rman, Mainl-|ng          |            |            |            | 
|            |and Affairs |            |            |            |            | 
|            |Council     |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|5           |Judicial Yu-|Lin Yang-ka-|170 million |47.3 million|217.3 milli-| 
|            |an president|ng          |            |            |on yuan     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|6           |Minister Wi-|Kuo Yuan-ju-|150 million |22.5 million|172.5 milli-| 
|            |thout Portf-|ng          |            |            |on          | 
|            |olio        |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|7           |President   |Li Teng-hui |80 million  |72.4 million|152.4 milli-| 
|            |            |            |            |            |on          | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|8           |President's |Chiang Yen--|78 million  |42.7 million|120.7 milli-| 
|            |Office secr-|shih        |            |            |on          | 
|            |etary       |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|9           |Control Yua-|Li Shen-i   |120 million |570,000     |120.57 mill-| 
|            |n member    |            |            |            |ion         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|10          |Judicial Yu-|Li Chih-p'e-|105 million |-800,000    |104.2 milli-| 
|            |an Grand Ju-|ng          |            |            |on          | 
|            |stice       |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|11          |Minister Wi-|Huang Shih--|104 million |-1.45 milli-|102.55 mill-| 
|            |thout Portf-|cheng       |            |on          |ion         | 
|            |olio        |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|12          |Director, P-|Ch'in Hsiao-|96 million  |6 million   |102 million | 
|            |alace Museum|i           |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Huang Shih-ch'eng, who is from Changhua, also feels his 
wealth is overestimated. His wife, Ch'en Chao-o [7115 2507 
1230], who is a National Assembly member, said that all their 
land has been inherited, and that it is located in remote areas 
that even buses do not reach. One tract she visited only once, 
and her grandparents are buried on another plot. They are worth 
hardly anything at all. Before becoming magistrate of Changhua 
County, Huang Shih-ch'eng was a lawyer. He also ran a trading 
corporation located on Jenai Road in Taipei. Today, however, he 
neither practices law nor runs the corporation. He depends 
entirely on his salary. 
  Chiang Yen-shih's billion still comes mostly from land. He 
gets more than NT$1 million a year from two houses, one on Anho 
Road, and the other on Ihsien Road. When another more than NT$24 
million in savings, more than NT$2 million in stocks, and more 
than 1 million in gold bars are added in, to call him the 
"Diamond Secretary" is no exaggeration. 
  Lin Yang-kang, who has designs on the president's seat, has 
no less wealth than Li Teng-hui even though he has yet to gain 
that seat. Although his NT$20 million in savings is only half 
that of Li, he owns a large tract of land, and he holds NT$5 
million worth of bonds. His wife, Ch'en Ho-ping [7115 0678 
1629], has more than NT$21 million invested in two corporations. 
  Most curious is Lin Yang-hsiang's and his wife's leasing of 
16 hectares of government forest land at Shuili Village in 
Yuch'ih Township, Nantou County. This matter has raised a lot of 
eyebrows. The after-the-fact explanation that Lin Yang-hsiang 
has provided is that he leased this land 40 years ago while 
still a student at Taiwan University. At that time everyone was 
very enthusiastic about afforestation, and his father was also 
an afforestation enthusiast. He positively has not used his 
position as president of the Judicial Yuan to lease the land. 
  The return from this forest land is difficult to estimate. 
Maybe the young Lin Yang-hsiang developed the habit of "mountain 
climbing" because of his frequent inspections of forest land. 
This habit may be unexpectedly helpful to him in moving up to 
the office of president. Nevertheless, one thing is certain and 
that is that should the grasslands Yuan president want to become 
a grasslands president, he will certainly not have to worry 
about not having enough money to get elected. 
  Control Yuan member, Li Shen-i, who frequently describes 
himself as the son of a peasant family in Tainan, was also 
ranked a millionaire in this communique on wealth, but he said 
with some pain, "This is really an overestimate!" Li Shen-i, who 
has been a lawyer for more than 20 years, did not deny his 
penchant for investing in real estate, but he describes this as 
land he holds with others. 
  Maybe so, but the land that Li Shen-i holds with others is 
scattered everywhere. In 1978, he and some friends bought 
farmland on the Kuantu Plain, himself investing NT$2.5 million 
to buy 360 ping. In 1984, he and friends bought more than 3,100 
ping of grassland located along Hsiukuluan Creek in Yuli Town, 
Hualien in which he has a one-sixth interest. He also spent NT$1 
million for it. In 1990, he and a Rotary Club friend bought 80 
chia of mountain land in Juifang, only 5 percent of which is 
his. He spent NT$2 million for it, but an appraisal company 
estimates the value of this land to be NT$200 million. 
  In this connection, not only did Li Shen-i write a letter 
demanding a retraction from the media, but he also countered 
with the question as to who would be willing to buy the land 
were it to sell for 20 million? Subsequently, he also joked with 
reporters asking, "Would you buy it for 5 million?" Li Shen-i 
said that the land he bought is not suitable for building 
houses. As for the 300 ping of land for which he paid NT$210 
million to the "Academic Community Preparatory Committee of the 
Central Research Academy," so far he has done nothing with it. 
In addition, Li Shen-i bought a membership in the Tonghua Golf 
Club. He explained that he bought it only because he had helped 
the club solve some legal problems in return for which the club 
permitted him to buy the membership in installments. His 
membership has a value of NT$2.5 million. 
  As for the four dwellings bought in Li Shen-i's name, namely 
the ones he received following the renovation with friends of a 
13-story building on 30 ping of land that his family had earlier 
purchased on Hoping Road East opposite the Science and 
Technology Building, one is his residence. The three others have 
been rented out, the proceeds providing retirement income for 
his father. 
  However, in 1977, Li Shen-i bought more than 50 ping of land 
at the low price of several thousand New Taiwan dollars a ping 
in what is now the Hsini Planning Zone. This showed uncanny 
foresight. In 1993, he began selling off this land in order to 
clear up some personal debts, and to pay for his daughter's 
education expenses abroad. However, his asking price is 
NT$700,000 a ping, so because of the present depressed economic 
conditions, there have been no takers. This has irritated him 
somewhat. Li Shen-i said that estimates that he is worth NT$300 
million are really far off the mark, but NT$100 million is a 
completely reasonable estimate. 
  Minister Without Portfolio Kuo Yuan-jung's land holdings are 
also very substantial. However, Kuo Yuan-jung explains that her 
land in Taichung City was inherited, and that the land she owns 
in Neihu and Tamsui was bought during the 1960's. Originally, 
houses could be built on that land, but later it was zoned a 
protected forest area on which construction is prohibited. It is 
not worth very much money now. 
  However, Kuo Yuan-jung and her husband, Ni Wen-ya [0242 2429 
0068], have more than NT$20 million in savings and short term 
securities. Their appearance on the Control Yuan's list 
attracted particular attention. Kuo Yuan-jung said that inasmuch 
as she has always worked in a government agency, her financial 
management method is fairly "simple and clear." 
  People from Taichung say that the land that Kuo Yuan-jung 
holds in the Liming section of Taichung is located in the 
seventh rezoned area and close to the center of the city. It is 
worth no small amount of money. Therefore, it is no surprise 
that Kuo Yuan-jung is listed as a billionaire level government 
official. 
  Not only did Kuo Yuan-jung buy some mountain land, but Grand 
Judge Li Chih-p'eng also purchased between five and six chia of 
mountain land in Wanli Township 15 years ago. At that time, the 
price was a little more than NT$200,000 per chia. Li Chih-p'eng 
says that he bought that piece of land purely with retirement in 
mind, but the trees growing on that land today are between two 
and three stories high. The land was not bought with the idea of 
building houses on it. 
  Commenting on being listed in the billionaire class, Li 
Chih-p'eng explained that houses like the one he is living in 
today at Neihu were bought for NT$500,000 20-odd years ago, but 
now the market price has risen to more than NT$20 million. "It's 
not my doing!" 
  Palace Museum Director Ch'in Hsiao-i's declaration of 
calligraphic scrolls and antiques worth nearly NT$5 million also 
attracted some attention. However, his large free-standing home 
located in Lane 136 in Section 1 of Chihshan Road is also 
estimated to be worth more than NT$100 million. In order for him 
to be able to bury his head all day long in the study of 
historical relics, Ch'in Hsiao-i has been cloaked in a golden 
robe. Giving "a private matter" as a reason, he is unwilling to 
discuss this. However, members of the Ch'in family said that 
this is too preposterous. They have lived in this house for more 
than 20 years. How can a more than 20 year old house be worth 
NT$100 million? 
  People in the market say, however, that Chihshan Road is a 
red hot section of the city today. The land for the tall 
building built opposite the Palace Museum cost nearly NT$500,000 
a ping some time ago. An asking price of NT$100 million for the 
160 ping of land and the buildings on which Ch'in Hsiao-i's 
house sits would not be an exaggeration. However, the Ch'in 
family notes that this house is only theirs to live in; they 
cannot sell it. Thus, it is really not very fair to say that 
they are billionaires. 
  K'o Ming-mou, a member of the Control Yuan who is one of the 
champions whose assets have been published by the Control Yuan, 
was not listed in the Control Yuan's previous glittering 
listing. Today things are different. Of the 29 members of the 
Control Yuan, probably only Lin Meng-kui [2651 1322 6311] and 
Hsieh K'un-shan [6200 1507 1472] are richer than he. 
  Current reporting on K'o Ming-mou and his wife shows more 
than 59 parcels of land alone, and all are located in either 
Changhua or Taichung cities. The K'o family's businesses -- 
Yusan Engineering and Yuisheng Construction Company -- also 
operate in these two areas. 
  The land area that K'o Ming-mu has declared is also small, 
and his holdings are not great. Only three houses are under his 
name, but many people in Changhua believe K'o Ming-mou owns more 
houses than this. Nevertheless, a leader of Changhua's white 
faction, K'o Ming-mou has always adopted a political posture of 
being more interested in politics than business. His coterie and 
his money interests in Changhua have always been substantial, so 
it is no wonder that Li Teng-hui has called upon him repeatedly 
to run for county magistrate there. Furthermore, the election of 
Kuomintang candidates also depends on the degree to which they 
obtain K'o Ming-mou's endorsement. The present estimate of his 
assets at between NT$300 million and NT$400 million only 
includes the assets held in his name. The resources at K'o 
Ming-mou's command are surely greater than this. 
  Finally, a person that must be specially introduced is the 
richest woman government official today, Yeh Chin-feng, the 
deputy chairman of the Planning Commission for Recovery of the 
Mainland who has been highly touted for election as the next 
secretary of the Haichi Hui [3189 1015 2585]. 
  Yeh Chin-feng said that the reason she and her medical 
doctor 
husband have so much land is that virtually all of it was 
inherited by her husband, Lin Yao-tung [2651 5069 2639]. For 
example, the land in Fuhsing Township in Changhua County is all 
farmland that has not yet been divided up for inheritance, so 
she herself does not know where the land is located. 
  Yeh Chin-feng also said that their four houses in Changhua 
City are dilapidated houses made of earth or galvanized sheet 
steel. The only building they have that is worth any money is 
the hospital on Minsheng Road that covers an area of nearly 400 
ping, and this land was also purchased 20 years ago for about 
NT$10,000 yuan a ping. She also said that since her husband is 
very conservative about money management, the money he has is 
invested in houses and real estate. The two 30 ping of land 
houses they own in Taichung are located in the suburbs and not 
worth much money. Moreover, since she works in Taipei, she 
purchased a small house on 10 ping of land on Hsini Road, which 
is purely for convenience. 
  Nevertheless, Yeh Chin-feng also admits that although most 
of 
the houses under their name are not worth much money, if they 
are renovated, they will be worth quite a bit. As for the 
estimate of her personal wealth at NT$200 million, she said, 
"How can you compare the price of land in Changhua with Taipei." 
Since Yeh Chin-feng actually did marry a medical doctor who has 
money and can buy property, becoming rich through her husband, a 
personal wealth of more than NT$100 million for Yeh Chin-feng is 
no exaggeration. It is just that her husband earned it. She 
herself is just a daughter who was married off, whose sole 
income is her salary. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59305 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG, MACAO </F>
<H3> <TI>   Poll on Current Sino-British Talks </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0046A Hong Kong MING BAO in Chinese 1 Oct 93 p A6 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0046A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong MING BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Seventy-Five Percent of Hong Kong Residents Felt Governor </F>
Should Disclose Content of Sino-British Talks in His Legislative 
Proposal"] 
  [Text] A public opinion survey indicated that three-fourths 
of Hong Kong residents hoped the governor would disclose the 
content of the Sino-British negotiations on political reform 
when he releases his legislative proposal next week; while the 
proportion of residents who hoped the governor would set a time 
limit on these negotiations increased to 50 percent from the 30 
percent of four months ago. In addition, over one-half of the 
residents agreed that the governor should submit his political 
reform proposals to the Legislative Council by the middle of 
October. 
  The Hong Kong University Social Sciences Research Center 
announced yesterday the results of a public opinion survey it 
conducted on Tuesday and Wednesday [28, 29 Sep] this week. The 
survey was based on telephone interviews completed with 516 
respondents in a random sample, with a completion rate of 53.8 
percent. 
  The survey revealed that three-fourths of the interviewees 
agreed the governor should disclose the content of the 
Sino-British talks in his legislative proposal, while only 
one-tenth disagreed. 
  One-half of those interviewed agreed that a cutoff date 
should be set for the Sino-British talks, while three-tenths 
disagreed. Among those who agreed to set a time limit, 34 
percent thought the cutoff date should be as early as possible, 
20 percent clearly hoped the cutoff date would be before the end 
of this year, and 21 percent considered more than one year 
should be allowed before ending the talks. 
  When asked whether they agreed that the governor should 
submit his political reform proposals to the Legislative Council 
by mid-October, over one-half of the sample agreed, but 27.6 
percent disagreed. 
  A somewhat larger than one-third of the interviewees felt 
that the political reform proposals the governor submitted last 
year should be completely revised, but 28 percent thought they 
should be turned over to and decided at the Sino-British talks; 
only 11 percent felt that the political reform proposals should 
be submitted without change. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59306 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG, MACAO </F>
<H3> <TI>   Impact of Sino-British Agreement Assessed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0046B Hong Kong MING PAO in Chinese 5 Oct 93 p A16 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0046B </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong MING PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Cheng Yu-shuo (6774 1342 4311), director of the </F>
Hong Kong Municipal Science and Technology College's Social 
Sciences Institute: "No Big Deal Even If Sino-British Talks 
Should Fail"] 
  [Excerpt] Britain and China want to maintain the channel 
for bilateral diplomatic contacts because considerable mutual 
benefits are involved -- in order to maintain Hong Kong's 
stability and prosperity, there will be basic cooperation even 
when the relationship edges toward collapse as happened with the 
4 June Incident and the publication of the draft political 
reform proposal. The reason China does not want to wreck Hong 
Kong is because in recent years, Hong Kong's industrial and 
commercial circles have firmly supported the position of the 
Chinese Government, and the PRC would not wish to see their 
benefits adversely affected. 
  Therefore, in my personal estimate, the possibility of the 
Sino-British talks collapsing is not great; even if they did 
collapse and agreement could not be reached, the resulting 
impact would not be very great. On the one hand, this is because 
Hong Kong residents have low expectations that the negotiations 
would be successful, and the shock of not having any agreement 
would therefore be correspondingly limited. On the other hand, 
from a more serious perspective, any agreement that might be 
reached between the two sides will likely be a tactical rather 
than strategic agreement; as both sides can no longer cooperate 
sincerely, any agreement reached will only involve cooperation 
to the extent that it minimizes damages to both sides while 
maintaining Hong Kong's stability and prosperity. 
  In point of fact, however, beginning in early April, the 
points of view and observed tendencies among Hong Kong's pro-PRC 
media have shown that China intends to separate politics from 
economics, and even if no agreement is reached on the political 
system, maximum effort will be made in the economic area to 
maintain cooperation, for example, in approving the land-fill 
engineering project for the Central District; Wang Qiren [3769 
0796 0086], Hong Kong-Macao Affairs Office Deputy Director, has 
also publicly stated that it is China's intention to continue to 
support the development of Hong Kong's economy. 
  The above line of reasoning assumes a rosy scenario; that 
is, 
even if China and Britain really cannot reach any agreement on 
the political system, the shock for Hong Kong will not be too 
great. However, undeniably also is the fact that without an 
agreement, there will be some side effects. To begin with, 
Britain will face considerable difficulties in turning the Hong 
Kong Government over to a Special Administrative Region [SAR] 
government. The turnover, in and of itself, will involved myriad 
details, but from the mid-1980s to the present, not a great deal 
has been accomplished in terms of preparatory work. Now with 
only a little over three years left before the 1997 turnover, 
one must wonder whether it will be possible to complete all the 
necessary preparatory work for the turnover. If the situation 
should remain unchanged, the SAR government will certainly 
encounter difficulties during its initial establishment phase in 
1996 and 1997. 
  Furthermore, the lack of any agreement will impact on the 
rank and file civil servants in Hong Kong. Under the 
circumstances in which Britain and China cannot cooperate with 
any degree of sincerity, how can these civil servants 
concentrate on their work? Will the status of senior civil 
servants be maintained? The highest-ranking civil servants have 
various options, namely, to leave, to emigrate or to stay and 
join the private sector in industries or commerce. It can thus 
be anticipated that without any agreement the civil servants 
will have no basis for making suitable plans. 
  Furthermore, as the Hong Kong Government becomes 
increasingly 
a "lame duck" government, it will have even greater difficulties 
gaining majority support in the Legislative Council. At the same 
time, as the Hong Kong Government must perforce concentrate on 
managing the difficult Sino-British relationship, it will also 
have to devote what energy it has left to solve the larger 
issues of people's livelihood, and many problems such as housing 
(particularly the problem of subdivided, multi-storied 
buildings) will become even more difficult to handle. Another 
example is medical services, where the whole set of concepts is 
no longer applicable; with costs of medical care continuing 
their upward climb, the per-bed intensive care cost is over a 
thousand Hong Kong dollars but patients now pay only some 40 
dollars; the government in fact will not be able to continue to 
provide large scale subsidies to medical care, and without such 
government support, the standard of medical services will 
certainly decline. The government should encourage the younger 
generations to purchase their own medical insurance before this 
problem can fundamentally be solved. But if the government lacks 
the political will, how can it proceed to institute such reform? 
Confronted with [challenges of] the 1990s, the Hong Kong 
government should have new policy measures to deal with such 
issues, but the government has dragged its feet, not getting 
adequate support from the Legislative Council to take any 
action, and leaving many social problems of people's livelihood 
begging for solutions. We can well imagine in the days to come, 
the government will need to cope with the 1994 and 1995 
elections on the one hand, and with the transition in 1996-97 on 
the other; larger issues of people's livelihood may well have to 
be put off to the next century before they can be dealt with. 
  Aside from the above, in a situation of Sino-British 
contention, with two clearly defined camps facing each other, 
both sides may well lack the ability to compromise. The closer 
we get to 1997, the stronger the pro-China forces will become; 
among them, some political parties may well decline to take part 
in elections, and the democratic faction facing no opposition 
will score another big win. This type of situation will make 
things much more difficult, for while it is normal for any 
political party to win big under normal competitive 
circumstances, the situation would be much more complicated if 
the victory was the result of elections boycotted by other 
political parties. 
  Naturally, if the Sino-British relationship should really 
deteriorate, some economic projects will of course face great 
difficulties, such as the No. 9 container dock and the new 
airport. But the major difficulties will be on the Chinese side, 
because under the circumstance of mutual suspicion and extreme 
non-cooperation, it will not be easy at all to reach agreement 
on any individual economic projects; this is not so much a case 
of the Chinese side refusing to grant permission, but when China 
and Britain distrust each other, no Chinese official would dare 
take on the responsibility to approve any individual economic 
projects. 
  As for the stock and real estate markets, Hong Kong people 
have gradually adapted themselves to the Sino-British disputes, 
and will not attach great importance to the lack of an 
agreement. For after all, any agreement will only be a tactical 
move, and given the fact that 1997 is close at hand, the 
importance of an agreement is declining daily. Major investors 
pay even less attention to the question of Sino-British 
cooperation or to 1997, since the factor they most emphasize is 
still the future development potential of China. If China 
continues to reform and open up, and remains a good place to 
invest, then these investors would basically pay no attention to 
the Sino-British dispute; were they to behave otherwise, 
investment activities in Hong Kong in recent years would 
certainly have been affected; yet on the contrary, the stock 
market and real estate market have continued to score new highs. 
Based on present development, unless Chinese economic 
adjustments hit rock bottom, and that coming on top of the 
Sino-British dispute, Hong Kong would not be affected to any 
serious extent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59307 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> HONG KONG, MACAO </F>
<H3> <TI>   Contracting Foreign Employees Causes Controversy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0105A Hong Kong CHING PAO [THE MIRROR] in Chinese No 9, 
5 Sep 93 pp 16-17 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0105A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHING PAO [THE MIRROR] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Yu-hsiang (7115 3022 4382): "Localization </F>
of Workers Hired From Abroad Hints at Conspiracy"] 
  [Text] Hong Kong's already unstable contingent of 
civil servants is seriously torn and divided over the 
British-Hong Kong government's sudden introduction of a new 
measure allowing the conversion of employees hired from 
overseas. Naturally, there is intense conflict between the local 
civil servants and foreign civil servants hired abroad, but even 
among local civil service groups, there is dissention. This has 
cast a shadow over Hong Kong's social stability in the 
post-transition period, which is most regrettable. 
  The Hong Kong government has suddenly announced the policy 
of 
allowing foreign civil servants to turn local contract workers, 
and this has evoked strong repercussions among Hong Kong's more 
than 100,000 Chinese civil servants who believe that this is 
clearly the Hong Kong government's attempt to undermine the 
localization program. The Hong Kong media are almost unanimous 
in their opposition to this new policy. 
  The British-Hong Kong government probably had not 
anticipated 
this loud voice of opposition toward this foreign civil servant 
conversion system, and except for sending a minister-level 
officer to hurriedly explain to Hong Kong's several large civil 
service associations to minimize the impact of the incident, it 
tried to defend itself saying that the plan in no way 
contradicted the policy of localization of civil servants. 
<H5>  Ford Misleads the Public </H5>
  According to the British-Hong Kong government's official 
explanation, the British rushed through the foreign civil 
servant conversion plan without prior deliberation or 
consultation because the government was concerned that the 
foreign civil servants might sue the government on human rights 
grounds, charging the government of depriving them of their 
right to continue to work in Hong Kong after 1997. In 
particular, many among the foreigners have lived in Hong Kong 
for seven years or longer, which would qualify them as local 
residents under the Sino-British Joint Declaration and the Basic 
Law's definition. Upon making its studies, the Legal Department 
concluded that if the overseas employees should sue the 
government, there was a good chance that the government would 
lose. 
  Even before there is a lawsuit, the government has declared 
that it would lose. This is quite unheard of. Subsequently, the 
British-Hong Kong government's Chief Secretary Ford defended 
this new plan saying it complied with the Sino-British Joint 
Declaration and the pertinent articles of the Basic Law and that 
it was an effective measure to keep the talented people in Hong 
Kong after 1997. 
  Ford may be guilty of taking things out of context and 
misleading the people, because the Sino-British Joint 
Declaration and the articles in the Basic Law never 
discriminated against foreign civil servants. Except for a 
handful of minister-level positions which must be filled by 
Chinese nationals after 1997 to give expression to Chinese 
sovereignty and the policy of Hong Kong people ruling Hong Kong, 
other government department positions are to be recruited 
openly, and anyone with ability, regardless of nationality, is 
eligible for consideration. 
  Thus, after the Hong Kong SAR government is established in 
1997, the criterion for recruiting civil servants will be 
"appointment based on ability only," and foreign-born civil 
servants will not be denied their right to continue to serve 
Hong Kong; however, the special privileges and benefits they 
enjoyed in the past under the rule of the colonial government 
will not be extended beyond 1997. 
<H3>  British-Hong Kong Has Always Discriminated Against Local 
Public Servants </H3>
  An editorial in a Chinese language magazine actually called 
upon the Hong Kong people to be generous in accepting foreign 
civil servants to continue to serve Hong Kong after 1997, so 
that Hong Kong could retain its characteristic as a large 
international city. Some pro-Britain Legislative Council members 
even expressed concern that any rejection of foreign civil 
servants would infer or border on racial discrimination. 
  This is pure "slavish comprador philosophy." In the past, 
the 
British-Hong Kong colonial government has always favored foreign 
civil servants and has always discriminated against native 
Chinese civil servants. It was only as a result of the arduous 
struggles of the local civil servants a decade or so ago that 
the Hong Kong government agreed to implement the policy of 
localization of civil servants. But there has never been any 
clear results, and the local public employees have long harbored 
much resentment. But now the British-Hong Kong government has 
executed a sneak attack by suddenly announcing the foreign civil 
servant conversion system, permitting those who meet the 
qualifications to convert to local civil servant status; they 
even called that a part of the localization process. 
  This is stealing the sky and putting up a sham sun -- a 
gigantic fraud. The original meaning of the policy to localize 
the public servants is pure and simple. It means to give the 
local Chinese employees who make up the majority of the 
contingent of civil servants a better chance of being promoted. 
But today, the government is trying in vain to call the foreign 
civil servant conversion plan a part of the localization process 
and even saying that this plan applies to less than 200 foreign 
public servants. This is a sly manipulation of statistics, 
because this handful of foreign employees all hold high-ranking 
positions in various government departments, and if they are 
considered local employees after 1997, they will never leave, 
and this will directly jeopardize the promotion opportunity for 
hundreds and thousands of local Chinese civil servants. No 
wonder when this new policy was announced, local Chinese civil 
servants were in an uproar. 
  The authorities announced this new policy on the third day 
after Governor Patten had gone on vacation. Was it a 
coincidence, or was it pre-arranged? Before Patten left Hong 
Kong, he had said that during his vacation, he would read no 
official documents, nor did he want his subordinates to fax him 
anything which could spoil his holidays. 
  Is Patten going to ignore everything and wait until the 
whole 
affair blows over before coming back to work, so that he would 
not have to face the local Chinese civil servants? The fact is, 
since Patten took office in July of last year, he has 
consciously or unconsciously let the foreign civil servants keep 
all the privileges they enjoy in the Hong Kong government. He 
not only has announced the continued employment of Chief 
Secretary Ford who should be retiring, but he has also 
deliberately ignored Chen Tsu-tse [7115 4371 3419] who was 
expected to be the first Chinese to become chief secretary 
before 1997. Chen has become so discouraged that he eventually 
quit his position at the Education and Manpower Planning 
Department and quietly left the Hong Kong government. 
<H3>  The British-Hong Kong Government's Move Divides the Civil 
Servants </H3>
  One of the main reasons for the Hong Kong government's 
announcement permitting foreign civil servants to change systems 
is that if qualified overseas employees were not allowed to turn 
local and keep their jobs, the government could be sued by the 
Overseas Employee Association for human rights violations. But 
according to the terms of employment of overseas workers, once 
the contract expires, the government has the right to renew or 
terminate any overseas employee's contract as warranted. In 
other words, even if an overseas civil servant meets all the 
requirements of becoming a local employee, it does not mean that 
his or her contract will be automatically renewed upon 
expiration or that he or she can continue to work in the 
government. This is but the government's deliberate attempt to 
mislead the public. 
  The already not very stable contingent of civil servants is 
badly torn and divided over this new measure suddenly introduced 
by the authorities allowing the conversion of foreign employees. 
Between the local and foreign employees, there naturally are 
serious conflicts, but even among local civil service groups, 
there are dissentions. This has cast a shadow over Hong Kong's 
social stability in the post-transition period, which is most 
regrettable. 
  Today, some local civil service groups are prepared to sue 
the Hong Kong government, and others are drafting private 
lawsuits to prevent the conversion of foreign civil servants. 
The matter has become even more complicated. It is learned that 
the Chinese authorities have formally asked to discuss the 
matter at the 27th round Sino-British Joint Liaison Group 
Meeting to be held in Beijing in mid-September. This no doubt 
will add another variable to the Sino-British negotiations over 
Hong Kong's political reform. Prospects are grim. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59308 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Wang Ruowang on Politics of Three Gorges Project </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0074A Hong Kong CHENG MING [CONTENDING] in Chinese No 
193, 1 Nov 93 pp 48-50 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0074A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong CHENG MING [CONTENDING] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Ruowang (The United States): "Three Gorges </F>
Project and Party Culture" -- First paragraph is Wang Ruowang's 
introduction] 
  [Text] The Three Gorges Project has started with the final 
approval of Deng Xiaoping, Li Peng and others to serve the needs 
of putting politics in command of everything for the party 
culture. The proposal to develop the Three Gorges Project is 
actually aimed at setting people's minds at rest and diverting 
their discontent with what happened after the "4 June" Incident. 
This project is destined to end up in three disastrous ways. 
  China is determined to develop the Three Gorges Project. The 
resettlement of the people in the 13 counties along the Chiang 
Jiang has already begun. I cannot say much about this project 
since I am not an expert in water conservancy, and I have been 
driven out of the country. Nevertheless, I am quite familiar 
with the CPC party culture of scores of years. The process from 
the early evaluation to the final decision in developing the 
Three Gorges Project precisely shows a vivid sample about the 
influence of the party culture. There are many things that make 
people indignant and heave a deep sigh. I would like to inform 
my fellow countrymen about them in this article. 
<H5>  Knowing the Present by Reviewing the Past </H5>
  During the 40 years when the Communist Party of China ruled 
the country, all party leaders invariably loved to develop large 
projects and exaggerate. There are some well-known examples from 
the Mao era, such as steel-making in backyards, overtaking 
Britain in 15 years, and realizing Communism after three years. 
(The practice of everyone eating from the same big pot, which 
means communism, was proposed in 1958). 
  Also, there was the Sanmen Gorge Water Conservancy Project 
along the Yellow River. The party ordered the project, because 
it wanted to make the water in the Yellow River clear with 
Chairman Mao's hands so that the prophesy that "when a sage 
emerges, the water in the Yellow River becomes clear" left from 
the ancient times would be fulfilled by Chairman Mao. At that 
time, the whole party regarded the development of the Sanmen 
Gorge Dam as a political task of top priority. However, the 
Yellow River is still filled with murky water today when the 
sage has already been dead for more than 10 years. The Sanmen 
Gorge, clogged with silt, has become a cynical mockery of the 
greatest sage in the world fantasy! 
  Mao's successor Hua Guofeng realized that it was hard for 
him to exercise leadership, because he lacked political capital. 
He sought to score more economic achievements to make up for his 
political weakness. Thus, he made magnificent plans to build ten 
enterprises such as the Baotou Iron and Steel Complex and 
another ten oil fields such as the Daqing Oil Field. Later, his 
mistake was seized by Deng Xiaoping, who sneered and called it a 
"foreign leap forward." Later Hua Guofeng was kicked out of the 
Political Bureau together with his bold remarks. 
  The Chinese Communist leaders love to talk and act big, but 
not because they are conceited or they have the personal 
temperament of loving to brag. The projects they choose to 
develop are not really conducive to the national economy or the 
people's livelihood. They are aimed at heightening or 
consolidating their political authority. This is the purpose of 
putting politics in command of everything. Deng Xiaoping 
criticized Hua Guofeng for promoting the foreign leap forward, 
but he himself cannot jump out of the eccentric ring of history. 
If political leaders are elected by the people, they must pay 
full attention to the will of the people, and the tenure of 
their offices is limited. They would not commit such errors. 
This is the first main point of the party culture. 
  Raising a hue and cry on the mass media and winning warm 
applause from the people is half way to success for the Chinese 
Communists. They attach great importance to propaganda work. 
They do not take into consideration in advance the difficulties 
they may encounter as well as the consequences. Deng Xiaoping's 
suggestion to "cross a river by feeling the stones" is a brief 
outline of this mode of thinking. Therefore, most of China's 
projects in economic construction have a fine start but poor 
finish. There are some projects where a great deal is said, but 
no action is taken. In some cases, they cannot find the stones, 
while in other cases, they have not got into the water yet. The 
aforementioned is the second main point of party culture in 
economic construction. 
  The Three Gorges Project for hydroelectric power 
generation was vetoed when Mao Zedong and Zhou Enlai were in 
power. Why does this project resurface again, after 1989? We are 
able to understand the situation better if we study the first 
and second main points of the party culture. Deng Xiaoping, Li 
Peng, Zou Jiahua and others have made the final decision to 
develop the Three Gorges Project under this kind of historic 
background, because they need to serve the need to put politics 
in command of everything. As far as 1989 is concerned, the 
Chinese Communist leadership regard it as a bad year. The "4 
June" butchery was followed by the collapse of the Soviet Union 
and Eastern Europe. Faced with troubles at home and abroad, the 
Chinese Communists found themselves isolated and helpless as 
never before. It was at such a time that they proposed 
developing the Three Gorges Project. On the surface, they 
claimed that power shortages were the roadblock in increasing 
production and deepening reform (Quoting Zou Jiahua's words), 
but actually the project is aimed at setting the peoples' minds 
at rest and diverting them from their discontent with reality. 
This mentality of "singing a grand Beijing opera for the people" 
is similar to that of working hard to host the 2000 Olympic 
Games in Beijing. 
  Referring to Zou Jiahua's remarks, I said at a gathering 
held in the Silicon Valley near San Francisco on 15 August 1992 
that "the Chinese Communists hope to extricate themselves from 
their predicament by developing the Chang Jiang water 
conservancy project. The result will invariably be a suicidal 
policy bringing calamity to the country and the people. 
Actually, China is not short of electric power. Power shortage 
problems can be solved by adopting other measures. What China 
needs badly is democracy and human rights." (Local newspapers 
have carried reports on my speech). 
<H5>  Understand the Present To Better Predict the Future </H5>
  Those at the top act arbitrarily and turn a deaf ear to 
all negative views. To meet requirements in accordance with the 
second main point of party culture, it is necessary to mobilize 
the whole party to ensure that public opinion from the top to 
the bottom throughout China is in conformity with the party 
central committee. All those with different political views are 
criminals, and enemies. 
  First of all, a leader sets up a plan at a meeting. 
(Deng Xiaoping always makes the final decision). Then he 
mobilizes a group of experts to rig up all the arguments to 
prove the brilliance and correctness of the party central 
committee. There was a water conservancy expert at the Qinghua 
University--Professor Huang Wanli [7806 8001 6849]. Prior to the 
development of the Yellow River Sanmen Gorge Dam during the Mao 
era, he wrote a letter to the government organization in charge 
of the project to oppose the development of the project. For 
this, he was labeled a rightist and deprived of his right to 
speak. A campaign was whipped up in the 1990's to develop the 
major Chang Jiang water conservancy project. Huang once again 
wrote a letter to voice his opposition. He was turned down. He 
sought to go through legal proceedings against the project. 
Naturally he was totally ignored. Another water conservancy 
expert wrote a letter, suggesting building five to six medium 
hydroelectric power stations in different locations along the 
tributaries of the Chang Jiang, which would be able to generate 
electricity within five years. The greatest advantage of this 
project is that all places of historic interest and scenic 
beauty would remain intact while improved navigation along the 
Chang Jiang is insured. This plan was rejected by Li Peng and 
others who love to talk and act big. They held that the 
disadvantage of the plan is that it cannot solve all the 
problems at one fell swoop; nor can it demonstrate the 
superiority of socialism. Here we have once again run into the 
party culture "roadblock." 
  To ensure uniformity in all mass media throughout the 
country, all newspapers and journals are forbidden to print any 
opposition views. They also are not allowed to print letters 
from readers who question the project. When experts and Hong 
Kong reporters conducted on-site inspection tours, they were 
invariably briefed in advance about the project and the 
"tremendous achievements" after the completion of the project. 
(We cannot but admire the painstaking efforts made by those who 
advocate the project. They fear that the Hong Kong news media 
would differ with the party central committee in opinion.) 
  When the 1992 National People's Congress [NPC] was 
prepared to adopt the motion on the Three Gorges Project, a 
scale model of the project was put on display outside of the 
conference hall, and the Chinese Communist leadership whipped up 
a frenzy inside and outside of the congress for the project. 
They did not expect that one-third of the deputies would still 
vote against the project or abstain. This was the first time in 
the history of the NPC that its role as a rubber stamp was 
overshadowed. One of the NPC Standing Committee members, Huang 
Shunxing, held a press conference, saying that there are more 
disadvantages than advantages in developing the Three Gorges 
Project. He also said that the Chinese Communist officials made 
him angry by exerting pressure on the NPC deputies. Naturally 
newspapers did not report on what he had said. Later, the 
Chinese Communists expelled Huang Shunxing from the NPC without 
making him lose his face. 
  From this we can see that the entire process in the 
development of the Three Gorges Project is soaked with the 
poisonous juice of the party culture. The party culture is a 
product which combines autocracy with class struggle. It sharply 
conflicts with any effort to make policy decisions with a 
democratic and scientific approach. The Three Gorges Project is 
one of system engineering which goes beyond the century. (A dam 
with the highest elevation of 175 meters in the world.) 
Falsehood and subjectivism have no place in any scientific 
undertaking. In addition, most of the people working on the 
project are laymen or cadres who blindly follow orders. Right 
now, the qualities of the cadres are much worse than those who 
built the Sanmen Gorge Dam during the Mao Era. 
  When a vice minister of Water Conservancy and the chief 
responsible person of the corporation in the development of the 
Three Gorges Project assumed his post, he said: "We plan to cut 
short the time to dam the river by one year so that it will 
happen at the same time as the return to China of sovereignty 
over Hong Kong. The year 1997 will be a year of double 
celebration." "I hope that comrades in the department carrying 
out preparatory work for the project will work conscientiously 
and boldly. Even if they make mistakes, I will naturally assume 
the responsibility," he added. We like to ask a question: Why is 
it necessary to drag together the occasions of damming the Chang 
Jiang and the return of Hong Kong's sovereignty to China? The 
authorities in Beijing are thinking about recovering Hong Kong 
ahead of schedule. Does this mean that the date for damming the 
Chang Jiang will also be moved up so that it will happen in the 
same year as Hong Kong's return to China? Besides, people in 
Hong Kong do not feel that 1997 is a year for celebration. In 
the "year of double celebration," for what do we celebrate? 
During the past dozens of years, China had always selected "1 
July" or "1 October" to start or finish any construction project 
or to launch a new ship as a sign to make contributions to the 
party. To complete a project or launch a new ship on a certain 
date, workers have been asked to hurry up and work overtime at 
the sacrifice of quality. As a result, such practice often 
causes landslides, major setbacks and even deaths. I remember 
that when the telegraph building in Shanghai was completed in 
1987, the leadership chose the party's birthday to celebrate the 
occasion. However, workers did not have enough time to install 
the elevator. As a result, a customer wanted to use the 
elevator, but got himself killed. To fulfill a political task, a 
joyous occasion thus ended as a funeral. In addition, local 
newspapers were not allowed to report the incident. 
  When the aforementioned official said that "I shall 
naturally assume responsibility," his tone was magnanimous, but 
actually he would not be held responsibile. There are hundreds 
of different types of work on the work site. If workers at the 
lower levels have problems, do all of them need to ask the 
commander-in-chief on the work site to solve them ? The work 
site covers an area about dozens of li in diameter. If anything 
goes wrong in terms of quality, how does the commander-in-chief 
at the top know who has caused all this? As soon as this 
anonymous person in responsibility opened his mouth, we knew 
that he was deeply poisoned by party culture. This kind of 
person can be an outstanding cadre in doing political work, but 
he is definitely not a man of action. As the responsible person 
for the project, this vice minister mentioned nothing about 
quality first. He was only responsible to Li Peng and Zou 
Jiahua. He did not assume responsibility for the lives and 
properties of millions of residents along the Chang Jiang. No 
wonder disastrous things happen! 
  We can predict the future if we carefully examine what 
is happening right now. The Three Gorges Project is destined to 
end up in the following three disastrous ways: 
  1. Changes for the worse, such as ecological imbalances 
and dropping of the groundwater level, take place after 10 to 15 
years of hydroelectric power generation at the Three Gorges Dam; 
just like the Aswan Dam which caused mass desertification in the 
lower reaches of the Nile River. Egyptians now regret what they 
had done in building the dam. 
  2. Due to the improper handling of the silt problem, the 
water level in the section of the Chang Jiang between Chongqing 
and Yichang will continue to rise just like what happened at the 
Sanmen Gorge Dam. 
  3. The tragedy caused by the burst of the Gouhou Dam in 
Qinghai on 27 August which killed more than 400 people serves as 
an advance warning from God to Li Peng, Jiang Zemin and Zou 
Jiahua that whenever work is not properly done in strict 
accordance with specifications in a certain location in a huge 
systems engineering project, an irremediable dam burst would 
occur when torrential floods come down from the hilly areas in 
late spring and early summer. This will be a catastrophe beyond 
redemption. 
<H3>  Compatriots Are Responsible for Stopping the Chinese 
Communists' Wanton Behavior </H3>
  In one of his poems, Mao Zedong seemed to foresee this 
catastrophe. In his poem "Kunlun" (source of the Chang Jiang), 
he wrote: 
"In summer days, your melting torrents, 
  Flood the streams and rivers, 
  Turning men into fish and turtles, 
  Who has passed judgement on the good and ill, 
  You have wrought these thousand autumns?" 
  Who are the chief culprits who will cause this terrible 
tragedy? If these several future historic criminals do not wake 
to reality by now, there will be people who compile the list of 
those who stay condemned through the ages. 
  Obviously a catastrophe now looms over the vast land of 
China, while the Beijing authorities stubbornly cling to their 
own stand. How can the Chinese people let them act blindly and 
recklessly? All those who are concerned over the fate of the 
motherland should express themselves. They should write letters 
to the National People's Congress, the CPC Central Committee and 
the State Council; launch a signature campaign; or send appeals 
to the Ministry of Water Conservancy and party and government 
organizations to express their views peacefully. They must call 
for efforts to stop developing the project, resettling people 
and inviting tenders abroad, because this is a major event which 
will involve the lives and properties of millions of people and 
thoroughly destroy our beautiful motherland like what happened 
in the struggle against the "four olds" [old ideas, old culture, 
old customs and old habits]. Every compatriot who is concerned 
about China and its people is responsible for stopping the 
Chinese Communists from acting wildly in defiance of the public 
opinion. The Chinese people should not allow the Chinese 
Communists to do what they please and remain silent like what 
they did during the Cultural Revolution. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59309 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar003___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  10 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ideas for Revamping State Ownership System </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0140A Chongqing GAIGE [REFORM] in Chinese No 5, 20 Sep 
93 pp 18-29 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0140A </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing GAIGE [REFORM] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Research Group on "An Overall Design for China's </F>
Economic System Reform," headed by Wu Jinglian (0709 2417 8834): 
"Basic Ideas About the Establishment of a New System for 
Macroeconomic Regulation and Control and Management of 
State-Owned Assets"] 
  [Text] The 14th Party Congress clearly stated the goal for 
China's economic system to be the building of a socialist market 
economy system. I believe that in order to realize this goal, we 
should institute as quickly as possible associated tax, fiscal, 
and financial system, as well as conduct investment control 
system reform to provide a basic framework for the attainment 
within three to five years of a national macroeconomic 
regulation and control system in the socialist market economy. 
At the same time, we should actively promote reform of the 
state-owned assets control system to lay the foundation for a 
new equity rights system in which public ownership is paramount 
in the operation of the market economy. 
  1. Intensification of taxation, fiscal, finance and 
banking and investment control system reform and moving ahead 
with state-owned assets control system reform is urgently 
required for the building of a socialist market economy to solve 
deep-seated problems in development of the nation's economy. 
  Since 1992, China's reform, opening to the outside world, 
and 
modernization have entered a new era. The overall reform and 
development situation is good, but some deep-seated 
contradictions and problems remain in the operation of the 
economy. One is that an effective macroeconomic regulation and 
control system and microeconomic restraint systems have yet to 
be built; thus, a new round of high growth of total social 
demand is in the offing. Second, demand inflation and structural 
imbalances exist at the same time. Improvements to the product 
mix, the industrial structure, and the irrational enterprise 
organizational structure have not been great. Structural 
inconsistences further complicate overall balance. Third, 
despite the rapid economic growth, overall economic returns 
remain not very high. State-owned enterprises' losses continue 
high, and a serious problem exists with enterprises delaying 
payment of their obligations. Fourth, the fiscal and financial 
situations are grim; thus, the central government macroeconomic 
regulation and control capabilities are extremely weak. On the 
one hand, the trend is toward an increase in the central 
government fiscal deficit, the government being able to obligate 
only approximately 38 billion yuan each year for the capital 
construction of key projects. Government is unable to change the 
seriously backward state of basic sectors. On the other hand, 
structural readjustment pressures are transferred to the banks. 
This intensifies the trend toward greater government 
underwriting of credit. Central bank difficulties in controlling 
the main throttle valve of total money supply adds to 
inflationary pressures. 
  The current economic situation suggests that inflation has 
begun to appear. Naturally emergency actions will have to be 
taken at once to deal with it in order to prevent a 
deterioration of the economic situation. However, grim realities 
indicate that given the existing institutions, the effect of the 
actions we are able to take will be limited. Thus the root 
causes of large scale economic ups and downs will remain. During 
the near term, a basic action is to accelerate macroeconomic 
system and enterprise system reforms, readjusting the benefits 
stimulation mechanisms in enterprises, and governments at all 
levels, improving risk limitation mechanisms, and provide the 
policy tools needed for indirect macroeconomic regulation and 
control for the building of macroeconomic system that realizes 
policy goals. 
  The existing macroeconomic system suggests the main reasons 
for the foregoing inconsistencies and problems to be as follows: 
  The problems with the tax system are manifested mostly in a 
narrow tax base, too great a dependence on processing 
industries, and inability to respond to sources of revenue, all 
of which make for unstable fiscal revenues. Second, taxation 
plays too great a role in the readjustment of the industrial 
structure and enterprises under different ownership systems. Tax 
policies have too great a bias; thus, the various taxable items 
and tax rates are too complex and the tax burdens are not equal. 
Third, the overly biased revenue policies not only render the 
attainment of policy goals difficult, but they damage the unity 
and the coherence of the tax system, thereby opening many 
loopholes for tax evasion and tax cheating, which increases tax 
collection and administration difficulties. 
  Neither the existing "fiscal contracting" nor the impending 
fiscal system of "contracting tax sharing" provide an 
institutional basis for regularizing financial distributions 
between the central government and local governments. First of 
all, the division of fiscal revenues is still according to 
administrative subordination, which is detrimental to the 
separation of government administration and enterprise 
management. Second, an overly large percentage of turnover 
taxes, which have a substantial impact on the economic 
structure, go to local jurisdictions. This results in redundant 
construction and vying among jurisdictions for high speed 
growth, which intensifies economic fluctuations and regional 
separation. In addition, the haggling and the strict 
guaranteeing of base figures associated with fiscal contracting 
produce a regressive mechanism in central government fiscal 
revenues in which the central government lacks financial 
strength, and the ability of the central government to apply 
fiscal measuresto adjust the structure becomes weaker and 
weaker. Finally, as the economy grows, growth of fiscal revenues 
slows. During the "real estate craze" of 1992, enterprise 
profits increased, and industrial growth reached 20 percent, but 
land-use revenues and income tax revenues declined for the 
period January through October, while product taxes increased 
only 5.2 percent. Moreover, the overly rapid increase in fiscal 
expenditures causes a widening of fiscal policies. Fiscal 
revenues that are lower than production increase has become a 
serious problem in 1993. During the first quarter of the year, 
fiscal revenue growth amounted to only one-half the increase in 
GDP, and only one-third the increase in industrial production. 
  The functions of the finance and banking system are ill 
defined and lacking in vitality. First, the central bank carries 
too heavy a responsibility for readjusting the economic 
structure. Some of its expanded administrative tasks frequently 
conflict with its goal of controlling total demand. Second is 
too great reliance on administrative fiat to regulate and 
control the money supply, and the central bank's lack of policy 
tools for indirect regulation and control of money makes 
effective and flexible readjustment of total demand difficult. 
Third, the operating mechanism of the specialized banks have a 
strong administrative coloration. They lack vitality, and they 
have numerous accounts pending, unpaid debts, and bad debts. The 
quality of their assets has declined further. Therefore, 
whenever total demand inflates excessively, both effective 
monetary policy tools and a finance and banking system that can 
attain monetary policy goals are missing. These banks continue 
to have no choice but to rely on administrative fiat and command 
style methods to control total demand. The result is they can 
neither control money outside plan nor can they prevent damage 
to key construction projects covered by state plan. 
  The planning system has yet to break free from controls on 
microeconomic activity. Static control methods for achieving 
equilibrium in planning are still adopted, a substantial amount 
of effort going into the setting of norms, the apportionment of 
investment, project approvals, and sharing foreign exchange. 
Ability to integrate macroeconomic policy methods in a 
comprehensive way is weak. 
  Investment decision-making authority is still too greatly 
centralized in government departments at all levels. Control 
methods continue to be mostly administrative fiat, control of 
scale, and project examination and approval. The most 
conspicuous problem is that investment project decision making, 
fund raising, construction, production, and operation, as well 
as debt repayment, are divorced from each other. A mechanism is 
lacking for spelling out responsibilities and for limiting 
risks. This leads to ill-advised investment, redundant 
construction, and low returns that causes serious waste. With 
the further deregulation of prices, operation of the economy -- 
particularly the degree to which enterprises' operating 
activities will be oriented toward the market -- will accelerate 
greatly. Failure of macroeconomic system reform to keep up will 
mean that frictions between the existing control system and 
enterprises or markets will become worse and worse. This will 
directly impair sustained and steady national economic growth. 
Therefore, further intensification of macroeconomic regulation 
and control system reform has become an urgent necessity in the 
building of a market economy and in ensuring the nation's 
steady, high speed economic growth. 
  Delay in reforming the state-owned enterprise equity system 
is one of the basic reasons for the various economic problems 
mentioned above. So long as state-owned enterprise equity rights 
are unclear, there is no separation of government administration 
and enterprise management, and the limits of authority are not 
spelled out, formation of genuine market entities will be 
difficult. Enterprises cannot be expected to react fully to 
macroeconomic regulation and control signals. Only enterprises 
whose equity rights are clear, who make their own operating 
decisions, and who are responsible for their own profits and 
losses can be the nucleus for a market economy. However, effort 
to reform enterprises' operating mechanisms entirely from the 
microeconomic angle cannot fundamentally change this situation. 
Thus, reform of the state-owned assets control system is needed, 
rebuilding the state-owned enterprise equity rights system by 
transforming the state-owned enterprise equity structure. 
  2. The Basic Pattern of the New System of State 
Macroeconomic Regulation and Control, and the Goals of System 
Reform 
  We have the following tentative ideas about the goals, basic 
functions, division of labor among various sectors, and the 
goals of system reform that take into account both the 
requirements for a market economy and the state of China's 
economic development. 
  A) Main Goals of State Macroeconomic Regulation and 
Control: The main goals of state macroeconomic regulation 
and control are to regulate total demand, and to ensure economic 
stability and growth, as well as to balance international 
receipts and expenditures; to remedy shortcomings of the market 
mechanism so as to be able to provide public products and 
services to society, regulate income distribution, ensure social 
equality, and promote balanced regional development; and to 
adopt appropriate industrial policies in order to advance 
structural improvements and increase total supply capabilities. 
  B) Basic Pattern of the Functional Division of Labor of 
Main Macroeconomic Policies. Regulation and control of 
total supply is achieved mostly through monetary policy, and 
through appropriate readjustment of the economic structure and 
fiscal methods. Industrial policies are largely functional 
policies. Too wide ranging tilt policies are not used since the 
goal is to promote change and upgrading of the economic 
structure. The tax system is gradually moving in a neutral 
direction. 
  This basic pattern has the following several components: 
  First, the main functions of the taxation system 
are to provide the government with a steady revenue base and to 
create a fair environment for market competition. Taxation 
policy mostly regulates the distribution of income. Taxation 
policy is gradually changing awaya from the use of preferential 
taxation policies to allocate resources; ultimately, taxation 
will become neutral. Thus, for a fairly long time to come, 
indirect taxes -- mostly added value taxes -- will predominate. 
Land taxes and resources taxes should also hold an important 
position. Enterprise income taxes will decline as a percentage 
of all taxes, and the position of the individual income tax will 
gradually rise, ultimately becoming one of the main kinds of 
taxation. A transition will be made gradually from mostly 
indirect taxation to direct taxation. In order to ensure a broad 
tax base and steady revenues, a fairly high percentage of 
indirect taxation, such as added value taxes, is currently 
necessary. However, added value taxes are taxes levied on key 
element income. They differ fundamentally from turnover taxes 
such as product taxes. The added value tax can ensure steady 
revenues from a wide range of sources while avoiding the double 
taxation of the turnover tax and the structural distortions. 
  Second, The main function of the fiscal system is 
to use the redistribution of fiscal revenues and the use of 
government funds to promote balanced regional development; to 
provide public infrastructure and social services to sustain 
long-term, steady, and balanced economic growth; and to use 
fiscal policy to regulate the level of total demand. Exercising 
this function requires institution of a standard tax 
distribution system that spells out the powers and fiscal 
authorities of the central and local governments so as to ensure 
the active interest of both parties. When organizing fiscal 
revenues, the central government must have the lion's share, 
this apportionment serving as the foundation for building a 
system whereby the central government transfers payments of 
fiscal revenues to local government, thereby increasing the 
central government's regulation and control capabilities. 
Performance of this function requires the building of a new 
long-term financing system for policy purposes that relies on 
the state's credit to attract funds to be used over a long 
period, the state paying compensation for their use, these funds 
being used for the building of infrastructure and basic 
industries requiring a long period for recovery of capital. This 
forms a new fiscal system that is fairly able to normalize 
relations between the central government and local government, 
that fairly equitably balances fiscal capabilities between one 
region and another, and that effectively adjusts the economic 
structure. 
  Third, The central bank is a key player in the 
finance and banking system. The central bank's monetary policies 
are important means of macroeconomic regulation and control. 
Monetary policies are basically restraining policies who goal is 
to stabilize the currency as a precondition for ensuring total 
supply capabilities. The central bank must exercise supervision 
and control over banking and safeguard the financial order; 
however, it must not interfere in the business of the 
specialized banks, much less, may it directly perform the 
business of the specialized banks. The central bank may no 
longer use the granting of credit for policy reasons for direct 
readjustment of the economic structure. Its functions require 
the building of a highly skilled and highly efficient central 
banking system, development of nationwide and regional 
commercial banks, and the establishment of special banks that 
function to meet policy needs. 
  Fourth, the main function of the planning system 
is the study of long-term strategy, the drawing up of long-term 
plans and industrial policies, and making economic development 
forecasts and providing overall balance. Doing this requires a 
new concept of planning, improvement of planning methods, and a 
change in the work focus of planning units. 
  Fifth, The almost complete deregulation of prices 
has given rise to a price formation mechanism in which the 
market decides prices for the most part. The state's pricing 
policy consists of mostly the following: support prices for 
basic agricultural products, and regulate and control prices in 
sectors where a natural monopoly exists, the overall price level 
and industrial monopolies regulated and controlled through 
overall demand policies and monopoly regulation measures. 
<H3>  3. Basic Tasks in Reform of the Macroeconomic Regulation and 
Control System, and Steps To Be Taken for Their 
Implementation. </H3>
  A) Tasks in Tax System Reform and Steps To Be Taken for 
Their Implementation 
  (1) Need to build a new tax system that has a broad tax 
base, 
in which tax burdens are fair, and in which collection and 
administration are efficient. 
  Establishment of a new tax system requires readjustment of 
the current turnover tax structure, changing the current 
turnover tax system of one tax for domestically owned and 
another for foreign owned enterprises, and regularizing the 
turnover tax system. It also requires changing the separate 
enterprise income tax that is based on whether an enterprise is 
Chinese for foreign owned, and separate income taxes for Chinese 
citizens and foreign citizens, establishing a uniform enterprise 
income tax and individual income tax. The land tax and the 
resources tax should be broadened; tax burdens should be made 
more equitable; preferential tax policies should be revamped; 
and ways to collect a uniform social security tax should be 
studied. 
  Accomplishing the above tasks will require a new tax 
structure that not only provides a broad tax base, ensures 
steady revenues, and causes little damage to industries, but 
also provides considerable choices of taxes to divide up between 
the central government and local governments in the 
regularization of the tax sharing system. In addition, a 
standard added value tax, and a uniform income tax provide 
conditions for effective collection and administration of tax 
revenues. Once the new tax system is in place, every effort must 
be made to make fiscal revenues a greater percentage of national 
income than they currently are. 
  (2) Carry out tax reform and price reform more or less in 
tandem. 
  Simultaneous with regularization of the added value tax 
should be corresponding readjustments of the range of products 
covered by the product tax. Since raising prices or 
decontrolling prices of basic products results at once in either 
overly low or overly high product taxation rates for basic 
sector processing industries, readjustment of the product tax 
becomes an urgent task of primary importance. The tax on a small 
number of luxury goods should be retained, and redesignated an 
excise tax. A one or two tier tax rate added value tax should 
replace the tax on other products. Uniform tax rates should be 
promoted across the board, calculation and collection of the 
added value tax should be regularized, and uniform receipts that 
show the tax paid or deducted should be used. These methods 
should be used to establish a new pattern of indirect taxes as a 
substantial percentage of all taxes to ensure steady fiscal 
revenues. 
  At the same time, in the handling of distributions between 
the state and state-owned enterprises, taxes and profits should 
be separated, indebtedness repaid after taxes, and profits 
distributed after taxes, in addition to which the summarization 
of experiences should be used as a basis for perfecting debt 
repayment and profit sharing methods. Uniform fiscal accounting 
standards should form a basis for merging the Chinese owned and 
foreign owned enterprise income tax to bring tax rates into line 
in fact as well as in name, and the Chinese and foreign personal 
income tax should be made uniform as well. 
  Reform of the land tax and the resources tax, broadening the 
application of the land and resources tax to regulate 
differential revenues from primary products following price 
decontrol. In view of the current development of the real estate 
sector and development zones, land taxes should be reformed at 
once. Taxes should be levied on land sales, land use, land 
trading, and land appreciation to increase fiscal revenues and 
ensure equitable distribution of social resources. 

  - 
  -  Re-examination of tariffs, integrating this task into 
domestic tax system reform and with requirements for entering 
GATT for timely readjustment and reform of tariffs. Nominal 
tariff rates should be reduced gradually, all item reductions 
and exemptions controlled, the current very low actual tariff 
rates and the overly high nominal tariff rates fundamentally 
changed. Currently, China's nominal tariff rate averages 22.5 
percent, but because of various reductions and exemptions, the 
actual import tariff rate averages only about 10 percent. This 
is lower than the average 14 percent rate of developing 
countries. 
  -  Separation of national tax collection agencies and local tax 
collection agencies. First of all, for the sake of 
centralization and efficiency, everything possible should be 
done to centralize in the central government all tax legislation 
that is under national government control, then turn over to 
local government for collection the kinds of taxes that local 
government can collect more efficiently, local taxation then 
being expanded somewhat. Local government should be given some 
right to legislate local taxes. Central government and local 
government tax collection agencies should be set up to keep 
strict control over tax reductions and exemptions. Turnover tax 
contracting or contracting in a disguised form must be 
resolutely halted. 

    B) Tasks and Steps To Be Taken in Reform of the Fiscal 
System 
  (1) Standardizing the tax sharing system, building a system 
for revenue transfer payments, and building a system for 
long-term financing of projects of a policy nature are basic 
tasks in system reform. 
  Standardization of the tax sharing system requires 
clarification of government functions at all levels, authority 
defined on the basis of function, and payments made on the basis 
of authority. The general principle for defining authority is 
that each level of government will not meddle in the operation 
of enterprises. In the division of powers between the central 
government and local government, the central government is to be 
responsible for ensuring stability of the social order, and 
ensuring uniformity in markets throughout the land. It is 
additionally responsible for important economic structural tasks 
such as the building of a national infrastructure that cuts 
across regional lines, and for readjustments in the regional and 
industrial sectors. Local governments are responsible for 
matters directly related to local social and economic 
development, principal of which are social services including 
basic local facilities, environmental clean ups and scientific, 
educational, cultural, and health matters, local revenue 
distribution, and social insurance policies, as well as 
promotion of the development of commercial and other tertiary 
industries, and improvement of the investment climate. 
  Standardization of the tax sharing system also requires 
determination of central government and local government 
revenues. In the organization of revenues, the central 
government must have the lion's share. In defining the kinds of 
revenues that go to the central government and local 
governments, the current contract system for sharing revenues 
must be changed. In the division of income taxes, the division 
of revenues on the basis of the administrative subordination of 
enterprises must be demolished, and turnover taxes cannot be 
invariably shared jointly by the central government and local 
governments. The pooling of taxes must be reduced or eliminated. 
  Definition of the expenditures and revenues of government at 
all levels should form the basis for the central government's 
concentration of some revenues for use in balancing local 
governments' fiscal capabilities. A system should be set up 
whereby the central government makes transfer payments of fiscal 
revenues to local jurisdictions, i.e., the central government 
concentrates appropriate amounts of fiscal revenues for the 
subsidization of different areas according to set standards 
(such as population, nature of the terrain, and per capita GNP). 
  Building of a new long-term financing system for policy 
purposes. The basic function of long term financing for policy 
purposes is to enhance the building of infrastructure, making up 
for the shortage of budgeted funds. The main sources of 
financing for policy purpose are funds for which compensation is 
paid such as postal savings, retirement funds, and government 
bonds. Central government treasury offsetting of financing costs 
provides assurance that improves financing conditions. The main 
fields of financing activity are basic public facilities, basic 
industries, and long-term export credits that take a long time 
to recoup capital, produce low profits, and pose high risks. 
Public projects from which it is impossible to recoup investment 
through profits are paid for by fiscal budget gratis investment. 
The government financial sector may no longer meddle directly in 
the financial activities of state-owned enterprises. Financial 
accounting systems that closely meet international standards 
have been promulgated, and the role of independent accountants 
is becoming stronger; therefore, fiscal department agencies 
responsible for running state-owned enterprises' fiscal affairs 
should be abolished, and the functions of fiscal, tax, and state 
assets administration units should be straightened out. 
  (2) Fiscal system reform measures should be coordinated with 
price and tax reforms, reform of the revenue sharing system 
conducted step by step. 


    -  Concomittant with price and taxation reform, 
subsidization of losses incurred for policy reasons should be 
phased out. 
  -  Reform of the standardized tax sharing system should be done 
in two steps. In view of the difficulty of defining power and 
establishing a transfer payments system, receipts should be 
handled before expenditures. As a first step, fiscal expenditure 
base figures at all levels should be frozen, reform conducted in 
step with reform of indirect taxation and the income tax, and 
the relationships between the central government and local 
governments on revenues changed first. Inasmuch as different 
kinds of taxes have different effects on the economic structure 
and fiscal revenues, and bearing in mind collection and 
administration capabilities, the following tax sharing pattern 
should be established for several main forms of taxation: Excise 
taxes, added value taxes, tariffs, and major resources taxes to 
revert to the central government; business taxes, real estate 
taxes, and social security taxes (or program evaluation and 
review funds) to revert to local governments. Once the income 
tax has been regularized, revenues from it may be jointly shared 
or revert to local governments. Local government shortfalls 
between receipts and expenditures should be subsidized out of 
the central government treasury. In addition, reforms for the 
separation of tax collection agencies should be carried out to 
set up two separate tax collection and administration systems. 
Second is the setting of expenditure base figures and the 
make-up of expenditures on the basis of power, simultaneously 
setting up a regularized system by which the central government 
can make transfer payments to local governments, the central 
government using this system to equalize the financial resources 
of different jurisdictions and to subsidize backward areas. 
  -  Simultaneous with reform of the tax sharing system should be 
improvement of the redundant fiscal budgeting system. Applicable 
functions of fiscal units and planning units should be 
readjusted or merged for the formation of long-term fiscal 
financing plans. Policy purposes banks such as import-export 
banks and development banks should be established as 
institutions for long-term financing for policy reasons. 

    C) Financial System Reform Tasks and Steps for Carrying 
Them Out 
  (1) Perfection of the central bank's macroeconomic 
regulation 
and control mechanism, setting up a highly skilled, highly 
effective central banking system with primary level branches in 
the major administrative regions. The central banks should apply 
indirect regulation and control methods to control currency and 
regulation and control total demand. 


    -  The central bank should gradually replace control of 
the money supply with control of total credit, changing its 
primary reliance on limited direct credit for gradual 
implementation of indirect macroeconomic regulation and control. 
This means using its own funds, buying up or selling off 
government bonds, changing rediscount rates, and adjusting 
interest rates to control basic money, thereby attaining the 
goal of control total money supply. 
  -  Readjustment of the People's Bank organizational structure, 
eliminating branches and sub-branches below the primary branch 
level, and setting up one or more national commercial banks and 
regional banks. The business of transporting currency and the 
clearing business should be handled by commercial companies. 
  -  Cutbacks on the range of central bank activities, turning 
over matters done for policy reasons to banks set up for that 
purpose. The People's Bank should no longer handle special 
loans, nor should it finance nonbanking financial institutions. 
The central bank should actively promote open market business, 
gradually increasing the percentage of government bonds among 
the central bank's assets. Simultaneous with the government's 
halting of overdrafts on the central bank and the establishment 
of banks that function for policy purposes, postal savings may 
be used as a source of funds for long-term financing for policy 
reasons. 

    (2) Establishment of banks to meet policy needs and the 
development of commercial banks. 
  Vigorous reduction of loans granted for policy reasons, 
establishment of banks to meet policy needs, and making loans 
granted for policy reasons a part of the system for long-term 
policy-related financing. 

  - 
  -  Separation of specialized banks' policy purposes business 
from its regular business, determining the organizational 
structure for specialized banks, and reforming their financial 
systems and labor wage systems to make them real commercial 
banks. 
  -  Exercising control over the ratio between assets and 
liabilities of commercial banks, as well as controlling assets 
risks and liquidity, encouraging commercial banks to engage in 
competition, using competition to impel the banks to improve 
their services. 

    (3) The basic tasks in foreign exchange system reform are to 
make the renminbi freely convertible within certain limits for 
ordinary international current account receipts and expenditures 
(including the repatriation of profits from direct investment in 
foreign trade, posts and telecommunications, communications, and 
transportation); and to reduce administrative interference in 
the use of foreign exchange. 


    -  First is a change in the way in which the central 
government uses foreign exchange. Except for foreign exchange 
needed for special purposes such as national defense and foreign 
exchange, which the state supplies at the posted price, all 
foreign exchange to be supplied at the negotiated price. 
  -  Acceleration of exchange rate reform, merging different 
exchange rates into a single one and developing foreign exchange 
markets. This should be followed by foreign exchange retention, 
exchange rates being allowed to fluctuate, thereby making the 
renminbi freely convertible within certain limits for current 
accounts. 

    (4) Separation of the banking and the securities business, 
independently supervising and controlling the securities 
business. 
  A) Basic Tasks in Reform of the Investment System and 
Steps for Carrying Them Out 
  (1) Setting up an investment system having different 
categories of control. 
  Construction projects may be divided into three general 
categories on the basis of the field of investment, recovery of 
investment, and the profits to be made. 
  First, enterprises and banks should have broader decision 
making authority about investment in competitive industrial 
sectors and in the tertiary industries field, a "declaration 
system" ultimately replacing the "examination and approval 
system." The government should no longer interfere in investment 
activity. 
  Second, governments at all levels should continue to include 
in their fiscal budgets money for investment in public services 
and facilities of a nonproductive nature such as the building of 
schools, hospitals, and cultural facilities. Government 
authorities in charge should continue to exercise direct control 
over such investment. 
  Third, the government should provide policy-related credit 
for infrastructure and for investment in basic industries and 
the sophisticated technology sector, as well as for regional 
development. Such investment credit, which has a bearing on the 
economy of the whole country, should be made a part of the 
nation's policy-related long-term financing system. Banks that 
have been set up to meet policy needs should exercise control in 
accordance with state regional development plans and industrial 
policy. 
  (2) Bearing in mind existing conditions and possibilities, 
energies should be concentrated, first of all, on reforming the 
state policy-related long-term investment credit system. 
  Investment in the first category cited above [i.e., in 
industry and tertiary industries] accounts for more than 
three-fourths of all investment; however, rationalizing this 
investment activity will ultimately require changing enterprise 
equity rights, building a standardized taxation system, and 
perfecting the finance and banking system. 
  Prominent problems existing today in state construction and 
development investment that the central government regulates and 
controls directly, and in the credit field are mainly the 
following: Lack of investment responsibility and a mechanism for 
limiting risk; a shortage of funds, the central government 
having insufficient ability to regulate; a problem-plagued fund 
raising, fund use, and fund administration system; and the 
central bank and the specialized banks getting into 
policy-related credit, which injures monetary policy, lowers the 
efficiency of the specialized banks, and gets in the way of 
finance and banking system reform. 
  Unlike first category investment activities, state directly 
regulated and controlled capital construction cannot 
automatically improve as reforms in other fields intensify. 
Thus, it is both necessary and possible to begin at once to 
reform state long-term policy-related credit and the credit 
system so as to solve current extremely serious structural 
problems, and to set the stage for reforms in other fields. 
  (3) Basic tasks in reforming the state-policy-related 
long-term investment credit system 


    -  Beginning to build an investment decision making and 
risk limiting mechanism that links rights and responsibilities, 
completely changing the present operating mechanism in which 
rights and responsibilities are separate and government 
administrative agencies directly interfere excessively in 
investment. 
  Establishment of a development bank. The basic function of a 
development bank is to issue medium- and long-term credit for 
investment in infrastructure, basic industries, newly emerging 
leading industries, and regional development, using state long- 
term economic development plans and industrial policy as a 
guide. A development bank provides preferential interest rates 
for projects producing a marked public benefit for which the 
investment recovery period is long and economic benefits low. 
Development bank funds may not be invested in equity shares. 
  %Widening of sources of policy-related long-term credit 
funds, soaking up idle capital in society to improve the central 
government's ability to guide investment activity and readjust 
the investment structure. 
  %The main source of development bank funds is the issuance 
of 
bonds. The treasury should arrange construction fund purchases 
of long-term low interest or interest-free debentures. The state 
should direct that postal savings and social security fund 
surpluses, and insurance company surpluses must be used to 
purchase regular interest rate development bank finance bonds. 
The state should also adopt policies to encourage financial 
institutions and individual to purchase development bank bonds, 
financial institutions being able to use the development bank 
bonds they hold as collateral for People's Bank loans. Guided by 
state macroeconomic plans and controls on the scale of credit, 
the development bank should set up a credit project evaluation 
and examination system, a control system, and operating 
procedures that link control over the ratio between assets and 
liabilities and control over assets risks. 

    A) Attendant Reform of Planning Work 
  The task in planning is comprehensive balance and the 
formulation of industrial policies. Reform of the macroeconomic 
regulation and control system poses a need for a high order of 
comprehensive balance in planning work, and the ingredients of 
industrial policy should also be changed. Once the pricing 
system, the taxation system, and the fiscal system have taken 
care of the market signals problem and the distortions of 
benefit relationships, there will be no further need for 
excessively biased industrial policies. Nor will frequent 
artificial tinkering with the various market parameters be 
needed. The main ingredient in industrial policy, which consists 
primarily of functional policies that improve the overall 
quality of the economy, is improvement of social and economic 
infrastructure, the fostering of management, technology, and 
planning, and the simultaneous adoption of export-oriented trade 
policies to bring about an optimization of the structure through 
the melding of the domestic economy with the international 
economy. In addition, industrial policy must pay close attention 
to the development of one or two leading industries, tilting 
policies in their favor to an appropriate degree to stimulate an 
upgrading of the industrial structure. One important means for 
implementing industrial policy is policy-related long-term 
financing. Planning units should accelerate reforms in the 
following several regards: 


    -  In the investment control realm, as system reform 
intensifies, and the mechanism for restraining investment 
entities grows stronger, planning units should curtail the 
examination and approval of routine investment projects, 
gradually substituting a "declaration system" for the 
"examination and approval system." In the process of building a 
development bank, the planning sector should work together with 
the fiscal and banking sectors to make appropriate readjustments: 
  -  State use of foreign exchange, no longer employing planning 
quotas, for gradual institution of an exchange purchase system. 
  -  Large scale cutbacks in various licensing systems to promote 
implementation of trade policies. 
  -  Make vocational training an important part of planning 
work 

<H3>    4. The Different Roles of All Sectors in the Macroeconomic 
Regulation and Control System in the Building of a Socialist 
Market Economy System </H3>
  First, fiscal system reform is the most important 
task in the establishment of a new system. It should be given 
priority consideration in the building of systems. 
  The taxation system is the most basic institutional 
framework 
for a market economy. Therefore, only from the foundation of a 
standard tax system can a market economy be built in which 
competition is equal, resources are allocated effectively, and 
distributions are relatively fair. 
  Second, the urgency of finance and banking system 
reform is manifested, first of all, in the ability of the 
central bank's macroeconomic regulation and control to ensure 
economic stability. The finance and banking system has two basic 
functions in a market economy. One is to regulate and control 
the money supply through the central bank to ensure economic 
stability. The current economic situation suggests that this 
reform should be accelerated. The second is to provide a 
well-developed financing system for economic activity to promote 
growth and increase returns. The entire financial markets system 
must steadily develop and improve with the development of 
China's market economy. Therefore, reform and perfection of the 
entire finance and banking system is a fairly long-term task. 
  Third, In overall terms, reform of the investment 
system cannot be achieved within the investment system alone. As 
reform of the enterprise system, and of tax and finance and 
banking institutions proceeds, and as the functions of 
government organs change, transformation of the investment 
system will become easier to achieve. However, a state 
policy-related long-term investment credit system must and can 
be inaugurated as early as possible, both to help solve glaring 
structural problems in the present economy, and to set the stage 
for reforms in other regards. 
  The foregoing analysis does not mean by any means that these 
reforms should be carried out alone. Each system has different 
functions, but overall integration is necessary in the process 
of conduction reform. 
<H3>  5. Reform of the State-Owned Assets Control System, Building 
a State-Owned Enterprise Equity Structure in Which the State 
Holds Shares Indirectly and Directly Control Shares as a 
National Legal Entity </H3>
  A) Fundamental Reform of State-Owned Enterprises Must 
Begin With the Enterprise Equity Rights System. 
  Since the beginning of reform and opening to the outside 
world, China has adopted a series of enterprise reform measures 
that have brought definite results. The face of state-owned 
enterprises has changed very greatly. Nevertheless, it must be 
realized that no fundamental changes have been made in the 
situation of no clarification of the equity rights of 
state-owned enterprises, no separation of government 
administration and enterprise management, no clear-cut 
responsibilities, and enterprise mechanisms that do not operate 
smoothly, not very high vitality, and not very good returns. 
  There are another two steadily growing tendencies that 
require very close attention. One is that large quantities of 
state- owned assets are being drained away through various open 
and hidden means. State-owned assets have become the most 
important sources of sudden wealth for small groups, 
individuals, and foreign investors. This draining away is a 
redistribution of wealth that is very unfair and that may lead 
to social unrest. Second, enterprises living off of their 
capital, technological stagnation, and inadequate development 
stamina will seriously impair upgrading of the entire national 
economic structure and international competitiveness. This is 
because China' energy, raw and processed materials, and heavy 
chemical industries, and the key industries that provide 
mechanical equipment are still its large- and medium-sized 
enterprises. Looked at in these terms, ability to completely 
turn around the current trend in state-owned enterprises is a 
matter that affects the basic strength of China's economy and 
its long-range development prospects. 
  Therefore, enterprise reform must explore new approaches. It 
cannot just work within the existing management system, or 
continue simply to take actions that delegate authority and make 
concessions. It must solve problems at their source. It must 
reform the existing state-owned assets control system and 
operating methods, rebuilding the publicly owned equity rights 
system. 
  B) The Key to State-Owned Assets Control System Reform 
Lies in Rebuilding the State-Owned Enterprise Equity Rights 
Structure, the Main Objects of Reform Being State-Owned Large- 
and Medium-Sized Enterprises 
  (1) Two basic principles must be adhered to in the 
rebuilding 
of the state-owned enterprise equity structure. 
  First, is the principle of clear-cut equity rights and the 
separation of government administration and enterprise 
management, using the formation of state holding companies to 
create juridical organizations, and using share control and 
share participation to separate state-owned enterprise ownership 
rights from governments at all levels. This means the building 
of a new equity rights structure, demolishing the mechanism 
whereby government directly interferes in the operation of 
state-owned enterprises. 
  Second, is the principle of demolishing industry monopolies 
and the diversification of equity rights. In founding state 
holding companies that hold state-owned enterprise shares, the 
formation of new industrial monopolies must be guarded against. 
Administrative monopolies exist in the traditional system, 
government departments monopolizing major decisions in 
enterprises. If we simply trade the former government units in 
charge for industrial corporations, these corporations managing 
and administering the state-owned enterprises in those 
industries, we will end up in a new kind of industrial monopoly. 
This will distort market signals and enterprise actions, thereby 
lowering the efficiency of the market economy. The harm will be 
no less than that of the administrative monopoly in the 
traditional system. Therefore, we must carefully design control 
organs for the new state-owned enterprise juridical entities, 
institute the swapping of share holdings, and diversify equity 
rights to prevent a national holding company from monopolizing 
an industry. 
  (2) The key to reform lies in changing the equity rights 
structure of state-owned large- and medium-sized enterprises. 
  Most medium and small state-owned enterprises may be found 
in 
the ordinary industrial sector and in tertiary industries. In a 
socialist market economy, there is no need for state ownership 
of these enterprises. Furthermore, as a practical matter, these 
enterprises can fairly easily clarify anew their equity rights 
relationship through leasing, mergers, joint ventures, and sale, 
becoming market entities that make their own operating decisions 
and are responsible for their own profits and losses. 
  The difficulty in reforming the state-owned enterprise 
equity 
rights system lies in how to establish a state-owned large and 
medium size enterprise equity rights structure that is both 
consistent with requirements of the market economy, and also 
does not change the character of ownership. In reality, China's 
state-owned large and medium size enterprises hold a dominant 
position in terms of infrastructure and as basic industries. 
They are also in the leading sectors of the national economy. 
These sectors are technology and capital intensive. They are 
also characterized by marked economies of scale and substantial 
investment risk. They have a bearing on the national economy and 
the people's livelihood. This is not a field suited to the 
investment of private capital. State-owned enterprises will 
still have to play a major role in these sectors. Therefore, 
finding a new state-owned enterprise form for state-owned 
enterprises in these fields has become a problem in urgent need 
of solution. 
  C) Theoretical Basis for the Building of a State-Owned 
Enterprise Equity Structure and Basic Goals 
  Basic economic theory holds that independent equity rights 
are the foundation for operation of a market economy. The key to 
reform of the state-owned assets control system means building a 
form of ownership having independent equity. 
  The development of modern share corporations and their 
juridical entity control structure have greatly enriched equity 
concepts. It has given rise to equity mechanisms in which the 
ultimate ownership rights and the occupancy rights, control 
rights, and operating rights that derive from them are mutually 
separate and mutual restricting. Operating rights are held by 
enterprise management teams who are responsible for the 
enterprise's day-to-day operation and decisions. Control rights 
are held by the board of directors. They include the appointment 
and payment of compensation to management teams, and decisions 
on the enterprise's important development strategies. Occupancy 
rights belong to the enterprise's juridical entity. As the 
occupier of all enterprise assets, it is responsible for 
indebtedness. It can mortgage and lease, and it bears all 
losses. Ownership rights are held by all shareholders. Their 
rights include the right to earnings, and to make strategic 
decisions through shareholder meeting approvals of the board of 
directors. So called separate equity rights means the 
separation, independence, and mutual limitation of the foregoing 
four kinds of rights. 
  In view of basic economic theory in conjunction with 
practice 
in reform of the country's enterprises and foreign experience in 
state-owned assets control, we believe the basic goals of 
state-owned assets control system reform to be the building of a 
new state-owned assets equity structure. Broadly speaking, this 
includes a structure having the following four levels: 
  First, ultimate ownership of state-owned assets is in the 
hands of the state. 
  Second, the state (an NPC Standing Committee-empowered 
agency) controls the equity rights (state directly controlled 
shares) of national level holding corporations through full 
funding, control of shares, and share participation. 
  Third, in their status as independent juridical entities, 
state holding corporations employ share control or share 
participation to control state-owned enterprise equity rights 
(juridical entity directly controlled shares). 
  Fourth, as independent juridical entities actually holding 
state-owned assets, the managers of enterprises possess decision 
making authority for day-to-day operations. 
  Such a structure in which the state holds shares indirectly 
and a juridical entity directly holds shares does not change the 
dominant position of public ownership in terms of ultimate 
ownership rights. However, it does permit a separation of 
state-owned assets control functions and operating functions. 
Thus it builds mutually restricting ownership rights, control 
rights, occupancy rights, and operating rights, thereby enabling 
a genuine separation of government administration and enterprise 
management that enables state-owned enterprises to become market 
entities that make their own operating decisions, and are 
responsible for their own profits and losses. 
  D) Ideas About the Specific Make-Up of a State-Owned 
Indirect Shareholding, Public Juridical Entity Direct (Swapped) 
Shareholding Plan 
  First, the members of the public ownership system committee 
established under the NPC Standing Committee are elected by the 
NPC Standing Committee. The public ownership system committee 
acts as the ultimate personification of state-owned assets, or 
what might be termed the ultimate board of directors for all 
state-owned assets. The public ownership system committee has 
authority to select members of the board of directors of 
national holding corporations on the basis of their special 
skills and the achievements of national holding companies. The 
work of the committee is subject to supervision of the NPC 
Standing Committee and the electorate. 
  Second is the building of multiple national level holding 
companies. During the period when national level holding 
companies are being created, the committee will appropriate some 
state-owned assets to the holding companies or give each of the 
holding companies a substantial amount of equity rights 
distribution certificates to be used for the purchase of 
state-owned assets. This will serve as a means whereby the 
public ownership system committee invests in national level 
holding companies, the state-owned system committee using full 
funding or share control to get possession of national level 
holding companies. It will appoint members of the board of 
directors of national level holding companies. 
  Two methods may be used to demolish industrial monopolies 
and 
diversify equity rights at the time when national level holding 
companies are founded. Method number one is the establishment in 
each sector of a national level industrial holding company, 
administrative means used to allocate one-third of the equity 
rights of state-owned enterprises in that industry to the 
national level holding company in that industry. Then the 
national level holding company limits the percentage of total 
shares sold that enterprises whose shares it controls might 
hold. The remaining two-thirds of equity rights is given to the 
national level holding company for that industry. Method number 
two is the establishment of several comprehensive national level 
holding companies, the public ownership system committee giving 
each holding company a sufficient amount of share equity 
distribution certificates. The public ownership committee places 
a limit on the percentage of shares it controls in any single 
industry, and it allows holding companies to freely choose the 
purchase equity in state-owned enterprises in different 
industries. This method first requires first that all 
state-owned enterprises change to the share system. 
  Third, as independent juridical personae, national level 
holding companies might use share control and participating 
shares to maintain or obtain equity in state-owned enterprises 
having independent corporate status. 
  Simultaneous with holding companies swapping of their 
holdings of state-owned enterprise equity rights, each 
enterprise also has a certain percentage of equity that can be 
held by other juridical persons or private individuals. Thus a 
diversification of enterprise equity occurs that helps start the 
establishment of a competitive corporate structure. 
  E) Several Main Tasks in the Transformation of the 
State-Owned Enterprise Equity Structure 
  (1) Transformation of shares in existing large- and 
medium-sized state-owned enterprises. First of all, an inventory 
of assets is required to determine the amount and value of 
enterprise assets. The enterprise's assets are then represented 
by capital stock that is divided into various shares, and the 
enterprise's juridical corporate status decided upon. Only after 
this is done cam the national holding company buy equity in the 
enterprise for the formation of a controlling share or 
participating share relationship. At the same time, shares are 
openly offered to attract capital from other juridical persons 
and private individuals. 
  (2) Selection of methods for founding national level holding 
companies. Generally speaking, national level holding companies 
might be newly founded, or existing banks, insurance companies, 
funds, and investment corporations might be made into holding 
companies. Several different choices exist in the actual 
founding process: 
  One proposal is to prohibit banking institutions from 
holding 
shares. This is because even though the source of banks' 
shareholding funds is not savings but administratively allocated 
equity rights or equity rights distribution certificates, 
nevertheless, should recovery of capital invested in 
shareholdintgs become impossible, the banks would be at 
considerable risk. Should a crisis occur at a participating 
share enterprise, the banks stability would be shaken. Thus, it 
has been proposed that national level holding companies be 
founded by personnel drawn from the former Ministry of Industry. 
However, in order to guard against industrial monopolies, most 
of the equity rights of formerly subordinate enterprises would 
be dispersed into other shareholding companies. Another proposal 
is for all national level holding companies to be financial 
institutions. State-owned enterprises throughout the country are 
generally fairly heavily in debt to banks. If they held shares, 
banks could swap indebtedness for equity, thereby solving the 
enterprise indebtedness problem while simultaneously making 
banks shareholders. In addition, large corporate blocs generally 
mostly exercise financial control over subordinate companies, so 
bank share holdings would help the development of large 
entrepreneurial blocs around banks. We believe both methods 
might be mixed. 
  (3) Founding of second level national holding companies. 
China has more than 1,000 large- and medium-sized state-owned 
enterprises under central government control. Nationwide, 
large- and medium-sized state-owned enterprises number in the 
thousands. The founding of only 10-odd primary level national 
holding companies would scarcely suffice to complete the 
restructuring of the ownership of state-owned enterprises. Thus, 
the founding of second level national holding companies is 
needed. First level holding companies might hold equity in 
second level holding companies, and second level holding 
companies might also swap shareholdings among each other. Second 
level holding companies could also hold equity in enterprises. 
They would be like the presently existing entrepreneurial block 
companies. 
  (4) Selection of methods for the swapping of share holdings 
between national holding companies and enterprises. One method 
is a pyramidal ownership structure. This means a share holding 
relationship with swaps only downward and sideways. This means 
that the holding company at the top of the pyramid would have 
substantial authority and control capabilities, while second 
level national holding companies as the core could easily spawn 
numerous large entrepreneurial blocs. Through its control of 
shares, the state would wield tremendous economic power. Another 
method is the network ownership structure in which swaps could 
be made either laterally or vertically. A necessary precondition 
is fairly centralized equity in national holding companies, 
particularly in second level holding companies, enterprises also 
being able to hold equity in national holding companies. This is 
the kind of structure for the swapping of share holdings among 
juridical entities in Japan. We believe a rather appropriate 
method would be to use the first method for the most part. Later 
on, control could be gradually loosened, a title made toward the 
second method. Adoption of this transitional method includes an 
assumption that initially the state will provide full funding 
for the national holding company's equity. Then later on, 
depending on the spread of individual holding company equity in 
different industries and fields, such as ordinary industries and 
the tertiary industry field, a change can be made gradually 
toward a form of holding in which state control of shares and 
share participation is paramount. 
  (5) Associated Government Agency Reform 
  Establishment of national holding companies, separating 
enterprises from direct government control, requires 
simultaneous reform of government agencies to bring about a 
genuine transformation of government functions. 
  All industrial departments in charge must be basically 
eliminated. Those departments that have been in charge of 
industrial planning and administration may be a part of the 
Economic Relations and Trade Committee once they have been 
reduced in size. The Economic Relations and Trade Committee will 
be responsible for functions similar to those of Japan's 
Ministry of International Trade and Industry [MITI]. As a 
transitional organization, once personnel cutbacks have been 
made, it may regain administrative organs for basic industries 
and sophisticated and strategic industries such as energy, 
communications, aviation, and shipping. 
  Founding of a large three-in-one fiscal mechanism made up of 
public finance, taxation, and national assets. The Ministry of 
Finance should abolish departments and bureaus in charge of 
enterprises' financial matters. It should reform the existing 
system of direct control over the finances of state-owned 
enterprises, changing to indirect control methods made up 
primarily of income tax collection, and supervision of returns 
from state-owned assets. Correspondingly, the fiscal budget 
should be changed to a three account form consisting of 
recurring, construction, and capital accounts. The basic 
functions of the State Administration of State Property are 
administrative supervision of state-owned assets, protection of 
the rights of enterprises as juridical persons, and to examine, 
verify, and coordinate. 
  Establishment of a public ownership system committee chosen 
by the NPC to serve as the ultimate board of directors for 
state-owned assets. Not only will it appoint members of the 
National level holding company board of directors, but it will 
also decide national investment, empowerment, and the taking 
back of empowerment. 
  (6) Founding of mechanism for the circulation and transfer 
of 
juridical entity equity for the fashioning of market competition 
among public juridical entities and among other juridical 
entities. 
  Thus, after state-owned enterprises have been turned into 
stock companies, more limited liability companies will have to 
be set up and listed for exchange when conditions warrant. In 
addition, a juridical entity equity exchange organ must be 
established. A negotiable securities exchange must also be 
established for gradual expansion of the number of juridical 
entity shares listed. This is to promote the circulation and 
transfer of juridical entity equity for optimum allocation of 
resources. 
  Public juridical entity equity exchanges must also include 
second level national holding companies. An equity exchange 
percentage may be set, fluctuations in share price becoming an 
important indicator for holding companies. In addition, this 
will also stimulate holding companies more, which is good for 
competition. 
  (7) Transformation of the local state-owned enterprise 
equity 
system. Local state-owned enterprises or a portion of them may 
be designated for local public ownership. Alternatively, the NPC 
Standing Committee may empower local people's congress standing 
committees to set up local public ownership committees as 
plenipotentiaries for local state-owned Assets. Local 
state-owned equity organizations may be rebuilt using the 
methods explained above. This could accelerate the conversion 
process nationwide. 
  However, consideration also should be given to the founding 
of an equity relationship for swapping of local state-owned 
equity between the central government and local governments, and 
among local governments. A minimum amount of sales should be set 
to improve the effective allocation of key resources within the 
market nationwide. 
  F) Sequence and Steps in the Transformation of the 
State-Owned Enterprise Equity Structure 
  The first step is a wide-ranging inventory of the assets of 
state-owned large- and medium-sized enterprises to speed up and 
widen the process of changing enterprises to a stock system. 
This means issuing capital stock for enterprise assets, dividing 
the stock into shares, and determining enterprises' juridical 
corporate status. 
  The second step is setting up national level (or bi-level) 
holding companies, selecting existing banks, insurance 
companies, funds, and investment corporations for conversion to 
holding companies. 
  The third step is reforming government agencies, share 
companies dividing up equity rights at the same time, swapping 
holdings, and beginning open share subscription. 
  The fourth step is listing of share corporations as 
conditions warrant, and beginning equity trading in securities 
exchanges to advance optimum allocation of publicly owned equity. 
  Reform of the state-owned property control system is an 
enormous piece of systems engineering that ramifies into all 
parts of the economy. It requires painstaking planning and 
long-term preparation. Therefore, we should begin to do it as 
soon as possible, learn as we go, and gradually move ahead. One 
fairly safe way to proceed is to select several sectors, and one 
or two cities as pilot projects. This will both help summarize 
experiences as work proceeds to make revisions and improvements, 
and will also reduce social shock. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59310 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   State Councilman on New Trends in Opening Up </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0225A Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 21 Nov 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0225A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by staff reporter Li Zhengping (2621 3630 1627): </F>
"Ten Major Trends in China's Opening Up to the Outside World--An 
Interview With Hu Ping, Director of the Special Economic Zone 
Office of the State Council"] 
  [Text] China will further expand its opening up to the 
outside world. This is a strategic decision made by the 
Communist Party of China in order to establish a socialist 
market economy. However, how to implement the decision? This 
question has aroused attention from all circles. On 19 November 
this reporter interviewed Hu Ping, director of the Special 
Economic Zone Office of the State Council, who was presiding at 
the Fifth National WorK Conference on Economic Development Zones 
held in Tianjin. Hu Ping used over two hours to brief this 
reporter on 10 major trends in China's opening to the outside 
world in the 1990s. 
<H3>  Major Trend One: Objective of Opening to Outside World Is 
Changing From External Orientation Based on Promoting Exports 
From Coastal Regions Into "Neutrality" Centered on Keeping 
Country's Imports, Exports in Equilibrium </H3>
  China's exports, Hu Ping said, should continue to be 
encouraged to compete on the world market and improve their own 
standing continually. But if China only strives to encourage 
exports, China will inevitably experience too many international 
economic frictions. At the same time China cannot particularly 
encourage imports. First, while there is demand, there is not 
that much foreign exchange. Second, that course of action will 
conflict with the overall goals of developing national industry, 
adjusting economic structure, and establishing an independent 
economic system. Therefore, with regard to the overall objective 
of opening to the outside world, it is advisable to formulate a 
"neutral" objective which neither particularly encourages 
exports nor particularly encourages imports, so as to make it 
possible both to maintain the market's attractiveness and to 
enhance international competitiveness. 
<H3>  Major Trend Two: Opening to Outside World Is Changing From 
Moving in Forward Direction Into Moving in Both Directions </H3>
  During the 1990s, while promoting domestic economic 
development by making use of international economic forces, it 
is necessary to employ a two-direction strategy, so as to 
exploit the two markets, use the two kinds of resources, and 
learn the two sets of skills in a comprehensive manner. In 
addition to developing transnational business operations and 
carrying out international trade, it is necessary to encourage 
the carrying out of operations in Third World countries to 
develop resource products in short supply on the Chinese market. 
Such operations can simultaneously stimulate technology, 
equipment, and labor service exports and increase the 
availability of resources in short supply on China's domestic 
market, thereby achieving several things with one stroke. 
Comrade Xiaoping said that "it is necessary to adopt new ways to 
increase South-South cooperation." To that end, the government 
should provide support by adopting supporting policies on credit 
funds, insurance, taxation, and the sale of products in China. 
<H3>  Major Trend Three: International Economic Cooperation Is 
Developing From Undiversified, Bilateral Level to a Higher, 
Diversified and Multilateral Level </H3>
  The development of the Tumen River proposed in recent years, 
Hu Ping said, involves six Northeast Asian countries, China, 
Russia, the DPRK, the ROK, Mongolia, and Japan, encompassing an 
area of 30,000 square km. This area enjoys both geographical and 
resource advantages, and, from a long-term perspective, has 
great potential for cooperative development. The joint 
development of the upper reaches of the Mekong River involves 
the four countries of China, Thailand, Myanmar, and Laos. 
Thailand is rather enthusiastic about it. Our Yunnan Province 
has taken initial steps to open transportation routes to 
Myanmar. This region is characterized by strong mutual 
complementarity in hydropower, tourism, agricultural, mineral, 
and other resources. Joint development, leading to the emergence 
of a "golden square" in Southeast Asia, constitutes a new 
situation in the opening to the outside world. With regard to 
the western borders, Korgas Pass has also proposed a new line of 
thought, calling for the establishment of a zone of border trade 
cooperation between Xinjiang and Kazakhstan so as to create 
channels of border trade between the two countries. Besides, the 
Suzhou industrial zone to be jointly developed by the government 
of Singapore and Jiangsu Province, a zone now in the planning 
stage, will cover 8 square km in its first phase. All those 
developments demand that we use political, economic, and 
diplomatic means in a comprehensive way in an effort to produce 
a new situation regarding the long-term effort to open up to the 
outside world, a situation which is beneficial to us on a 
long-term basis and based on international mutual 
complementarity. 
<H3>  Major Trend Four: Situation of Opening to Outside World Is 
Turning From One Characterized by Development Centered on 
Coastal Regions Into One Characterized by Deeper, More Extensive 
Development Involving Border and River-Valley Regions </H3>
  In the 1990s the "coastal, border, and river-valley" 
strategy 
will be expanded in terms of extending the geographic scope and 
increasing the depth of development in the various industries. 
Currently, foreign enterprises are not only cooperating with 
state-owned enterprises, but have also created a new situation 
characterized by the forming of partnerships with township 
enterprises and private enterprises. The economic sector based 
on public ownership can consolidate its status as the main actor 
only through competition. Comrade Xiaoping said, "The further 
reform and opening up proceed, the greater the capacity to bear 
and withstand risks there will be." This argument is completely 
correct. 
<H3>  Major Trend Five: Opening to Outside World Is Extending From 
Coastal, Border, and River-Valley Regions to Hinterland </H3>
  There now exists, he said, a view that it is necessary to be 
tilted in favor of some industries but no longer in favor of 
some regions. This view has some merit. The opening up process 
of the central and western regions should be appropriately 
accelerated. When conditions are ready, it is necessary to add 
some cities to the ranks of open cities. Investment policy 
should be based on integrating industrial policy and regional 
policy. With regard to guiding foreign investment, in addition 
to following the established policies concerning the coastal 
regions, it is also necessary to formulate some encouragement 
policies in view of the unique strengths of the Northwest and 
Southwest. For instance, it is necessary to study special 
policies with regard to such matters as comprehensive resource 
development, the development of the reservoirs area at the Three 
Gorges of the Yangtze River, and the energy development in the 
Southwest. With regard to the issue of the coastal regions' 
helping the central and western regions in an effort to achieve 
common development, it is also necessary to use economic methods 
and adopt various forms such as partnership and cooperation in 
accordance with Comrade Xiaoping's instructions, and create a 
path in the 1990s. 
<H3>  Major Trend Six: Construction of Development Zones Is 
Changing From Separate Construction Into Group Construction and 
Zones Are Turning From Being Unifunctional Into Being 
Multifunctional </H3>
  As director of the Special Economic Zone Office, Hu Ping has 
special feelings for the development zone, a product of the 
opening up to the outside world. After the cleaning up and 
cooling down, he said, the remaining development zones across 
the country which should get heated up will get heated up; that 
is, it is necessary to act in such a way as capabilities would 
allow, engaging actively in development while improving 
efficiency. Those zones can thus become the new growth segments 
of our country's productive forces and produce a new colony of 
industry. 
  There is now a trend to form partnership relations among 
development zones which are forming partnerships and carrying 
out cooperation in the areas of information, planning, 
designing, business promotion, management, personnel training, 
etc. The development zones (including bonded zones) are 
exploring the use of international practices for the deepening 
of the development function so that they can develop in a 
multifunctional and all-dimensional direction. The development 
zones with the necessary conditions are exploring ways of 
developing operations in the central and western regions or even 
abroad. Many development zones have become windows of opening to 
the outside world as well as bases for efforts to adjust 
industrial structure, to promote the grafting of new 
contemporary technologies onto old enterprises, and to make the 
economy climb another step. As Comrade Xiaoping said, "The 
development zones have a great hope." 
<H3>  Major Trend Seven: Foreign Investment Is Changing From Being 
Focused on Manufacturing of Exports Into Moving in Direction 
Emphasizing Industrial Operations and Diversified Operations, 
and Is Turning From Being an Investment Type Into Being an 
Investment-Finance Integration Type </H3>
  After 15 years of opening up to the outside world, foreign 
investment has now reached a certain scale. The target area of 
foreign investment has now extended to basic industries, basic 
sectors, and some tertiary industries, and the trend is good. 
Some large international corporations are making a strategic 
shift toward China. It should be particularly noted that not 
only is international capital inclined to invest in China, but 
that it is also forming joint ventures with influential 
enterprises in China on the basis of adopting the joint-stock 
system and then having the stocks sold on the markets of 
developed countries. The use of this practice indicates that our 
country's industrial capital is being transformed into financial 
capital and is moving from the domestic market to the 
international market. According to the international financial 
community, China, a "mountain-climbing tiger," will reach the 
summit, and it is hard to estimate its international impact. 
This development trend tells us that in using foreign 
investment, it is not only necessary to focus on introducing new 
technologies and developing new products, but also necessary to 
carry out in-depth, multiangular, and comprehensive analysis and 
formulate policies accordingly, so that the use of foreign 
investment may develop in a direction which is both appropriate 
to the new trends in international investment and more 
beneficial to China. 
<H3>  Major Trend Eight: Relations With Hong Kong, Macao, and 
Taiwan, Once Based on Trade Cooperation, Are Developing in 
Direction of Economic Integration </H3>
  The years 1997 and 1999 are coming soon. After the problems 
of resumption of sovereignty between the mainland on the one 
hand and Hong Kong and Macao on the other are resolved, the 
trend of economic integration encompassing the markets of Hong 
Kong, Macao, and the mainland will further grow under the 
general policy of "one country, two systems." Consequently, 
capital and technology from Hong Kong and Macao in large 
quantities will enter the hinterland market, and affect the 
manufacturing sector, infrastructure, basic industries, tertiary 
industries, and many other spheres on the mainland. The 
semiofficial Trade Development Office of Hong Kong made Europe 
and North America the focus of trade investment in the past, but 
has carried out deep-going advances into the hinterland in 
recent years by using the "uniform packaging" method. Recently 
people in Taiwan have proposed that special zones, facing the 
coastal regions of the mainland, be established in Taiwan. They 
have cried out in alarm: "As Hong Kong has adopted the uniform 
packaging method, what should Taiwan do?" Their idea of a 
"Chinese economic sphere" has some sound elements. We should 
provide adroit guidance in view of the circumstances, but should 
not ignore the idea. It can be expected that there will be a new 
trend in the economic and trade relations between the mainland 
and Taiwan in the 1990s. 
<H3>  Major Trend Nine: Opening Up to Outside World Is Extending 
to Deeper Levels and Is Proceeding in a Comprehensive Manner </H3>
  The expansion of opening to the outside world requires the 
establishment of a set of new systems and mechanisms functioning 
at all levels. The more deep-level problems the opening to the 
outside world encounters, the more necessary it is to establish 
an effective system of macroeconomic regulation and control. In 
the future there will be fewer and fewer proposals to attract 
foreign capital through preferential policies. Instead, 
competition and service will constitute the key factor 
determining whether one succeeds or fails. Therefore, it is 
especially necessary to give emphasis to the construction of the 
investment environment, including the construction of both the 
hard environment and soft environment. The training of personnel 
needed for the opening to the outside world is the fundamental 
guarantee of the cause of opening to the outside world. 
<H3>  Major Trend Ten: Opening to Outside World Is Changing From 
Being Just an Economic Matter Into Developing in Direction of 
Combining Economics and Culture </H3>
  According to him, the integration of economics and culture 
represents a worldwide trend at the present time, and cultural 
strength is part of comprehensive national capabilities. The 
integration of economics and culture is still in the phase of 
coming into being in China. Promoting the combining of economics 
and culture can give vitality, motive force, and attractiveness 
to the economy being opened up to the outside world, and can 
also provide a spiritual pillar and social constraining forces 
contributing to the prevention of corruption in society, while 
pushing China's fine traditional culture to a new high. 
  Hu Ping used a vivid, figurative saying, "the sea of 
bitterness has bounds, but turning back will not lead one to the 
shore," to describe the general trend in China's opening to the 
outside world. The Chinese economy, he said, was on the verge of 
collapse 15 years ago. During the past 15 years, the reform and 
opening up have extricated China from the sea of bitterness. 
Facts have proven that only by advancing bravely in the process 
of reform and opening up will we be able to achieve the great 
goal set for us by Comrade Xiaoping. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59311 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   China Vulnerable to Antidumping Action </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0227A Guangzhou JINAN XUEBAO [JOURNAL OF JINAN 
UNIVERSITY] in Chinese No 57, 20 Oct 93 pp 14-18 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0227A </F>
<F P=104>  Guangzhou JINAN XUEBAO [JOURNAL OF JINAN 
UNIVERSITY] </F>



<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Xue (7115 7185) and responsible editor Xie </F>
Xuelian (6200 7185 5571): "A Tentative Discussion of Legal 
Countermeasures To Be Taken by China Against Hostile Antidumping 
Laws"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] III. Inherent Causes of, 
Legal Countermeasures Against Antidumping Actions 
  Apart from some irrational provisions of antidumping laws in 
foreign countries and in the rules of the General Agreement on 
Tariffs and Trade [GATT] and in their application, there are 
also in China's own present political and economic system many 
deficiencies and problems which have given cause for 
investigations of China's conditions by various European and 
American countries. 
  A. China's foreign trade system is basically one of strict 
controls, but in actual fact, exports are not effectively 
administered, and imports too are not strictly controlled. On 
the other hand, all export-import companies and foreign 
trade-oriented enterprises are themselves responsible for 
earning their own foreign exchange and for their own profits, 
and they are also ignorant of the law. For these reasons they 
will not hesitate to fight among themselves, pushing down each 
other's export prices, causing a continuous decline in the 
prices of China's export products. This then of course easily 
incurs accusations of dumping. 
  B. Target areas of China's exports are limited and export 
distribution is irrational. Because China's reform and opening 
up has only been going on for a short time, China's markets 
abroad are still very limited. The countries and territories to 
which China presently exports on a regular basis are Hong Kong, 
the European Community, and the United States. Chinese products 
have not yet penetrated other markets, such as Latin America, 
for example. Under these circumstances, export products are 
being distributed to an extremely narrow field, and there is 
also no unified coordination between China's enterprises, so 
that the allocation of markets has very obviously become 
somewhat irrational. Even more serious is the widespread 
practice of the "three ins and one compensation" trade 
(importing materials for processing, importing samples and 
ordering corresponding goods, importing parts for assembly, and 
compensation trade). Although these types of trade have, to a 
certain extent, been profitable for China, the various countries 
will compute quantities and prices according to the origin of 
the merchandise. China's profits will then be extremely small, 
while Hong Kong, the main entrepot for such trade, will reap the 
largest share of the profits, while China will also have to bear 
the risk of antidumping measures by foreign countries. 
  In view of the two points mentioned above, China must adopt, 
in legal respects and as soon as possible, the following 
measures: 
  1. In legal respects, there has to be a further 
clarification 
of the legal position of the various state agencies in charge of 
import-export affairs and of all import-export companies and 
enterprises, and a clarification of their respective rights and 
obligations. This would require that China promulgate as soon 
as possible a "Foreign Trade Law," which would have to fix in 
legal terms the whole series of mutual relations involved, and 
should lead to a state of affairs in which economic activities 
would have laws to rely on and rules to follow. The state's 
import-export administration must combine the strict with the 
moderate, and must take firm control of the main issues. At 
present, China's agencies in charge are assuming administrative 
charge of everything, but in actual fact administer everything 
badly. In my opinion, an agency, placed in administrative charge 
by the government, must not take on and concern itself with all 
matters, big and small. Moreover, China's present system of 
strict administrative controls is unsuited to China's further 
efforts at reform and opening up, and incompatible with the 
policy of moving the foreign trade companies and enterprises 
toward the international market and having them participate 
directly in the competition. The state organs in charge should 
as soon as possible readjust the direction and mechanism of 
their own administrative controls. They should adhere for 
themselves to the larger orientation of serving the enterprises, 
they should strengthen contacts with foreign governments, help 
enterprises actively open up overseas markets, transmit 
information, exert efforts in dispelling concerns and resolving 
difficulties on the part of the enterprises, and should do a 
good job of well-coordinated controls and effective guidance. 
In their capacity of agents of foreign trade, the import-export 
companies and enterprises must then, with regard to their 
organizational setup and with regard to the macro-controls they 
are subjected to, actively and of their own accord respect and 
comply with administrative measures of control by superior 
departments in charge. There must be no passive resistance and 
going one's own way. At the same time, the foreign trade 
enterprises and companies in all regions and of all systems must 
strengthen their lateral economic associations, mutually 
exchange information, and mutually coordinate action. There 
must be no "civil war" among ourselves, we must take a unified 
stand against the outside world, and there must be, as far as 
possible, identity of prices for the same king of commodities. 
At the same time as we shall actively open up and expand 
international markets, we must better coordinate the allocation 
of present international markets. It has already been proven 
that engaging highhandedly in internal competition among 
ourselves, to gain profits merely for one's own unit, may result 
in a temporary and one-time profit, but that it will ultimately 
not only harm the interests of others and of the state, but also 
not necessarily be of profit for oneself. 
  2. Strengthening investigation and study of the legal 
antidumping code of GATT and relevant legislation in other 
countries, and compiling a Chinese antidumping law, antisubsidy 
law, and other relevant laws. 
  As Chinese products are imported by other countries, they 
will be subject to the limitations of the antidumping laws of 
those countries, while when foreign products enter China, China 
has no corresponding limitations or restrictions by way of 
antidumping legislation. This is not fair, and is also not a 
normal situation. Even though China is presently achieving a 
certain positive result in protecting the Chinese internal 
market by means of quantitative restrictions and raising import 
duty, this is not a good long-range device. If it is the 
intention to actively develop national industries, achieve a 
smooth entry into GATT and as quickly as possible adjust to the 
situation after joining GATT, the most positive and active 
alternative is to set up, as quickly as possible, a Chinese 
antidumping system. This would prevent the large-scale dumping 
of foreign products in China, would prevent irrational harm 
being thereby done to China's national industries by foreign 
imports, and would promote China's industrial readjustment and 
the healthy development of China's market economy. Enactment of 
a Chinese antidumping law would necessitate a more intensive 
investigation and study of the antidumping rules of GATT and the 
antidumping laws of other countries. We should take GATT's 
antidumping rules as basis, give in addition consideration to 
the specific conditions in China, in formulating an antidumping 
law and antisubsidy law that has Chinese characteristics and is 
consonant with the international developmental trend. 
  Simultaneously, China also needs to perfect its present 
legislation concerning foreign economic relations, to suit the 
ongoing reform and opening up, especially with a view to the new 
situation after joining GATT. Everything that is outdated and 
backward in Chinas' legislation must be changed, and made to 
conform with the demands of world standards in economics and 
trade and with the fundamental principles of GATT. 
  3. Adopting effective countermeasures in actual practice, no 
passive attitude and suffering a beating. 
  First of all, we must thoroughly study and utilize the 
exceptional clauses in GATT rules to protect China's national 
industries. GATT, being an international economic treaty, is at 
the same time the product of antagonisms and compromises between 
the signatory states. In order to coordinate the interests of 
the various signatory states, GATT included certain exceptional 
clauses. Through sustained struggle and effort, the developing 
countries gained inclusion of some additional preferential 
measures favoring the developing countries. Among these, the 
ones that China can use to its advantage are: 
  1) The clause concerning the balance of international 
receipts and payments. According to Article 12, China may, for 
the reason of protecting its foreign financial status and 
international balance of payments, place a limit on the quantity 
and value of imported commodities. 2) The protective clause. 
According to Article 18, China may, for the reason of raising 
the general living standards of its people and of accelerating 
the buildup of its infant industry, adopt appropriate customs- 
and non-customs-related measures. According to the provisions 
of Article 19, China, having undertaken the obligations that 
include a reduction of customs duties, may, if that would allow 
a large influx of certain products and thereby seriously harm or 
seriously threaten domestic production of the same kind of 
products, completely or partly abrogate, for a time, the said 
obligation. 3) Exceptional clause. If certain particular 
commodities pose a problem as to a country's protection of 
natural resources, environmental protection, its public health 
or national security, GATT rules allow the importing country in 
question to impose restrictions on the importation or prohibit 
the importation of this kind of articles. 
  Apart from making full use of the legal provisions, China's 
import-export companies and enterprises should also give serious 
attention to the utilization of legal techniques. Many Chinese 
import-export companies and enterprises are little knowledgeable 
as to international treaties and foreign laws, and pay little 
attention even to domestic laws. If they are one day brought 
before a court of law as defendants, they will therefore, not 
know what law to adduce to protect their own interests. Their 
methods will then be merely negative and passive; they will in 
such a case try to shift responsibility to others and argue back 
and forth, and not actively meet the accusation. At the same 
time, they do not know how to utilize the special advantages of 
joint interests with export merchants, distributors, or 
commission agents, and will make no effort to gain their 
cooperation and support. Enterprises and companies engaged in 
foreign trade should employ legal advisors on permanent 
contract, and have the lawyers check contracts before signing, 
to ensure accuracy, so as to avoid as much as possible any 
future economic disputes. If one day a dispute should occur, an 
experienced lawyer should promptly be asked to assist in the 
lawsuit, utilizing his expertise in legal matters and any of his 
relevant social relations, so as to have him help come out 
victorious. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59312 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> LABOR </F>
<H3> <TI>   Urban Unemployment Rate Rises Slightly </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0211B Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 1 Nov 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0211B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wang Kejun (3769 0344 6511): "China's City and </F>
Town Unemployment Rate Shows a Slight Increase"] 
  [Text] China's third quarter employment growth remained 
sluggish, employment growth in urban collective units was even 
slower, employment growth among privately managed business and 
individuals was fairly rapid, and the urban unemployment rate 
rose slightly. 
  Based on statistics, 147.37 million persons nationwide were 
employed at the end of September, 580,000 more than at the end 
of the second quarter, but 550,000 fewer than at the end of last 
year. Comparing previous year levels at the same period, there 
was a nearly 100,000-person fluctuation between the end of last 
year and the end of September. Such a degree of fluctuation had 
not been seen in the last ten years. 
  Comparing ownership systems, we see that urban collective 
units lost quite a few workers, while the various joint venture 
units and foreign capital units continued to increase their 
employee ranks. Comparing industries, industry lost a 
considerable number of workers, while employment in the 
construction, health and fitness, and finance and insurance 
fields rose slightly. Looking at state-owned units, a fair 
number of permanent employees were cut, while contract employees 
grew in sizeable numbers. 
  Statistics provided by the State Administration for Industry 
and Commerce show that at the end of September private and 
individual employment in urban areas reached 11.5 million, an 
increase of 800,000 or 4.5 percent over the end of last year. 
Compared with last year's level at the same period, the 
increase was 500,000 employees or 5.4 percent. 
  Looking at the different industries, employment growth was 
sizeable in the commercial and food service industries which 
accounted for about 70 percent of the total increase. Industry 
and construction employment, however, grew minimally, accounting 
for only about 30 percent of the total growth. 
  Comparing regions, employment growth in the four provinces 
of 
Guangdong, Fujian, Jiangsu, and Sichuan was significant, with 
each recording over 50,000 new employees, while employment 
growth in the three minicipalities of Beijing, Shanghai, and 
Tianjin was minimal, with each having less than 10,000 newly 
employed workers. 
  According to Ministry of Labor statistics, at the end of 
September, the urban unemployment number stood at 3.78 million 
persons, or at a rate of 2.4 percent. This is 0.1 percent 
higher than the level at the end of last year. It is estimated 
that the unemployment rate will rise to around 2.6 percent by 
the end of this year. 
  Overall, the current urban unemployment situation is not 
growing significantly. Yet, in certain areas the unemployment 
rate continues to grow. This is especially true with respect to 
the aged, the young, border areas, and certain areas of the 
defense industry, mining, and the forestry industry where 
regional economic growth has been slow and workers have not 
departed in significant numbers. Generally, with respect to 
these areas, unemployment stands at over three percent, with 
some areas experiencing upwards of ten percent unemployment. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59313 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> LABOR </F>
<H3> <TI>   Editorial Recognizes Importance of Skilled Workers </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0211A Beijing GONGREN RIBAO in Chinese 27 Nov 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0211A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GONGREN RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Text] The first-ever China Youth Talent Olympics, jointly 
sponsored by nine units including the Ministry of Labor, the 
All-China Federation of Trade Unions, and the central committee 
of the Communist Youth League, came to a close after nearly 
three months of competition, with the outstanding achievements 
of skilled contestants in ten areas of industry providing a 
successful close to the competition. 
  In June of this year, Jiang Zemin, Li Peng, Qiao Shi, and 
other leading comrades each made speeches in dedication at the 
opening ceremonies. Yesterday, the contest organizing committee 
distributed prizes to the winners in a solemn ceremony at the 
Great Hall of the People. Premier Li Peng and other leading 
comrades met with the winning contestants at Zhongnanhai. 
Throughout the course of the competition, leaders from every 
province, city, autonomous region, and industry showed heartfelt 
concern and support for the talented stars of labor. All of 
this amply demonstrates that our party and nation attaches a 
great deal of importance to our nation's working class, and in 
particular, to the vast number of young workers. 
  The labor of our workers, and especially that of our skilled 
workers, is the key link in transforming science and technology 
into a productive force, and is an important foundation of 
economic growth. Without the labor of workers who possess high 
quality and skill, high quality products would be impossible, as 
would a soaring economy. Science and technology is social 
wealth, and operational skill is also social wealth. In a 
certain sense, they are important sources of wealth at a deep 
level. We can introduce superb technology, advanced equipment, 
effective management techniques, and the applicable experts from 
abroad; but is it possible to introduce from abroad the vast 
numbers of skilled workers required for economic construction? 
The superb operational skills of talented workers can create 
incalculable social wealth that money cannot buy. For this 
reason, Comrade Jiang Zemin pointed out that, "skilled workers 
are the sine qua non of economic construction." This is 
something we must fully recognize. 
  People can still remember back to the 1950's and 1960's when 
our nation was producing large numbers of skillful craftsmen and 
"masters of technology" like Li Ruihuan, Ni Zhifu, Hao Jianxiu, 
and Wang Chonglun. The "top notch work," "knack for getting the 
job done," and "work style" that these individuals demonstrated 
on the production line greatly enhanced product quality and 
production efficiency. Their diligent technical study and the 
superb skills they attained were of monumental value in 
promoting construction enthusiasm in the working classes 
throughout the nation. Countless "masters of technology" not 
only created huge amounts of material wealth for our society, 
but they created precious spiritual wealth for society as well. 
The party, the nation, and society as a whole attached enormous 
importance to these workers. 
  Today there are 120 million enterprise employees and nearly 
100 million township enterprise employees in China, with 170 
million of these people being workers who are the main force 
behind the creation of material wealth in society. As science 
and technology and the economy all grow at a rapid pace, the 
demand for higher cultural and technical quality of workers 
grows stronger. Yet, if we look at the current situation in the 
worker ranks in China, we see that this demand is far from being 
met. Looking at the make up of our workers ranks, we find only 
200,000 technicians and 2,000-plus highly skilled technicians. 
If we look at the proportions of skill capacities required for 
production, we find that our technician ranks should grow to one 
million workers. Heightening the technical quality of our 
worker ranks is indeed an urgent mission required for 
development of our national economy. 
  Vigorous national development demands that, while we attach 
importance to and give full play to the role of the 
intellectuals, we also must attach importance to and give full 
play to the role of the skilled workers, and this applies with 
particular force to highly skilled workers. We must stress 
growth in the worker ranks, we must adopt various forms, we must 
pursue various routes, and we must accelerate the cultivation of 
the various forms, we must pursue varius routes, and we must 
accelerate the cultivation of the various specialized technical 
workers. We must create a social atmosphere that attaches 
importance to technical operational skills and that respects 
technical workers. Of course, singers, movie stars, and dancers 
are needed in society. But, if "these three stars are the only 
ones that shine," while the multitude of skilled workers and 
technical stars who create immense wealth for society are busy 
with their noses to the grindstone, working in obscurity, and 
getting the cold shoulder, or being condemned or denounced, how 
is society going to grow? We should pay more attention to 
shining the media spotlight of skilled workers, we should focus 
the camera lens and direct the pen more toward capturing the 
accomplishments of the skilled workers and technical stars, and 
we should let the people know that, without the contributions of 
our technical stars and skilled workers, our society would be 
floundering in emptiness as it chases its "stars." At the same 
time, we must call on leaders at every level to ardently show 
concern, to support, and to fully use and fully reward skilled 
workers and technical stars. This is an important measure that 
will prevent talent drain, safeguard the enthusiasm of skilled 
workers, and encourage skill growth and wealth creation on the 
job. Of course, further reform of an irrational labor wage 
system, destruction of the communal rice pot, and promotion of 
the social status of the skilled worker remain the fundamental 
ways to protect our skilled workers and induce young workers to 
study technical skills. 
  I hope that the "technical stars" and the ranks of the 
skilled workers in China expand into an enormous and powerful 
force. When large numbers of "technical stars" and skilled 
workers emerge, then the Chinese economy will enjoy sustained, 
rapid, and healthy growth. We look forward to this wonderful 
future! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59314 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> POPULATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Impact of Market on Rural Population Control </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 5 Oct 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> Beijing </F>
<F P=104>  JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Qin Pinduan (4440 0756 4551) of Anhui University </F>
Population Institute: "Chinese Population Control: Adjustments 
Under Market Economy"] 
  [Excerpt] With the development of the market economy and 
the deepening of China's rural structural economic reform, 
China's overall birth rate increased from 17.82 per thousand in 
1979 to 22.28 per thousand in 1982. During the same period the 
natural growth rate increased from 11.61 per thousand to 15.68 
per thousand. The rural population birth rate increased from 
18.43 per thousand to 22.97 per thousand and the natural growth 
rate from 12.04 per thousand to 15.97 per thousand during this 
period. This had a huge impact on population control in China. 
  First impact: Economic. With the rise of market economy in 
the villages, the rural economy will take off quickly. And the 
villagers' misunderstanding of family planning cadres' work will 
increase further as will the difficulties of that work. 
Moreover, the growth of the rural economy will weaken the 
effectiveness of economic penalties for excessive births. The 
wealthy do not fear penalties, and even less do the poor, 
thereby rendering almost nil the control function of economic 
penalties. 
  Second impact: Regional disparities will increase further. 
With the development of the market economy, economic disparities 
between the coastal and inland regions will increase further. 
Unbalanced attitudes brought about by poverty and prosperity 
will be exacerbated, and difficulties controlling the population 
in impoverished areas will also increase. The vicious circle of 
"the poorer the more births, the more births the poorer" will be 
further exacerbated. 
  Third impact: Administrative control functions will be 
further weakened. Administrative means are a major aspect of 
population control in China, and the growth of the market 
economy will weaken these administrative control mechanisms. 
This weakening is especially evident in rural areas. The 
establishment of the responsibility system in rural households 
was the first instance of the weakening of administrative 
control functions, and the establishment of the market economy 
will be the second. 
  Fourth impact: On population planning. Population planning 
is 
formulated from top to bottom, as the Central Committee draws up 
the overall plan, which is then broken down to provinces, 
municipalities, and autonomous regions, and then further broken 
down to prefectures, cities, and counties, and then directly to 
the township, town, and village. Within the structure of the 
market economy there is also a market population, namely a 
market for population demand and for productivity. Thus, with 
population childbirth there exists the birth of markets (which 
is determined by the demand of the population market). Thus 
when drafting a population plan, we must consider the market 
demand of the population and proceed from bottom to top. When 
market demand is great, the plan can be appropriately relaxed, 
and when market demand is small, it can be appropriately 
tightened. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59315 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> TRANSPORTATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Problems With Bottlenecks `Even More Prominent' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0214A Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO in Chinese 19 Nov 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0214A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINXI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "China's Transportation `Bottlenecks' Tighten </F>
Daily"] 
  [Text] In recent years the disparity between the 
transportation and shipping industry which had been the vanguard 
of the national economy and the speed of economic development 
has been widening. As compared with 1990, in 1992 only 187 
kilometers of railway lines were added while the maritime 
transport capability of the Ministry of Transportation decreased 
by over 4,100 vessels. Coming into 1993, because of the limited 
increases in the capabilities of transport equipment over the 
past two years and the sustained high speed of economic 
expansion, the problems with constrictive "bottlenecks" have 
become ever more prominent. 
<H3>  Extremely Limited Growth in Transportation; Obvious Changes 
in the Mix of Products Being Shipped </H3>
  From the beginning of the year to date, impelled by the 
continued strong economic expansion, transport demand has 
continued to swell, while the reciprocal transport output has 
stalled and not increased, or increased only microscopically. 
In the period from January to August, railway haulage amounted 
to 1.036 billion tons, an increase of only 1.7 percent over last 
year; maritime transport haulage increased only 2.6 percent, 
while the specialized transport units under the highway 
transport departments showed a decrease in output. This was in 
sharp contrast with the increases in the national economy. 
  There were obvious changes in the mix of products being 
shipped. The shipment of investment type products increased 
greatly, while the quantity of the types of products normally 
shipped fell sharply. According to statistics for January to 
July, there was an average increase of over 10 percent in 
shipments of metal ores, iron and steel, non-ferrous metals, 
non-metallic ores, mine construction materials, cement, 
chemicals, and industrial machinery, while there was a 
corresponding large decrease in shipments of phosphates, 
foodstuffs, cotton, fertilizers and farm chemicals, livestock, 
and farm sideline products. The decrease in volume was over 15 
percent for all of the above products except for foodstuffs 
which decreased only 2.3 percent. The shipment of coal, which 
represents over 40 percent of total railway transport volume 
also fell 1.4 percent. Such decreases have seldom been seen in 
recent years. Regional volume of maritime transport of 
investment type products also showed very prominent increases: 
according to statistics, for the first half of the year alone, 
regional maritime transport of steel products, gravel, cement 
and similar goods increased al almost 30 percent over the totals 
for the same period last year. 
<H3>  Passenger Volume Up Greatly, Ratio of Long-Distance 
Travelers Increases </H3>
  Since the spring of this year, and following the peak of the 
Spring Festival period, the off-season did not turn off and the 
peak season kept peaking, so that by the end of August, the 
volume of railway passenger travel had reached 703 million 
trips, an increase of 21.9 percent over the same period last 
year, with medium and long distance trip volume representing 
over 80 percent of the total. The average distance traveled rose 
from 315 kilometers in 1992 to 334 kilometers this year. By the 
normal practice of previous years, this would be the equivalent 
of running an additional 1000 passenger cars in the first half 
of the year. 
<H3>  Gap Between Supply and Demand Widens, Transport Crisis 
Worsens </H3>
  Over the past several years there have been only limited 
increases in equipment capabilities and the exploitation of 
latent capabilities through renovation has just about exhausted 
its potentials, and the capacity for guaranteed shipment has 
fallen off greatly. According to concerned departments, the 
first half of this year represented one of the most severely 
critical periods in the history of the railway industry. The 
railway freight car demand-fulfilled rate has averaged only a 
bit over 60 percent; the gap between trunk route haulage and 
upper limits has been about 40 percent, both of these being some 
10 percentage points below the normal year's averages. It has 
become difficult to guarantee shipment of materials for some 
major projects and national command type plans, such as coal 
shipments for the entire nation's chemical industry. The May 
command contract plan called for shipment of 162,000 tons while 
the actual shipment plan allowed for only 87,000 tons but less 
than 80,000 tons was actually shipped. For the iron and steel 
industry nationwide, the external cause of shortfalls in 
deliveries of steel contracted by the state was attributed to 
transportation problems in 62.3 percent of the cases of short 
deliveries. Especially in the south-east coastal areas this 
year, masses of passengers and freight required transport 
southward, causing the crisis situations along the already 
over-capacity Beijing-Guangzhou and Beijing-Shanghai rail lines 
to become even more spectacular. Only a little over one quarter 
of the demand for freight shipment south to Guangdong can be 
fulfilled. Many of the factories and the mines along the trunk 
routes have already limited production or stopped production 
because they are unable to obtain guaranteed shipment. The 
crisis in passenger transport is also critical: along the trunk 
lines, the passenger car passenger overload rate is commonly 
above 50 percent. Some localities have been forced to use 
freight cars to clear out laborers awaiting transport. 
  At present, while concentrating on the construction of basic 
railroad facilities, we should also work diligently to expand 
transport capabilities within a short period of time, 
concentrate on getting the railroads to organize their 
dispatching and establish a railway style of working, work 
diligently to increase the full-load, non-stop transport of 
railway freight cars and medium and long distance passenger 
transport, further cut back on short haul freight and short trip 
passenger transport, with the aim of having the railways 
continue to concentrate on the development of high volume, long 
distance, non-stop transportation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59316 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   CASS Reports Rural Income Disparity Widening </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0177A Beijing ZHONGGUO NONGJIHUA BAO in Chinese 9 Oct 93 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0177A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO NONGJIHUA BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Cai Fang (5591 2499) of the Rural Village </F>
Development Research Institute of the China Academy of Social 
Sciences: "A Trend Worth Noting in Rural Villages: Rural 
Farmers' Income Gap Widens"] 
  [Text] During the past several years at the same time that 
rural village economy was experiencing a swift expansion, the 
growth of rural villagers' income was slowing down. Statistics 
show that in the average villager's income in 1980 was 191.33 
yuan; by 1985 this had climbed to 343.32 yuan, for an average 
annual increase of 12.4 percent. However, from 1988 to 1990 
there was a decrease in income. In 1991 income recovered and 
reached 374.33 yuan, but between 1985 and 1991 the rate of 
annual increase was only 1.8 percent. 
  At the same time this was taking place, the disparity in 
incomes was also increasing. 
  A. Viewed nationwide, the disparity in incomes between rural 
households has increased. In 1980 the Gini coefficient for rural 
village income 0.2366; the multiple between the lowest and 
highest levels of income was 3.16. By 1988 the Gini coefficient 
had risen to 0.3024 and the multiple between high and low had 
risen to 4.68, and this trend has become even more obvious in 
more recent years. (Statisticians commonly use the Gini 
coefficient to represent the degree of inequality in the 
distribution of income; the greater the Gini coefficient the 
more unequal the distribution.) 
  B. The disparity in villager incomes between regions has 
increased. Using the national average villager's income as 1, 
then in 1980 the index of income for the eastern, central and 
western sections respectively was 1.303, 0.964 and 0.887, while 
in 1990 it was respectively 1.431, 0.890 and 0.822. 
  C. The disparity between urban and rural incomes again 
increased. The relevant materials show that urban residents' 
income has increased from the 1984 ratio of 1.7:1 to the 1990 
ratio of 2.2::1. This has caused a relative decrease in the 
rural villagers' standard of living, with urban residents' 
consumption ratio climbing from 2.3:1 in 1984 to 2.8:1 in 1990. 
Causes of the increased disparity in incomes stemmed primarily 
from the fact that changes in the prices of agricultural 
products were not favorable to agriculture. In 1989 the 
agricultural product procurement price index rose 15 percent but 
the rural industrial product retail price index rose 18.7 
percent. In 1990 the agricultural product procurement price 
index suffered an overall decline of 3.5 percent while rural 
village industrial products prices rose 4.6 percent. In 1991 
agricultural product prices again fell by 2 percent, while rural 
industrial product prices rose 3 percent. This exacerbated the 
disparity in urban-rural incomes. Other major factors creating 
the imbalance in incomes between rural households and between 
rural districts were the tremendous changes which had taken 
place in the relative ratios of agricultural and industrial 
enterprises in the villages of each locality and the relative 
ratios between agricultural and non-agricultural enterprises 
taken up by the rural households. Still another important 
problem was the ruthless assessment of payments from rural 
villagers. According to rough statistics from the Ministry of 
Agriculture, nationwide in 1991 in cases where statistics could 
be compiled, villagers involuntarily paid out administrative 
fees amounting to some 1.77 billion yuan, fines of all kinds 
amounting to some 2.31 billion yuan, collective assessments of 
4.1 billion and miscellaneous other expenses of 3.81 billion, or 
an average of 13.8 yuan per person. On the one hand, these 
expenses were not levied according to one's level of income, and 
thus increased the discrepancies in incomes. On the other hand, 
the economic expansion in each locality was uneven, and so in 
the more developed eastern sections a large portion of the 
various impositions were borne by the town and township 
enterprises, while in the central and western sections of the 
country where township enterprises were not so well developed, 
the burden was borne by the individual households. 
  The discrepancies in rural incomes brings with it some 
serious problems we cannot overlook. 
  First of all, it effects the amount of hope that the masses 
hold for the reforms. The final success of the economic reforms 
depends upon the support and cooperation of the broad masses of 
the people. However, the amount of support the people will give 
and the fervor with which they cooperate are determined by the 
amount of hope they place in the reforms, that is, what are they 
going to get out of the reforms. If the inequality of income 
situation worsens exceedingly, there is the possibility that our 
nation's broad masses of farmers will lose their faith in 
economic reform. 
  Second, it intensifies the blind outflow of labor from 
under-developed regions and the outflow of investment capital. 
If the motive force for the movement of the factors of 
production comes primarily from the difference in remuneration 
for the factors of production in different localities, then, if 
this difference is overly large, it can cause this movement to 
become excessively severe and it could become a blind movement. 
For the past several years, because of the difference in 
development between the eastern and central and western sections 
of the country, the differences in farmer incomes was 
exaggerated, and created the "flood of workers" which exerted 
tremendous pressure upon transportation and basic facilities of 
some cities: this should not be overlooked. Another problem to 
which attention should be paid is the flow of large amounts of 
capital from the central and western areas to the eastern 
coastal regions, creating a "vicious cycle of poverty" in the 
central and western areas. 
  Third, it has restricted agricultural production, especially 
grain output. Within the overall trend of enlarging differences 
in income, the ones' whose income situation changes for the 
worse are commonly the households engaged in agriculture and the 
agricultural areas, especially the grain farmers and grain 
producing regions. This situation harms agricultural investment 
capabilities and the enthusiasm of those working agriculture. 
The most alarming aspect is that there has been a tremendous 
overall decrease so far this year in the amount of capital 
inputs such as agricultural machinery and fertilizers. Because 
of inadequate demand, the agricultural machinery industry is in 
serious decline, and agriculture's production capacity will of 
necessity suffer corresponding harm. 
  The following policies are formulated to solve the problem 
of 
the overly great differences in farmers' incomes. 
  1. Sped up the progress of market oriented reforms. At the 
present time, the income disparities between farming households, 
between regions and between urban and rural is mainly created by 
the disparity in income between the agricultural and the 
non-agricultural production sectors. Thus, we must utilize the 
market mechanisms to reduce the differences, and thus we must 
let the market play its role to the fullest extent, and raise 
the earnings of those engaged in agriculture. Within the short 
term, while the grain market is gradually opened up, the price 
of grain can be allowed to rise to the level of the 
international market. Over the long term, our nation should 
avoid a long term situation in which our grain prices are higher 
than international market levels. This is say, we should 
maintain an appropriate level of grain imports, allow our 
farmers to plant economic crops. This is the basic method of 
solving the farmers' low income problem. 
  2. Continue to encourage the expansion of town and township 
enterprises under all forms of ownership systems. We must 
employ legislation to promote and protect the establishment and 
growth of private enterprise, turn the income of the high income 
levels into savings, to create employment opportunities for the 
rural excess labor forces. The most pressing need is to 
establish legislative protection for the property rights of 
private enterprises. 
  3. The state and all levels of society must support the 
growth of village and township enterprises in the central and 
western regions. The state should truly focus on investments and 
credit for the village and township enterprises in the central 
and western regions and at the same time organize the various 
governmental departments to cooperate with these regions within 
the limits of their mission and establish village and township 
enterprise development zones. 4. In macroscopic terms, we 
must begin to implement a redistribution policy. That is, we 
must speed up the reform of the tax collection system, create 
better tax legislation, and begin collecting individual income 
taxes in those areas where the conditions are right. The 
principle of this sort of redistribution of income policy is to 
increase equability on the condition of not harming efficiency 
and to effect the common enrichment of the rural villages while 
admitting the existence of differences. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59317 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sichuan Cotton Procurement </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0181S Chengdu SICHUAN JINGJI BAO in Chinese 15 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0181S </F>
<F P=104>  Chengdu SICHUAN JINGJI BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] As of 5 December, Sichuan Province had procured 
760,000 dan of cotton, fulfilling 34.8 percent of the task, and 
a 64.3 percent decline from the same period in 1992. Sichuan 
consumes over 3 million dan of cotton a year, in addition to 
state transfers of 1.1 million dan, Sichuan itself must produce 
over 2 million dan. It is estimated that cotton procurement for 
1993 will total 900,000 dan, a decline of 1.4 million dan from 
1992. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59318 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Gross Income of Zhejiang Rural Economy To Increase </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0181T Hangzhou ZHEJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 10 Nov 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0181T </F>
<F P=104>  Hangzhou ZHEJIANG RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Summary] In 1993 the rural economy of Zhejiang Province 
grew rapidly. It is estimated that gross income of the rural 
economy will exceed 200 billion yuan, a 31.4 percent increase 
over 1992. Income of primary industry will be 31.1 billion 
yuan, a 10.1 percent increase. Income of secondary industry 
will be 154.5 billion yuan, a 39.3 percent increase. Income of 
tertiary industry will be 18.4 billion yuan, a 14.9 percent 
increase. In 1993 per capita farmer income will reach 1,163 
yuan, a 12.5 percent increase over 1992. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59319 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Changing Status of Rural Women Characterized </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0091A Beijing ZHONGGUO RENKOU BAO in Chinese 29 Oct 93 p 
3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0091A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO RENKOU BAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Zhihong (1728 1807 4767), from the China </F>
Labor News: "Rural Chinese Women Show Changes in Six Areas"] 
  [Text] According to a "Survey on the Social Status of 
Women," recently sponsored and conducted by the National Women's 
Federation, China's rural women have shown noticeable changes in 
the following six areas, as reform in China's rural system has 
deepened: 
  Participation in Labor. Under the impact of the wave of 
reform in the rural system, large numbers of farmers are 
escaping from the confines of the land, applying themselves 
vigorously to enlarging the scope of their business activities, 
and continually opening up new fields of endeavor in rural 
modernization. Twenty-one percent of rural female workers have 
already turned to lines of work outside of agriculture, which is 
not much different from male laborers, of whom 30 percent have 
turned to lines of work outside of agriculture. Of them, 52.4 
percent have turned to industry and processing; 16.5 percent are 
putting their efforts into commerce, or the service industries; 
4.7 percent have entered the ranks of the construction industry; 
2.8 percent are specializing on the transportation industry; and 
23.6 percent are going into other industries. Women are involved 
in many parts of social production, and their income is 
increases every day. The ratio between the incomes of women and 
men is approximately 0.78 to one. 
  Education and Training. In the 15 years since reform and 
opening up, 46.3 percent of rural women throughout China have 
received some kind of training in agricultural technology. 
According to this survey, women make up 27.6 percent of farmers, 
with occupational titles of agricultural technician and above. 
The rise in their own educational level has also further raised 
the consciousness of rural women about providing even more 
educational opportunities for the younger generation. The survey 
found that 80 percent of women aged 18 to 29 expect their 
children to attain at least a high school education. 
  Marriage and the Family. Changes show up mainly in that a 
wife's opinions on important policy matters in her family cannot 
be ignored. There has also been a steady decrease in incidents 
of family violence. 
  Participation in Society. The results of an evaluation of 
the 
political awareness of China's rural women show that 49.8 
percent of them could correctly give the name of the general 
secretary of the Chinese Communist Party, and 11.2 percent could 
give the name of the President of the United States in that 
year. Among the major topics that they discussed with others, 
13.8 listed social phenomena and issues first, while 13.4 
percent ranked first exchange of information related to their 
work. It is plain that rural women harbor great enthusiasm for 
participating in external affairs. 
  Pre-Natal Care. According to the survey, over the last ten 
or 
more years, rural women have come to attach more and more 
importance to pre-natal care, while rural pre-natal care 
services have also become more and more organized and 
standardized. Among women under 40, 46.3 percent are able, 
during pregnancy, to receive prenatal examinations in accordance 
with their doctor's advice, and 57.2 percent have the assistance 
of a midwife, or medical personnel, during delivery. At present, 
66.5 percent of villages have a trained, qualified midwife. 
  Social Attitudes. Although the traditional idea that "men 
should be in charge of the outside, and women should be in 
charge of the inside," is still deeply rooted in rural areas, 
the self-awareness of China's rural women is gradually being 
increased. The survey shows that 66.1 percent of people either 
doubt or deny the view that "males are by nature better than 
females;" 61 percent deny the notion that "a woman should avoid 
being in a higher position than her husband;" and 71 percent 
approved of the statement that, "I would despise myself if I 
could not accomplish anything." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59320 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Describes Root Causes of Corruption </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0091B Beijing GUANGMING RIBAO in Chinese 26 Oct 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0091B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUANGMING RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ouyang Yuanfang (2962 7122 0337 2455): "Is </F>
Corruption the Evil Consequence of Reforms Leading to a Market 
Economy?"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] There are more or less two 
reasons indicating worsening corruption. First, administrative 
constraints have been relaxed somewhat, while the ownership 
system at state-owned enterprises has not yet been reformed, and 
the constraints of ownership have not yet taken shape. This has 
given rise to much disorder. Second, during this period when the 
function of government is being transformed and the style of 
effective macro adjustment is changing, all at once certain 
areas of uncertainty have appeared, leading to some irregular 
government activities. These circumstances have created 
"openings," "facilitators," and "accelerators" for the emergence 
and spread of corruption. Therefore, we cannot say there is no 
relationship at all between the spread of corruption and the 
market economy; but we also cannot say that it is the necessary, 
evil consequence of reforms leading to a market economy. At 
most, the imperfections in the process of reform toward a market 
economy have provided corruption with an opportunity to come 
forth! 
  The crux of the problem is whether the root of corruption is 
in the market economy or in the old system. This writer believes 
that the root cause is in the old system. This is a special 
feature of the corruption problem as it exists in China at the 
present stage. Mainly, it has the following manifestations: 
  First, state power is marked by direct control over 
micro-economic activity. The agencies with authority, and even 
the individuals in charge, hold de facto power of life and death 
over enterprises and small-scale activities. Enterprises and 
small-scale activities need administrative approval at every 
turn; without it, nothing can be so much as talked about. 
Therefore, making and using connections, doing business through 
influence, "greasing palms," and "cutting red tape" have become 
the "standard topics" in economic life. From this, there have 
arisen all kinds of bad practices, bribery, and the perversion 
of justice. 
  Second, improper hiring is a major breeding ground for 
corruption. Interpersonal relationships are complex, leading to 
tangled webs of interrelations, where "one bureaucrat protects 
another." In some units, only relatives, or only mediocrities, 
or only slavish-minded people can be hired. Such bad practices 
as hiring people related through marriage, forming cliques, and 
bureaucrats protecting one another have been going on for a long 
time; the masses have been angry, but do not dare to speak out. 
These bad hiring practices are both a major manifestation of 
corruption and a source of it. 
  Third, there is a lack of suitable control over government 
actions, or even on the exercise of personal authority. There is 
no objective mechanism for preventing excesses, and no effective 
system of oversight. This is a major reason why corruption has 
persisted despite repeated prohibitions against it, and even 
became more and more rampant. For these two reasons, the 
original mechanisms of vertical and horizontal supervision have 
become weak. Moreover, it has been extremely difficult for law 
enforcement agencies and the media to carry out their functions 
independently. When the masses have made reports, usually very 
little has come of it, and it has also invite open or disguised 
retaliation. Over time, the exercise of authority has become 
unconstrained and "omnipotent," and when it has become thus 
corrupted, then it "does as it pleases." 
  Fourth, corrupt activities and corrupt elements often cover 
themselves with a camouflage or veneer of high-mindedness. Many 
bad practices, or open corruption, are not only dressed in 
official garb, but are carried out under the banners of "public 
spirit," "principle," "guidance," and the like. When something 
goes wrong, then the corrupt elements can still drag in all 
sorts of irrelevancies, and shift between soft and hard tactics, 
plus bringing in exculpations and intercessions from above, 
until things are hopelessly confused. This concealment in 
formalities has created the present pattern of widespread, 
semi-public corruption, and the difficulty of suppressing or 
striking out against such corruption so that the perpetrators 
can rest easy, knowing that they are well-protected. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59321 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Dissident Qin Yong-min's `Peace Charter' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0086A Taipei LIEN HO PAO in Chinese 16, 17, 18 Nov 93 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0086A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei LIEN HO PAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Three installments of serialized article by Qin Yongmin </F>
(4440 3057 2404): "Peace Charter (Draft)" -- First three 
paragraphs are editor's note.] 
<H5>  [16 Nov 93 p 10] </H5>
  [Text] The "Peace Charter (Draft)" which appeared in 
Beijing on the 14th is a spontaneous democratic proclamation 
seldom seen on the mainland in recent years, and quite capable 
of shaking up both the Communist Party rulers and the mainland 
democratic movement. 
  The charter was comprehensively revised and perfected 
through the collection of signatures and a wide spectrum of 
ideas, and clearly reveals that pluralistic democratic 
government reforms are an unstoppable historical necessity. It 
requests that the communist party in power act in good faith and 
initiate a peaceful transformation of the political system from 
top to bottom and reduce to a minimum the negative effects which 
would disrupt the life of the masses. 
  "The Charter," on the principle that it is "operable," 
requests the communists eliminate "counter-revolutionary 
crimes", open up restrictions on political parties, respect the 
resolutions of the United Nations regarding human rights 
questions, redress the wrongs of the "4 June" incident, release 
all political prisoners, and establish a strategy for attaining 
a pluralistic democracy. It also requests both sides of the 
Straits initiate co-equal negotiations, call a roundtable 
discussion, and promote peaceful unification. These suggestions 
and procedures are the accumulated crystallization of the 
thinking and struggling of the members of the people's movement 
on the mainland over the past ten years and have the great 
boldness of vision for driving history, a vision which 
transcends the limitations of time and space. It is truly a rare 
democratic document. 
  Over the past decade or more, tremendous changes have taken 
place in the economic system on the mainland: We greatly admire 
this fact. 
  However, as the facts of contemporary world history amply 
testify, the rapid expansion of the market economy of necessity 
requires the implementation of a pluralistic democratic 
government. 
  In view of the fact that tremendous changes have occurred in 
the present world order with the end of the cold war, we move 
toward a new order. 
  In view of the fact that all Chinese are concerned for the 
future peaceful development of China, towards this end we 
specifically put forward this charter. 
  The many and varied examples of transformations in political 
systems which have taken place in the past and in the present, 
at home and abroad, compel us to worry deeply. If pluralistic 
democratic government is an unstoppable historical necessity, 
then we must ask ourselves: in China, will this process be 
carried out peacefully or not? 
  We are convinced that within the ruling circles on the 
Chinese mainland there are men of historical insight who also 
have come to recognize the above stated problem and its urgency. 
For this reason, the teachings of historical experience, 
especially the example of the pros and cons of the former Soviet 
Union and of Eastern Europe, are sufficient enough to cause both 
the government officials and common people on the mainland who 
still harbor antagonistic feelings to arrive at a sort of common 
understanding. 
  Only when the government powerholders are sincere and it is 
carried out in a systematic and peaceful manner from top to 
bottom, can the negative effects of the historical 
transformation of mainland China from a centralized to a 
pluralistic to a democratic government, that is, the disruption 
of the social and economic lives of the masses, be kept to a 
minimum. 
  It should be pointed out that the turbulent tides of world 
history and the unprecedentedly strong international forces of 
democracy have not only caused the peaceful transformation of 
China to become a popular cause, but have also provided various 
necessary conditions for this transformation. The present 
situation at home and abroad, considered from every angle, 
absolutely will not allow a repetition of an incident like the 
"4 June" massacre. At the same time, justice and reason do not 
desire that a situation similar to that prior to 4 June, when 
all social controls were lost, should ever happen again. 
  The key to the current question is this: This transformation 
will be a blow to the upper classes of China's society and 
certain persons who derive benefits therefrom and thus harbor a 
negative, rejecting attitude toward such a change. At the same 
time, the classes which are victims of the present system and 
some individuals hold unavoidably extreme feelings. These two 
conditions, both to a certain degree, have a negative effect 
upon a peaceful and systematic political transformation. 
  As for the question about the two sides of the Taiwan 
Straits, the key problem is not what form unification will take 
or at what time it will happen, but rather upon what basis and 
upon what type of mutual recognition will unification be based. 
  In accord with the above historical background, we, the 
citizens of China, with a deep sense of the great mission facing 
us, boldly step forward and call upon the government and the 
governed of our whole nation. Basing our actions upon the 
principle that "the interests of the entire nation override all 
else" renouncing all past enmities, with mutual respect and 
mutual accommodation, renouncing aggression and seeking 
compromise, let us discuss the state of the nation and realize 
the great reconciliation of the Chinese people. Let us seek in a 
peaceful and safe manner to come together to accomplish the 
great mission of the transformation of the political system of 
the Chinese mainland and the peaceful unification of the two 
sides of the Taiwan Straits. 
  We especially call to the attention of the members of all 
levels of governing and governed, the fact that in order to 
avoid the intensification of contradictions, which could lead to 
loss of control of the process of political change which must be 
forthcoming and which could cause the nation to slide into 
anarchy, the present regime should from this moment onwards 
begin to take all precautions necessary to avoid these troubles. 
This applies especially to the present government on the Chinese 
mainland, which most particularly has the responsibility to take 
positive action at the earliest possible opportunity to 
gradually ameliorate the political situation and to grasp the 
present favorable opportunity and self-consciously conform to 
the laws of historical development. Otherwise, they must bear 
the greatest historical responsibility for the various 
situations which might develop as mentioned above. 
  To avoid having the next chapter in China's political 
history 
again tread the vicious circle of the last hundred or so years, 
with the premise of taking into full consideration the common 
interests of the government and the public on both sides of the 
Strait and in particular their individual special interests, we 
solemnly recommend, specifically to the governments on the two 
sides of the Strait, naturally first to the government on the 
mainland, to the whole body of the Chinese people including 
those on both sides of the Strait, in Hong Kong and Macao and 
the minorities, and to our compatriots overseas, and to all 
organizations at home and abroad who work for social progress, 
the following workable procedure for the peaceful reconciliation 
of the whole people. 
  1. We believe that the government of Mainland China does 
represent China, and as a standing member nation of the Security 
Council of the United Nations, has the duty to comply with all 
resolutions of the United Nations regarding human rights and 
should begin guaranteeing the human rights of the Chinese people 
beginning with contemporary international standards and 
immediately establish laws comparable with those of contemporary 
democratic nations regarding person, speech, communication, 
publication, assembly, organization (including lifting party 
restrictions), travel and holding demonstrations, as well as the 
free travel of citizens in and out of the nation's borders. It 
should immediately eliminate "counter-revolutionary crimes" and 
strictly carry this out under international supervision and 
under the supervision of the people both within and outside the 
country. 
  As a reciprocal gesture of good will, we appeal to the 
masses 
of the people to restrict their own inalienable rights to 
assemble, travel and demonstrate, in normal times to the levels 
of the present laws of the authorities, and reduce the social 
unrest instigated by a politically motivated peaceful transition. 
  2. We appeal to the authorities in the mainland government 
to 
exhibit the great spirit of being controllers of a historical 
transformation, and as soon as possible legislate and enforce 
strategic measures for passing from centralized to pluralistic 
forms, and then establish and make complete a democratic system 
of government, creating the conditions under which the processes 
of the transformation of the mainland government can be carried 
out from beginning to end in a context which the central 
government can control and adjust. 
<H5>  [17 Nov 93 p 18] </H5>
  3. Under the premise that the mainland government recognizes 
the previous two articles, we then appeal to the whole body 
politic and all advanced forces at home and abroad to respect 
the government of the mainland as the one force which is capable 
of leading the peaceful transformation of the mainland, to 
actively and voluntarily cooperate with them, to provide various 
types of workable and constructive suggestions, to lay aside the 
terrible disputes which are not related to the main issues, and 
strive to form with the present authorities a beneficial 
relationship of mutual aid in which both sides push for progress 
in reconciliation. 
  4. We earnestly urge the mainland government to make the 
first initial necessary gesture of reconciliation, that is to 
immediately redress the wrongs of the "4 June" incident, set 
free all political prisoners incarcerated because of "4 June" 
and other such reasons, making no differentiation regarding 
political beliefs and factions, and give an appropriate amount 
of recompense to all those who suffered in the "4 June" incident 
and others or their families who suffered political harm. 
  When the mainland government truly exhibits sincerity 
towards 
reconciliation, we call upon those who have suffered and their 
families, and members of society at all levels to adopt a 
forward-looking attitude and no longer seek to ascertain the 
general responsibility for "4 June" and various later political 
incidents. 
  5. We call upon the Chinese Communist Party and its 
government to remove the legal prohibitions placed upon all 
political exiles, and allow all students, labor movement 
personnel, and other such persons in exile abroad to return to 
China. 
  We believe that China's problems can only be solved by the 
Chinese people themselves, in China. For this reason, we call 
upon all who truly aspire to dedicate themselves to the 
motherland to immediately return to China and join in China's 
economic modernization and political democratization. 
  6. On the day when, according to modern international 
standards, laws regarding forming associations are legislated 
and implemented and restrictions on political parties are 
lifted; that is, when all non-violent political parties at home 
and abroad may legally register their existence; at that time, 
all societies and organizations and political parties should 
proceed promptly to the concerned department to register and be 
recorded. At the present time we thus call upon all concerned 
sides to initiate, under the principles of openness, legality 
and non-violence, with planning and with skill, an ideological 
movement which will not disturb the order of society, and use 
this as the means of exerting pressure to attain human rights 
and the minimum limits which a democratic movement should 
possess. After it is possible to legally register, then of 
course these should continue to be the principles employed. 
  7. We call upon the governments on both sides of the Taiwan 
Straits to immediately start direct negotiations regarding these 
problems. We believe that the cohesiveness of the Chinese people 
is great enough to peacefully unify Taiwan and the mainland. For 
this reason, we call upon the authorities on the mainland to 
formally put away the proposition of use of force to settle 
problems, and treat the Kuomintang Party, the Peoples 
Progressive Party and other political parties of Taiwan as 
equals; when conditions are ripe, welcome the expansion of the 
Taiwanese political parties onto the mainland. We also call upon 
all levels of government and the public in Taiwan at such a time 
to also, in a like manner, welcome the expansion of the mainland 
political parties, including the Communist Party, onto Taiwan, 
and thus finally accomplish the social and political conformity 
of the two sides of the Taiwan Straits. We also call upon the 
Democratic Progressive Party of Taiwan to discard their proposal 
of an "Independent Taiwan" and to actively work for the cause of 
democratic progress of all of China, including the mainland, 
Taiwan, Hong Kong and Macao. 
  8. We call upon the mainland government to completely 
respect 
the self-governing rights of the peoples of Hong Kong and Macao, 
and handle problems occurring after their reunion with the 
mainland under the principles of sovereignty belonging to the 
center and administrative rights belonging to the localities, 
fully respecting the freedom of choice of the local peoples 
regarding their social, political and economic systems and their 
style of life. 
<H5>  [18 Nov 93 p 18] </H5>
  9. We call upon the various nationalities throughout the 
nation to protect the great unity of the Chinese people, and at 
the same time call upon the government to handle the problems of 
each of the nationalities in accordance with modern 
international standards, fully respecting the right of self- 
determination of the minorities, and laying aside the worn-out 
concept of preserving a unified domain through violent means. 
10. On the basis that the preceding articles are accepted by 
all sides, and this naturally means that first they are 
basically accepted by the mainland government, we suggest that 
in a speedy manner a roundtable discussion be called, with 
government and public personnel of various callings from the 
mainland, Taiwan, Hong Kong, Macao, and the nationalities and 
others from home and abroad participating, to discuss and 
resolve in common the next stage of the peaceful transformation 
and the peaceful unification of the two sides of the Taiwan 
Strait. Naturally, in accordance with the needs of the objective 
situation, a great many bilateral and multilateral preparatory 
meetings could take place beforehand, and the peaceful 
transformation and peaceful reunification talks could be carried 
out at separate roundtable discussions according topics or 
differences. 
  We believe that the above articles not only are in 
accordance 
with the basic interests of the Chinese people, but also are the 
rational requirements of the next chapter in Chinese history. 
We especially beg the mainland government to understand our 
good intentions and accept our proposal for the peaceful 
reconciliation of the entire people. 
  We call upon all Chinese and all the descendants of the 
emperors living abroad to join their signatures and voices with 
ours to convey our common desire for a peaceful political 
transformation of the mainland and the peaceful reunification of 
the two sides of the Taiwan Strait. 
  The "Peace Charter" is a free and public informal 
organization composed of all Chinese people at home and abroad, 
without differentiation as to political affiliation, who accept 
and agree with this charter and who as individuals and 
organizations strive to achieve a peaceful transition to a 
unified and democratic China wherein pluralistic political 
forces coexist and carry out all sorts of public, lawful 
activities. 
  The "Peace Charter" welcomes all persons who agree with its 
viewpoint both at home and abroad and who will effectively 
support and participate in its work -- initiating collection of 
signatures, widespread propaganda, and carrying out other 
activities within the limits permitted and guaranteed by the 
present day constitution and laws. 
  The "Peace Charter" emphasizes most emphatically and deeply 
respects the Chinese Communists and their government as the only 
social force which is capable of leading the mainland in 
peacefully completing the change from centralized to pluralistic 
democracy. This is a fact that we sincerely hope will facilitate 
the Chinese Communists to shoulder this immense historical 
mission, and we most strongly urge them to not miss this last 
opportunity. 
  The measures which the "Peace Charter" proposes are only 
those measures which we deem workable under the present 
conditions, and are offered mostly to elicit better suggestions. 
There is no need to be restricted by its wording. However, we 
firmly believe that the spirit of this charter's proposal to 
realize the systematic and peaceful transformation under the 
leadership of the present governments not only conforms to the 
greatest interests of the Chinese people and the mainland 
government, but also is the only rational choice for 
contemporary China. 
  The signatories to the Peace Charter include persons from 
all 
walks of life; together they are the sponsors of this charter 
and bear the responsibility for the charter. At the same time, 
they have selected three spokespersons who have full authority 
to represent the "Peace Charter" in any talks with the 
governments on the two sides of the Taiwan Strait and in any 
public meeting held at home or abroad. The distributed copies of 
this charter, due to their extreme importance, become effective 
upon being signed by one of the signatories or by a 
spokesperson. Every signatory to this document has a mission 
to accept the signatures of persons from all walks of life and 
to initiate all types of activities, and to carry out special 
assignments with persons of all levels who are committed to this 
charter, all bearing together as one the responsibility. Let us 
work together with all Chinese people everywhere for the 
peaceful transformation of the mainland and the peaceful 
unification of the two sides of the Taiwan Strait. (11 October 
1993 in Beijing) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59322 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Legal Safeguards for Human Rights, Part III </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0069A Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] in Chinese No 
31, 15 Oct 93 pp 94-96 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0069A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yu Haocheng (0060 3185 2052): "On Legal </F>
Safeguards for Human Rights (Part III)"] 
  [Text] After realistically examining the situation in China 
and using the experience of other countries for reference, we 
cannot but point out that there is plenty of room for 
improvement in protecting human rights. 
  Regarding the situation of China's human rights, 
particularly that in citizens' political rights and the legal 
protection for human rights, the white paper "Human Rights in 
China" published by the Information Office of the State Council 
in October 1991 has already described these quite well. However, 
after realistically examining the situation in China and using 
the experience of other countries for reference, we cannot but 
point out that there are many problems that we need to solve and 
plenty of rooms for improvement in protecting human rights. One 
of the problems is that the constitution has no provision to 
guarantee citizens' rights to enjoy freedoms that they should 
enjoy, while the other problem is that some of the rights have 
been incorporated into the constitution, but there are no laws 
enacted to guarantee such rights. Therefore, there is no firm 
guarantee. In addition, a situation prevails where "laws are not 
observed and their enforcement is not strict," so that some 
legal rights are only in name. We would like to analyze the 
existing problems in the protection of human rights as follows: 
<H5>  Freedom of Person Is Deprived and Restricted </H5>
  1. On Freedom of Person. China's current 
constitution stipulates that the freedom of person of citizens 
is inviolable and that unlawful deprivation or restriction of 
citizens' freedom of person by detention or other means is 
prohibited. Article 2 of the "Regulations of the People's 
Republic of China Governing Arrest and Detention" stipulates 
that no citizens "may be arrested except by the decision of a 
people's court or with the sanction of a people's 
procuratorate." However, public security organs actually often 
arrest citizens in disguised form by using the "shelter and 
investigation" provisions. Legally, China has never promulgated 
any provision on "shelter and investigation." Re-education 
through labor is regarded as an administrative penalty. In 
essence it deprives and restricts personal freedom of those who 
receive such re-education. 
  The provision for "living at home under surveillance" is 
a coercive measure specified in the "Criminal Procedure Law of 
the People's Republic of China." It stipulates that 
"surveillance of one's home is to be carried out by the local 
public security station or by the people's commune or the 
defendant's unit entrusted with the task." This kind of coercive 
measure serves to limit the sphere of activities of the 
defendant and place him or her under surveillance, but it does 
not completely restrict his freedom of person. Nevertheless, the 
defendant is often brought to another location by the public 
security organ and detained in a disguised form, and his 
personal freedom is completely deprived and restricted. In 
addition, Article 92 of the "Criminal Procedure Law" of China 
stipulates: "The period for holding a defendant in custody 
during investigation may not exceed two months. Where the 
circumstances of a case are complex and the case cannot be 
concluded before the expiration of the period, the period may be 
extended by one month with the approval of the people's 
procuratorate at the next level up." However, this period 
actually often exceeds the period prescribed by the law. 
Sometimes, it even lasts as long as several years. In addition, 
China has for many years implemented the policy of "seeking 
employment at the place of reform", which has actually prevented 
prisoners from becoming completely free after finishing their 
term of reform through labor. All this runs counter to the laws 
which guarantee citizens' freedom of person. 
<H5>  "Freedom of Thought" No Longer Available </H5>
  2. On Freedom of Thought. The "Common Program 
of the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference," 
which had played the role of the interim constitution when the 
People's Republic of China was first founded, also had a 
provision on freedom of thought. Article 5 of the program said: 
"People of the People's Republic of China enjoy freedoms of 
thought, speech, the press, assembly, association, 
correspondence, person, residence, change of residence, 
religious belief, procession and demonstration." However, after 
the 1954 Constitution, freedom of thought is no longer 
available. There is only freedom of belief. This means religious 
belief, not any belief in any discipline or thought. 
  The 1982 Constitution, the current one, follows this 
practice. It has similar wording in its Preamble. Also, it adds 
that "Under the leadership of the Communist Party of China and 
the guidance of Marxism-Leninism and Mao Zedong Thought, the 
Chinese people of all nationalities will continue to adhere to 
the people's democratic dictatorship and follow the socialist 
road... and turn China into a socialist country with a high 
level of culture and democracy." Some of China's jurists have 
stated with certainty that "the four cardinal principles have 
been incorporated into the Constitution." "The Preamble of the 
Constitution is legally binding," they added. Whether or not 
this kind of practice of compelling people to legally accept the 
ideology runs counter to the principle of freedom of thought is 
something that we have to give thought to. 
  3. On Freedoms of Speech, of the Press, and of 
Participation in Fine Arts and Literary and Art Activities. 
All the versions of China's Constitution stipulate that citizens 
enjoy the freedom of speech. However, Article 51 of the current 
Constitution stipulates that "The exercise by citizens of the 
People's Republic of China of their freedoms and rights may not 
infringe upon the interests of the state, of society and of the 
collective, or upon the lawful freedoms and rights of other 
citizens." Due to the fact that as of now, there is no law of 
the press or law of publication which explicitly describes the 
scope of speech that is prohibited, and that Article 102 of the 
Criminal Law on crimes of carrying out counter-revolutionary 
propaganda and incitement is quite vague, citizens' words can be 
considered as "those infringing upon the interests of the state, 
of society and of the collective," and their freedoms of speech 
and of the press can be restricted or deprived at any time. Mass 
media such as newspapers and magazines have always been regarded 
as the "party's mouthpiece," and the ban on newspapers and 
magazines run by people has not been lifted. It is difficult for 
political thought and speeches that differ from those of the 
ruling party and the government to get published, while writers 
of literary or academic works under criticism often have no 
chance to defend themselves. All the information in newspapers, 
journals, and radio and television materials are carefully 
scrutinized. Books and journals from Hong Kong, Macao, Taiwan 
and overseas are strictly checked or sealed off when they go 
through the import procedure. Citizens' rights to know things 
(also called the right to understanding things) is restricted to 
a great extent. People often have to rely on the study of news 
reports which "are exported for domestic circulation" to 
understand the true situation in China. 
<H5>  No Law of Association Even At Present </H5>
  4. On Freedom of Association. All versions of 
China's Constitution have stipulated that citizens enjoy freedom 
of association. However, there is no law of association even at 
present. The State Council had only promulgated the "Regulations 
for the Registration and Control of Mass Organizations." 
"Association" in the Constitution means mass organizations, 
excluding any political party or any organization of a political 
nature. There is no "Law of Political Parties" in China. Laws 
have never stipulated whether or not it is legal to form other 
new political parties. Actually the formation of any new 
political party is prohibited. The "Regulations for the 
Registration and Control of Mass Organizations" stipulate that 
in forming a mass organization, citizens must register it with 
the department of civil affairs with approval. This provision 
places nearly all mass organizations under the control of the 
government. Leading members of such mass organizations are 
usually party or government officials or are appointed by the 
party or government leadership. Such mass organizations 
invariably become "official" or "semi-official." Let us take the 
All-China Writers' Association as an example. Although many 
members of the association are displeased with the leadership of 
the association, they have no rights to form another 
association. Workers' activities to form a liberal trade union 
are also strictly forbidden in view of the lesson drawn from the 
Poland Solidarity Trade Union. 
  5. On Freedoms of Residence and Change of 
Residence. China's first "1954" Constitution had a 
provision in this connection, but such provision was deleted in 
the next three versions of the Constitution. China imposes 
strict restriction on shifting rural population to the urban 
areas. Rural residents are treated quite differently as compared 
with their counterparts in the urban areas. Freedom to leave and 
enter the country should be citizens' inherent rights, but such 
freedom is severely restricted in China. 
  6. On Freedom of Strike. The 1954 
Constitution had no provision on freedom of strike, but the 1975 
and 1978 versions of the Constitution had a provision in this 
connection. In his "Report on the Revision of the Constitution" 
made in January 1975, Zhang Chunqiao said that "in accordance 
with Chairman Mao's proposal," the specification that citizens 
enjoy freedom to strike has been added to the Constitution. 
However, such freedom was once again deleted in the 1982 
Constitution. A legalist who participated in drafting the 
Constitution at that time reasoned that "Workers are masters of 
the nation, and workers' interests are in accord with those of 
the state. A strike would only infringe upon the interests of 
the workers and the state and undermine the national economy. In 
addition, a strike often affects social order and make things 
difficult for the people to work and live." This is another 
example of asking the people to sacrifice their due rights for 
the interests of the state, of society and of the collective. 
However, tremendous changes had already taken place in the 
country at that time. The number of private and foreign-funded 
enterprises already accounted for a considerably larger 
percentage of the total number of enterprises. Even if the 
aforementioned statement was reasonable at that time, it does 
not make sense now. 
<H5>  Need To "Presume That the Defendant Is Innocent" </H5>
  7. On the Principle That "the Defendant Is 
Presumed Innocent." Prior to 1959, many jurists in China 
advocated the principle that the defendant should be presumed 
innocent. However, during the anti-rightist struggle such 
principle was branded as a bourgeois theory which "is conducive 
to the defendant." Many people received criticisms were thus 
classified as "rightists." The official view is that in 
investigating and trying cases, China's judicial organs adhere 
to the principle of "taking facts as the basis and law as the 
criterion." "They presume that criminal suspects are neither 
guilty nor innocent, and judgement should be passed on the basis 
of objective facts and in accordance with the law." As a matter 
of fact, the principle of seeking truth from facts cannot 
replace the presumption that the defendant is innocent, because 
the crux of the problem is that what kind of legal status the 
defendant has before the facts are ascertained and a sentence is 
passed by the court. Here is a good example. On 31 March 1993, 
the FAZHI RIBAO carried an article: "Work in Handling the 
Aftermath of a Senior Middle School Girl Student's Suicide Case 
in Zhuozhou City Is Still in Deadlock After Five Months," and 
sponsored a discussion forum on this incident. What happened was 
that a 15 year old girl student, under a situation of having no 
concrete evidence against her, was subject to coercive 
interrogations several times a night. She was instructed to 
rummage through her bookcases and boxes and to expose the 
contents. Afterwards, she committed suicide. However, the school 
administration drew the conclusion that "There is no evidence to 
prove her larceny. Nor can we deny her larceny." This incident 
completely substantiates the correctness and the necessity of 
the principle of presuming the defendant as innocent in 
protecting human rights. 
<H5>  No One Supervises Enforcement of the Constitution </H5>
  8. On Supervising the Enforcement of the 
Constitution. The current constitution in China stipulates 
that the National People's Congress and its standing committee 
are responsible for overseeing the enforcement of the 
Constitution. No particular organization is assigned to perform 
the job of enforcement. In essence, no one is supervising the 
enforcement of the Constitution, because one of the important 
supervisory tasks is to determine whether or not all laws and 
regulations are in accord with the Constitution. Apparently, the 
National People's Congress and its standing committee cannot 
carry out the work of examining all the laws that they have 
passed. Due to the lack of a particular organization assigned to 
oversee the enforcement of the Constitution, citizens are unable 
to take legal proceedings against state organs and their 
leadership for violations of the Constitution. Are China's laws 
and regulations for the protection of citizens' rights as well 
as rules for the implementation of such laws and regulations in 
complete accord with the guidelines and the provisions of the 
Constitution? People are gravely concerned over this question. 
Therefore, it is necessary to set up an authoritative 
organization to insure that laws and regulations are in accord 
with the Constitution. 
  In short, on the one hand, China has scored remarkable 
achievements in strengthening socialist democracy and the legal 
system, and in protecting citizens' freedoms, and rights and 
interests, since the convocation of the 3d Plenary Session of 
the 11th CPC Central Committee, while on the other hand, there 
are inadequacies, even serious inadequacies. In order to make 
improvements in this respect, we must continue to reform our 
political structure, further develop socialist democracy, and 
improve the socialist legal system. To work hard to improve 
China's situation in human rights is not only indispensable in 
building a democratic, civilized and prosperous modern nation, 
but also essential in making valuable contributions to promoting 
progress for the whole mankind. (End of article; slightly 
abridged for TANG TAI) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59323 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Mao's Breakthroughs, Tragedies; Part II, III </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0085A Beijing XUEXI YU YANJIU [STUDY AND RESEARCH] in 
Chinese 5, 15 Nov 93 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0085A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing XUEXI YU YANJIU [STUDY AND RESEARCH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lu Zhichao, edited by Liu Ying: "Mao Zedong's </F>
Three Big Breakthroughs, Three Big Tragedies--The Centenary of 
the Birth of Mao Zedong"] 
<H5>  [5 Nov 93 pp 10-12] </H5>
  [Text] Part II--The First Breakthrough and Tragedy: 
On the Issue of China's Approach to Construction 
  There were many reasons behind the occurrence of this 
tragedy. The party's resolution on history and other documents 
have summarized the principles, and further study is certainly 
needed on the details. As far as Mao Zedong's own thinking and 
understanding are concerned, the following two points should at 
least be given special attention. 
  First, there were errors in assessment and a tendency 
toward rash advances in regard to China's effort to build 
socialism in terms of the historical starting point of the 
effort, the historical stage in which the effort was carried 
out, and the construction goals and speed involved in the 
effort. As discussed above, the understanding of socialism 
that the Communist Party of China, including Comrade Mao Zedong, 
had during the long period of struggle for democratic revolution 
was rather abstract, and it can be said that they were not fully 
prepared. One manifestation of such abstractness was that in 
regard to understanding Marxism, there was no sufficient 
understanding of the fact that Marx's discussions of socialism 
were based on temporal and historical conditions totally 
different from those in China; another manifestation was the 
practice of making Soviet experience and realities the only 
basis, despite the fact that Stalin had not resolved the issue 
of integrating Marxism with Russian realities either and that he 
had rushed things and disregarded the limits imposed by the 
historical stage, whether in declaring the establishment of 
socialism or in announcing the outlines of features of socialism 
(including making those later comments on the transition to 
communism). In the early years of the PRC, Mao Zedong was still 
rather cautious in his assessment of the process of socialist 
construction in China. Later, because of the expeditious 
achievement of socialist transformation and a lack of sober 
understanding of the masses' enthusiasm, his assessments of such 
things as the historical stage in which China was situated and 
the goals and speed of socialist construction became 
increasingly divorced from reality. In 1955, efforts to fight 
conservative tendencies were started, involving criticisms of 
"women with bound feet." The efforts started in the area of 
forming agricultural cooperatives, and then were extended to the 
economic spheres including the spheres of industrial and 
agricultural production, transportation, and capital 
construction as well as the scientific, educational, cultural 
and other spheres. It was demanded that there be persistent 
criticisms of right deviationist conservative views on the scale 
and speed of construction. In the period between the making of 
the speech, "On the Ten Major Relationships," and the Eighth CPC 
Congress, because of problems in actual economic construction 
and resistance from many in the party leadership, he gave 
approval to rather realistic plans and measures, but was never 
happy about the activity of "opposing rash advances." As 
discussed earlier, he made many creative breakthroughs on the 
issue of China's approach to socialist construction in view of 
the lessons of the Soviet Union, but he did not do one thing, 
that is, to criticize Stalin's simplistic summarizing of the 
process of socialist construction, the summarizing which had 
been done too early. On the contrary, he believed that China's 
approach to construction could lead to even faster development 
than achieved by the Soviet Union. At the 1957 Moscow 
conference, he and Khrushchev already had disputes between 
themselves, but they were basically in agreement on the 
situation and speed of the development of socialism, that is, 
believing that the east wind was prevailing over the west wind 
and that socialist economic development could soon lead to 
catching up with and surpassing the West. Hence the criticism of 
the activity of "opposing rash advances" in early 1958 and the 
"Great Leap Forward" later. 
  The "Great Leap Forward" was a rash advance based on 
disregarding the limits imposed by the historical stage in two 
aspects. The first was to propose struggle goals and development 
speed concerning economic development which were totally 
divorced from the realities in China, applying the phrase, "one 
day equals 20 years," used by Marx to describe the time of 
revolution to the development of economic construction, material 
production, and cultural undertakings. The second was the 
attempt to establish production and distribution relationships 
and to change the look of society completely according to the 
principles of communism with respect to the relations of 
production and even overall social development, disregarding the 
backwardness of China. This totally deviated from Marxism and 
was entirely divorced from the realities in China, becoming the 
root cause of all the errors on the issue of economic 
construction. 
  Our country had previously been a large semicolonial, 
semifeudal country in the east, and was one era behind 
capitalist societies with ripe preconditions for socialist 
revolution and construction, in terms of the development levels 
of the economy and social relationships. Even the task of 
anti-imperialist, antifeudal democratic revolution which had 
involved the resolution of various social contradictions under 
ripe conditions had been completed only after long, tortuous, 
and hard struggle. In those years the insufficient understanding 
of the realities in China, of the historical stage in which 
China had been situated, and of the long-term and arduous nature 
of the revolution had resulted in the cause of revolution 
suffering great losses. Because of the absence of adequate 
economic conditions and social and cultural preconditions, the 
transition to socialism on the basis of the victory of 
democratic revolution and socialist construction would 
inevitably go through a series of transitional stages and an 
even longer and more arduous process of struggle, as Lenin said. 
People of each generation, Marx said, can only create their own 
history under the definite material conditions created by their 
predecessors; people, he also said, can only propose tasks for 
which historical conditions are ripe. That is, the development 
of the social productive forces and changes in the relations of 
production or in social relationships in general must all be 
based on definite conditions and laws. During the democratic 
revolution, Mao Zedong's understanding and handling of this 
issue was correct, and therefore he was able to lead the entire 
party and people in achieving victory step by step. However, 
after the victory of the democratic revolution, especially after 
the middle of the socialist transformation stage, he became 
increasingly unable to make sober assessments. "On the Ten Major 
Relationships" did contain some creative breakthroughs with 
respect to approaches to, and models of socialist construction, 
but still basically followed Stalin with respect to views on the 
historical stage of socialism or on criteria about socialist 
construction. As a result, under the theme of exploring China's 
approach to socialist construction lurked the danger of an even 
stronger tendency toward rash advances on the basis of 
disregarding the limits imposed by the historical stage. Thus, 
at the time of the "Great Leap Forward," the series of correct 
policies and measures put forward in the period between "On the 
Ten Major Relationships" and the Eighth CPC Congress were 
completely changed. The "Great Leap Forward" was not only a 
manifestation of a simplistic and vulgarized understanding of 
socialism and communism, but also a manifestation of a lack of 
understanding of modern industrial society (that is, the entire 
stage of capitalism). It in fact reflected the mental state and 
limited horizon of the Chinese people who, living in a poor 
agricultural society, were anxious to change the existing state 
of affairs. This was exactly the reason why the "Great Leap 
Forward" was able to gather support from huge numbers of people 
in a short time and arouse tremendous, but very blind, 
enthusiasm. In this sense, Peng Dehuai hit home when he used the 
phrase, "petty bourgeois fanaticism," at the Lushan conference. 
As shown here, Mao Zedong's tragedy not only carried a personal 
flavor but also reflected characteristics of Chinese society. 
  Second, he failed to achieve the transition from 
revolutionary movement (especially revolutionary war) to routine 
economic construction in respect to working methods, 
disregarding the laws of economics and one-sidedly emphasizing 
reliance on political mobilization and mass movement. The 
approach to socialist construction in China proposed in "On the 
Ten Major Relationships" represented breaking away from the 
Soviet Union's rigid model of construction (encompassing its 
development strategy and economic system); but there were more 
philosophical and political supporting arguments than economic 
supporting arguments. He did not take a position different from 
the Soviet model on a fundamental point, that is, the failure to 
regard the economic development of society as an objective 
process which would function according to its own laws 
irrespective of any human wills, and to understand that even the 
most advanced people and the strongest power would only be able 
to exercise guidance on the basis of the conditions they 
enjoyed, but could not make designs and plans at will as if 
building a house. In discussing the relationships among 
agriculture, light industry, and heavy industry, he mainly 
discussed how to correctly adjust the distribution of investment 
in state plans; in discussing the relationships among the state, 
collectives, and individuals and between the center and the 
localities, he mainly discussed how the central state power 
should correctly demarcate various powers and correctly 
distribute benefits among groups. This was necessary, but in 
fact still represented the way of thinking characteristic of a 
highly centralized planned economic model as the Soviet Union 
had. He correctly emphasized that it was necessary to give great 
attention to agriculture and light industry, to pay attention to 
the interests of the localities, of various economic 
collectives, and of workers at large, and to arouse their 
enthusiasm. All this was basically in line with the objective 
demands of economic development. Such measures as delegating 
power and a series of "concurrent development" measures adopted 
for that reason were for the purpose of meeting those demands at 
the systems level (for instance, the effort to develop industry 
across the urban and rural areas nationwide through small-scale 
operations, the use of homegrown practices, and mass 
participation all failed together with the "Great Leap Forward," 
but gave the peasants some preliminary education on spreading 
industrialization; thus the effort had a historical link to the 
widespread development of township enterprises today). These 
represented fundamental differences with the Soviet system. 
However, on the whole, he was less inclined to consider 
analyzing things on the basis of economic conditions and the 
laws of economics and to exercise regulation and guidance 
through manipulating the economic system and economic policy. He 
was more inclined to rely on political mobilization and mass 
movement. Especially, later on, because of the abovementioned 
assessments involving the disregarding of the limits imposed by 
the historical stage and the development demands which 
contributed to rash advances, he disregarded objective economic 
laws to an increasing extent, and one-sidedly emphasized 
stimulating people's subjective initiative through political 
mobilization; he even promoted the "Great Leap Forward" 
coercively through applying the pressures of political criticism 
and mass movement. 
  Aside from disregarding the law that the social productive 
forces should be developed gradually under the given material 
conditions and that the relations of production should suit the 
level and state of the productive forces, the most concentrated 
manifestation of the so-called disregarding of economic laws in 
the actual process was the disregarding of the law of value, the 
basic law of the commodity economy. For, under the condition of 
low level productive forces in China, whatever form the 
relations of production take, people inevitably demand the use 
of the principle of equal exchange to govern the exchange of 
labor with other people or society, and do not tolerate the 
uncompensated appropriation of their labor. The distorted public 
ownership system and egalitarian distribution based on 
disregarding the limits imposed by the historical stage in 
existence at that time inevitably inhibited or even hurt the 
display of workers' enthusiasm and the development of the 
productive forces; and political agitation, however forceful, 
could only achieve temporary effects. Because of such a state of 
affairs, the economic system and policy of that time were often 
in contradiction and conflict with the demands of the law of 
value and the wishes of workers; and Mao Zedong held wavering 
and contradictory views of the law of value, sometimes accepting 
the idea and sometimes rejecting the idea. Mao Zedong made a 
series of contradictory statements on the law of value, but 
fundamentally he disregarded or even rejected the idea. During 
the high tide of the "Great Leap Forward" he expressed approval 
to the effort to oppose bourgeois rights, and gave approval to 
many practices such as levelling, transferring, and 
egalitarianism. However, after he discovered that such practices 
had caused many difficulties in, and harm to economic life, and 
that Chen Boda and others were advocating the abolition of 
commodity production, he repeatedly stressed the roles of 
commodity production and the law of value. He criticized Stalin 
for setting the state and collective peasants against each other 
and for not daring to put means of production in the category of 
commodities, thereby being more advanced than Stalin; but he 
also criticized Stalin for talking about only economic 
relationships and material interests, but not making politics 
the commanding matter, and for failing to promote communist 
elements, thereby going one step backward from Stalin. He 
understood Stalin's contradictory state of mind, saying that 
Stalin had had 30 years of experience, but had not found the way 
out and that as could been seen he (Stalin) had been dejected. 
In fact Mao Zedong was also very dejected in relation to this 
issue. On the one hand he said that there was no need to fear 
that the negative effects of commodity economy and the law of 
value would lead to the appearance of the ghost of capitalism, 
but in fact he feared this ghost of capitalism greatly and thus 
tried every means to suppress it, giving increasing emphasis to 
relying on the practice of making politics the commanding matter 
and on mass movement. All this made it impossible to adopt the 
approach of applying the law of value in the form of using 
multiple economic forms and measures to arouse the masses' 
enthusiasm for production so as to promote the development of 
the productive forces, and eliminated various possibilities of 
reforming the economic system on the basis of proceeding from 
realities. 
  Here we are only discussing how and why Mao Zedong turned 
from making creative breakthroughs into suffering tragic 
failures on the issue of China's approach to socialist 
construction, but are by no means arguing that there were no 
people with sober understandings of those issues within Chinese 
society and the CPC as well as its leadership. Whether among the 
cadres, masses, and intellectuals at large or within the party's 
leadership teams at various levels, there were many people who 
had rather sober understandings of the realities in China and 
the historical stage in which China was situated, and who put 
forward rather realistic views on the goals and speed of China's 
economic development and on the balances that should be kept, 
believing that various impure economic forms should be tolerated 
under China's socialist economic system. Such correct views and 
ideas were also the reasons why Mao Zedong could outline a 
correct approach to construction when making the speech, "On the 
Ten Major Relationships," in 1956, and why the Eighth CPC 
Congress was able to make correct decisions. For, at that time, 
inner-party democracy and the system of collective leadership 
were still in rather good shape; various ideas could all be put 
forward to be discussed so that they might complement each 
other. Nevertheless, after the start of the "Great Leap Forward" 
in 1958, people became more or less hotheaded; in addition, Mao 
Zedong severely criticized the activity of "opposing rash 
advances," and refused to listen to dissenting views, resulting 
in initial damages to inner-party democracy and the practice of 
collective leadership. This was an important reason. During and 
after the 1959 Lushan conference, inner-party democracy and the 
practice of collective leadership were thoroughly destroyed. Any 
discussions of, or debates over, different views on economic 
construction became political struggles; as a result, there 
emerged autocratic and arbitrary decision making on important 
issues, and checking and balancing forces disappeared. All this 
further deepened Mao Zedong's tragedy. It can be said that "On 
the Ten Major Relationships" and the Eighth CPC Congress were 
the crystallization of collective wisdom, and that the "Great 
Leap Forward" and the Lushan conference were the disastrous 
results of rejecting democracy and the practice of collective 
leadership. This is material covered by our next two topics. 
<H5>  [15 Nov 93 pp 9-12] </H5>
  [Text] Part III--The Second Breakthrough and Tragedy: 
Concerning Contradictions Among the People and the "Policy of 
Letting a Hundred Flowers Bloom and Letting a Hundred Schools 
Contend" 
  Socialism is not only an economic system. Socialism is a 
social system encompassing economic, political, cultural, and 
other systems and policies. Its central task is to promote the 
sustained and rapid growth of the productive forces. At the same 
time, it should also enhance the comprehensive construction of 
social relationships, enhance the construction of such things as 
democratic politics and spiritual civilization so as to ensure 
the healthy development of economic construction, improve the 
entire people's material and cultural standards of living, and 
promote comprehensive social progress. 
  Thus, while exploring the approach to socialist construction 
in China, Mao Zedong also conducted bold explorations regarding 
the development of social relationships and the construction of 
democratic politics and science and culture under the conditions 
of socialism in China, and made creative breakthroughs. 
  After leading the Chinese people in overthrowing the 
reactionary rule of imperialism, feudalism, and bureaucratic 
capitalism, the Communist Party of China established the state 
power of the people's democratic dictatorship which was led by 
the working class and based on the alliance of workers and 
peasants. Relying on this state power, it extensively 
transformed social and economic relationships, and carried out 
economic and cultural construction in a comprehensive manner. 
During this process, it created many things, with the people's 
democratic dictatorship being just a creation based on 
integrating the Marxist theory of proletarian dictatorship with 
the concrete realities in China; and it also followed and 
referred to Soviet experience in many areas. 
  In 1956 and 1957 new situations and changes occurred at home 
and in the international environment, thereby prompting Mao 
Zedong to also think about new approaches to handling society, 
politics, science and education, and cultural construction. 
  The first was the change in the domestic situation. By 1956, 
through a series of social transformation movements, not only 
had such remaining tasks of democratic revolution as land 
reform, suppressing counterrevolutionaries, and restoring the 
economy been completed, but with regard to the economic system, 
the socialist transformation of the relations of production, 
mainly the ownership system, had also been completed. Because of 
six or seven consecutive years of social transformation 
movements involving all the people, the social structure had 
undergone tremendous changes. The exploiting classes either had 
been basically eliminated as classes (the feudal landlord class 
and compradore bourgeoisie) or were in the process of being 
eliminated (the national bourgeoisie); workers, peasants, and 
intellectuals at large had been emancipated both politically and 
economically; the productive forces of society had been 
liberated; the state power of the people's democracy had been 
consolidated; and China had achieved such national unity, 
solidarity among the people, and social stability as had not 
been seen for over 100 years. This indicated that the many years 
of large scale and tempestuous class struggle between 
antagonistic classes had basically ended, and that class 
struggle was no longer the main contradiction in our society. At 
the same time, because the task of social transformation had not 
been entirely accomplished, because the old society had left 
behind various things still producing influences, and especially 
because China had a large population and was backward 
economically and culturally, various nonantagonistic 
contradictions among the people not only existed and emerged in 
large quantities, but had become even more prominent under the 
new situation. At that time there were such problems as the 
problem of different views on the campaign to eliminate 
counterrevolutionaries, land reform, and the socialist 
transformation of industry and commerce, the problem of 
different assessments of intellectuals' thought reform, the 
problem of attitude toward agricultural cooperatives, the 
problems of students' enrolling in schools of higher levels and 
the placement of graduates, the problem of workers' wages and 
benefits, the problem of differences in the lives of workers and 
peasants, and the problem of party and government workers' 
growing tendency to seek personal fame and interests, being 
divorced from the masses, and committing the mistake of having a 
bureaucratic way of doing things. In serious cases, there were 
such manifestations as peasants' withdrawing from cooperatives, 
workers' strikes, and students' strikes; many places saw 
marches, demonstrations, and "disturbances," and the democratic 
parties and nonparty figures had also expressed various views. 
All those problems manifested themselves directly or indirectly 
in the form of contradictions between the leader and the led, 
that is, contradictions between the ruling Communist Party and 
its cadres on the one hand and the masses of the people of all 
sectors and strata who were being led on the other. Such a 
situation shattered people's previously held simplistic 
understanding of socialism--the naive illusions based on a 
belief that all difficulties would be resolved as soon as the 
social system was changed and that socialist society would be an 
ideal realm with no contradictions, thereby confronting people 
with the question of how to understand the new situations and 
state of affairs. 
  The contradictions discussed above were mostly 
contradictions 
about economic interests of various groups of people amidst 
social change. At the same time such social changes and changes 
in interest relationships also manifested themselves in people's 
thinking and ideology, mainly in the form of different views 
held by young students, intellectuals, party member cadres, and 
nonparty figures on various theoretical and practical issues; 
such different views in turn manifested themselves in the form 
of differences, discussions, and debates concerning political 
views, academic views, and artistic styles in the scientific, 
educational, and cultural spheres. 
  The second was the impact of the international environment, 
mainly the impact of the changes in the Soviet Union. The 20th 
CPSU Congress revealed a great deal of problems in the history 
of several decades of proletarian dictatorship in the Soviet 
Union. Firstly, there had been abnormal phenomena in inner-party 
and social struggles, highly developed practices of personality 
cult and autocratic and arbitrary rule, cruel factional 
fighting, and the excessive expansion of the campaign to 
eliminate counterrevolutionaries; secondly, there had been 
ideological and theoretical dogmatism, arbitrary decisionmaking 
in, and the dogmatic control of the scientific, cultural, art, 
and other ideological spheres, and the practice of using 
administrative or even dictatorial means to suppress debates 
among different views and to inhibit the expression of different 
schools and styles. All those policies and measures had been 
adopted under the cover of the pseudo theoretical principles 
that in socialist society the relations of production had been 
in "complete congruence" with the productive forces and that the 
"political and moral unanimity" of Soviet society had been the 
motive force for social development. While the words of 
congruence and unanimity had been used publicly in an extensive 
way and while the idea that society had been full of 
contradictions, mostly among the people, under the new situation 
of socialism had been rejected, in practice very crude methods 
had been used to resolve those contradictions. As a result, 
various social contradictions had become ever more serious and 
numerous, and exploded in a powerful manner at the opportunity 
provided by the vigorous effort to expose Stalin at the 20th 
CPSU Congress. In addition, there were contradictions among the 
people as well as contradictions between ourselves and the 
enemy, contradictions within and between the Soviet Union and 
East European countries, internal contradictions in those 
countries, and the impact of Western countries' infiltration 
efforts. All those things stimulated and promoted each other, 
resulting in very chaotic, complex, and tempestuous situations. 
The concentrated manifestations were the Polish and Hungarian 
incidents in 1956. Previously it had been believed that there 
had been no contradictions, and then all kinds of contradictions 
exploded together; consequently, many people in socialist 
countries, including many leaders of Communist parties, were 
stupefied and at a loss what to do. This showed that people 
still lacked an understanding of the new social system, 
socialism, and that especially in the Soviet Union Stalin's 
metaphysics still had profound influence. At the same time, it 
also reminded and prompted the Chinese Communists, first of all 
Mao Zedong, who had just won the victory of socialist 
transformation, to think about the relevant issues in a profound 
manner. 
  How to understand the new domestic situation after the 
establishment of the socialist system in a preliminary manner, 
how to summarize the experience and lessons of the Soviet Union 
accumulated over several decades, and how to analyze the various 
international and domestic currents of thought after the 20th 
CPSU Congress were issues about which Mao Zedong thought 
repeatedly in 1956-1957. The overall theme of those issues was 
the historical experience of proletarian dictatorship, and the 
basic line of thought was to rely on and mobilize the force of 
the masses of the people, to enhance the construction of 
socialist democracy in the political, social, cultural, and 
other spheres, and to consolidate the state power of the 
people's democracy led by the working class, so as to promote 
the development of socialist economic construction. In this 
process, through mutual enlightening among, and repeated 
considerations by leaders of the party, Mao Zedong gradually 
formed two important ideas: The double-hundred policy and 
contradictions among the people. 
  This issue and the issue of China's approach to socialist 
construction were considered almost at the same time. When 
delivering the speech, "On the Ten Major Relationships," Mao 
Zedong also expressed many thoughts on political, social, 
ideological, cultural, and other issues, in addition to issues 
relating to economic construction. The many discussions of the 
relationship between revolution and counterrevolution, the 
relationship between right and wrong, and the relationship 
between the party and those outside the party as well as the 
discussions of learning from all nationalities and countries and 
of the need to adopt an analytical attitude toward the Soviet 
experience and Stalin's mistakes conducted under the topic of 
the relationship between China and foreign countries all 
involved the double-hundred policy and the issue of 
contradictions among the people. Although no clear and concise 
principles had been worked out, it could be seen that those 
important ideas were in the process of being considered and 
formed. When the center discussed "On the Ten Major 
Relationships," Mao Zedong proposed that "letting a hundred 
flowers bloom and letting a hundred schools contend" be made our 
policy. Not only was this policy put forward, but lively 
explanations of the policy were also made in view of the state 
of affairs in the academic and cultural communities, especially 
in view of the impact of dogmatic Soviet practices in our 
country. Also, the policy was expounded systematically through 
the article by Lu Dingyi, director of the CPC Central Propaganda 
Department. In view of the mistakes of "Left" dogmatism which 
suppressed the freedom of thought in the scientific and cultural 
spheres, the idea of "letting a hundred flowers bloom and 
letting a hundred schools contend" advocated the freedom of 
independent thinking, the freedom of debate, the freedoms of 
creation and criticism, and the freedoms to express one's own 
views and to hold on to and maintain one's own views, and so on. 
Thus, as soon as it was proposed, it was inevitably linked 
inseparably to the concept of contradictions among the people 
and to the idea of differentiating between two types of 
contradictions. Whether at that time or at present, people 
should not expect a proletarian statesman to allow absolute 
freedom for all without any distinctions and limitations. We 
ourselves and the enemy must be clearly differentiated from each 
other politically, and there must be freedom among the people; 
this proposition should be the inevitable conclusion. In the 
second half of 1956, the Polish and Hungarian incidents took 
place in succession; such complex situations occurring under the 
socialist system prompted Mao Zedong to give more attention to 
the issues of contradictions among the people and of 
differentiating between the two types of contradictions. His 
"Letter to Huang Yanpei," and the article "More on the 
Historical Experience of Proletarian Dictatorship," written 
under his guidance, both clearly put forward the concept of 
contradictions among the people, asserting the need to clearly 
differentiate between the nature of contradictions between 
ourselves and the enemy and the nature of contradictions among 
the people as well as the need to use different methods to 
resolve the different contradictions. In February 1957, Mao 
Zedong made the important speech, "On the Correct Handling of 
Contradictions Among the People," at the Supreme Conference on 
State Affairs, systematically expounding a series of theoretical 
and policy issues concerning contradictions among the people and 
the differentiation between the two types of social 
contradictions, while putting the "double-hundred policy" in the 
category of things involving the correct handling of 
contradictions among the people. 
  As should be pointed out, despite the serious mistakes and 
detours later in the process of implementation, the putting 
forward of the two ideas of the "double-hundred policy" and of 
contradictions among the people has had long-term significance 
to shattering the traditional rigid understanding of socialist 
society and to the establishment of scientific theory and 
guiding policy based on realities with regard to the issue of 
how the political, ideological, and cultural spheres should 
promote socialist construction. 
  There has been a great deal of summarizing and expounding of 
the ideas of the double-hundred policy and contradictions among 
the people proposed by Mao Zedong. As far as the scientific 
understanding of socialist society is concerned, as least the 
following several points are creative and of strategic 
significance. 
  First, the concept of contradictions among the people and 
the 
correct handling of contradictions among the people have become 
the main themes of political life in the country. Mao Zedong 
said that contradictions among the people were not a new issue, 
but had been given less attention than now because of the 
acuteness of the struggle between ourselves and the enemy in the 
past. He based his views on historical development, changes in 
the situation, and the Marxist principle that the cause of the 
proletariat must rely on the broad masses of the people and must 
practice democracy. Actually the putting forward of this concept 
represented a new understanding of socialist society and further 
development of the theory of proletarian dictatorship (assuming 
the form of the people's democratic dictatorship in our 
country). On the one hand, he not only analyzed the various 
manifestations of contradictions among the people after the 
establishment of the socialist system in a preliminary manner in 
our country, but also made analyses based on principles of 
dialectical materialism and historical materialism; that is, the 
law of the unity of opposites and principles on basic 
contradictions in society, to support the argument about the 
root cause of the inevitably prolonged existence of such 
nonantagonistic contradictions among the people, thereby 
revealing the fundamental method for observing socialism (and 
even communism in the future). On the other hand, he further 
developed the ideas contained in the article, "On the People's 
Democratic Dictatorship," that is, holding that the people's 
democratic dictatorship was the combination of democracy for the 
people and dictatorship over the reactionaries; especially, 
drawing on lessons of the Soviet Union, he emphasized that 
practicing democracy for the people had become an increasingly 
widespread and prominent problem confronting the people's 
democratic dictatorship, and the main theme of the country's 
political life. This idea and another very important idea 
emerged and were formed at the same time. That is, after the 
establishment of the socialist system in a preliminary way, our 
country faced the transitions from class struggle to the 
struggle against nature, from revolution to construction, and 
from the revolutions in the past to technological and cultural 
revolutions. Since class struggle was no longer the main 
contradiction and since economic construction had become the 
focus of the party's and the state's work, functions relating to 
democracy, such as using democratic means to resolve various 
contradictions among the people as well as unifying the people's 
interest and will, consolidating the unity among the people and 
the unity of the country, and arousing the entire people's 
enthusiasm for working hard to build socialism through the 
system of democratic centralism had naturally become the main 
functions of the state power of the people's democratic 
dictatorship. 
  The second concerned the method for correctly handling 
contradictions among the people, the method of 
unity-criticism-unity. This was the natural extension of the 
preceding issue. As the nature of contradictions among the 
people and the nature of contradictions between ourselves and 
the enemy were different, the methods of handling were also 
different. In the process of exercising leadership over 
revolutionary wars and revolutionary base areas, the Communist 
Party of China not only accumulated rich experience with respect 
to the struggle against the enemy, but also accumulated rich 
experience with respect to the handling of inner-party 
contradictions, internal contradictions within the revolutionary 
army and ranks, and contradictions between groups of people in 
the base areas, thereby producing the method of 
unity-criticism-unity. After the nationwide victory, the use of 
the method had been spread across society so as to handle 
contradictions among the people at large. After putting forward 
the concept of contradictions among the people, Mao Zedong 
systematically summarized and explained the method in view of 
the new situations and experience (including foreign experience 
and lessons). 
  The third concerned the "double-hundred policy" in the 
ideological and cultural spheres. The policy of "letting a 
hundred flowers bloom and letting a hundred schools contend" was 
proposed earlier than the issue of contradictions among the 
people was raised, and was later included in the general subject 
of correctly handling contradictions among the people, becoming 
an important component of the subject. Specifically, this policy 
advocated letting a hundred flowers bloom in the sphere of arts 
and letting a hundred schools contend in the scientific sphere, 
and was a policy of promoting socialist scientific and cultural 
prosperity. But its significance was more extensive and 
profound, involving the issue of how the ruling Communist Party 
should give play to Marxism's guiding role so as to exercise 
leadership over the ideological sphere and even involving the 
issue of what methods the Communist Party should use to lead the 
country. This policy included allowing and guaranteeing 
ideological and political freedoms and rights enjoyed by the 
people at large, advocating independent thinking, free 
expression, the freedoms to engage in scientific, literary, and 
artistic creation and in criticism, discussion, and debate. 
Thus, people could pursue the truth and develop science and 
culture amid contending and competition, thereby continuously 
forming ideological unity based on socialist and Marxist 
principles. This policy also included the adoption of the method 
of developing Marxism, defeating erroneous things, and 
overcoming the impact of various erroneous and reactionary ideas 
on the people through comparisons, competitions, and struggles 
between the true, good, and beautiful and the false, evil, and 
ugly as well as through discussion, criticism, and reasoning. 
This policy was different from Stalin's crude dogmatic policy, 
practiced in the Soviet Union, of exercising ideological and 
political control through administrative coercive means. That 
method not only could not improve and unify the people's 
thinking, but would also inevitably lead to the gradual loss of 
the right over leadership amid the superficial strengthening of 
control; as a result, hidden behind the facade of formal 
unanimity would be markets where various fallacious ideas would 
spread. Thus, Mao Zedong believed that the "double-hundred 
policy" should be a fundamental as well as long-term policy, but 
not a temporary policy. He reduced the issue of whether to 
adhere to the "double-hundred policy" to the issue of whether to 
have "loosening" or "tightening." He said that there could be 
two different methods, or policies, for leading our country, 
that is, loosening and tightening. One of the two policies, 
loosening and tightening, must be selected. We adopted the 
policy of loosening because that was a policy conducive to the 
consolidation and cultural development of our country. Of 
course, compared with the past situation in the Soviet Union 
when the crude and simplistic method was used, the use of the 
policy of loosening would make it more difficult and complicated 
to exercise the leadership of the Communist Party, to carry out 
guidance based on Marxism, and to manage the state, but would be 
an effective way to resolve contradictions and enhance 
leadership. 
  The fourth concerned the matter of long-term coexistence and 
mutual supervision. This policy was proposed, under the new 
situation, to handle the relationships between the parties 
formed in the history of our country. This policy was also put 
forward earlier than the idea of contradictions among the 
people, and can be said to have represented an important aspect 
of the process of considering and forming the concept of 
contradictions among the people. For, the relationships between 
the Communist Party of China and the democratic parties as well 
as the relationships between the different classes and strata 
that they represented respectively were all in the category of 
things involving contradictions among the people. In 1956, after 
the basic completion of socialist transformation, there occurred 
the issue of whether there should be the continued existence of 
the many democratic parties which, formed during the War of 
Resistance Against Japan and the struggle against Chiang 
Kai-shek and composed of mainly members of the national 
bourgeoisie and intellectuals of the national bourgeoisie, had 
cooperated with the CPC for a long time. At that moment, on 
behalf of the CPC Central Committee, Mao Zedong put forward the 
policy of "long-term coexistence and mutual supervision." In "On 
the Ten Major Relationships," he said: Is it better to have one 
party or several parties? It now seems that it is better to have 
several parties. Not only was such the case in the past, but 
such can also be the case in the future, that is, long-term 
coexistence and mutual supervision. In the 1957 speech on 
contradictions among the people, he further explained that like 
a person a party needed to hear different opinions. In addition 
to accepting the supervision by the working people and the 
masses of party members on the basis of considering those people 
to be the main source of supervision, the Communist Party of 
China, as the leadership force of our country, should also be 
supervised by the democratic parties. Of course, such 
supervision should be mutual supervision, that is, that parties 
should make suggestions to each other and criticize each other 
and should use the method of combining unity and struggle, the 
method of unity-criticism-unity, to resolve contradictions 
between them, so as to achieve unity based on socialism and to 
arouse enthusiasm on the part of all sectors, thereby serving 
socialism. The putting forward of this policy marked the 
beginning of the forming of a party system with Chinese 
characteristics. This policy was also different from the Soviet 
Union's policy, and has been proven to be better for the party, 
the people, and socialism in later years. 
  The final, and also the most important point concerned the 
goals and ideas with regard to the political scene in socialist 
society. In proposing such theories and policies as those 
concerning contradictions among the people and the 
double-hundred policy, Mao Zedong paid great attention to 
dialectics. He once said that China should be a country where 
dialectics would develop. The series of policies proposed by him 
at that time were proposed mainly in view of Stalin's erroneous 
practices which had been exposed in a preliminary way and in 
view of the Soviet Union's ideological and cultural policies and 
political system which had been highly centralized, rigid, 
despotic, and lacking in democracy and freedom. Consequently the 
focus was put on emphasizing handling well contradictions among 
the people, emphasizing the development of the people's 
democracy, protecting the people's freedoms and rights, and 
making the party and state lively and vibrant. He hoped that 
China's socialism would not be rigid, inflexible, and 
frightening as in the case of the Soviet Union, and hoped that 
through the implementation of the series of policies mentioned 
above, literature and art as well as science and technology 
would be prosperous and developed, that the party would always 
maintain its vitality, and that the people's cause would be 
prosperous. But he did not forget the other side of the matter. 
Although contradictions among the people had emerged in large 
quantities and had become the main theme of the country's 
political life, contradictions between ourselves and the enemy 
still existed, ideas and forces opposed to the CPC's leadership 
and socialism still existed, and thus the dictatorship function 
of the state power of the people's democratic dictatorship had 
not lost its role, as the new China had been established not 
long ago. Although it was necessary to advocate and protect the 
people's ideological and political freedoms and to develop 
democracy among the people, China which was so large could not 
exist without discipline or without centralization and unity. 
Although various ideas and political views and various academic 
schools and artistic styles could all manifest themselves and 
could all "bloom" and "contend," Marxist guidance and education 
should not be relaxed and the leadership role of Marxism must be 
maintained. There were many such discussions. The most 
concentrated discussion was his following statement made in July 
1957: "Our goal is to build a lively political situation where 
there are both centralization and democracy, both discipline and 
freedom, and both unified wills and the ease of mind on the part 
of individuals, so as to facilitate socialist revolution and 
socialist construction, to make it easier to overcome 
difficulties, to build up China's modern industry and modern 
agriculture more quickly, and to make the party and state 
strengthened and more able to stand turbulence and storms." 
  All this, from the relevant theories and general and 
specific 
policies to the political situation which would be created 
through the implementation of those theories and general and 
specific policies, that is, the target states of affairs of the 
social, political, ideological, cultural, and other spheres of 
the new socialist society that we wanted to build, provided an 
encouraging direction and blueprint. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59324 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Public Sector To Remain `Predominant' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0076A Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] in 
Chinese No 11, 11 Nov 93 pp 15-17 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0076A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHENLI DE ZHUIQIU [PURSUIT OF TRUTH] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Shi Zhonglai: "On Theory of Predominance" -- </F>
Predominant Role of Public Ownership in Socialism Will Not Waver] 
  [Text] Right now, people in various localities throughout 
the country are earnestly implementing the guidelines laid down 
by the 14th National CPC Congress, and enthusiastically 
establishing and developing the socialist market economic system 
by deepening reform and boldly making explorations. There is an 
important prerequisite in establishing the socialist market 
economic system. That is to persistently uphold the predominant 
role of the socialist public ownership system. In his report 
delivered at the 14th National CPC Congress, Comrade Jiang Zemin 
explicitly pointed out: "The socialist market economy is a 
component part of the basic system of socialism. So far as the 
ownership structure is concerned, for a long time to come we 
should allow diverse sectors of the economy to develop side by 
side. The public sector, which includes enterprises owned by 
collectives, is to remain predominant, with the private sector, 
which includes individually owned and foreign-owned enterprises, 
as a supplement." 
  Right now, naturally very few people would openly oppose 
the predominant role of the public ownership system. However, 
there are also people who adopt various forms to covertly or 
overtly express their different views on this issue. If we act 
in accordance with these views, we would either make the 
predominant role of the public ownership system totally vanish, 
or change it into something that only exists in name but not in 
essence. The so-called "theory of predominance" is one of these 
views. 
  Those who advocate the "theory of predominance" have 
said: To let the public ownership system play the predominant 
role does not mean that the socialist public ownership system 
must play a predominant role in quantity and in production value 
in the national economy. The predominant role in terms of 
"quantity" is a "burden and encumbrance" which should be 
discarded and changed into a "predominant role of a guidance 
nature." What is a "predominant role of a guidance nature"? That 
is, it is only necessary to maintain the public ownership system 
in a limited number of "non-competitive basic industries." It 
share should be lowered to 10 to 20 percent. It should not 
exceed a maximum share of 30 percent. The large portion of the 
remaining industries must be left to the non-public economical 
sector. It is said that by managing this limited number of 
"non-competitive industries" well, it would be able to "guide" 
the whole national economy to forge ahead. "Although it is small 
in size, it functions efficiently." Therefore, it is called the 
"theory of predominance." Can we agree with this kind of view? 
  Any thing or event, either a natural phenomenon or a 
social phenomenon, must have a definite quantity to be its 
carrier. Without a definite quantity, there will be no definite 
quality. To have a definite quality, we must have definite 
quantity. Quantitative changes of a thing have their limits. If 
quantitative changes exceed their limits, the quality of the 
thing or event will change. This thing will become something 
else. Let us take water as an example. It is a transparent 
liquid composed of two hydrogen atoms and one oxygen atom. Under 
standard atmospheric pressure, water will become ice when its 
temperature reaches zero degree Centigrade. It will start to 
boil and become steam, when its temperature reaches 100 degrees 
Centigrade. That is to say that quantity and quality are 
conditional and interchangeable. Both quantity and quality have 
their own limits. "When quality reaches its limits, it becomes 
quantity." "Pure quantitative changes may also become 
qualitative changes." 
  Social phenomenon is of no exception. In a capitalist 
society, there not only exists the capitalist ownership system, 
there also exists the individual ownership system, the 
capitalist cooperative system and so on. However, the main basic 
means of production is in the hands of the bourgeoisie. A large 
number of labor forces are commodities, and the capitalist 
relations of production become the "light which illuminates 
everywhere." This society is exactly the capitalist society. To 
replace the capitalist system with the socialist system, the 
most important sign is that the proletariat must seize the 
political power and that workers hold the capitalists' means of 
production in their own hands, and establish the system of 
ownership of means of production. One of the basic special 
features of socialism with Chinese characteristics is to make 
the public ownership system of means of production the 
predominant and the other economic sectors a supplement. Without 
the predominant role of the public ownership system of means of 
production, there will be no socialism with Chinese 
characteristics. This is simple and sound reasoning. Naturally, 
in the course of building socialism, it is difficult to define 
the share of the public ownership system and the share of the 
non-public ownership system in the different stages of 
development of the productive forces. However, as far as the 
whole country is concerned, if the share of the public ownership 
system drops to the extent that it no longer plays the 
predominant role, is not strong enough to restrain or decide the 
development of the whole national economy, and its status as the 
economic foundation of the socialist system is shaken, while the 
share of the non-public ownership system rises to the extent 
that it may greatly affect or even overpower the public 
ownership system, can it still be said that the predominant role 
of the public ownership system is being maintained? No matter 
what kind of high-sounding names such as "guidance nature" or 
"qualitative type" are bestowed upon the public ownership 
system, the answer is self-evident. 
  It also makes people feel doubtful if it is said that 
the public economic sector will be able to play a "guidance" 
role if it is limited to control a small number of 
"non-competitive basic industries." People realize that 
according to labor sequence and degree of processing, industries 
can be divided into infrastructural facilities, basic industries 
and the processing industry. Once again the processing industry 
can be divided into rough (primary) finishing and precision 
(fine) finishing. Infrastructural facilities and basic 
industries are important industrial sectors which play a basic 
role in the development of the national economy. Without the 
development of infrastructural facilities and basic industries, 
the development of the processing industry and the entire 
national economy is out of question. Particularly the energy 
industry, the raw and semi-finished product industry and the 
communications and transportation industries are bottlenecking 
economic development. It was precisely for this reason that as 
soon as we had the political power in our hands, we confiscated 
the basic industries with the capital of imperialists and 
Kuomintang bureaucrat-capitalists, and turned them into state 
properties. During the 40 some years after the building of New 
China, we have once again amassed a large amount of manpower and 
material and financial resources, and invested hundreds of 
billions of yuan to build and develop, batches after batches, 
infrastructural facilities, basic industries and major 
engineering projects which have laid a solid material foundation 
for socialist construction and played a significant role in the 
development of the national economy. However, as seen from the 
entire national economy, infrastructural facilities and basic 
industries only provide a part of the material foundation. It is 
impossible to develop the national economy without a decent 
processing industry in high technology even if there are 
infrastructural facilities and basic industries, because these 
facilities and industries are unable to provide the finished 
products. People can neither eat nor wear them. Separating basic 
industries from the processing industry is just like developing 
the processing industry without basic industries. The national 
economy will become a deformed lame duck. In addition, the 
development of today's productive forces and science and 
technology are, to a great extent, manifested in the processing 
industry. We cannot develop basic industries if our technology 
in the processing industry is backward. It is necessary to bring 
into full play the predominant role of the public ownership 
system not only in the development of infrastructural facilities 
and basic industries, but also in the development of the major 
processing industry. Let us ask this question: Would it work if 
we let the public economic sector withdraw from all key 
departments in machine building industry, electronics industry, 
astronautics industry, chemical industry and other industries of 
high technology and let the non-public economic sector fill in 
its vacancies? It would not work even in the light and textile 
industries, let alone the major industries mentioned before. The 
development of light and textile industries directly affects 
people's livelihood and the state accumulation. Right now the 
overwhelming majority of state-run large and medium-sized 
enterprises which account for a large portion of China's light 
and textile industries are running well. Their varieties of 
designs, colors, quality and even management are better than the 
small enterprises of the non-public economic sector. In this 
connection, the state-owned enterprises are playing an exemplary 
and guiding role. The original management system of state-owned 
enterprises are full of problems. It must be reformed; its 
technology upgraded, and its structure readjusted. Other 
economic sectors must also be allowed and encouraged to develop 
themselves. However, is there any good reason why we should 
bring about economic changes and replace the public economic 
sector with the non-public economic sector? Right now, basic 
industries account for approximately 28 percent of China's total 
industrial output value, while the processing industry about 39 
percent. If we change the public economic sector which account 
for 39 percent of the output value into non-public economic 
sector and if the public economic sector is only allowed to 
develop "non-competitive" basic industries in accordance with 
the views of those who advocate the "theory of predominance," 
what portion will be left over for the public economic sector to 
develop? (What does it mean by "non-competitive" anyway? Under 
the conditions of the market economy, what sector of the economy 
is "non-competitive"?) 
  Important special features of infrastructural facilities 
and basic industries are large investments, long construction 
cycle, slow investment returns, high labor intensity for 
workers, and small profits. These features are more conspicuous 
in "non-competitive" basic industries. However, things are 
reversed in the processing industry. Right now, many departments 
in China's basic industries have yielded low economic results. 
Several trades suffered losses continuously for many years. 
Perhaps such losses can be attributed to the special features 
mentioned before. Another reason for the losses is the 
excessively low price which is even below the production cost. 
The public ownership system cannot be blamed for the low price. 
It is not caused by poor enterprise management. It is mainly 
because of an unreasonable pricing structure. An enterprise has 
no authority to fix the price. When the price is being 
determined, it is necessary to take into consideration the needs 
of the macro-economic control and the abilities of all sectors 
to take the burden. In other words, these lines of business 
offer lower prices and suffer losses, because they often take 
the overall national economy into consideration, sacrifice their 
own interests, shift a part of "economic results" to the private 
enterprises, "Sino-foreign joint ventures, cooperative and 
solely foreign-funded enterprises" and individually owned 
enterprises which use infrastructural facilities and the 
products of basic industries when they sell their products at 
lower prices or even profit-free to the processing industry or 
other departments. This kind of situation reflects the role of 
state-run enterprises and the macro-economic control. However, 
can we go on like this forever? What would be the result if we 
continue acting in such a way? Why should we let the public 
economic sector engage in trades that make small or almost no 
profit or even suffer losses, while allowing the non-public 
economic sector handle those trades which are able to sell their 
products at higher prices, and reap larger profits with little 
investments and a quicker turnover rate of capital funds? What 
kind of role would the socialist public ownership system play? 
Is there a need for us to let the state-run enterprises forever 
take the blame of "operating with low economic efficiency" while 
covertly shifting their large amount of profits to others? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59325 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> POLITICAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Party Construction Must Meet Demands of Market </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CM0070A Shanghai SHEHUI KEXUE [SOCIAL SCIENCES] in Chinese 
No 11, 15 Nov 93 pp 24-27 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0070A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHEHUI KEXUE [SOCIAL SCIENCES] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wu Qingping, affiliated with the policy research </F>
office of the CPC Yueyang Municipal Committee, edited by Xi 
Ling: "The General Political Demands of the Market Economy and 
Party Construction"] 
  [Text] We must study the issue of doing a good job of 
carrying out party construction under the situation 
characterized by the development of a socialist market economy 
in view of the general political demands of the market economy. 
<H3>  I. Party Construction Must Meet General Political Demands of 
Market Economy </H3>
  According to Marxism, politics is a concentrated 
manifestation of economics. The market economy is a social 
system which is based on the unity of economics and politics. 
The self-construction of our party, as the political group 
exercising leadership over the development of a socialist market 
economy, must certainly meet the general demands of the market 
economy. If we reject the idea that party construction must meet 
the general demands of the market economy, we will not be able 
to truly do a good job of carrying out party construction, nor 
can we develop a true market economy, reaping the victory of 
reaching a socialist market economy. 
  As a creation in human history, the politics of a socialist 
market economy does not have a ready-made model to follow; on 
the other hand, over the several hundred years since it was 
born, the market economy has acquired a rather mature form of 
politics and accumulated rich political achievements. With 
regard to the questions of how to discover the general political 
demands of the market economy through examining the varied and 
complex political phenomena of market economy countries, and of 
how to consult and draw on what is discovered in view of the 
actual situation regarding the construction of our party, I 
believe that emphasis should be given to grasping three key 
points. 
  First, we must discover the general political demands 
of the market economy through examining particular 
situations. Mao Zedong has pointed out: "In terms of the 
order of its movement, human knowledge always grows by changing 
gradually from being knowledge about individual and particular 
things into being knowledge about general things." (Footnote 1: 
Mao Zedong Xuanji, p 285) Whether in analyzing the 
general political demands of the market economy or in exploring 
the ways to enhance party construction in view of such demands, 
it is always necessary to persist in achieving knowledge about 
the particular before achieving knowledge about the general. 
This requires us to clearly understand the situations and 
political characteristics of the market economy countries and to 
analyze the development tracks of those countries' market 
economies as well as their political experiences and lessons, so 
as to derive the general political demands of the market 
economy. Such general demands should be considered to represent 
the essential elements and a rough outline of the rich political 
practice of each country. The general political demands of the 
market economy to be discussed below include the three elements 
of "the rule of law, democracy, and checks and balances," which 
represent just the rough summarizing of the common elements of 
the politics of the developed market-economy countries. 
  Second, we must persist in being creative. Being 
creative represents the spirit of the era of opening up and 
competition. If party construction is to meet the general 
demands of the market economy, we must try hard to be creative, 
rather than simply copying the specific political form of a 
particular country. To try hard to be creative, we must have a 
master spirit characterized by a high sense of responsibility to 
the party and the people, handling "traditional" things in a 
scientific way. On the one hand we must realize that we have 
many fine traditions which still need to be carried forward and 
developed under the new situation; on the other hand we must 
also realize that under the condition of the market economy 
party construction we cannot rely on traditions alone, and that 
we must dare to think, dare to break a new path, and dare to 
take risks. On an overall level, we must regard "the three 
benefits," a notion proposed by Deng Xiaoping, as the goal of 
creative efforts; we must make bold designs, carry out bold 
practical activities, and make timely adjustments on the basis 
of being guided by that goal, so as to ensure that there are new 
breakthroughs and improvements in party construction. 
  Third, we must persist in gradually implementing 
things. Making party construction meet the general demands 
of the market economy is a major reform, and the relevant 
process involves various spheres. Therefore, we must overcome 
impatience and proceed with this work in a step-by-step manner. 
We must formulate work plans in a scientific way, and do a good 
job of managing the reform trial points. We must make a greater 
use of modern communication means in the effort to spread 
information about reforms to various places around the country. 
<H3>  II. Do a Good Job of Carrying Out the Party's System 
Construction in Accordance With the Demands of the Legal System </H3>
  The market economy is an economy based on a legal system. 
Under a market economy, the productive forces are greatly 
liberated, people's enthusiasm and creativeness have greatly 
increased, and competition in society is especially fierce. To 
ensure equal competition and overall efficiency and to prevent 
encroachments upon other people's rights, we must impose norms 
on people's conduct through establishing and maintaining social 
contract relationships. 
  For a long time we have failed to give sufficient emphasis 
to 
legal system work. Party construction has mainly consisted of 
ideological construction, while system construction has been 
neglected. As should be pointed out, the party's ideological 
construction led to tremendous achievements in the war years and 
in the early period of the PRC, as well as many achievements 
after the start of reform and opening up. For instance, 
activities such as the large-scale discussion of the criteria of 
truth in 1978 and the emancipating thinking movement of recent 
years surrounding Deng Xiaoping's speech on "three benefits" 
played a very large role in educating, uniting, and improving 
the whole party. However, the attempt at mainly relying on 
ideological construction without carrying out system 
construction is unlikely to suit a modern society, or to result 
in party construction being carried out in a satisfactory 
manner. First, fundamentally, the superstructure is conditioned 
by the economic base; in general the effectiveness of 
ideological construction is determined by the level of 
development of the productive forces of society and by the 
degree of rationality of social relations among people. 
Therefore, in developing a socialist market economy, it is all 
the more necessary to give emphasis to system construction, and 
to maintain and improve the standards of party construction 
through relying on the infrastructure which imposes norms on 
relations among people in a scientific way. Second, from an 
operational perspective, there are many difficulties in 
ideological construction. For instance: Theoretical development 
is lagging behind, and it is thus difficult to improve people's 
understanding; interest relationships intersect each other and 
are complex; people's minds are getting increasingly 
complicated, and some are not matching their words with their 
deeds, resulting in difficulty in grasping the real result; and 
as the relevant work is greatly affected by personnel turnover, 
it is difficult to consolidate results. In comparison, system 
construction involves relatively small operational difficulties, 
and is conducive to ensuring order and stability. As early as 
1980, Deng Xiaoping made the sorrowful summarizing comment: "Our 
past mistakes of various kinds surely had much to do with some 
leaders' thinking and styles, but the problems in the 
organizational system and the work system were even more 
important." He also pointed out: "The issue of system has a 
bearing on whether the party and state will change their colors, 
and must elicit high attention from the entire party." (Footnote 
2: Deng Xiaoping Wenxuan, p 293) As recently as 
during the southern inspections last year, Deng Xiaoping again 
sincerely admonished us: "It remains necessary to rely on the 
legal system, and it is more reliable to use the legal system 
approach." 
  The issue of how to do a good job of carrying out the 
party's 
system construction needs to be continuously explored 
theoretically and in practice; roughly two aspects should be 
given special emphasis: 
  One aspect is the setting of criteria. The system 
represents the norms governing conduct of all in the party, and 
there must be some criteria used for determining what kind of 
system can be considered satisfactory. 1) Requirements should be 
scientific. Times are changing, and there should also be system 
changes. Requirements on party members in times of war should be 
different from those in times of peace. In times of peace, 
requirements on party members under the situation of a planned 
economy should be different from those under the situation of a 
market economy; and emphasis should be placed on different 
things in different stages of market economy construction. There 
should be systematic scientific rules on all those matters. 2) 
The contents should be concrete. That is, there should be 
specific, clear, and easily grasped rules on what everyone is 
required to do, what everyone is required not to do, how one is 
to do the required things, and which approaches are not to be 
used. 3) The procedures should be without loopholes. We must 
formulate regulations which dovetail each other closely so as to 
reduce as much as possible the impact of the human factor in the 
course of enforcing the regulations. 
  The other aspect is the formulating of a systems 
framework. Presently, it is proper to consider dividing the 
party's framework of systems into three blocks. 1) 
Organizational systems. They mainly include some basic rules on 
organizational forms and changes at the various levels in the 
party. For instance, the organizational command system, the 
election system (encompassing such things as enhancing 
election-district rules as well as inner-party speech-making and 
question-answering), the question system, the evaluation system, 
rules on dismissal and impeachment procedures, rules on 
personnel arrangements concerning the executive organs of 
organizations at various levels, and regulations on the party's 
full-time workers (the party's lawyers and professional party 
cadres). 2) Meeting-related systems. Meetings constitute an 
important form of our party's activities, and must be 
standardized. In view of the overall situation at present, the 
main task for the present time should be to press ahead with the 
construction of the six meeting-related systems, that is, the 
party committee system, the plenary meeting system, the system 
of the congress of party members' representatives, the annual 
party-member conference system, the party-member 
discussion-meeting system, and the democratic-life meeting 
system. 3) Work-related systems. The party's work involves many 
things. As far as inner-party work is concerned, the systems on 
which work should be done include: The party-member study and 
training system, the system of reporting on one's work, the 
system of leading cadres's work at the grass roots and job 
rotation, the personal-wealth declaration system, the 
examination and evaluation system, the system of 
party-discipline sanctions, the system of relaying information 
on the party's internal affairs, the party organ and party 
journal system, the system of protection of party members' 
rights, and the party's internal financial management system. 
<H3>  III. Do a Good Job of Carrying Out the Party's 
Organizational Construction So As To Meet the Democracy Demand </H3>
  Democracy is one of the major components of political 
modernization, and also a fundamental political characteristic 
of the market economy. In a broad sense, democracy refers to 
letting people themselves decide matters affecting their own 
self-interest, and to the full realization of "autonomy" on the 
part of various social actors within the scope defined by law. 
Why does a market economy have more vigor than a planned 
economy? A fundamental difference is that while a market economy 
contains innumerable highly "autonomous" functioning actors, a 
planned economy follows a model characterized by a "unified" and 
centralized way of doing things, and the micro-level actors in 
such an economy are extremely lacking in autonomy and would 
function only when given various commands by the "superiors," 
and that therefore such an economy shows many diseases of 
"ossification." 
  To make the party's work meet the demand for democratic 
politics raised by the market economy, we must focus such work 
on the party's organizational construction. Organization refers 
to a system's internal structural relationships and the relevant 
subsystems. Whether the system is functionally strong, and 
whether the system is powerful, are to a large extent determined 
by whether the internal relationships are proper and by the 
amount of vigor of its subsystems. Enhancing organizational 
construction according to the democratic spirit is undoubtedly 
conducive to rectifying the structural relationships in a system 
and to invigorating the subsystems. Enhancing the party's 
leadership does not just mean enhancing national leadership; 
under a situation characterized by the development of a market 
economy, it is even more important to enhance the concrete 
leadership exercised by party organizations of all levels in all 
sectors. "When there is order in the provinces, there is order 
nationwide." Only by giving full play to the initiative of all 
party organizations and arousing enthusiasm on the part of all 
sectors would it be possible to truly do a good job of 
developing our social and economic cause, to have a solid 
foundation for the party's leadership, and to have the effort to 
enhance the party's leadership produce real effects. Tens of 
thousands of party organizations are scattered around in all 
corners of social life; the enhancement of their 
self-construction through democratic means and their presenting 
themselves as living models before the masses will be of very 
profound and far-reaching significance to accelerating the 
political and economic democratization and the modernization 
process of China. 
  With regard to the issue of how to meet the democracy demand 
and do a good job of carrying out the party's organizational 
construction, it seems proper to consider the following several 
points: The first is to delegate power so as to increase 
the combat effectiveness of organizations. In the current 
period of transition from a planned economy to a market economy, 
the overall task remains to adjust and delegate the powers which 
have been characterized by excessive centralization. We must 
turn each party organization which is directly engaged in 
practical work into an autonomous power center so as to enhance 
its combat effectiveness. The second is to maintain 
inner-party transparency so as to strengthen the cohesiveness of 
the organizations. We must ensure smooth information 
exchanges within the party, especially between the superiors and 
subordinates. Inform all party members of important matters 
inside and outside the party and hold regular and nonregular 
discussion meetings of party members, encouraging party members 
to speak their minds freely and to share the party's cares and 
burdens. Make representatives to party congresses permanent 
representatives, and clearly define their terms of reference and 
duties. Hold relevant meetings regularly to discuss the relevant 
work. To improve the quality of democratic life meetings, we 
must have representatives of subordinate organizations attend 
the democratic life meetings of superior organizations. 
The third is to make the relations between the party and 
the masses closer, so as to increase the vitality of the 
organizations. We must do a good job of conducting 
investigations and study. It is proper for leading party cadres 
to work at the grassroots jobs under their supervision on a 
regular basis, while retaining their positions, and leading 
party cadres currently holding office should meet the masses on 
a regular basis. 
<H3>  IV. Do a Good Job of Building the Party's Supervision 
Mechanisms So As To Meet the Demand Concerning Checks and 
Balances </H3>
  Power is an ability to control matters. Power in human 
society is a human ability to control social objects. As the 
market economy entails the most extensive fair competition and 
contains different kinds of self-interested economic actors, it 
must be equipped with comprehensive and complete checks on and 
balances against all powers in society, and will in no way allow 
self-interested actors, not governed by the principle of 
fairness, to control society in an unconstrained manner; only in 
this way would it be possible to ensure that society is lively 
but not chaotic, with things in order. 
  A concrete analysis will show that there are checks on and 
balances against power everywhere in a market economy society: 
As far as the numerous commodity producers are concerned, their 
highly autonomous business decisionmaking is fundamentally 
constrained by market demands and the production factor 
conditions enjoyed by the producers; as far as the various local 
powerholding actors are concerned, their high degree of autonomy 
is constrained by the law of the state and the state's 
regulation and control means (mainly fiscal) as well as by the 
wishes of the people under the respective jurisdictions; as for 
the "supreme" central powerholding actors, they are also 
effectively supervised and constrained by various parties. An 
example would be the phenomenon of the "three-way separation of 
powers" in the United States. 
  Our party is the ruling party and the central representative 
of the state power of all levels. Therefore, a key to meeting 
the market economy's demand concerning checks on and balances 
against power is to do a good job of building the party's 
supervision mechanisms. 
  From an overall perspective, the party's supervision 
situation was in the past characterized by supervision 
relationships based on supervision exercised by superiors over 
subordinates, or "superior-centered" supervision relationships, 
while horizontal supervision and supervision exercised by 
subordinates (the masses) over superiors (leaders) were 
relatively rare. Through reform in recent years, the highly 
centralized system has been gradually dismantled, and 
"superior-subordinate type" supervision relationships have been 
greatly weakened, while other supervision relationships have not 
been strengthened. The present state of affairs characterized by 
a lack of supervision and power imbalances has inevitably 
created tremendous difficulties for our cause. First, corruption 
becomes unavoidable. The history of political development, 
whether ancient or contemporary and whether Chinese or foreign, 
shows that "unconstrained power will inevitably lead to 
corruption." There is no denying the fact that we do have many 
excellent Communists who, because of their firmly held party 
spirit, are able to resist corruption and remain uncorrupted; 
but there are also many party members who, because of a lack of 
supervision, are more or less corrupted by their inflated 
selfish desires under the impact of the tides of the market 
economy. The news media's reports on ten cases of crimes 
committed by degenerate party members collected by this author 
in a casual manner show that those involved in nine of the cases 
had such positions as "factory director," "manager," "section 
chief," and "division chief," as well as such enviable honor 
titles as "the advanced," "model" "shock worker," "holder of the 
May First Medal," constituting a share of 90 percent. This 
example can more effectively demonstrate that it is difficult 
for unsupervised power not to lead to corruption. Second, it has 
become difficult to deepen the reform. As must be pointed out, 
an important error in past reform efforts has been that 
attention has been given only to the delegating and 
recentralization of power but not to checks on and balances 
against power. Such an error has to a large extent created the 
situation in which reform is unstable and difficult to deepen. 
In terms of root causes, such current problems as those of 
localism, formalism, the growing strength shown by sectoral 
interests, enterprise mechanisms' not being invigorated, low 
efficiency, embezzlement and corruption, financial disorder, and 
counterfeit and shoddy goods are all closely related to the 
error. Third, it is difficult to consolidate the party's power. 
From a long-term and developmental perspective, whether the 
party's leadership can be solidified does not mainly depend on 
whether the party now holds power or not, but is more 
importantly determined by how power is used and by how the 
reform and construction cause led by the party progresses. If 
corruption is widespread, leading to a great deal of problems, 
it would be very difficult to keep the party's leadership power 
solidified, and the cause of establishing a socialist market 
economy in China would be facing great dangers. 
  If one is to do a good job of carrying out the construction 
of the party's supervision mechanisms so as to meet the market 
economy's demand concerning checks on and balances against 
power, it seems necessary to change the framework of the 
party's supervision mechanisms from being a "plane triangle" 
into being a "solid triangle." The past "superior-centered" 
power system in the party can be seen as a "plane triangle." 
Each powerholding actor who is part of the triangle is in 
general constrained only by its superior. When there are changes 
in the power structure (that is, power delegation) or when the 
checks and balances at the superior level are not working in a 
fair manner (leading to phenomena like the bureaucratic tendency 
and the small group tendency), powerholding actors would be in 
an unsound situation characterized by the "absence of 
constraints." On the other hand, as the structure of power 
assumes the shape of a plane figure, the structure as a whole 
would be lacking in stability. A complete and proper system of 
checks on and balances against power should be in the shape of a 
"solid triangle." That is, each powerholding actor is 
constrained both by its superior and by the relevant 
powerholding actors on the same level. In this way the power 
system as a whole will be consolidated. Specifically there are 
two aspects to be discussed: 
  First, do a good job of carrying out the superiors's 
supervising and constraining of the subordinates. In terms 
of the overall situation, it is necessary both to delegate power 
and enliven the situation so as to accommodate the market 
economy, and to satisfy modern society's need for orderly 
management. 1) Keep control over provinces and release cities. 
For provinces are large, while cities are small. The province 
represents the highest level of local power, and the city 
represents a lower level of local power. A province's situation 
is much more complex than a city's situation, and therefore we 
must keep comprehensive control over the appointment of members 
of the provincial leadership teams, while keeping control over 
only the chiefs of the municipal leadership teams. 2) Weaken 
vertical sectoral controls. Most of the existing powerholding 
agencies of various levels and their vertical ways of control 
all have to a great extent the color of a planned economy. In 
the future, except such necessary vertical controls as those 
over taxation, customs, the military, and the police, vertical 
controls should be weakened as much as possible, and some 
agencies should be dismantled on the basis of consideration of 
the relevant situations. 3) The means of control should be 
changed as soon as possible. Except for the cases of the 
appointment and dismissal of leading personnel and vertical 
controls mentioned above, the use of administrative means should 
be reduced as much as possible; "campaign" and "focus" work in 
particular should be reduced. We must perfect legal means and 
strengthen economic means; particularly, we must resolve the 
problem of the weakness of central fiscal means. 
  Second, do a good job of carrying out horizontal 
supervision exercised by party organizations of the same levels 
over each other. 1) Fully develop the function of 
disciplinary commissions. During the period when such 
institutions as the people's congresses are still lacking in the 
capability for supervision, it is necessary for disciplinary 
commissions to become powerholding actors (checking and 
balancing against power) and to supervise party committees of 
the same levels. We must study and increase the supervision 
tasks of each disciplinary commission in view of the need to 
abide by party discipline and the law of the state as well as 
the needs of the development of the local reform and 
construction cause; we must merge disciplinary commissions with 
such agencies as the supervisory and anticorruption agencies so 
as to improve overall efficiency. 2) The secretary of a 
disciplinary commission should be elected by all the party 
members of the party organization of the same level, and the 
candidates should, as much as possible, go through the relevant 
entry, speechmaking, and question answering procedures according 
to usual election practices. The secretary of a disciplinary 
commission should be subjected to periodical elections, and be 
able to get re-elected consecutively. 3) Scientifically define 
the task and working methods of disciplinary commissions. We 
must clearly give disciplinary commissions various inspection 
tasks and make personnel arrangements in view of the amount of 
work to be done. In addition to routine inspections, 
disciplinary commissions must also be given the task of 
conducting random inspections; they should do a good job of 
keeping records so as to facilitate the truthful evaluation of 
the work of the party organizations of the same levels as well 
as the disciplinary commissions' own work. 4) A disciplinary 
commission should report to permanent representatives of the 
party members on its work. The secretary of a disciplinary 
commission and relevant responsible persons should report to all 
the party members on their work every year, and answer the 
questions raised by party members. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59326 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economic Development `Widens Regional Differences' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0224B Beijing JINGJI RIBAO in Chinese 26 Nov 93 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0224B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI RIBAO </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Tai (1728 3141): "How Do We Treat China's </F>
Regional Economic Differences"] 
  [Text] The regional economic structure is an important 
component of the national economic structure. Due to different 
conditions in the development of the national economy, the 
economic and technical development in various regions is 
unbalanced. Under the conditions of market economy, we must 
understand that because of differences in various regions, there 
can be major differences under certain conditions. However, if 
the economic differences are excessively large in various 
regions, they would have an adverse impact on social stability 
and development. Therefore, we must follow the principle of 
giving consideration to both balanced development and efficiency 
in forming a reasonable pattern for the distribution of the 
productive forces. 
<H5>  Widening Regional Economic Differences </H5>
  Since the beginning of the reform and opening up program, 
China has scored economic achievements which attract worldwide 
attention. Tremendous economic achievements have been attained 
in various regions throughout the country. However, such 
development is unbalanced. The rate of growth is the greatest in 
China's eastern region where economic and technological 
foundations are good, while this rate is comparatively low in 
the central and western regions where economic and technological 
standards are fairly low. As seen from the average annual growth 
rate of gross national product between 1980 and 1991, the ratio 
among China's eastern, central, and western regions is 
16.72:15.2:14.78 with the eastern region nearly 2 percent higher 
than the western region. The accumulative difference in rate of 
growth has again widened the once diminishing regional economic 
differences. 
  There are almost no changes in the ratio of population in 
China's eastern, central, and western regions during the past 
decade. Nevertheless there are notable changes in the ratio of 
gross national product in these regions. The ratio in 1980 was 
52.2:31.2:16.5. The ratio in 1991 was 55.8:29.3:14.9 with the 
ratio in the eastern region raised by 3.6 percent and the 
central and western regions lowered by 1.9 percent and 1.6 
percent respectively. Influenced by the differences in economic 
development, the gap in residents' incomes in various regions is 
also widening. Let us take the income of peasants as an example. 
The ratio in 1980 between the average per-capita income of 
peasants in five provinces and municipalities directly under the 
central government with the highest income and that of the five 
provinces and autonomous regions with the lowest income is 
1.98:1 (assuming the average per-capita income of peasants in 
the provinces and autonomous regions with the lowest income is 
1). These figures rose to 2.88:1 in 1991. As seen from the 
eastern, central, and western regions, the 1980 ratio of average 
per-capital income of peasants in these three regions was 
1.39:1.11:1; while that in 1991 rose to 1.71:1.06:1. 
  In China's existing economic structure, nearly half of the 
gross national product is contributed by secondary industry, and 
nearly 90 percent of the added value of secondary industry is 
contributed by industry (manufacturing industry). Therefore, the 
rate of industrial growth is extremely important in the 
development of the entire national economy. There are 
significant differences in the rate of industrial growth among 
the eastern, central, and western regions. The rate of average 
annual rate of growth between 1985 and 1990 was 1.39:1.05:1. 
This difference brought about changes in the regional structure 
in terms of total industrial output. The percentage in the 
eastern region rose from 60.3 percent in 1985 to 62.7 percent in 
1990, while that in the western region dropped from 12.75 
percent in 1985 to 11.91 percent in 1990. Due to various 
reasons, the growth rate of investment in fixed assets in 
central and western regions is relatively low. From the 
long-term investment point of view, this trend is not so 
favorable. The rates of growth of investment in fixed assets in 
China's eastern, central, and western regions from 1982 to 1991 
were 19.69 percent, 16.15 percent, and 18.18 percent. In 1991, 
61.46 percent of the additional investment in fixed assets was 
made in the eastern region. 
  Since the beginning of this year, China has continued to 
maintain a high rate of growth in its economic development. The 
gross national product in the first quarter rose by 14.1 percent 
over the same period in 1992. According to accumulative figures 
compiled from January to April, China registered a rate of 
growth of 23 percent in industrial production. However, the 
pattern of unbalanced economic developments in various regions 
remains unchanged. In some districts, economic development is 
still quite sluggish. Those areas that were economically 
backward in the past are still lagging behind others, and their 
ratio in economic increments continues to drop. The gaps between 
the eastern region and the western region and between the south 
region and the northern region continue to widen. Let us take 
industrial production as an example. According to accumulative 
figures compiled between January and April, the rates of 
industrial growth in the eastern, central and, western regions 
were 28 percent, 14.5 percent, and 13.6 percent respectively; 
and the increments in industrial production in the eastern 
region accounted for 77.5 percent of the total increments in 
industrial production. Jiangsu, Zhejiang, Fujian, Shandong, and 
Guangdong provinces alone made up 61 percent of the total 
increments in industrial production. According to accumulative 
figures compiled between January and April, the rates of growth 
of investment in fixed assets in state-owned units in the 
eastern, central, and western regions were 77.5 percent, 48.3 
percent, and 46.4 percent. About 70 percent of the increments of 
investment in fixed assets in state-owned units were in China's 
eastern region, and 44.7 percent of such increments were in 
Jiangsu, Zhejiang, Fujian, Shandong, and Guangdong provinces. 
<H5>  Reasons for Widening Regional Economic Differences </H5>
  There are objective reasons for the unbalanced development 
in 
China's different regions such as historical and natural 
conditions and so on. However, we must not neglect the influence 
of the macroeconomic policy on backward areas. 
  From the financial resources point of view, the state has 
placed emphasis on the development of China's coast areas in the 
eastern region since the implementation of the reform and 
opening up policy. Large investments are made with excellent 
economic results. Meanwhile, attracted by the high financial 
returns, funds have unceasingly flowed to the coastal areas in 
Southeast China from various localities. Let us take 
Heilongjiang Province as an example. Cash flowed out of the 
province totalled 1.3 billion yuan during the first quarter of 
this year alone. In 1992, funds flowed out of Shanxi Province to 
the coastal areas in the form of loans and fund-raising reached 
1 billion yuan. This flow of funds has provided the developed 
coastal provinces with ample funds for construction, while money 
supply falls far short of demand in backward regions. 
  From the industrial structure point of view, the central and 
western regions are important ones where there are abundant 
resources of energy and raw and semi-finished materials. These 
regions also supply major production facilities. In these 
regions, prices and production are more strictly controlled by 
the state plans, and there are more mandatory plans for 
production targets, while the processing industry is not well 
developed. Within the industrial structure in the eastern 
region, the processing industry and the industry of consumer 
goods are given priority. Production is almost completely 
regulated by the market. There are less state mandatory plans 
for production targets, and prices are set by enterprises 
themselves. Under the current situation whereby the pricing 
structure has not been rationalized, the central and western 
regions provide low-price energy and raw materials, while paying 
higher price to buy processed products and consumer goods. This 
has created a form of exchange at unequal value with the eastern 
region. Funds are being transferred to the eastern region from 
the central and western regions, thus hampering the economic 
development in the backward regions. 
  From the point of view of flow of professionally trained 
personnel, professionals and technical personnel have always 
been leaving the backward regions to the developed areas for the 
past ten and more years. Between 1983 and 1992, more than 5,000 
technical personnel of all kinds have been transferred out of 
Ningxia through the normal procedure. Between 1990 and 1992, 
6,638 cadres including 31 high-ranking and 566 middle-ranking 
professionals were transferred out of Xinjiang to work in other 
provinces. Among the transferred cadres, 56.4 percent of them 
were transferred to work in coastal cities, while 43.6 percent 
of them were transferred to work in large cities in China's 
interior provinces. The shortage of qualified personnel greatly 
affects the economic development and the process of 
modernization in central and western regions. 
  Under the conditions of the socialist market economy, it is 
impossible for China's different regions to develop with the 
same speed. Adequate regional differences are conducive to 
arousing the enthusiasm of various localities to develop their 
own economy and compete with one another. However, if the gaps 
are excessively wide and are continuously widening to create 
"polarization," such gaps may adversely affect economic, 
political, and social stability. Therefore, a major task of the 
state in exercising macroeconomic control is to make use of 
economic, administrative and legal means to keep the regional 
differences within the limits that are acceptable by the society. 
<H5>  Several Proposals </H5>
  1. Encourage Central and Western Regions To Look for 
New Fields for Economic Growth First of all, we must 
vigorously develop town and township enterprises. Right now, 40 
percent of per-capita peasants' net income in the country comes 
from non-farming industry, while 80 percent of such income in 
coastal developed areas comes from town and township 
enterprises. Meanwhile, the total output value in town and 
township enterprises in central and western regions accounts for 
less than 5 percent of that of town and township enterprises in 
the whole country. Therefore, the central and western regions 
must regard the development of town and township enterprises as 
an important measure to stimulate the economic development in 
these two regions and make use of local resources to manufacture 
their unique commodities. To further develop the economy in 
central and western regions, town and township enterprises there 
must undergo a stage of unusual development by leaps and bounds. 
Second, they must take advantage of their geographic 
superiority. Those backward areas in the border region have fine 
conditions to develop border trade. They must develop their 
local processing industry through border trade and turn their 
geographic advantage into industrial superiority and form an 
industrial structure that benefits both China and the 
neighboring country. Third, it is necessary to pay attention to 
commodity circulation and promote production. The scale of 
market affects the production scale. Thus, it also affects the 
economic scale. The key in promoting economic development is to 
attach importance to commodity circulation and marketing. The 
current major task of the central and western regions in paying 
attention to commodity circulation is to further improve the 
market structure. 
  2. Permit Central and Western Regions To Adopt More 
Flexible Measures in Implementing Policy on Ownership 
System. The ratio of the public economic sector, 
particularly the state-owned economic sector, is far greater in 
the central and western regions than that in the developed 
areas. Therefore, it is necessary to encourage the economic 
sector which is not state-owned, particularly the non-public 
owned economic sector, to develop itself. While making the 
state-owned economic sector predominant and regarding the 
public-owned economic sector as the mainstay, we must adopt all 
kinds of measures to promote the development of all other 
economic sectors. We should treat all other economic sectors on 
an equal basis. 
  3. Adequately Increase Investments in Central and 
Western Regions. Right now, China's eastern region is more 
capable of developing itself. The state may consider gradually 
shifting its investments westward, and increase investments in 
central and western regions with emphasis on communications, 
transportation, and energy, and raw material industries. While 
taking into consideration the mutual economic benefits in all 
regions, we must set up and develop a system of division of 
labor in various regions, encourage and support the processing 
industry with local raw materials, and force the processing 
industry in the eastern region to turn out more products with 
higher added value and high technology and export-oriented 
products in order to upgrade the industrial structure in China. 
  4. The State Must Not "Demand Uniformity in Everything" 
in Exercising Macro-Control. In exercising macroeconomic 
control, the state should give more preferential treatment to 
economically backward regions while taking into full 
consideration the actual situation in the backward regions where 
economic growth has just started and there are differences in 
economic development in different regions. The percentage of 
economic increments contributed by the backward regions is 
fairly small. These regions have little overall influence. If 
the measures adopted by the state in exercising macroeconomic 
control are excessively severe, they may deal severe economic 
blows to the backward regions, although their effects in cooling 
off the overheated national economy may not be so obvious. Many 
backward regions are worried that the policy and measures to 
"demand uniformity in everything" may "chop off the tails of the 
developed regions, while cutting off the heads of the backward 
regions" and that it will thus make the backward regions lose 
another opportunity to develop themselves. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-59327 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar004___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-004 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title:China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Wu Jinglian on Measures To Slow Inflation </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94CE0142A Chongqing GAIGE [REFORM] in Chinese No 5, 20 Sep 
93 pp 4-5 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0142A </F>
<F P=104>  Chongqing GAIGE [REFORM] </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Chinese </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wu Jinglian (0702 2417 8834): "Accelerate </F>
Coordinated Reforms of the Financial, Tax, and State-Owned 
Enterprise Systems"] 
  [Text] Since the latter part of last year, China's economy 
has shown signs of "overheating" and inflation. What is meant by 
the economy "overheating," from the perspective of the materials 
production system, is that certain sectors of the national 
economy can no longer support the going rate of growth. From the 
monetary point of view, meanwhile, an "overheated" economy 
refers to the rise in the overall price level; it means 
"inflation." Between July and August of 1992, there were clear 
signs of the economy overheating and of inflation. They could be 
seen in three areas: 1) Bottlenecks in the "tight sectors" such 
as communications and transportation, especially rail transport; 
energy, especially power supply; raw materials, especially 
construction materials, were even more restrictive. 2) 
Inflationary pressure found its way from M&lt;inf&gt; 2&lt;/inf&gt;  which 
had a low rate of circulation to M&lt;inf&gt; 0&lt;/inf&gt;  which had a high 
rate of circulation, and the retail price index began to rise. 
If we include the price of means of production, the price index 
would be even higher. 3) People began to expect inflation. For 
example, the sale of Phase II state treasury notes which paid 9 
percent annual interest was sluggish and the resale of Phase I 
and older treasury notes was at below face value; meanwhile, 
there were incidents of panic buying of gold, gold jewelry, and 
hard currencies (U.S. and Hong Kong dollar). These indicated 
that people were expecting the inflation rate to run at above 10 
percent. At the end of last year and early this year, inflation 
was obvious, or in the words of a newspaper, "inflationary 
pressure is being released": The overall price index of the 
workers' living expenses rose to double-digits; retail price 
index in the 35 large and medium-sized cities rose to around 15 
percent; RMB's exchange rate plummeted. At the same time, 
because there were no market rules and because of the 
expansionary monetary policy, China's stock market, real estate 
market, and the just-opened futures market created a "bubble 
economy." The situation clearly indicated that the financial 
chaos and the soaring rate of inflation were threatening our 
economic stability and the normal operations of businesses and 
industries. If proper measures were not taken, it could lead to 
serious economic turmoil. Under the circumstances, the 
government began to take steps in July to rectify financial 
order and lower the rate of increase in the money supply. 
Although we were a little late, we were heading in the right 
direction, and decisive action was necessary. 
  Current measures being taken can be separated into three 
levels: 1) Use of direct administrative controls, which include 
tightening the control over the loan quota, sorting out 
investments in basic construction projects and the development 
zones, and setting a deadline for retrieving illegal short-term 
loans. 2) Use of economic measures, which include raising the 
interest rate on loans again and resuming the opening of 
inflation-proof savings accounts. 3) Proceed with reform of the 
financial system. It has been a month since the introduction of 
the first measures, and judging by the current situation, 
although there have been some problems and difficulties, the 
overall situation is good: Price increases have slowed; foreign 
exchange prices have dropped; the "bubble economy" created by 
stocks and real estate has shrunk. If all goes well, the 
national economy may stabilize in the near future -- say, at the 
end of the year or early next year. But, whether things will 
turn out as expected will depend on whether the 
yet-to-be-introduced measures are correct and whether they can 
be effectively implemented. 
  The initial success so far is due mainly to the first level 
measures and some of the second level measures. Under conditions 
of extreme economic chaos, it is necessary to use some "hard 
measures" to quickly put the situation under control. But we 
must clearly understand that these administrative measures have 
limits as well as side effects. That is to say, one, after 14 
years of reform, China's finances have, in part, "come alives," 
which greatly diminishes the ability of administrative plans to 
control the economy. About 50 percent of the gathering and 
distribution of funds no longer go through the state banks' 
formal channels. Therefore, it will be a mistake to rely too 
heavily on administrative measures. Two, although we must make 
every effort to do what is right and avoid what is harmful, it 
is impossible to avoid being indiscriminate when using 
administrative measures, and so when we use administrative 
measures to cool the "overheated" parts of the economy, other 
parts which need even more support or are even "hotter" will 
often be affected, thus preventing the increase in supply. 
Furthermore, since the financial system has not undergone 
radical reform, some units may not be implementing state 
policies properly, and when that happens, what should be 
tightened may not tightened and what should not be tightened may 
be tightened. For example, some units may not take away funds 
used for real estate speculation but may take away necessary 
industries' and businesses' circulation funds, and this can 
cause serious consequences. 
  The effectiveness of the second type of measures is 1) 
constrained by the effectiveness of organizations and 
institutions manipulating those economic measures and 2) limited 
by defects in other economic mechanisms. Therefore, the success 
of those economic measures is predicated on reforms in other 
areas. Today, the more serious problems are: 1) Speculation in 
the bubble economy is yielding a high rate of return--100 
percent profit or better a year. This has resulted in large 
amounts of money being channeled to the stock, real estate, and 
futures markets for speculation purpose, thus exacerbating the 
shortage of funds needed by industries and businesses, and it 
also makes it difficult for the interest lever to function 
effectively. Therefore, as we tighten the money supply, we must 
increase the supply of financial goods, strengthen market order 
and management, and carefully release the air in the "bubbles." 
2) Foreign exchange reform is out of sequence (regular accounts 
are still using dual exchange rates and under administrative 
control, and meanwhile, capital circulation is very lax,) and as 
a result, our own currency is grossly undervalued and the 
masses' confidence in our currency is shaken, which adds to the 
inflationary momentum. We can remedy the situation in two ways: 
One, retract the order and change those methods that have 
loosened the control over the capital accounts. Another way is 
to accelerate the reform to make trade-related foreign exchange 
convertible. Personally, I favor the second method. 
  Since the root cause of this round of inflation is the slow 
pace of reform, the basic cure of course is to accelerate 
reform. Just as we have pointed out many times before, the root 
cause of today's accelerated inflation and widespread corruption 
is the very slow pace of reform of the taxation, financial, and 
state-owned enterprise systems, and so the solution is to 
accelerate reforms in those areas. In other words, not only must 
we speed up the restructuring of the financial system, we must 
also speed up the reform of the tax system and the restructuring 
of the state-owned enterprise system. Moreover, reforms in these 
areas must be coordinated, because only then can we quickly set 
up the basic frame work of a market economy and give play to the 
market economy's overall ability to allocate resources properly. 
Therefore, it is imperative that we focus on the research and 
study of a coordinated reform program, and once the program is 
formulated, we must immediately get organized and quickly begin 
its implementation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
